Don't Waste Money. I am always up for a new genre of film, but the reviews here are misleading. The basic plot of the movie is that life sucks (yeah thats it). The rest of it is just sick. If your really into perversion then okay you'd probably get more out of it then I did, but for the viewers who haven't been almost raped by their fathers, or killed their grandparents or shot themselves in public this isn't the movie for you. If you still want to see the movie try and get it from netflix or borrow it from a friend before you dish out the cash
Not so good. I'm a big fan of Jamie Kennedy's work with The Experiment!!  And Brad Gluckman is one of my favourite characters so I went out and bought the film.  It's no where as near as good as The Experiment. The film falls short of expectations in a fundamental way - he's not winding anyone up.  Well I suppose there is a limit with what you can do with this character, he's just not made for film.
Rachel is worth it. I was very excited to see this, having seen the original cast (lead by Marin Mazzie and Brian Stokes Mitchell) on broadway. For some reason the energy of this cast does not transfer into the audience. Brent Barrett, I'm sorry to say, is a sad replacement for Stokes. Nancy Anderson (who has been wonderful in other roles) is squeaky and annoying in this one.The one reason I'd give to watch this is Rachel York, who seems to be perfect in just about every role she takes on. I saw and loved Marin Mazzie, but Rachel York can certainly hold her own. She has a wonderful voice, amazing comic timing, and is quite beautiful on top of it all. She embodies Lily Vanessi brilliantly in this production. It's just a shame that her fellow cast-members can't do the same
Not for weight loss. This DVD is fine for beginners who would like some stretching, but there is no weight loss aspect to it. I felt deceived by a cheap marketing ploy that appealed to my desire to lose weight
The Men who Fought for the Honor of Saving America's Worst Actor. After its disturbing and frighteningly chaotic opening sequence, this film swiftly degenerates into another typically stupid, arrogant AMERICAN war film.  Spielberg is a great director, and deserved praise for the opening sequence alone, but what could he do with a screenplay that is little more than a boring melodrama with stereotypical characters who all die in increasingly gruesome ways.  Without the massive buckets of blood, why would we want to watch?  This film is NOT reality, and the fact that it pretends to be reality is offensive to me.  Hollywood's God-complex is its undoing.  Okay lets all pat ourselves on the back one last time for being "brave" enough to revel in the glorious bloody pulp of war.  In my opinion, this film is like a horror film with a bad plot.  Imagine having to fight, bleed, and die all kinds of horrific ways for the honor of saving Matt freakin' Damon.  Just thinking about it makes me want to go watch the ending of The Departed again.  There's a movie with an ending that will leave you smiling
Can't believe I wasted my time!. This wasn't a very entertaining movie at all. I guess I am one that likes to be happily entertained when I actually find the time to spend ~2 hrs in front of a movie and this just didn't do it. I was annoyed most of the time I watched it. The ending stunk too. Like another reviewer pointed out, Jennifer A.'s character had all these things she wanted him to learn, and then, when he 'goes there', she still walks away. Don't waste your time!
I wish I could go lower than this. This is horrendous movie. I will never claim it as the movie of my generation. It's one of the many reasons why I absolutely hate the "80's". The others are:Breakdancing, The Yuppie lifestyle,Power hungry businessmen/women, Women with manly handshakes, New Wave Music, and junk movies like this. I know that the main character is nothing less than a manipulator who is only concerned about himself, and what he can get out of life. He ridicules his friend because he's sick, and doesn't feel like driving Ferris around...especially in a Ferrari that mysteriously gets lost in the parking garage, so what am I left to believe I have to wonder if this is where Ice Cube got the inspiration for "It Was A Good Day". I don't care what decade it was, or what was cool back then, or now manipulating your friends is "NOT" I repeat"NOT" cool. I know with John and Johnette Q. Public this is something of a sexual relase. I could picture private parts of men and women everywhere getting soaking wet from this movie, and I find it so repulsive that everyone out there finds this funny.
What it ain't. Well, it ain't noir! Ellroy should sue for what has been done to his book.What it is: It's incomprehensible, because most of the actors cannot enunciate. It's poorly acted - would someone please give Hartnett a day job away from the camera? It's campy. I haven't see a night club show like the All Lesbian Busby Berkeley Tribute in this movie since Robert Preston did his gig in Victor/Victoria. At least Preston had the talent and material to be funny. Here it was pointless, it served no purpose at all. It's overly complicated. Complex works great in the book, but on film all the subplots confuse and ultimately disappoint. And the camera work of the two men falling between the staircases was just too, too De Palma. I literally went, "oh, there's the trademark." Talk about suspending disbelief-- fuhgeddaboudit!What it is, is a really bad movie.
Difficult!. Am I the only one who found the basic workout difficult? The pace was too quick for me to get the right technique in the poses and even though I have done this workout several times now, my back almost always is very painful for at least 24 hours afterward. I have found that, apart from a few exercises, the intermediate workout is easier
our  daily bear. i gave one star beacuse it is not color this very old movies i want some in color about depression i have the prombleof the derpression   of you have any movies about this please let me kno
Great 80's time capsule, but a fairly lousy movie. Less Than Zero was hailed all over the place when it was released....hailed by all but the critics. Sure, it did fair box office, because it had some of the "hip" actors of the day appearing in it AND because it was based on THE hip book (I was right there living it too!).The unfortunate aspect of the film is that neither the script, the actors, nor the directer ever really provide us with a "baseline" from which we can launch any sympathy for Julian (Downey Jr.). We see he, Clay (McCarthy) and Blair (Gertz) all graduate high school, but we don't know what they were like IN high school. Therefore, as we are thrust into Julian's ever downward spiraling drug habit, we don't know if this is normal or not.Clay and Blair dated through high school. Julian was their best friend. All three come from obscenely wealthy and priviledged West coast families with little in the way of family values to show them their way in life. Everything has been handed to them and that was it - no real parenting apparently ever took place.After Clay leaves LA to go East to an ivy league school, Julian and Blair start bedding each other. Even though Blair is contemptible for her actions, it appears that she and Clay are the only two in this film who have any real sense of responsibility and Blair realizes hers late in the film.Julian's daddy gave him tons of money to start a business and Julian lost it all on drugs and partying. He's been "homeless" ever since, sleeping in parks and at friends houses when he can. In the process, his drug habit has gone from coke to crack and possibly a little heroin along the way. Where does he get it all? Why their high school friend, Rip (Spader) of course. He's not only a major drug dealer, but apparently does some pimping of women and men on the side. Julian is in for $50K to Rip and the only way he can work it off is to turn tricks with guys....Aint this all uplifting and exciting? Well, it has its exciting moments. And when you consider all the action in this film takes place over Clay's college Christmas break, it's all the more distressing.The film effectively captures the ambiance of privileged college kids gone wild in the 80's. The clothing and the excess is all very very real. It's a shame that the film just never lets us feel too sorry for Julian. I wanted to shake him or kick his rear end. What a tool! And Clay and Blair...? If I'd been them, I'd have kicked ol' Julian to the curb long before - what a bore taking care of a drug addict (forgive me my seeming lack of concern, but I have ACTUALLY taken care of a drug addicted friend - it gets old really quickly...the lies, etc.).Anyway, if you allow the script's lack of a true emotional center, then I have to complain about one further thing: Andrew McCarthy. I have never understood why he was a working actor of such popularity. Downey Jr. (amazing in this film, because it was at one of his greatest times of drug abuse - which makes it a true case of art imitating life and vice versa) and Gertz are fine in the film. But McCarthy...I've never thought him capable of acting his way out of a wet paper sack. There's nothing going on there. No emotion. No sense of urgency other than when he moves quickly. His face is blank, completely vacuous...Anyway, buy this for its value as a real time capsule into some of the excesses of the 80's but don't get it because it's a great film or for any DVD extras, because what's there is slim to none - mostly various versions of the film's trailer.
"Is That All There Is?". I generally admire Jennifer Aniston's work so I picked this up when the video store offered a second rental free with the purchase of two bags of popcorn.  Sadly, watching the popcorn pop was more interesting than the movie.  If you went to sleep after the first 10 minutes, you would't miss much since nothing really happens.  If it's a comedy, it isn't funny. If it's a slice of life, the lives are deadly dull.  The emotional level is so low-key you suspect the entire group is on valium.  Jenifer Aniston especially, seems to have phoned this one in.Real characters?  As it happens, I've known thousands of real people over the years and not a one bears the slightest resemblance to any of these sad-sack characters.  If they're actually representative of real Americans then we're in big trouble!  My wife & I had the same reaction at the end of this one ..... "THAT"S IT??!!"
Not for Young Kids. I saw this movie a long time ago and had forgotten all but the basic plot.  I recently purchased the DVD thinking it would be a fun movie for my younger kids (9, 8, and 6) to watch.  Also, it was rated "PG" so I thought it would be pretty safe.  I was wrong.  While the plot is innocent enough, the language was atrocious.  I couldn't believe this thing was rated PG and not at least PG-13.  Be advised that if you don't want your kids to hear a lot of cursing throughout a movie, then this is not for you
time to pull the life support on this trash. i can't believe that they got money to make this "movie"(i use that term loosly). the plot has more holes than you can count and the worst excuse for a reason to start a killing spree that i have ever seen. not even worth the price of a rental. just long and slow. you have been warned
ruined by its own precocity. Set in 1986, Ballad tells the tale of an ailing wealthy counterculture environmentalist (Jack) and his teenage daughter (Rose) living on an abandoned commune. Years ago it was prospering but all the members have left, including jack's wife, and only Jack and Rose remained. They spend their days in quiet contentment, gardening, farming --and launching two-man guerilla attacks on a housing development on the other side of the island.Living in near isolation, jack and rose develop an incredibly close bond, one that threatens to become incestuous. Terrified of this development, Jack asks his secret mainland girlfriend and her two teenage sons to live with them. The new 'guests' are an unwelcome development to Rose's life. She's incredibly possessive of her father and in retaliation for this intrusion, she tries to seduce the two boys and kill Kathleen (the girlfriend). jack is at wit's end eventually, things cannot go on as they were nor can they continue to coexist in the new situation. He has two choices neither of which are idyll.This is where the movie goes awry. The movie keeps everything to a very natural level, no overwrought music, and overreactions. This works for most of the movie yet these events are too alarming for the characters to ignore. After Rose tries to shoot Kathleen, all the characters choose to ignore Rose's unhealthy jealousy. They blame her behavior as wild child-ism, the result of being isolated from society for too long. And while this is the case, it is also annoying. The Rose character is too much of a petulant child instead of a wild child. As her acts became increaingly dangerous, the more I wanted someone to finally tell her enough is enough. The character of Jack is equally unlikable. He chooses to ignore his daughter's unhealthy attachment and when he does fully accept it, he continues to encourage it. This may be a fully organic development of the characters and their relationship, but that doesn't mean it's entertaining. Despite the controversial relationship, the movie vacillates between smug and boring.The performances are good, my favorite are those of Paul Dano, Ryan MacDonald, and Catherine Keener as the girlfriend and her two sons, there's a naturalness to their acting that is oddly lacking in the depictions of Jack and Rose. Perhaps that is intentional. Jack and Rose are not as much real people as they are idealized environmentalist versions of a fairytale king and his daughter, living in grand isolation until the advent of the evil stepmother, Kathleen. Only in this case the stepmother isn't evil and the new family is more entertaining then the main characters.There is an extraneous subplot with Beau bridges as a housing developer that serves as metaphorical commentary on Jack and Rose's reltionship, but like the rest of the movie it's too smug to be meaningful.
Fine Cast but Movie Struggled. This is a movie about coming to terms with the death of a loved one. Diane Floss gets murdered as she enters adulthood after getting caught in someone else's domestic dispute (wrong place, wrong time)...The movie centers around her father (Dustin Hoffman), her mother (Susan Sarandon) and her fiancee (Jake Gylenhaal), and how they all cope with the grief. Mother and father want to hold onto as much of their daughter as possible and as a result, find it hard to let go of their would-be son-in-law...This movie should have been good - the subject matter is an excellent starting point and together with  a fine cast should give you 'gold' but, it is slow and the diaglogue is 'awful' in places. Hoffman does his best to hold this movie together and Gylenhaal gives a fine performance. Sarandon over-acted but this may be a result of having to work with such a poor script. You can tell a good movie, when you care so much about the characters that you don't want the movie to end...I left with little feelings about each character and could have easily switched this movie off half-way through...I think that Hoffman and Sarandon will only remember this one for the 'pay-cheque'..
disapointed. i was verry disapointed to see this movie because i wanted to see the  real movie and not a musical movie.i'm still looking for the real real movie but still can't find it
ONLY FOR LUCY/DESI DIEHARDS!. This is a terrible movie. When it came out in 1956 it was a box office bomb even though both stars were at the height of their powers. Time had only added to it's mediocrity
Terrible Movie - Dont waste your time!. This is the worst movie I have seen all year. It was hard to follow what was happening - you couldn't tell what was real or not. The movie made no sense. Total waste of time to watch - it will leave you total confused in the end. Nothing was real
TOO HOT IN B&W SHOULD BE IN COLOR. this movie was shot and released in eastmancolo
Not really bad but could've been a lot better. The series' main flaw is the repetetiveness of the storylines, somehow even though I watched the episodes back-to-back I still felt deja-vu. The plot wouldn't advance for episodes, and I think this is what caused the ratings to plummet, they took too long to flesh out the plot so, the fans grew bored. Also, what contributed to my feelings was the showing of several identical slides in every episode! That said, it still was a fun watch, the bonds shared by the twins, Chobi, Lisa, and the enigmatic Kaze are really interesting and often funny(when not pertaining to Kaze of course). Also, the villians were not malevoloent, just mischevious which only served to affirm my opinion that this anime is more oriented towards kids. I'm not sure about the mechanism used to rate if it's final fantasy or not, but I think the fact that they had crammed all the plot twists in the last episode contributed to the criticisms, I think if the animators took some of the sub-plots out and focused on the storyline this series would've been good, instead of just decent. As it is, it's still fun, and at a bargain price; if you have nothing better to do, go ahead and watch it!(2.5 stars
Awful. I thought this movie was absolutely awful.It is one of the worst movie's I have seen in quite a while.You keep waiting for the movie to get interesting, but it never does.I don't recommend this movie, especially not to a guy, he would be bored out of his mind by this one
Where is he going with all this?. Noam has been around for quite some time and has a wide audience of follwers. Mr. Chomsky is highly critical of US foreign policy. He attacks both, the right and the left. The world is very complicate due to human nature not Noam Chomsky's political/linguistic analysis.He has many adherents, especially from well known universities, including Berekley. But, Mr. Chomsky is marking his arguments in the form of speeches, books, dvds. Yes, the truth must come out. HE IS MAKING MONEY.......Lots of it!People need to be more, not less, informed. And, they don't necessarily and should not be totally absorbed by Chomsky's politics. I find Chomsky's following, from two conflicting levels, humorous in nature and tunnel vision in nature. Humorous because people don't think for themselves. Tunnel vision because people don't think for themselves.We humans have been in conflict from day one. We don't need Chomsky to remind us of this. Being an independent thinker is so important and critically rewarding; yet, many "scholars" make the same mistake: they look to others for validation. They almost cannot think for themselves.America is a great nation. We should honor all that is good, question what is not, and support and strengthen this great nation
Warners day off. I am a huge fan of the old MGM musicals and have been more that happy with the restoration quality on every DVD transfer issued by Warners in the MGM library. The release of the "Dream Factory" collection is a fine example. These films could have been photographed yesterday ("Summer Stock" is a pure delight to watch in terms of picture quality). "Barkleys of B'way" unfortnately does not live of to the exceptional quality acheived on other films of this genre.The DVD picture quality is very poor and dull and the sound is very muted. I was so dissappointed in this treatment. The DVD appears to have simply transfered the Video to DVD. No restoration to the picture is at all apparent. Even the trailer looks better than the movie.The extras are fine and I can't complain here but hey Warners, what were you thinking when you tackled this gem. Someone must have been taking a sickie!Sorry Fred and Ginger.
This goes waaaay too far - unrated version. First of all - even though most of my friends hate them - I must admit that I do enjoy watching some good horror flicks. My DVD collection is also primarily concentrating on this genre. Besides classics, such as "Psycho", "The Haunting (original)", "Rosemary's Baby", "The Exorcist", "The Omen (original)", "The Shining", "The Changeling", "Halloween", "Alien" and "The Evil Dead". I also enjoy more recent flicks, such as "The 6th Sense", "The Others", "The Ring (US version)", "The Grudge (US version)" "The Descent", "Dawn Of The Dead (Remake)" and "TCM 2003 Remake".The Problem with "The Beginning" is, thatA. the viewer knows that nobody will survive this massacre the second the movie starts. Which leads to the fact that no hero can be found in this movie!B. Nobody gets to know why Leatherface turned out this way. Damn, they could've atleast shown some flashbacks or a decent intro as e.g.in "House Of Wax".C. There is waaaay too much unnecessary gore and therefore lack of true suspense.These facts, especially the last, make this movie a over the top gorefest in the same league as "Wolf Creek", "High Tension", "Hostel" and "Saw (Sequels)". As one re-viewer stated. Horror movies should entertain by giving the viewer bonechilling suspense and a few good scares. This movie sadly couldn't succeed, due to unnecessary gore, splatter and blood. I don't need that
This set blowwwwws. This set was produced way too early. Disney made too few of these sets (although at the time it was released only 15 percent of Americans had a DVD Player) To further insult Disney fans they put in a stupid sequel? I mean come on, just put in Lion King 1 at least, or a movie that was a little older. This set should be burned, I'm a collector and I don't even think personally that it has any collector value as all the movies are being released (Lady & the Tramp on 2/28/06 and Little Mermaid 10/06) So whatever, wait for the PLATINUM 2 Disc Sets. I still have my 101 Dalmations on Laserdisc :)
not what we expected. Ordered this for my 2 year old. I didn't realize it was only about the number 2. I thought it was learning about numbers, part 2 and would involved numbers one through 10. So perhaps this was my mistake. Gets a bit tedious. My 2 year old got bored with it, because he also expected it to cover other numbers
Annoying Mill Creek Logo. The selection of movies in this collection is mediocre at best, but  that's more or less expected. What isn't is the Mill Creek logo which pops up (in COLOR) about every 15 or 20 minutes. Since the movies are all or nearly all in B&W, this is impossible to ignore and quite irritating. If this sort of thing bugs you, be warned.
Avoid if you like Vampire Movies, and if you want to see good acting. There are very few movies that I haven't finished watching.  This now goes on the short list.  Luckily I didn't rent this one and instead was excited to see it on TiVo, that is until after 30+ minutes in I was hoping a vampire would kill me.This film while it has an R rating and there is a reason why, even the toned down TV version was extremely graphic, from pulling out someone's tongue, watching a vampires head blow up and catch fire in the sun to blood spray.  There isn't anything wrong with a good horror movie but graphic violence to fill time (so you don't have to have actors say anything) seems a bit of a waste.The premise of a rag tag bunch of vampire hunters joining forces to defeat evil could have been a great movie.  But, the low budget, director chosen and filming of this movie won't make it a classic on anyone's list.In addition the movie was WAY OVERACTED.  I don't know if everyone was trying to make the film better or what but the overacting made it to the point that it made the acting look horrible.  It got to the point I no longer cared who won a battle.As I said this is one of less than a dozen movies I have been looking forward to seeing that I couldn't even finish.Gets 1 star cause I can't give it less
Not good. This was not Miami Vice. It was a cop movie with the same characters as the tv show. I realize they were trying to make an updated version of the show, but they updated it so much that it wasn't the show at all. Fox and Colin were not a goo match up on the screen. It felt like they weren't even in the same movie.
Hendrix?. I really thought this movie sucked, so much so that I couldn't watch the whole thing.  I have been a Hendrix fan for a long time, and he is my biggest influence and musical idol.  So naturally I was dissapointed when the actor playing Hendrix was not even playing the guitar; not to mention the studio musician they used for the guitar work was channeling texas blues, maybe SRV.  It didn't even sound like Hendrix.  And as has been mentioned, they didn't get the rights to any actual Hendrix songs, so the soundtrack didn't include any of Jimi's original music(how absurd is that?).Personally the movie offended me; this movie is useless to anyone who already knows anything about Jimi.  And worse, to someone who does not know anything about Jimi, the movie portrays him as a corny goofball who stumbles into stardom.  I mean you can listen to the dialogue by the lead actor and you can tell which individual interviews he studied to prepare for the role; yet when he delivers these lines, he sounds like such a loser.  When Hendrix spoke, he was certainly a little out there sometimes, but he was cool.  He spoke the language of the 60's.  This actor definitely lost something in the translation.I would recommend that you not see this movie; for the same price you could purchase something valuable, like the documentary "Jimi Hendrix" (1973?).  This actually has some really good clips of live concert footage.  Honestly, I would recommend that anyone who wants to learn more about Jimi should just buy as much of his music as you can afford and listen to it.  That is what Jimi Hendrix was about; creating revolutionary music.  If you want to get into the story of his life, which was quite sad, read a biography or something."Hendrix" does not focus nearly enough on Jimi's music (clearly, they didn't get the rights to!) and instead tries to make a drama of his lifestory, and seems to do that very poorly too.  Zero Stars
This movie's horrible. This movie is so bad, Kids should not see it. It's like a kidergarden student wrote this movie! You know what they shouldve put in? How about characters not liscenced, bad guys, talking animals, and a better backstory. They shouldve called the movie "The Amazing Missing Dog Adventure", Which was probaly what they had in mind before they thought, "No wait! Make it about Arthur! We already ruiend Casper and Barbie, Now let's do the same thing with Arthur." And that's right, it's by Mainframe Entertainment
Shame on Showzen. For an incredibly amazing, hilarious show, it is a shame that something that is normally closed-captioned when aired on television is not really captioned when released to DVD. Amazon says it is closed captioned, but there is nothing on the DVD box that indicates it is. Using this information, I went ahead and purchased it anyway, only to find out it was not at all. Who is really at fault I don't know, and yes I am definately bitter
AN Awfull Film. I turned it off after 20 minutes
An ironic anachronism, replete with Hollywood PC shibboleths. You can tell this movie was released in 1998 because you can still see New York's Twin Towers standing, and because of the groveling incantations of "Islam is a religion of peace," repeated often enough (along with casting a Good Guy Arab Cop, Tony Shalhoub) to offset any PC-incorrect image of portraying Islamofascist terrorism.A measure of how silly this movie appears from the rearview mirror of 2006 and all the ghastly Islamofascist atrocities since 9/11 is the first terrorist scene in the movie, where Denzel Washington as FBI agent tries, via megaphone, to talk the terrorists down from a hostage situation. He succeeds in getting the terrorists to let children exit the bus. Jihadis with a conscience -- now where have we ever seen this actually happen - Beslan (186 children killed)? London? Madrid? Mumbai? Only as old people start to exit the bus on a second appeal by Denzel does the bus blow up.After a series of bombings in New York's supermarkets, movie theaters, restaurants, etc., pressure builds to call in the U.S. Army under martial law. Bruce Willis, the Army commander who is to take on this task, warns time and again that this isn't the proper role of the Army, but then, as one of the President's advisors explains in the movie, as if this is just one of those political things, the "President wants to appear presidential." Remember, this is 1998, and though critics of the movie, such as the New Yorker, refer to Willis's character as a "fascist U.S. Army general", the decision to grant him martial law authority would have been, ahem, none other than Bill Clinton. The movie slides by that little detail, however, to make it look like Willis, all on his own, is rounding up all able-bodied men of the Muslim persuasion (less draconian, by the way, than the rounding up of all Japanese-Americans on the West Coast by FDR, where the threat was less real and imminent than in this movie, but let's not talk about that, either; we're still in 1998, after all).Of course, the CIA comes in for its usual whipping by Hollywood, where CIA agent Annette Bening has kept crucial facts to herself because she has personal scores to settle -- you see, she is the one who trained and armed some of these terrorists who are now running amok. Oh, yeah, sure, women-hating Al-Qaeda types would allow somebody like pretty Annette to train them!But the best nonsense comes at the end: Denzel Washington and a handful of FBI agents rush into Army combat HQ and somehow surround Bruce Willis and pull their guns, saying he is under arrest for "violating the Constitution" (hey, why aren't they arresting the guy who ordered the martial law, Bill Clinton?). The general's clueless security detail also draws its guns, and there's a Mexican standoff. Denzel, using the same powers of persuasion that freed at least the kiddies from Islamofascist murder on the bus, appears to be succeeding in talking the Army soldiers out of using their guns to protect Willis. So Willis accepts the situation, allows himself to be arrested, and as the credits roll we see all these Army vehicles leaving Brooklyn in shame -- all it took was to bust the "fascist" general. Ta-dah!So the movie, with a heap of literary license, proves at least one point at the end: back in the 1990s, it didn't take much for Bill Clinton to wuss out and avoid taking on the terrorists.Meanwhile, some day, sooner or later, the idea of pre-emptive internment of Jihad-age Muslim men as a defensive measure will indeed catch on, if not here, then perhaps in France, the Netherlands, Russia, Israel -- it will be interesting to see who goes first. Because it is not just the Newtonian laws of physics that decree that for every action there is an equal and opposite reaction. When they do the sequel to this preposterous movie in New York sans the World Trade Center, Willis will play the part of the hero, and whoever gets stuck with the FBI agent role will be the fool.I give the movie two stars instead of one, because I would hate to discourage the making of such a sequel, and two, because any movie with Annette Bening in it automatically gets an extra star in my book
What the..... Honestly, nothing about this show grabs me. I'm surprised this show gets such high Nielsen ratings every week. The writers tend to come up with similar stories all the time. But the biggest flaw is the acting. It is really laughable. Me and my friends watch this sometimes to laugh at how ridiculous everyone seems to be. Horatio Caine talks in a slow drawl all the time, saying the stupidest and most obvious things. Calleigh is always smiling at everyone and everything up to the point it gets irritating. None of the C.S.I team displays any emotion whatsoever, oh...except Horatio when he over does it.The stories are also terribly boring and utterly predictable. If there's a V.I.P suspect with a "history" with Horatio, yup...you guessed it, he's involved (either directly or indirectly). And also, if the suspect appears in about 10 minutes into the show...yea, it's not him. And Calleigh gets "evidence" such as DNA from saliva etc almost every episode using her sexuality. I mean, once or twice is alright...but I've seen about 8-10 episodes and she does it all the time. Every criminal here is an idiot, they are sure to leave all kinds of huge "clues" leading to them or their alliances. And every crime gets solved all the time. Oh, and is it just me or does the C.S.I team seem to know everything under the sun at their fingertips, no need for books or researching, they already have it that big brain of theirs. Think that's unlikely? Exactly my point.In short, I wouldn't move appointments or hurry home to watch this show. In fact, even if someone gives me this DVD set as a gift, I would probably keep it aside or maybe present it to someoene else. Watch this show if you're REALLY bored, with nothing else to do and no better use of your time. If you want real Crime Scene Investigation, watch the original C.S.I, Las Vegas. That's the best C.S.I....period
An arrogant waste of time. I liked Ocean's Eleven but this movie was just ridiculous.  Someone seemed to think that if you get enough big celebrities in one place and try to make it "stylish" you'll have a good film.  Unfortunately, the plot, dialogue, and even the internal logic of the plot is just poorly done.  The clever banter isn't clever.  The plot is slow and dull.  And without giving too much away (although you really should pass on this movie!) there is a plot twist involving the Julia Roberts character that is so ridiculous as to be arrogant.  Overall, a terrible film and a terrible waste of everybody's time
Flat "acting", no energy. Poor casting, poor acting, unconvincing characters. The leading lady had no energy. There was no excitement, sexual or otherwise. Boring. One of King's worst. In contrast, I found King's "Swimming Naked" (Red Shoe Diaries) to be enjoyable. The acting wasn't great, but the stories were mildly entertaining and the nude scenes very pleasant
Interesting Premise Based on Celebrities' Secret Fantasy, But Still Needs More Thrills and Actions. `Paparazzi,' produced by 20th Century Fox and Mel Gibson's Icon Productions, looks exactly like any celebrity's secret fantasy. But making someone's secret fantasy into a film is not a bad thing at all. What I disliked about `Paparazzi' is not the lack of wit or insight into the `jobs' of paparazzi - oh, that's so easy to guess - but the lack of storytelling skill, or its payoff as entertainment. In other words, the story about the rising Hollywood star Bo Laramie who is badly treated by the paparazzi and his secret payback plans is neither thrilling nor intense as revenge fantasy.Yes, I understand. Some paparazzi (if not all) deserve to suffer such a bitter fate as those persistent cameramen who stalk and harass the new Hollywood action star Bo Laramie (Cole Hauser) and his family. I know some cameramen really do annoying things, and provoke celebrities on purpose in the same way as the mean and sleazy `journalist' Rex Harper (Tom Sizemore) does to Bo and his son. And suppose his beloved son and wife are hospitalized because of those paparazzi, what should he do?[CLUMSY PACE AND UNDERWHELMING PAYOFFS] `Paparazzi' is a revenge fantasy that is part based on the reality in Hollywood, and the tragic death of Princess Diana. You just cannot discuss this kind of exploitation film from a moral perspective because these films are purely entertainment in which we see the good guys rewarded and bad guys punished. And I like these films from the days of Charles `Death Wish' Bronson.`Paparazzi,' however, does not let us wallow in this guilty pleasure fantasy enough. In other words, the actions (or Bo's revenge) are not thrilling enough and neither are the payoffs. Trashy or not, any revenge story must have good amount of thrills in it in order to really taste sweet. But the taste of `Paparazzi' is only mild at best. It does not give us enough taste of honey because several ruses Bo uses to trap these paparazzi are too far-fetched and even tame, and those paparazzi are also too easy a target for him.Bo oversteps the mark because they overstepped it. This questionable formula works only when it does not give enough time for us to think. In spite of its short running time (that barely exceeds 80 minutes), however, `Paparazzi' kills its potentially interesting story by its slow and clumsy pace, heavy-handed direction that does not know the right way to tell an intriguing story, and disappointing acting from Hauser and Sizemore.The only thing I find interesting is the cameos from Mel Gibson, Vince Vaughn, Chris Rock, and Matthew McConaughey. Otherwise, `Paparazzi' lacks power and action that those revenge fantasy should have
Say what?. Nicole Kidman gives an absolutely lifeless performance as the interpreter of the title in this curiously flat Sidney Pollack film. THE INTERPRETER is unique as it is the only film ever shot on location inside the United Nations building in New York.Kidman plays Sylvia Broome, a minority White expatriate from a politically torn racially-mixed African nation. Members of her family have died due to the violence in her native land, and other friends and relatives who have remained behind are backing one or another contender for the Presidency of the fictional country. Kidman becomes the centerpiece of a massive international investigation after she ovehears discussion of an assassination plot against the despotic President, who is scheduled to address the United Nations. Sean Penn plays the govenment agent who is assigned to simultaneously protect Kidman, foil the plot, and find out what she really knows and where she really stands.THE INTERPRETER has all the elements to make up a grand espionage drama, but Pollack and the all-star cast fail to ignite this film. THE INTERPRETER should have worked but it doesn't, leaving it the sort of film that cries out for a remake the day shooting wraps. The story plods along at an elephantine pace; the willowy Kidman is too morally ambiguous to gain the audience's sympathy; Sean Penn is convincing but cranky. No one seems to speak over a murmur even at the most dramatic moments. The contrivance of a fictional country is far too quaint for the world-is-the-size-of-a-grape 21st century. In the end, the requisite suspense simply never builds, leaving THE INTERPRETER an intelligent, well-made, well-acted, and supremely boring film.
Three hours you'll never get back. I can only imagine how painful it must of been to &quot;act&quot; in this film. After the first half hour it was like a train crash to watch. Do anything you can to get out of sitting through this
Mediocre comedy. Having seen the movie once I would definitely say that I will never come back to it again. May be I have overgrown this kind of movies. But still it is more for kids than for adults. It is a disaster if you compare it with the top French comedies with Belmondo, Richard, de Funes, etc
Mud. Slow,dull and done on the "cheap"....stick with "Zulu" and read your history book's ....far more entertaining
Hallmark does it again....drag out drama. The standard Hallmark background music plays for hours on end. The world seems to be coming to an end due to a super nova. This mini-series will never come to an end.Do we tell?Who do we tell?Is there an evil plot to the end?Will Dr. Austin Sheppard (Peter Fonda) find time enough for love?Will an evil being abduct Brooke and Haley?Do we really care?We get to watch some great acting by Tia Carrere, born on 1967 as Althea Janairo, 11 years after she gained acknowledgement in the blockbuster film "True Lies" (1994). And let's not forget Peter Fonda who played Frank in "The Passion of Ayn Rand" (1999).
Not good... Just rented this dvd and was quite surprised.  Normally, I'm a big George Clooney and Matt Damon fan.  However, in this film, their talents were underutilized and did not make up for the poor script, editing, and direction which made this film quite dull to watch.While the idea behind the movie is good, it could have been more entertaing, dramatic, or suspensful.  As another reviewer remarked, I was quite tempted to shut it off after 45 minutes and watch something else.  But, I did suffer through to the end, where the film just sort of ends and leaves viewers hanging..
THE BALL WAS DROPPED!!!!!. Watch Phantasm 1 2 and 3 and 4 in that order and it's clear how badly the later 2 suck compared to one and 2 and as horror movies on there own. They shoudn't have even made a sequel without James Legros and the girl. Legros is a better Mike then Baldwin will ever be. We saw Baldwin as a kid and that was fine but kicking Legros out for 3 and 4 and putting back Baldwin was a bad move.Finally as much as I loved Reg he dies in number 2 so no continuity and a serious lack of seriousness make 3 and 4 poor poor sequels.In Hellraiser you ever see Pinhead crack a joke with any human characters/victims or do they purpously try to make you laugh no thats why it's a horror! After wathing 3 and 4 you'll feel that a sphere just drilled through your brain!!
Another teen movie, by adults, that hates kids. Never mind's that it's pretty stupid - "John Tucker Must Die," like a lot of movies about high-schoolers, actually hates high school and just about everybody in it, and by extension, American kids; it's the kind of movie that, if parents caught an hour of it, would make them think less of their children for watching it, and to a fearsome extent, pretending to live it out. Early in the movie one character, a cheerleader, remarks about stealing her mother's estrogen pills: "Well, guys use steroids to build their pecs." That estrogen will do the same for the cheerleader's breasts is laughable, but considering the hot debate of steroid use among kids - considering kids have died or flown into abusive rages while using them - that could be most casual, sickening line of the year.But it is what to expect from Hollywood screenwriters in their 30s who write exploitative trash for money then have the artistic gall to call it mild, girlie comedy - not unlike those fabulous "Laguna Beach" hacks who use insidious, and I mean insidious, editing techniques to create faux docudrama among teens with facial expressions and confused responses clearly mismatched, again and again in the sloppiest manner, to the previous line of dialogue. "JTMD" asks us to believe that the title character (Jesse Metcalf) simultaneously dates three women (Ashanti, Sophia Bush, Arielle Kebbel) without them knowing it, is able to afford repeated dinners at the nicest restaurant in town, owns a great car, stays in four-star hotels for high-school basketball road games, and my personal favorite, owns and drives a yacht. He and his brother have no parents to speak of.Neither do the three girls, unless you count the cheerleader's mom reference. One of them (Bush) is an avowed 17-year-old vegan vixen, however. And when they discover they've all been dating the same guy in gym class, they get in a brawl and are not suspended, but sent to a 23-minute detention without a teacher.Is this a satire, as "JTMD" bills itself? An edgy comedy? A smarter, cleverer film knows that teachers hand out discipline, in this post-Columbine world, for looking at each other funny, and that a brawl would constitute the lead story in the six o'clock news. A cleverer film has the girls chase not a superstar athlete, but, say head of the drama club. A cleverer film recognizes teen humor is mined not out of blase, ultra-hardened brat girls, but sweet, emotional, sunny girls. A cleverer film would know a dark comedy, if that's what "JTMD" intends to be, can't have cheesy lines and yachts sitting around to be driven.Instead we have a fourth, "smart" girl (Brittany Snow) is introduced as the girls' grand, "Taming of the Shrew" plan to woo John and eventually stomp his heart. This angel, of course, begins to fall for John, who is not particularly charming or interesting or anything beyond possessive and very wealthy, which are, if we follow our MTV, two of the trinity (the last being sheer, drop-dead cuteness emanating from those soulful eyes said guys must have, preferably brown) that makes up male desirability. Director Betty Thomas pretends that humor are four very different idiots insulting each other over the cliques they belong to. Ashanti gets the shortest end of the stick, adhering fiercely to the idea that cheerleading, in an empowered, open society that has a foreign Hindu woman as CEO of Pepsi, represents the canopy of female of achievement. Go figure - you break the glass ceiling with a cheer pyramid!We've been pounding this Earth for years now. Why do teens and young women still trail along, lapping it up? There is no real wit in the movie that you can't see from some third-rate comic being fed lines on a VH1 program, no style, no genuine attitude. It's all buried behind this driving notion of painting a portrait of a catty, young, rotten, unidealistic America most interested in getting tail, getting even and throwing s-uh-weet hoopty-rah parties. It is not immoral so much as it blank, a double zero signififying an unceasing period of meaningless motions to mimic, most involving self-debasement of young bodies. What fools Hollywood sees our children to be, wants them to be. What numb, donkey fools. If you need more proof, Jenny McCarthy has been cast as the voice of reason - and she's borderline believable.Ya know, so much ugliness is spewed about "Islamofascists," these manaical, stoneaged fiends who apparently can't tell you the sky is blue, spending most of their time taping martyr videos, finding Mecca and concocting devices to destroy our way of life. Consider, though, that one of the more recognizable items in Muslim countries is the satellite dish . A year from now, this thing's on a movie channel, and well, whatever evidence terroritsts thought they needed to chart the American decline into shame, they've got it. Not because it's absent morals, but humanity - the better for the terrorists to treat us as the faceless collateral damage they believe us to be.
Too Cheesy. I used this video in the 90s and got rid of it after a while.  Now I am back into fitness and got the DVD based on the previous reviews.  When the DVD came, I sat to watch it first and could NOT get past the cheesy chatter, costumes and outdated routine.  It may work, but home fitness has to be enjoyable and for me, this was definitely not.  Try Tamilee Webb's recent stuff instead, like "I Want That Body" and her newer CardioBlast.  Great, not cheesy, and very effective
unsuccesful attempt at something different. **1/2You at least gotta give `em points for trying.That's about the best that can be said for the people who made "Brick," an ambitious, though ultimately misguided, attempt to set a film noir drama on a contemporary high school campus.Joseph Gordon-Levitt - who, in "Mysterious Skin," delivered one of the best film performances of 2005 - is here completely miscast as a tough-talking teen investigating the  death of his beloved ex-girlfriend, most likely at the hands of some local drug dealers.  In all fairness to Gordon-Levitt, however, it should be pointed out that in "Skin," he was called upon to play a real life person with real life feelings and emotions, which he did to perfection.  In "Brick," the character is anything BUT real; rather, he is a deliberately artificial construct designed by writer/director Rian Johnson to move the plot along and to enhance the film noir atmosphere.  Yet, there is something inherently ludicrous in having modern teens speaking in the clipped phrasing and arch wordiness typical of 1940's film noir characters.  Actors like Bogart, Lancaster and Widmark didn't just have their tough-guy status conferred on them; they had to earn it, through the kind of wisdom and gravitas that come only with age and a life composed largely of hard knocks, both physical and psychological.  We always understood that it was the baggage they brought with them from their previous lives that made them what they were today.  Lacking this life experience, the characters in "Brick," on the other hand, go through the motions, but always eliciting the nagging impression in us that they are merely playing dress-up (if not literally, at least metaphorically), a fact which drains the film itself of vitality and relevance.  To put it more bluntly and succinctly, we simply don't care.It doesn't help that the story itself is convoluted and not particularly compelling, or that the acting is stiff and deliberately one-note in nature (not the fault of the actors, I must add).  Moreover, it's rather inexplicable as to why this high school seems strangely bereft of teachers and classrooms.  On the positive side, Johnson and cinematographer Steve Yedlin do bring an appropriately stark and ominous look to the normally cheery, antiseptic Southern California suburban backdrop against which the drama takes place.Perhaps by the time they all get together for their 20th high school reunion, the characters will have grown into their roles.  Till then, I'll stick with film noir dramas that are by, about and for grownups.
South Park:  The Down Years. Definitely rated five stars if your under the age of ten. Adults beware.  These guys have run out of ideas since the first season and are proceeding on the fumes from their fart jokes.I hope Trey and Parker make vast amounts of money to help pay for voice impersonation lessons.Besides the smugness, I am tired of all the voices in South Park sounding all too similar.
0 STARS:  LORD HAVE MERCY!!!. "The Church" is nonsensical rubbish.  I know Dario Argento is weak on plot, but this movie is absurd.  It's interesting how Argento does such a good job with a movie like "Suspiria" creating such an effective atmosphere for a horror movie even though the plot is a bit shaky; but, with "The Church", the creepy atmosphere is clearly not present, and the acting and execution of the screenplay are so bad which only magnifies how terrible the plot is...the result is a disaster!!  Indeed, there is zero character development, horrendous acting, monstrous plot holes and an uneven screenplay, all of which lead to this piece of rubbish called "The Church".  This movie is trash...PERIOD!  STAY AWAY!!!!
Snore. Don't let the cover fool you, this film isn't half as fun as you may hope it is. Maybe it's my own fault, but I was expecting something more like "Groove", or at least something interesting to watch. And it's not for my lack of knowledge of the bands, I often listen to Joy Division/New Order/Happy Mondays, and more from that scene. However, this seemed much more like the story of Tony Wilson and The Factory, than it did about the music, and almost came-off as a documentary. I almost stopped watching it out of boredom, but saw it through anyway. Now I wouldn't call this bad, it had it's good parts, just not many.
This Star Does Not Shine. So-So story about a man's relationship with a less than pleasant child star and said child star's mother.Like that old Dickie Roberts movie, it tries to say something about the plight of former and soon to be former child stars, but does not do a good job of it.Mickey Rooney and Shirley Temple, where are you when we need you?
"In Good Company" is not good company. "In Good Company" goes on and on at the end a little bit, and the ending especially is not fulfilling character/plot-wise.  If it had ended 15-20 minutes before it actually did, I would give it three stars instead of two.I admit there were quite a few times when I laughed a bit to myself, but it didn't make me fall off the couch or anything. There were other times when I thought the actions of some characters were weird or forced.Overall it isn't an entirely bad movie, but, like I said, the ending is unfulfilling.  Overall not strong performances coming from Scarlett Johansson or Topher Grace
Mediocre DVD Transfer; Average Sci-Fi Movie. For a 2-disc, director's cut, my expectations were perhaps too high for this DVD.  Nevertheless, I was appalled at the poor quality of the transfer.  The colors were dull throughout, and focus was frequently not at the beginning of scenes.For the movie itself, I don't agree that it is holding up well over time.  At 25 years old, the movie just has limited entertainment value for people who aren't waiting for their beloved canceled TV series to be on the big screen.There's no question that II and IV are the best of the series, but comparing it to other Star Trek original cast movies isn't putting the bar very high.My interest in watching this again was just having finished Melville's Moby Dick, the final scenes of which Khan repeats liberally during the final space battle.  That said, I think Montalban was fantastic as the revenged-obsessed Khan and very evocative of Ahab.  However, Shatner's pretentious Kirk just becomes more grating as time goes on.  The original cast schtick just doesn't make for a compelling drama
Wild Orchaid. This movie was NOT good at all. Other than it has beautiful people with real nice bodies,everything else is a waste of money and time
Bee boop, boring!- Not for Cardio Lovers. Searching through the Amazon FIRM DVD's, Lo and behold! New ones! I was very excited to get this. Once the DVD arrived, I rushed to play it. It started with a "boogie/hip hop" kind of warm-up.... and kind of STAYED there. It just lacked any intensity. Now, there was some latin dancing, some disco dancing, and a boogie/hip hop cool down, but nothing to break a sweat with.I would recommend this for someone who is just beginning to work out, or someone out of shape.I was really disappointed, because it was hosted by Allie DelRio, in my humble opinion the best of the best. Her smile was wonderful, following her was easy, but it just lacked that FIRM energy. Plus, the workout cast had only Allie and Allison. The other folks were people never before seen in FIRM videos. One lady in the back even did these mini-dip twist things with her knees over her toe box! (A HUGE no-no)Recently, Goodtimes video, the company who used to own the FIRM, was just purchased by Gaiam (The folks behind AM/PM yoga). If this is what they are doing to the FIRM, I am going to stick with the old ones I got. I sure hope not-As the owner of 30 FIRM workouts, I am used to quality and excellence with the FIRM
Disappointing and Forgettable. I watched Fast Forward, and I will not purchase the dvds.  Fast Forward left behind the complex, well-written, and nicely animated TMNT series of 2003+.  With Fast Forward, the TMNTs are in a brightly colored, flatly drawn world of trite dialogue spoken by two-dimensional characters.  There is nothing distinctly TMNT about the show anymore.  Splinter and the Turtles could be replaced by any good-guy characters,  with no impact on the series.  It is as if the Turtles, and Splinter, were plunked into a generic storyline, instead of having an original storyline inspired by the characters themselves.  I've been a fan of the TMNT for some time, and I will continue to be a fan of the Turtles.  I am not a fan of Fast Forward
Sterile, derivative and plastic... ...just like Hollywood and just like the music industry which, I guess, is the point.John Travolta, playing on his character from Get Shorty (and, to a lesser degree, like his character in Pulp Fiction and Swordfish) is Mr. Cool.  This time he's trying to make it big in the music biz.  He discovers a new talent (artist Christina Milian) and works his way through an assortment of characters that are more types and cliches than real characters.A brand name cast and yet no one makes any more than a dent on the personality radar.  The dialogue seems forced, funnier on the script than on the screen and most scenes feel posed and sterile.  Most of the actors appeared as bored as many celebrities are outside of their media personae.  Aside from a few interesting moments, only one speech toward the end made by Cedric the Entertainer redeemed the film.It's like a big commercial (which, I suppose, is any Hollywood film).  Certain musicians get shameless plugs (Steven Tyler and Aerosmith, included in the film), various movies get shameless plugs (including, in a not so disguised fashion, Get Shorty), certain Hollywood landmarks (e.g. the Mann Chinese Theater) are plopped into the film like a tourist video and even the L.A. Lakers and the Staples Center get a plug.It's an attempt to play on the irony of making a film about making a film or, in this case, making a musician.  So we watch Travolta as Mr. Cool navigating the landscape of the music industry to give Christina Milian her sudden and instantaneous rise to the top of the charts.  The ending is so horribly cheesy I felt as if I was watching American Idol.Watchable, but barely.The Player covered this terrain so much better.
Simply doesn't stand up to evidence. Friendly fire incidents resulted in over 5300 American deaths during Vietnam, 50 Israeli soldiers were killed in these mistakes during the 6 day war including 4 the day before the accidental attack on the Liberty.There was no motive for Israel to deliberately attack an ally in a time of war, especially when their forces were stretched thin.  Capt. McGonagle of the USS Liberty even admitted the attck was accidental.  If Israel really wanted to sink the ship they would have done so with submarines under the cover of night, instead of a partial attack in the middle of the day.  More than 10 American and 3 Israeli investigations have come to the same conclusion the attack was an accident.The USA would never have begun funding Israel with military aid had they deliberately attacked the Liberty, all in all this film is for conspiracy nuts and haters of Israel, and lacks any real coherence.
Power Rangers is better to watch :-|. This movie is so unbelievably horrible, I am pleading for you to rethink watching. I haven't seen something so bad, since, well, The Village. I would rather watch The Power Rangers than this movie. This movie, seriously, looks like it was filmed with my grandmother's video camera. Absolutely ridiculous...save yourself the time and mone
Lightweight. This film has been mentioned in the same breath as so called "hood films" such as Clockers and Menace 2 Society, I had heard it was set in a NYCHA housing project and so I bought it partly for visual research purposes for an upcoming final year degree project which may or may not involve architectural renderings of a NYCHA housing project, but partly because I enjoyed other apparently similar films.This film is absolute lightweight all the way. It may be "important", and back in '91 it may have been hardcore, gritty, convincing, etc. etc. but watching it in 2005 it packs a weak punch.It is not set in a NYCHA project, and the street lifestyle that is tackled so superbly for example in Menace is never even approached here. This movie instead chooses to go the route of King of New York, but Wesley Snipes is no Frank White. New Jack was instead set around an apartment building called "The Carter", which were we not told it was a crackden looked like a pricey, well-kept appartment block that totally lacked any edge or atmosphere whatsoever.The film utilised several times a helicopter fly-over of the area surrounding "The Carter", in much the same vein the beginning of Menace panned over Watts and Jordan Downs; but where Menace succeeded in capturing a palpable atmosphere of feral ghetto landscape and an implied simmering below the surface with its fly-over scene, New Jack's left you wondering why the film's director bothered setting the movie in such an unintimidating place, and then bothered to show it to you by means of a helicpter fly-over.Snipes and his crew look like a wannabe Run DMC, never convincing, never gritty, none of the darker more subtle aspects of criminality of the nature apparently portrayed in this film are ever even brushed upon. Snipes' Toni Montana impressions made me cringe, however good they may have been. This film was not tuned in, it simply didn't appear to have its feet on the ground.Ice T was plain annoying with his pseudo-racist, "street" policeman with the most annoying voice, accent and lines I have come across. He acted out every simple-minded stereotype of the character he was trying to portray, all the while smug and convinced of his own worth. Every scene with him in it annoyed me immensely.The only characters who seemed to do a stand-up job were Chris Rock's crack-head, and Mario Van Peebles' detective.New Jack is a lightweight crime drama that fails to deliver on most of its chosen frontiers, there are other films out there that tackle New Jack's chosen subjects in immeasurably superior ways.
A merciful two star rating; Look for future Arena Football Def. Coor. Stan Davis as 1 child actor & funny bit about Cheap Trick. Surprisingly sleaze and Chauvinismby female Director Heckerling! Sheduplicated it in Chevy Chase vehicleNational Lampoon's European Vacationtoo! Many child actors got their starthere, but the thing that cracked me up,as I saw it when it came out (unfortu-nately) was the dialog of my fav band,Cheap Trick: Ticket scalper "...Themagntism of Robin Zander and thecharisma of Rick Nielsen...and whatabout the tunes, 'I Want You To WantMe, The Dream Police...nan-nan-nah,'You're momma's alright, your daddy'salright, they just seem a little weird,Surrender, surrender...", before he'sinterrupted. If that isn't somebody'sidea of 'Surrender', they've stumbledonto this review by mistake
The Most Unintentionally Creepy Film EVER!. This has been playing on Here-On-Demand for quite some time now so I decided to watch it. This has got to be the most unintentionally disturbing film I've ever seen. The main character, Eban, stalks this 14-year-old boy around town. Eban, I might add, is played by Brent Fellows who is a creepy SOB. He's got these eyes and these mannuerisms that were unsettling to say the least. Anyway, Charley, has family problems. His mom was deaf, but died in a car accident and his father is abusive and takes the money his mother left him. It's obvious that Charley is lonely (his only two friends leave to go to Florida) and looking for anyone to pay attention to him. Eban is a creepy pedophile who is only attracted to young, impressionable teens. Put these two together and you have the makings of a Peter Sotos novel. There are many more things wrong with this film. I won't even get into the "Count The Boom Mics" game I started to play about 10 minutes in, but let's just say this is low-budget trash.
Why was it censored. The American DVD was censored, the way they censored Wild on E!. Maybe the american moral is different from all others. How would americans censored a theatrical representation of La Celestina? Have they not see La Cestina in a Theater? Buy the Spain DVD PAL version. It is not censored, as it should be. It is a completely different experience.
Boring. This is a one-time watch. It is most definately a home movie with very unprofessional editing. I was hoping for at least one or two songs to have a professional mix. Never happened..
Don't Get Me Wrong... I feel I should preface by saying that I love this band to death. However, For Fans Only is pretty shoddy. Every negative comment listed below is pretty valid and probably more bothersome then one would expect. That being said, it's not without merit. I just wish it had been put together better
Just Awful. This is a dreadfully plotted and dull affair. Avoid. Dull stories. Dull characters. The setting is nice, but that's it. If you like Foyle's War, I advise you to stay away from this one. Reminiscent of Murder She Wrote.
the most depressing movie ever made. I was 17 when this film came out. My girlfriend and I had just invented sex. We were enthusiastic about our invention. After sitting through this movie, we didn't have sex for more than a week. We were seventeen years old, had access to a sex partner and didn't have sex for a week!Pretty typical Warhol/Morrissey stuff: Self hatred, guilt, shame and money. How these people got tagged as the avant-garde is beyond me. Warhol and Morrissey were reactionaries through and through.I gave it two stars because it is sort of 'interesting' if you've never known people like the characters. They're around. If you're watching the movie to look at Joe D'allesandro, I won't hold that against you.
Awful. Can't remember seeing a movie this bad in, well... ever.  Tom Cruise's Flannagan can't get a job in the biz world, so starts tending bar at what's evidently the world's most swinging TGIF restaurant.  There he meets a shallow, woman-hating bartender named Coughlin who teaches him Coughlin's Laws of How to Treat Women Like Dirt and End Up Pathetic and Alone.  In the end, happily he (Coughlin) dies.  Flanagan, meanwhile, ditches his sweet new girl Elizabeth Shue for some "rich chick" (in his lovable words).  Then he gets bored of the rich chick, finds out he got Elizabeth Shue pregnant, gets spooked by aforementioned pregnancy, kicks a stuffy doorman in the buttocks, proposes to nice pregnant girlfriend, finds out it's gonna be twins, almost gets spooked again but doesn't, recites horrible poetry, and finally tops things off by yelling "The bar is open!" in a high-pitched puberty-like squeal. Yay for happy endings.
not impressed. I do not understand what the hype about this dvd is. I baught it according to [] reviews, but unfortunatly, was very dissapointed. I def felt a burn in my upper abs, but you are laying on your back THE ENTIRE TIME. There is no changing positions and targeting the abs from diferent angles. To me, it was basically crunch after crunch after crunch. Would not recommend it unless you want buldge in your upper abs
Big Fat Nothing. Take some talented actors and put them in an age old story of smart kids versus dumb adults and you get more of the same.  Really, is this the type of movie we want to pawn off on our kids?  They deserve better.The key point of this movie is that lying is bad.  Good point.  A device used to bring out the truth is creative pranks.  Also good.   Unfortunately, the pranks fall flat as they are totally implausible (even kids will have a hard time believing a man can't tell he's been dyed blue until he looks in the mirror), and since they are the device used to bring the movie to its conclusion, the entire thing falls flat.Making films for children is a fine thing.  They shouldn't be dumbed down or even given an uncritical eye just because they are for children, however.  Quite honestly, I'd rather have a kid watch something like "Good Will Hunting" before this.Don't waste your children's time with this film.  Read them a book ... a good book ... instead
Embarrassing. I didn't even want to see this movie, but my brother read the book and wanted to see it.  (We were unaware of the fact that this wasn't meant to follow the book...)Everything was poorly done in this movie.  Even Hans Zimmer's score didn't save it.  I've mentioned that I'd like it if one could rate an item with negative stars, and if I could, I'd give it negative ten
See 'Breaking Da Vinci's Code' for the actual facts. 'Da Vinci Code Decoded' is merely an uncritical rehash of the same, supposed, 'facts' that Dan Brown attempts to put forth in his book, much of which was co-opted from 'Holy Blood, Holy Grail' (as Mr. Brown himself attributes in his book).  The many fabrications and outright frauds he puts forth are effectively debunked in the far superior video 'Breaking Da Vinci's Code' where actual, reputable scholars dubunk his numerous errors.The pseudopigraphical writings known as the Gnostic (so-called) Gospels have been known to history since the 2nd Century and did not come to light for the first time at Nag Hammadi, although this cache of writings from that Egyptian city did increase our understanding of Gnosticism.  But the fact remains that these writings come from the 2nd century while the New Testament writings are demonstrably from the 1st century and carry the weight of Apostolic Authority, something the Gnostic writings never had.  By far the majority of mainstream historical and theological scholarship still rests on the side of the New Testament as the legitimate historical writings of the Christian Church, despite the efforts of a minority of Gnostic advocates, like Elaine Pagels.It should also be clearly understood that the claims put forth in 'Holy Blood, Holy Grail' and 'The Da Vinci Code' are entirely rejected by mainstream scholarship, both liberal and conservative.  This is primarily because both books suffer from the same fatal flaw, that is the so-called 'Priory of Sion' and the 'Dossier Secret' claims advanced by these authors are known and establshed FRAUDS.  These are the fabrications of a circle of anti-semitic French nationalists (and certifiable nut-cases) who revolve around the figure of Pierre Plantard - who was a primary source in 'Holy Blood, Holy Grail' (as readers of that book should be aware).  This is established by the excellent video 'Breaking Da Vinci's Code' as well as CBS's 60 Minutes, which did an investigative report into Mr. Brown's 'facts' and came to the same conclusions as above (this was aired most recently on April 30th).  Many other researchers have done reviews of the 'facts' of HBHG and DVC and come to the same conclusions.As a former Bible Seminary student and historical researcher, I can attest from my own research on these matters that the Da Vinci code is entirely a work of fiction and shouldn't be understood in any other light.  As far as 'Holy Blood, Holy Grail' is concerned, even it's own authors admit to it's highly speculative nature, not the type of writing one is going to draw serious historical or theological conclusions from.The bottom line, don't be taken in by the light-weight, air-thin 'research' as presented in 'Da Vinci Decoded' or the two books that inspired this current mania into the long debunked Gnostic writings.  By far the great weight of history and scholarship rest on the New Testament as the legitimate and authentic history of Christianity
Fact is stranger than Fiction. I am a fan of historical fiction, and this has to be one of the most historically inaccurate films I have ever seen! What bothers me the most is that the general public, who hasn't read the Tudor biographies like some of us have, will believe this stuff because it is their only exposure to the subject! I won't go into all the inaccuracies since other reviewers have already touched on them. Why tamper with history, when it was actually more fascinating than what was portrayed in this movie.
Pretty Forgettable. I bought this for the Jeffrey Dahmer and John Wayne Gacy documentaries, like I imagine you might. I'm not disappointed really, I don't regret buying it in any sense, it's just that this DVD isn't very good at all. It doesn't attempt to make any insight, which isn't something I particularly care for anyway. What each documentary offers is a limited and quite dated view of the serial killers. I can't imagine anyone learning something they didn't already know from them. It's mostly told through pictures when it seems there's option to use video. The Dahmer documentary, made in 1993, doesn't feature anything of interest. There's no interview with his father or anything, just a voice telling a story over pictures we've all seen before, with occassional clips of victims' families in court. The Gacy one, made in '96, is the same. There's also a program, made in 1997,on criminal profiling. This look at three farely well known killers whose capture supports profiling. It's told often with video rather then photos, which is good, but still they're somewhat boring subjects. The Criminal Profiler, Dahmer, and Gacy are all episodes from the A&amp;E series Investigative Reports, if you didn't realise. The last program is on Charles Manson. It's quite different from the others on the disc. Made in 1997, it originally aired on television as Biography: Charles Manson: Journey Into Evil. I don't with have any interest in Manson, but I guess it's ok. It features significant interviews with Manson and main female members of the Family. All programs run for about one hour or more. I wouldn't reccomend any of them, none are good at all. I might even describe them as terrible, considering what else is out there
Can We Fix It?- No We Can't. This show is extremely stupid, including that blue machine, it is stupid, and if this ever made a movie I would give it "SEVEN THUMBS DOWN!" When I saw a commercial on Nickelodeon, Bob The Builder is smaller than a 6-year-old. I give this television show *  (1 out of 5)
Don't Waste Your Money. This is quite possibly the worst movie I've ever seen.  I really enjoyed "Single's Ward" and thought I'd give this a try.  The characters were overplayed and the movie seemed drag on and on.  I would have been disappointed had I spent $4.00 renting this movie--unfortunately I bought it.  If you really want to buy the movie, email me and I'll give you a great deal on mine.  My copy has only been used once
Thumbs Down. Regardless of the new extras and restored scenes, this dvd has a terrible video transfer. Horizontal edges have more edge enhancement than even the infamously bad SWEP1 Phantom Menace dvd. The overall picture is reduced to near vhs quality from the excessive ringing.Absolutely avoid this Z-grade transfer unless you have a 13" tv or don't care at all about video quality
Too much star power for this quiet movie. A quiet deliberate movie ultimately suffers from having too much star power. No matter how scruffy and wain the filmmakers try to make Nicole Kidman look, she's still Nicole Kidman. Her portrayal of a janitor really pushes the limits of "suspension of disbelief" with her delicate features and legs that go on forever.And Anthony Hopkins is also miscast as a Jewish professor with a hard knock, secret past. While he remains one of my favorite actors, he cannot escape his "Britishness" which is even more unbelievable once you discover what his character's past is! The real discovery of this film is Wentworth Miller's absolutely astonishing turn as the teenage Anthony Hopkins.Ultimately, the film is worth seeing for Wentworth Miller alone. But the casting of two megawatt Hollywood actors hurts the believability of this film in the end
Very disappointing. I found this DVD to be extremely disappointing, especially when compared to the 2002 FIFA World Cup Highilights DVD by Reedswain (and I don't think Reedswain has produced one for the 2006 WC).  If you want to see a bunch of goals, one right after the other, then perhaps you'll enjoy it.  However, I think this DVD utterly and completely fails to capture the excitement, anticipation, electric atmosphere, and beauty of the tournament.  To me, it was a passion-less production.There is little to no pre-match analysis/introduction of the games being played, or its star players; there is no break in between the goals from one game to the next; and there are no highlights other than goals. I know, that's why it's called "All the Goals", but without other meaningful highlights, the goals are seen out of context and are almost meaningless.  For instance, how can you not show Zidane's infamous headbutt on Materazzi in the final, and how it affected the game?  This DVD doesn't.  And what about the drama of Australia scoring 3 goals in the remaining 10 minutes against Japan, after Japan had been leading 1-0 the entire game?  This DVD captures none of that drama.If you just want to see all the goals of WC 2006, you can do it for free at the FIFA WC website.  They even show some great highlights as well, but there's no commentary.  And no, I am not affiliated with FIFA in any way, shape, or form.
HORRIBLE - MADE MY SON CRY - DON'T WASTE YOUR MONEY. Growing up I loved watching Scooby Doo cartoons.  The mystery, the scooby snacks and of course, Shaggy & Scooby's bumbling ways, were funny and always captured my attention (and still do!).  I rented this movie for my almost 3 year old son and I to watch.  I was going to get him the cartoon show, but thought he might like the computer generated scooby better.  After the first five minutes, I got up to talk on the phone.  Five to ten minutes later, I hear my son shrieking and crying.  I run to him and there on the TV screen is the most horrible, EVIL scene.  I can't really describe it....Have any of you seen the rock group Insane Clown Possee? They wear silence of the lamb masks, gory makeup and one looks as if his lips are sewn together.  Yeah, nice image.  THAT'S WHAT WAS ON THE SCREEN.  I'm not being melodramatic when I say that this movie is horrible.  The scenes are not just a little scary, they are your-deepest-fears scary.  This is the stuff you watch once when you're 5 and you have nightmares for the next 4 years.  In my honest opinion, THIS MOVIE IS NOT FOR CHILDREN UNDER THE AGE OF 10.  My son talked about the scary movie for three days.  I'm mad at the movie and I'm mad at myself for walking out of the room.  I will never walk away and let my child watch a new movie alone - not even for 30 seconds.  He was absolutely terrified and literally crawled up me when I ran to get him.  Sickening.  Another reviewer called this Scooby POO.  I AGREE.  THIS IS TRASH
Lame. It's been about 7 or so years as far as I can remember since I last saw South Park, and I have to say, I just remember it being more funny.  This movie was unbearably lame.On the tv shows, there are actually some witty lines.  I just sat through this movie listening to stupid songs that weren't even funny, just the "shock value" of watching cartoons curse.  The curses weren't even funny, either ... just sort of stupid 'baby talk' type profanity; what is an "Uncle F&%*er" anyways?I have to conclude that Stone and Parker are two of the most overrated guys out there.  Team America World Police just sort of drifted around with again, the novelty of puppets cursing.  And while I rented this film hoping to just have some stupid fun like I did years ago watching South Park on tv, it was a real disappointment.Who cares about the cursing?  That's not what put me off.  It was just not funny
Let Viewers Sleep--Dull Film Without Action. *Plot/ending analyzed*After reading so many positive reviews of this film, I went through an extensive search in an attempt to find this rare film, well, suffice it to say, it was a complete waste of time. This boring rarity, should have never seen the light of day, it is a terrible film which attempts to classify itself as a "horror" or "zombie film". It takes one hour for us to even see any zombies in the film and when we do, they are so slow and boring, that we don't even care. The zombies are of the typical variety, very dim-witted and slow and yet at other times they use their own blood to invent other zombies, pick a door open with a key , throw a headstone at a policeman, etc, etc.The lead actor is played by a moronic hippie who only whines instead of actually killing any of the zombies, if he were as tough with action as he was with words, then this mess would have ended a lot quicker but no one believes that there are any zombies. It's a premise that could have been very interesting if the director could have created a viable story that didn't bore us to death. The washed up, drunk-o actor Arthur Kennedy (from "Lawrence of Arabia" fame- he was the journalist who remarks on Lawrence's annihilation of a Turkish rearguard by saying his memorable line: "Here, let me take your god damned picture!") plays a cop who makes no sense and he goes as far as shooting the lead actor! Call that absurd, it was actually quite a stupid scene.The ending was typical, and the whole film had no plot what-so-ever, I would suggest to people that they avoid this mess. There's a bit of extras on the DVD, namely the has-been director recalling the "glory days" of the film, and this is even boring.
You get what you pay for... terrible film-DVD transfers, and yes, you get 50 movies for about $13, but look at the titles carefully.  if you feel you can enjoy at least 2 of the movies, then this set is worth it (for me it was being able to watch "Horror Express" and "Bad Taste" for the 1st time in decades).  otherwise - WOW!  there's a lot of crappy movies in the box
Very Poor Sound. I have the VHS tapes of both of these concerts and the sound from the two DVD discs fell far short of coming anyway near the tape versions. It was a great disapointment
one of the worst ever. I had the clever idea to compare this version with the new movie.What a mistake.  The original pink panther is an absolute bore.  There is really no story. Essentially, Peter Sellers spends much of the movie trying to get his wife in bed.Major parts of the story make no sense.  Don't waste your time
Yuck; they should have left well enough alone. I was eager to see this movie, having loved the original "American Werewolf" movie; but was sadly disappointed.  I didn't care at all for the characters, the humor was missing completely and generally it stank up the screen.  Mark me off if you don't agree - I know you rude lot will anyway - but that's my story and I'm sticking to it
Joan Crawford was ashamed of this film. There are so many good Crawford titles yet to be released on DVD that you have to wonder why they are releasing this trash which Crawford herself hated. She said that if she was ever to suffer for her past sins, this is the movie that would be shown to her over and over again. She also found John Wayne to be miscast.Also to be released on DVD around the same time as "Reunion in France" is another of Crawford's worst films "Trog".  Seriously, who decides these releases?  What fans want most of all are the unreleased Crawford classics such as "Story of Esther Costello", "A Woman's Face', "Strange Cargo" and "Susan and God".  Besides the DVD releases of "Baby Jane", "Grand Hotel" and "Mildred Pierce" some years back, the DVD releases for Crawford so far have been dismal and look set to continue.Warner Bros and MGM take note:  please release the better films from Crawford's catalogue and stop wasting time with films like "Reunion in France" and "Trog".
Typical rom-com for genre/bullock/affleck fans only. If you've seen one you've seen them all. Uptight guy by chance meets quirky girl, she brings him out of his shell.Well, I bought this for like two dollars, and maybe it was worth it. I watch it like once a year. No special features on DVD worth mentioning.Ben Affleck is getting married, he has to fly down to the south from NY for the wedding. But things keep getting in his way. Forces of Nature. Also, he keeps running into, and can't seem to get away from, some weird chick (Bullock). Are these signs? Should he stop being so uptight, and go with this free-spirited chick? Or should he be an adult and get married and accept his Vanilla lifestyle?The acting in this movie is "meh", meaning Sandra has the same personality that she has in every movie; and Affleck sucks, as usual. The other small parts are well done, for the most part.The script is formulaic, and the cinematography at times is interesting. It's just another rom-com where the whacky girl brings the uptight guy out of his shell. The movie opens with a stripper scene, no nudity. There is also a pot-smoking scene in this movie. There is also a scene where Affleck strips at a gay bar. Just thought I'd throw that in, in case you're considering buying this for your teen daughter or something, and that kind of thing bothers you.You only need to buy this is you are a rom-com fanatic, or a big fan of either Affleck or Bullock. Otherwise this is completely forgettable.
great video game = bad movie. One of the greatest video game fighters in history, excluding Mortal Kombat, Street Fighter's popularity eventually produced excitment for a feature film, even starring Jean Claude.  The result, a bomb.Fortunately, Street Fighter is not even as bad as the 2nd Mortal Kombat movie, but it is still pretty poor.  I have tried really really hard to enjoy this movie, especially since just about all the Street Fighter characters are in the film and stay fairly close to their video game identities, but the ridiculousy dumb humor, crappy acting, and lack of any good-looking action forces the film to suffer.  Jean Claude even looks weak in this film, but compared to the other actors, they still manage to make him look good.  The story is weak too, with a lot of nonsense to kill time in what is already a short movie, not even an hour and half.  The only highlight is the fight between Bison and Guile (Van Damme), where they actually use some moves from the video game such as Bison's elevation ability and Guile's flash kicks.  Unfortunately, editing doesn't make the fight look very real at all.I only like this movie because I love the video game, and this is the only movie made with these guys, that is not animated.  If you don't enjoy the game, you will most likely hate this movie.  If you love Van Damme, this is one of his weakest entries.  Only obsessed Street Fighter fans will want this film
Amatuer Camera Man. Love Michael Buble, but this was more like a home made movie of someone using their camcorder from the audience. Parts of Michael's head was cut off, and then; sometimes, his whole head was cut off. Most of the time, the camera man didn't expect where Michael was going to move to and you'll get a jerky movement of the camera man trying to get Michael back into the picture. I wish they would have said in the description that this was more of a documentary than a concert. That this was just home made videos. This was definitely not worth $20. If you want a professional quality concert, I would recommend buying Michael Buble's Caught in the Act. Caught in the Act was worth the $20 bucks. You get professional camera men who anticipated Michael's movements, and parts of his head was never cut off like Come Fly with Me's DVD. Also, the sound quality on Caught in the Act was way better. Now, I understand why some places sold Come Fly with Me DVD's and had the word enhanced after it. The DVD that I received was not enhanced. Anyways, skip this one, and get "Caught in the Act" instead.
Poor Release of Movie. I found this movie very poor and totally a waste of my time.  It's plot needs to be rewritten and it does not contain a deeper meaning.  The ending was very disapointing and without proper conclusion. Denzel Washington did a great job playing the detective and John Goodman is a very good actor yet the other charaters did not do thier job and was poorly acted. My recommendation is to stay away from this movie and save your money. Buy somthing that has a good plot. D- is my ratin
not good. If your expecting a documentary with the clarity and production value of "End of the Century" or "Filth and the Fury" THIS AIN'T IT!  Picture taking 40 hours of bad home video (really awful sound) and editing together and calling it a documentary. No current interviews, No voice over making any sense of the chaos...No thought to flow or storyline, just a mishmash of stuff banged together. A real dissapointment. The saddest part is that for those fans out there who want it, this material could be a great source for a documentary with actual substance. I've liked the dolls for years and was really excited at the prospect of them getting their due. Its a shame this is what its been reduced to. Shame on everyone involved
Do you wanna know a... Do you wanna know a secret? I promise you that you could live without ever finding out. This movie's only secret is who the hell was dumb enough to produce it. I would also like to know why anyone who read the script would have signed a contract to star in it. Joey Lawrenece was obviously hard up for some cash or else he wanted to expand his acting into a new genre... bad films. The DVD is so cheap that there aren't even menus. Suspense?... Drama?... There is absoluetly more suspense and drama in movies like Legally Blonde than this one... also you get to see the real Reese Witherspoon and not a girl who was hired because she looked like RW. Also, if the "hero" of the movie gets hit in the head one more time... I swear I thought for a minute I was watching an episode of Jackass. The back cover of the DVD is simply incorrect in its summary of the movie. The spoiler doesn't even provide correct info about the plot. As for the rating, there is no 0 star so I had to give it a 1 star. However, this movie's only 1 star qualification was that it was in color and the text on the back of the case was without spelling errors. The only suggestion I can give is not to buy this DVD. However, rent it if you are having trouble falling asleep. This movie will definately put any insomniac to sleep. Beyond horrible, the only thing left that can be said is... "Que el infierno!
Bad Quality of DVD. Very disappointed with the DVD quality, it is even worse than any new VHS tapes. Even at the first time I played it, some part was not able to play. I wish the DVD/CD purchasing policy covered the case how to handle defect DVD/CD. Contents do cover a lot bellet movements
Domestic Life Well-Acted, But with Little Insight. Some people praise `We Don't Live Here Any More" as one of the realistic portrayals of two married couples, tired of lies, not really knowing what to do. It is also true that Naomi Watts and Mark Ruffalo have exceptional talent and here again they would not disappoint you with their fine acting. The film as a result looks like a filmed version of some John Updike novels (actually it is based on two shorts by Andre Dubus, whose `Killings' became `In the Bedroom').But sorry, Updike is not my favorite author, and the film's touch is too desultory for me. No, `desultory' is not the only real problem because I remember I was fascinated by the desultory realism of much more successful `In the Bedroom.' The real flaw of `We Don't Live Here Any More' is its dullness and all too familiar things about the four principal characters.Mark Ruffalo's character Jack is having affair with Naomi Watt's Edith and Jack's wife (Laura Dern) already suspects, or knows that his husband is cheating. But the affair means here uninspired, clichd sex scenes between Edith and Jack among the woods in Oregon, with Naomi Watts and Mark Ruffalo having sex against a tree ala `Fatal Attraction.' Edith husband Hank (Peter Krause) teaches creative writing, and has just one book published. The alcoholism of Laura Dern's character is suggested in the most obvious way (you know what), but in the first place why didn't the filmmakers realize that her portrait as poor housekeeper with alcoholism is already a big clich?Among these recycled materials, there are a few well-observed descriptions that deserve attention. It is the brief, but efficient study of the children in both families, and the film shows how these children accept the reality of the marriage that is falling apart. These clever, insightful moments, however, do not last long in the film, for it soon returns to the typical representation of the domestic life in America.We don't want any big surprises, or twists and turns in this kind of film because we know we have none from the beginning. It is true that `We Don't Live Here Any More' presents a convincing portrait of boring and stagnant marriage in a slumbering small town in America, but the film goes nowhere from there, missing every chance for the more incisive study of the characters.
jazzman. Jaw dropping BAAAAAAAD.  Embarrassing to watch.  Can we sayBOMB!  ...  Not a shred of value or depth.  Yuck
disapointed. i was verry disapointed to see this movie because i wanted to see the  real movie and not a musical movie.i'm still looking for the real real movie but still can't find it
A Disgrace to a Great Game and Animated Moive. I thought the animation was terrible. This was nothing like the animation done for the other Street Fighter movies. They were too &quot;kiddie like.&quot; The story lines were horrible also. If you liked the other animated Street Fighter movies, then you will hate THIS collection. It was not what i expected at all!!! Invest in the street fighter 2 V collection, that is worth the money! Much better animation nd closer to what you would expect after watching the Movies. 2 THUMBS DOWN for both Soul Powers AND Code of Honor!!
stick with the classic "the bad seed" instead. this must have seemed like a great idea at the time,"cast culkin against type as a killer child and show his range as an actor". the problem is his range is all the way from a to b.this movie never explains how or why the boy turns killer and asks us to except one too many "chance" happenings. in the end all we get is this "thriller"(and i use the term very loosely)that thinks just the idea of culkin as a killer is thrilling
A look into the future that's stuck in the past. Science fiction without innovation imagination or risk. Titan A.E. should have been an epic movie full of thought provoking ideas. With talents like the legendary Don Bluth on animation, skilled sci-fi screenwriters like Joss Whedon (Buffy the Vampire Slayer) and Ben Edlund (The Tick) writing the screenplay and stars like Matt Damon, Drew Barrymore, Bill Pullman and Nathan Lane doing voice over work and a [...]dollar budget the movie had all the elements of a hit. Unfortunately all these talented individuals failed to become successful when brought together on this project. Titan A.E. is an uninspired mess of a movie with a predictable story, dated looking animation, flat acting and primitive looking CGI. Thanks in part to the box office failure of this movie and several others like Treasure Planet and Atlantis, hand drawn animated movies are currently not being produced by American movie studios. A shame because there are so many great stories to tell using this art form.Titan A.E. follows the story of Cale, a young boy in the year 3028 or something. Cale's father has built a spaceship The Titan, which can recreate an Earth like planet when activated. Big blue off the shelf computer generated aliens known as The Drej find out about the Titan and go to Earth to destroy it. During a final onslaught on the planet, Cale's father gives his son to an alien to care for along with a ring then gets on another ship. The Titan escapes along with a few million human survivors. Five-year-old Cale helplessly watches as the Drej blow up Earth and kill his father. So bleak, so boring so predictable.Cut to fifteen years later. Cale a young man now, is working a crummy job at a space station. True to formula, he's angry and disillusioned drifting through life with no direction. After an unappetizing lunch of living creatures, Cale runs afoul of some human hating aliens. He's about to get pummeled when he conveniently he runs into Korso, a man who says he's been searching the galaxy for fifteen years for him on his quest to find the Titan. He activates a code in Cale's ring and conveniently the Drej head to the station to kill him. It would have been helpful to give the bad guys some character development here. I find it odd how the Drej found Cale at the same time as Korso but not for the past fifteen years despite being smart enough to blow up a planet. Cale and Korso shoot it out with the Drej to escape the space station, but the bug like cook who served lunch is a casualty of the assault. They hotwire a spaceship which gets damaged as it leaves the station and make a thrilling jump into space without spacesuits. Too bad this makes no sense scientifically. Their bodies would have exploded from the pressure before they asphyxiated.The movie goes on in spite of this minor plothole. On board Korso's ship Cale meets the attractive Akima, who looks both hot and edgy along with other members of Korso's alien crew. The quest for the Titan begins and the slowly paced movie starts to get even slooower, changing into a ninety minute long chase where we watch Cale and Akima start a lukewarm romance, shooting, arguing between Cale and the crew, arguing between Cale and Akima, arguing between Cale and Korso, two brief scenes where nudity is teased, and just more arguing and shooting leading to Predictable plot twist #1: Korso is working for the Drej and plans on destroying the Titan when they find it. True to formula, Korso gets a change of heart and sacrifices himself and Cale activates the Titan after learning predictable plot twist #2: Drej are beings of pure energy and they would power the Titan when it recreates the Earth like planet. Cale figures this out in record time and recreates the planet calling it "Bob". The movie ends and I shed a tear as I watch an opportunity to make something truly innovative in the Science Fiction genre wasted by a bunch of people who have the talent to do much better.Titan A.E. fails as a science fiction movie because of a poorly written script that has the plot and character development of a bad 1980's Saturday morning cartoon. Edlund and Whedon's weak screenplay plays everything safe and takes no risks in telling Cale's story. Movies in the Science Fiction genre always take risks exploring the worlds they inhabit and exploring the personalities of the characters who live in the universe. There was a story to tell here, but the writers focused on the wrong characters and the wrong plot points. The real story should have been with Cale's father not Cale. I wanted to know why he made the Titan and why was there a need to create a new Earth like planet. Could Earth have been overpopulated and scientists felt they needed a new world was the solution to handle the masses? Did the energy based Drej fear Earthmen exploiting their race as power source for the Titan? Perhaps Drej spies read about slavery in ancient American history texts and colonization of foreign lands during the colonial period and felt the need for a pre-emptive strike. These were deeper reasons for an intergalactic planet destroying war and should have been the focus of the movie's overall plot.Production wise, Titan A.E. is subpar. Bluth's hand-drawn animation for Fox looks horribly outdated when put side to side with the work of other animators at the competing animated studios of Disney, DreamWorks and Warner Brothers in the same year. Bluth's backgrounds are often too dark and character movements over exaggerated. Bluth, true to his style over the past thirty years focuses too much on wide shots of flailing of limbs to express character emotion and not on close-ups of facial expressions to tell his story. Watch any of Bluth's Disney films (Robin Hood, The Fox and the Hound) or his 90's Fox films (Anastasia, The Land Before Time, An American Tail) to see how little his style has changed with the times. The CGI has no detail and doesn't blend into the backgrounds smoothly. The Drej and their ships look like they belong in another film not here in Titan A.E. Compare the animation in Titan A.E. to DreamWorks' Road to El Dorado released that same year. Road does everything Titan A.E wanted to do from a technical standpoint blending CGI and animation beautifully. Brad Birds' work on Warner's Iron Giant features a well-written story and is a brighter film with lively human characters and beautiful backgrounds. Disney's later efforts like Kim Possible and Lilo and Stitch have more engaging characters and utilize unique animated character designs. Titan A.E. with its looks and feels like a 1980's movie not a 2000 theatrical release.Fox was setting up Titan A.E. to be a sci-fi classic that pushed the genre of hand-drawn animated films into the adult themed direction of Japanese Manga. Ironically, the failure of these "riskier" hand-drawn animated movies like Fox's Titan, A.E., DreamWorks Road to El Dorado, Warner's The Iron Giant, Disney's Treasure Planet and Atlantis halted the production of hand-drawn animated films in America for the time being. Because American studios and audiences continue to see hand-drawn animated films as children's fare filmmakers cannot push the envelope and tell the adult themed stories of their Japanese counterparts. Until American movie studios and audiences change their perceptions about hand-drawn animation, filmmakers will never be able to make hand-drawn animated movies with mature themes and expand the audience for the art form past small children.Pass this one by at the video store. Adults looking for an adult themed animated movie should Pick up the far superior Heavy Metal or Castle of Cogliostro and preteens looking for a non-Disney animated film can pick up the superior Road to El Dorado, The Iron Giant or The Prince of Egypt.
ORIGINAL IS BETTER~!. If you want UNCUT ORIGINAL version, ALWAYS look for ORIGINAL LICENSED Production. NOT US Release. Its a foreign film, it should not be US version to begin with~! HELLO!!!?? Why settle for LESS with US Version where they edit and cut so many excellent scenes especially with Jackie's Fighting Scenes. And US Release ruins the speed and sound as well. I have been collecting Jackie Chan's movies both HK and US Release Version for quite some time now. I found HK Version to be MUCH MORE in enjoyable, and HIGHER in Quality. American Market always like to "Americanize" and "Control". Regional Code Regulation thing is one of the example to CONTROL the Market. Why not let everyone enjoy the same HK Original Release move the same way ENTIRE WORLD enjoys it ?? No one makes Hollywood American movies to "French version" or "Chinese Version" ~! This what Americans are doing~! Well, enjoy the cheap "American version" then~! LO
Nope. I was not into this movie at all.  My mother recommended it to me but it was lame all the way through.  A middle-aged man decides he wants to do something different with his life, so he takes a dance class.  Ofcourse there's a fine dance instructor, a crush is pursued, a wife gets jealous, hires a detective, and *gasp* his crush is found out.  The movie was too predictable and it just wasn't for me.  Not a bad movie, just not my cup of tea.  Richard Gere was cute as usual, which was the only thing that made me watch it to the end, besides wanting to know what a correct quick step looked like since "So You Think You Can Dance" never had contestants who mastered it
I liked Intolerance better... Ugggh! On top of being dated and boring, this movie is so RACIST! Intolerance wasn't so fun either, but I liked it's theme better. D.W. Griffith films are not my favorites anyway, but I watched this out of curiosity and all I could say when it ended was UGGGH! "Birth" was stupid, and some of the ideas in it were outlandish. If you want to see a good Griffith film watch Intolerance. D.W. Griffith created the birth of a nightmare.
how can animation be STILL?. I wish I had seen the reviews on Amazon before buying this video. There is nothing moving in this video - it is essentially voiceovers over filming of a book shaking up and down. Not worth the DVD it was burned on. A HUGE WASTE OF MONEY!!
dismayed with Dr. Suess. This video leaves much to be desired.  Especially the scene in &quot;Horton Hatches an Egg&quot; when a fish came out of the water and shot himself in the head.  Definitely not what I would expect from a Dr. Suess video
Not the Best. I prefer the "Shrink Your Female Fat Zones" DVD with the balance ball. I really don't like the resistance strap with this one and I will probably sell my DVD, because I just don't like it. Denise does some great videos, but this isn't among them.
IT IS  AWFUL MOVIE!!!!. this movie suffers from being moronically and mind numbingly pathetic and stupid. Jerry O'Connell (tv's Sliders, tv's Crossing Jordan), Ryan Reynolds (The In-LAws, tv's Two Guys a Girl and A Pizza Place) and Bill Bellamy (Love Stinks, Tv's Fastlane) are friends. O'Connell has a graphic design company and has a lovely girlfriend, Bridgette Wilson (House On Haunted Hill, Love Stinks) but work gets in the way, which force the both of them to experiment in dating others. Reynolds tries to cope with the fact that he is becoming gay. It's, its just an awful movie and it really suffers from mad cow diesease, litterally. Reynolds shouldnt of done that scene from Silence OF The Lambs, NO! that was wrong! Ron Livingston (Office Space, Swingers) shouldnt of been in this movie and he just looks too much like Jon Tenney's (HomeGrown, Fools Rush In) older brother. Alyssa Milano (Poison IVy 2, FeaR) has bad choices in movies now. Also starring Kevin Weisman (tv's Alias, tv's Buffy The Vampire Slayer), Annabeth Gish (tv's X-Files, SLC Punk), Fiona Loewi (senior Trip, Love and Death On Long Island) and a weird appearace by John O'Hurley (best known for portraying Elaine Bennetts boss on Seinfeld), you know the guy, "my buddies call me Timbo" , it was just too much and it is a forgettable movie. Steer clear from this junk. The title song in the beginning Jerry O'Connell sang in Scream 2.
depressing. Firstly, I'm a huge fan of Jackie Chan and his work, but I just can't give this movie a good review. It is one of the most depressing films I've seen. Basic plot synopsis; Jackie has to watch all of his team members be executed, he is given an opportunity to save each one and fails each time. So thats the first 20 or 30 minutes of the film and all his closest friends are dead. The next portion of the film deals with him trying to drink himself to death. Then we watch his relationship with his fiance fall apart. Then we get to see one of the gang members being abused by his father. and thats at least two thirds of the film.And then there's the whole subplot about the gang members making a video game out of all the people they kill so the good guys have to play the game in order to figure out what bank they're going to rob next. Kind of cheesy.As I said, I really like Jackie Chan and he does display some really good acting talent in this film. But I don't like waiting until the last 20 minutes of the movie to see some good action and fight scenes especially when I just had to sit through some of the most depressing stuff I've ever seen
I wish I could give this 0 stars. This movie was a piece of crap!  I've never seen a more poorly thought out movie.  It had NOTHING good in it whatsoever.Glitches in the movie--Why was there only one sheriff?  Even in small towns, there's usually a sheriff and a deputy.Why would the police officer just stop the car in the middle of the road to talk?  People can talk while driving...DUH!On foot, Beth never would have escaped from those crooks.Also, why didn't they show us what was on the disk?  After making us endure a terrible movie, they should have at least shown us what was on the disk.The movie had a poorly thought-out ending.The movie was gory.  It's so revolting how those three guys were able to get away with killing a lot of people for so long.This movie was a waste of film.  At least I saw it for free.Don't even waste your money on renting this.  It is a waste of two hours of my life that I can never get back.
I'm sorry to write this.... ...because I feel I'm being, in some way, sacrilegious but this film was a very poor attempt to portray an extraordinary person, at least in my life.  I am a Catholic and have been devout to the St. Therese of Lisieux for most of my adult life and I was really looking forward to this film.  Like many of the other reviewers, I have also seen the French film of the same title and found it a far more rewarding experience than this new production.  The movie plays out like a religious Anne of Green Gables, with a Hallmark film quality that manages to gloss over everything to the point of making every character come across as one-dimensional cut outs of piety and wholesomeness.  Having read Story of a Soul, I know that Therese was not a faultless divine creation, but rather a very human woman with an extraordinary devotion to, love for and faith in God.  Everyone is so saccharine sweet and perfect that it bordered on the sickening.  It just wasn't believable.  Even more so, using the same actress to portray Therese from the age of 14 to 26 was an insane idea (Lindsay Younce was 21 at the time of filming).  Not only do we not witness her spiritual growth but there is no sense of the passing of time. The acting is a bit pedestrian and the dialogue an exercise in stilted screenwriting, the music hockey and contrived, but the production values are high and the movie has beautiful look to it.  No doubt everyone's heart was in the right place but this is just not the kind of film that will really shed any light on Therese Martin, woman and Saint.
First one=intriguing, second one=biggest mistake ever, third one= redemption. Now the Second one is pretty bad and tries too hard to be as good as the first.  It is very hard to create a sequel as good as the first but this one certainly proves that point.  Jurassic park two Lost world is worth it compared to this one.  don't even waste the $3.00
Where is the old hunter Buldeo?. The best of Rudyard Kipling's Jungle Book stories took place in the man village because that's where Mowgli meets a superstitious old hunter named Buldeo.   Buldeo claims that the tiger Shere Khan is supernatural,  the ghost of a wicked old money lender.  When Mowgli says that Shere Khan is only a very disagreeable tiger Buldeo threatens to spank our young hero.When Buldeo learns that Mowgli has a vendetta with the tiger and a black panther as his personal body guard the old man tells the other villagers that Mowgli is a demon child who is able to turn himself from a boy to a wolf, and back to a boy at will.  This is great story telling.  But where is Buldeo?  He isn't in the movie at all!  It's like leaving the Wicked Witch out of the movie version of "The Wizard of Oz".On a side note, in the Kipling stories the black panther Bagheera has a secret so shameful he can tell no one but Mowgli.   Bagheera was born in a zoo, chained and keep in a cage for the amusement of men.  But rather than blame Mowgli for the cruelty he suffered in captivity Bagheera sees the boy as a kindred spirit.  They were both separated from their own kind at an early age.  Once we have that bit of information the relationship between the boy and the panther makes sense.   We are able to understand Bagheera's total devotion to the Mowgli.  But the movie never explains that.  I realize that the movie shouldn't follow the book completely.   But since the book was so much richer the movie seemed like a let down
Embaressing. While "Riot Act" (2002) is probably the bands most strongest album yet, the tour that followed definitley was not.Onstage Pearl Jam don't even look like themselves anymore, well at least on the 2003 tour.The deliverence and shoegazing performance leave so much to be desired, its only a worse follow on from the 2000 american tour where the band looked exhuasted and bored, after what looked like a pretty impressive previous European tour of the same year.Probably the reason is that the band are't 21 anymore, and have become slack.Hopefully with rehearsals, eating properly, and new inspiration they will make their next tour back to their best, and end this drudge which has made them look silly in recent times.Don't buy this, their last decent tour was 1998 or Europe 2000, so one day hopefully we will see a DVD from those times or prior to that.New album soon.........
Good price, but... double sided disc?I don't know... I don't like the idea of those discs.They are bound to have more scratches, fingerprints and so on when you manipulate them.When you put the disc back in the case, you will leave marks on the disc, unless you wear cotton gloves or something.Apart from that, it's a GREAT deal, excellent price for 3 movies, if you don't already have them.I'd give it 5 stars if the set was for 3 discs, and not 2 (one being double-sided)Enjoy!:
An astonishingly conventional film that isn't nearly as subversive as it thinks it is. Let it first be said that everyone who considers themselves a serious student of film should see "Blue Velvet" on principle alone-- this review is intended for people who have seen it, and thus contains SPOILERS.David Lynch's "Blue Velvet" is that rare breed of film: anunquestioned modern masterpiece, upheld by imdb geeks andEntertainment Weekly-pop culture hounds as something trulyspecial. Everybody seems to like it, and everybody's gottheir own reason. Some see it as allegory, some simply as aliving nightmare, some as genuinely effective drama, some asa coming-of-age story.I've seen "Blue Velvet" three times now. The first time, Iadmit a prejudicial point of view-- I wanted to prove RogerEbert right in his criticism of it, because Ebert was myhero at the time. I was unimpressed. Later, I returned to itafter a number of critics upheld it asthe genuine article. I'd seen Mulholland Drive and LostHighway, and loved both of them-- perhaps I was moreprepared for Lynchian weirdness this time around. Nope. Iwas still unimpressed, although I was entranced by thevisual look of the film.Recently, I found myself picking it up again, afterseeing Mulholland Drive with an artsy group of friends whowere convinced that they could explain everything thathappened in it to me, and pretty much did (except for theblue box and the scene with the huge dude who knocks out thedirector's wife). With an increased appreciation of Lynch, Ireturned to what most consider his masterpiece, ironicallyenough, prejudiced IN ITS FAVOR this time around.Well, I'm still not impressed. "Blue Velvet" thinks it's sodamn cool and subversive. It thinks it's turning Americanaon its head by depicting sexual perversion behind whitepicket fences. I don't think it's doing anything at all.Granted, for forty minutes or so, "Blue Velvet" is compelling. From the opening scene to the discovery of the ear all the way up to  Dennis Hopper's unforgettable apperance and including the dream sequence afterwards, Lynch had me hooked. He seemed at that point to be ready to go for broke, to show us unimaginable horrors, to penetrate through to thedarkest aspects of human nature.Yet something odd happens after the forty minute mark-- the story that we thought was gradually unfolding into something complex and sinister stops unfolding altogether. After forty minutes, we have all the plot we're going to get. We have a woman held in sexual slavery by a drug dealer who has kidnapped her husband and son, we have the naive college kid who tries to help her out, we have the sweet high school girl he's falling in love with, and that's all we have. Those expecting "Blue Velvet" to "go somewhere" from this point will be sorely disappointed.In the end, "Blue Velvet" goes down an entirely conventional path towards its conclusion. Instead of exploring the Hopper character, Lynch makes him into a campy villain. Instead of exploring the Rosellini character, Lynch makes her into a conventional damsel in distress, longing after her husband and son. Instead of exploring Jeffrey, Lynch turns him into an uninteresting do-gooder. The latterchoice is particularly odd, given that Lynch has set him up to have his whole world turned upside-down-- yet he heroically takes everything in stride and saves the day.Most egregious of all is the resolution of the plot, whichI've got to assume is intended as a joke on the viewer.After all of Lynch's pretensions about inverting Americana,he gives us a reaffirmation of it, in the form of aconventional ending in which a simple act of violencerestores the natural order of things, the robins makeeverything better, and, gee, everything's just great! Eventhough I'm sure this is intended as ironic, I found myself frustrated anyway. If Lynch isn't going to take his art seriously, why should the viewer?I don't want to seem like I'm making an attack on Lynch, although it may seem that way, as I'm criticizing his most canonized work. Lynch has proven that he is capable of taking himself seriously, and developing stories that go places-- even if they work with a logic that conventional films do not. "Blue Velvet," by contrast, goes nowhere and does nothing truly unusual or interesting in the process. I've endeavored to work my way around to enjoying it, but I can't. It simply is not interesting, as a dramatic work, or even as an abstract collection of images.I would direct those who want to see Lynch at his best to "Twin Peaks: Fire Walk With Me," "Lost Highway" (my personal favorite), and "Mulholland Drive." These are virtuoso films that see the director exploiting the most fearsome resources of cinema to lead his viewers on journeys that begin and end, with point and purpose. They are masterpieces, and no matter what anyone tells you, they make sense if you are willing to do the intellectual heavy-lifting.Compared to these later works, "Blue Velvet" is positively forgettable.
What a Dog!. Musicals are historically slight in the plot department, and this movie is no exception.  Three stars: one fading, one rising and one coasting do not help matters either.Rita is the fading star.  It was painful for me to watch the once dazzling love goddess reduced to playing the controlling widow.  The make up department probably had to work overtime trying to cover the circles under her eyes, and her hair and costumes are just bad.  Novak is the rising star, although I don't get the 50's obsession with bubble headed, busty, bleach blond bimbos.  It would help if she could act, but sadly her range is very limited. I truly believe they added the dog to help make her character sympathetic, since she was unable to convey it herself.  Then there is Frank just coasting on his charm and cool.  Doesn't seem plausible that a hep cat like him, who could bag any "doll", "dame" or "mouse?", would fall for either of these gals.Anyway, I gave it 2 stars because of Snuffy the dog.  He stole every scene he was in.  Although that wasn't too difficult to do in such a dog of a movie
"Three different gynecologists have proposed marriage to her!". Overly predictable story about a high school spaz who inherits a billion dollar porn company where apparently all the women don't take their clothes off too much.The crude AMERICAN PIE - style humor at the beginning is pretty funny but then it sinks into the goofy NOT ANOTHER TEEN MOVIE territory and that got old quick.  Add on a true meaning of friendship ending and you'll be praying for the end.WHO'S YOUR DADDY? should have stuck to one direction and went with it instead of failing at fifteen.  Ali Landry is hot but I think Marnette Patterson is hotter.  Neither gets naked, or even close.
A disgrace to any integral female. There are two main female characters in the plot: one is a man-eater who will sleep her way to the top (although she may not even need it because she is good independently) and the other is the jealous and depressed housewife who gave up her career for the sake of her husband's. This is a man's fantasy and nightmare come true in one; and a boring cliche for all the intelligent and responsible females of the world. To all the Hollywood men out there: You can't brainwash us anymore with your b/s; okay??
Trinity is great. This movie isnt worth the time to read this review. It sucks and I'm a big Trinity fan. My advice is keep searchin
Shameful Amityville. Oh what a tangled web we weave... when Amityville fans we try to deceive. There is so little that is appealing about this train wreck of a movie that it astonishes me to this day that someone had the nerve to pin the Amityville name on this schlock fest.The story is downright wrong, if you can call the contrived script a story. two non believers move into the house to expose it as a simple hoax and get the surprise of their lives when they discover as others before them had, that the house is definitely not one apt to be selected for Better Homes and Gardens magazine. Sounds interesting, right? Wrong.The performances by Roberts in particular are flat and emotionless. Only the burnt in car victim on her way to tell the unsuspecting owner of the house's true nature scene is  slightly engaging. The script is horrible, the scares are non existent, and none of the original feelings that this could be really be true are there. Its a monstrosity of epic proportions that should NEVER be viewed by any true fan of the Amityville series. Avoid this movie.... like a haunted hous
Political propaganda is a horror unto itself. I was thoroughly enjoying the Master of Horror stories when I hit this clunker. Some eps were better than others surely but this one was just awful. I suppose if your views are more left than right, you'll find this fun in its fashionable depiction of the current administration - and an over the top extreme, better looking Anne Coulter character. I am an independent and really have my problems with both the Repugnantcans and the Devilcrats. However, the leftist elite with their high brow satire and constant screaming is enough to push me to the right. Anyway, back to this incredible piece of trash called a horror movie. It was neither horror nor the least bit funny. Throw a couple of zombies in with a conscience that fits your liberalism and I guess those who think as you do will be quite pleased. As for me, I'd buy most of the first season of the Masters of Horror series but this one isn't even close to meriting my coinage. Make a political statement elsewhere but please let's separate horror and state.
Worst treatment of one of the most under rated TV shows ever. To charge a ridiculously high price for an abridged release of any TV series is a crime. In this case it only adds insult to injury. This TV show was never fully appreciated, much less promoted in it's original run, which coincided with the early years of The Simpsons. But that can be credited to Fox Television's still relatively early, unsure of itself years when it wasn't quite sure where to emphasize its marketing. Nevertheless, that's no reason to perpetuate that crime in its DVD release. Chris Elliott was perfectly cast in this role of the live at home with the folks, 30 year old paper boy. It gave him an avenue of extention for the dry wit he demostrated in his years on David Letterman (who can forget, the man under the stands, and his Marlon Brando routines on that show). Watching this show you can see where producers cast him as the lead in "Cabin Boy," again, another unappreciated work. The wit and sarcasm are the same, as is the way he irks those around him, including his own folks, which includes his real life dad Bob Elliott of classic old time radio fame, and Elanor Donahue of "Father Knows Best" and "Andy Griffith," where she played a before her time sexy pharmacist named Ellie. I give this series 2 stars merely due to the quality of the episodes themselves, which  was the perfect marriage of writers who worked around Elliotts' delivery and humor. On that it should get a 5, but the collection offered here is a disgrace. This show ranks as one of the top 2 TV shows to get cut short before given a fair chance, along with "Police Squad," which at least was given a second life in movie theaters via "The Naked Gun" movies. Elliott deserved better than just "Cabin Boy" towards that end. Try again on the DVD release boys. Either do it right, or it shouldn't have been done at all
Exploitation Versus Art--Ingmar Bergman's Oscar Winner and Wes Craven's Shocker Tell The Same Tale. There is an interesting comparison to be made between Ingmar Bergman's classic "The Virgin Spring" and the grisly exploitation shocker it inspired, "Last House on the Left" by Wes Craven.  They share identical plots, feature graphic rape scenes, and before it's all over turn average men into murderers.  And yet one is considered to be a bona fide classic and 1961's Oscar-winning Best Foreign Film--and the other appreciated only in underground circles, but largely reviled as cheap gruesome exploitation.So just how different are they?  Not as different as you might imagine--but as different as art and exploitation."The Virgin Spring" is easily one of Bergman's most accessible films.  Telling a simple story in a straightforward fashion, he exposes a frankness and brutality people weren't accustomed to seeing.  A young girl venturing through the woods encounters two men and a boy.  Though they initially seem helpful, their actions quickly become violent.  After a graphic (for the time) rape, the girl is murdered.  Later, the wrongdoers happen upon the girl's home and seek shelter from her family--both groups unaware of who the other is.  Suspicions start to arise and vengeance is sought.It is a powerful tale of love, loss and the depths people can be driven into--where they become unable to stop themselves from betraying their faith and moral code, where savagery and rage take over.  Bergman's film benefits greatly from a stellar lead performance by Max von Sydow as the father.  Real conflict and raw emotion burn up the screen.  Add the beautiful cinematography and haunting score and it's a winning combination.  But what endures in the story of "The Virgin Spring" is how strong a component faith becomes--when there is nothing left to believe in, can you still believe?  A classic in every sense, "The Virgin Spring" still has the power to shock but there's something very redemptive about the film."Last House on the Left," however, is probably more notorious than acclaimed.  The plot, as I've said, is identical.  Coming 12 years later, in 1972, Wes Craven was at the beginning of his career and sought to retell this tale.  It is a shocker, and the scenes of rape and murder clearly foreshadow the "torture cinema" of today.  It is brutal, uncompromising and graphic--and the film was championed in the underground horror market.Working with a small budget, the film lacks the artistry of "The Virgin Spring."  While it still packs a visceral punch and has the power to shock--what it lacks is depth and subtlety.  The characters aren't particularly drawn out so their actions don't have the emotional resonance of the earlier film.  Without contemplating faith and moral choices, what we're left with is straightforward revenge.  And the film, ultimately, has no redemption--no uplift.  It's violence for the sake of violence.  It remains a historically significant precursor and influence on other shock films without being a particularly good movie in it's own right.And therein lies the difference between art and exploitation.   KGHarris, 11/06
Not Impressed. Sure the acting and the direction are adequate (Robson Green is a charismatic screen presence) -- certainly a cut above most American TV crime fare.  Alas, the story lines in this series are so contrived and improbable that they completely dispell the illusion of close-to-the-bone realism this show tries to project. I watched 3 installments of this series and each time I was struck by the lack of authenticity in the characters, their motivations, actions (and reactions)-- beneath the "gritty" veneer, these characters are paper-thin and implausible (particularly the criminals). Creeghan's tendancy to vigilantism is disturbing, yet fails to convince (I mean the guy's a walking liability, a loose cannon obviously in need of psych-leave) The whole production emits a subtle, yet palpable air of manipulation, sensationalism & pretense.  Want to see a truly gritty -- and thoroughly human -- British crime series? Watch "Prime Suspect" and skip these
Very Disappointing... Hmm...a Call of Cthulhu silent film.  Sounds interesting.  Sounds like everyone loves it..It just isn't very good.  I was more or less in agony watching it and by the end I actually felt a bit ripped off after it was over.It's just so low budget and it just plain doesn't work.  Cthulhu in particular was disappointing.  The whole film felt like a sort of "test film" to show investors...not a finished product
Hartnett's accent blows. I like hairdressing.This movie is abour hairdressing. And Professor Snape is fabulous as the Hairdresser. And so is Matt Sullivan, the wise cracking boy who has gone without sex for 40 days, is also a Hairdresser. As is Josie.I like hairdressing.Do you?
Good but about 10 years too late. I have been a long-time radiohead fan and, like many others, have been waiting patiently for a live DVD.  So I was thrilled to find out they released one and immediately bought it without even looking at the setlist.  It never occurred to me that they would release material that is nearly 10 years old!I couldn't help being disappointed when I watched this DVD.  The constantly changing camera angles and general lack of concern for the song itself make this unpleasant to watch.  In fact, I only watched it once and it has since been gathering dust.  I know I would have enjoyed it much more had it come out when the songs were still in their prime.I've always that Radiohead was modern, progressive, and totally innovative.   I appreciate their old music but they have come a long way since pablo honey... and it doesn't help that before every song, Thom mutters "this is a new one."
an exercise in film making; not a film; 2/10. Roman Polanski, whom I'm none too big a fan, is quoted as saying "People like Truffaut, Lelouch and Godard are like little kids playing at being revolutionaries."  And I think that quote sums up Shoot the Piano Player fairly well, it's an exercise in film, using new ideas & concepts, such as the scene where we don't follow Charlie but instead follow the woman leaving the apartment room, but in the end is a vapid, hollow piece of art; like a Norman Rockwell painting, or the work of Andy Warhol.Upon initial release the film was torn apart by the general public & critics alike, but now some 50 years later it's considered a landmark film, one of the most, if not the, most important of the French new wave, a movement cited as being the biggest influence on the American cinema of the late 60's and early 70's.  But, simply because it was influential doesn't necessarily stamp it's place as flawless.Everything about the film is fantastic; the acting, the music, the cinematography, and yes, the radical ideas Truffaut used are inspiring, but it's not enough to save a film that is utterly meaningless.The thing about the French New Wave's effect of American cinema is that American film makers took their ideas & added a layer of depth to them; they were more than just "oh, let's try this weird shot, it'll  be experimental"The movement, on numerous occasions, has been compared to jazz, which I can understand but don't agree with; with jazz, yes there's a free flowing improvisation, but there's something there than just pretty pictures & ideas that would be considered absurd by the standard audience's mind.A fantastic example of a scenario where the influence was greater than the original is John Cassavettes, whose Killing of a Chinese Bookie has the feel of a French New Wave film, but is also a fantastic work of art
Big Time Rip-Off. I don't know why people want to do this to their fans... It's too expensive for what you're getting... a few videos. There's a D12 song for promotional purposes and a worthless little tour of Eminem's house you'll never watch twice. The best part was the making of 'Stan'. Could've included a concert performance or interviews. 'Buyer Beware
Okay, But Could've Been Better. This movie was kind of disapointing to me. I thought it could've been a lot funnier than it was. The performance of Britnay Murphy was okay, she could've been better. The Performance of Dakota Fanning was ecxellent it was so good. She's a good child Actress. One of the best i've ever seen. The story of the movie was okay, it was slow and boring. thats why i didn't like it.Plot. Molly(Murphy) is a daughter of a dead rock star who is living of his fortune, one day her accountant runs away with the money and there is only one thing she can do, and have never done. Get A Job. This would bee a new experince for her. She becomes a nanny of a Spoild brat named Ray(Fanning) who thinks the whole world Is A Germ Infested place. There is only one thing diffrent between the two. Molly is 23 and acts like a kid, Ray is 10 and acts like an adult. Can ray show molly how to become an adult?If you liked this movie check out the soundtrack
A slow paced drama!. Despite the some edition problems and the presence of lagoons in the script, the story retains its interest. A disturbed woman in his early twenties, who has suffered sexual abuse of his own father and maltreats of his husband finds casually, a man in the middle of the road who eventually will help to dig in her life and face her demons.
WHAT?!?!?!?. First, in all fairness, I haven't seen this movie. Why? I refuse to watch so called horror films that demonize snakes. Snakes are NOT evil, people, they are part of nature, and maybe occasionally one will eat a person. But we eat cows, spiders eat flies, and so on. Snakes are lovely creatures, and the CGI never does justice to their beauty.Anyway, my main problem with this movie? The cover. 'Boa' it says. OK, Boa Constrictor. The people behind this movie obviously did not do their homework on Boa Constrictors. Their teeth do not sit up front like venomous fangs. They sit in back, curved backwards, which is why a bite from a Boa would be painful.In conclusion, please, do not make more movies demonizing animals. Make movies about monsters that may or may not exist, make movies about humans who are monsters inside, but don't make something innocent evil. And if you MUST, do your homework on the creature and make it look realistic
Torture for historians. A friend had just bought this DVD. I happened to be visiting. He wanted to show me how the special effects had been used in creating the armies. I thought he was just going to show me a few minutes of film, but once it went into the DVD player, it just ran on and on.I was literally squirming in my seat, this "historical" film is so bad. From Brad Pitt's awkward, unconvincing Achilles, to the painfully anachronistic acting and appearance of the whole film. For some reason, I kept thinking of "Conan the Barbarian".After about an hour, I literally fled my friend's house, making some excuse. I haven't been back since.NOT for history buffs
Would have been better had they not called it DnD. Basically I'm a fan of B-Movie fantasy films as well as a long time DnD player. I can say that the movie by itself is really not that bad and I'd easily say that its not the worst B-Grade fantasy film ever made. However as a DnD movie it blows.  I'll never understand the need of filmakers to make a film based on something with a strong fan base and then change everything that the fans love about the subject. I can fully understand the need to change some things. This is a movie and unlike some purists I understand it is a different medium and sometimes things just have to be different. However this film bore almost NO resemblance to DnD. Fortunately when the sequel (Wrath of the Dragon God) was made this was fixed.Basically a good movie just not a good dnd movie. If you can get over that fact go ahead and watch it for the somewhat ok B fantasy movie that it is.
Great Anime, Bad Anime DVDs. Why is good anime often under represented or under understood (if that is a word)? Greed. FLCL is a great anime. But it's only 6 episodes at around 3 hrs. Yet somehow the DVD makers felt is necessary to split a 3-hour series over 3 DVDs and charge nearly $30.00 bucks a piece for them. I don't buy my anime in the U.S. I buy it overseas. Sure I may have to read subtitles, and I might occasionally even unintentionally be purchasing a pirated property (which I try to avoid by usually buying from a select number of dealers and by paying attention to the name of the DVDs' producers) but when I can buy an entire 26-episode series (like Cowboy Bebop or Witch Hunter Robin) on 3 DVDs for less than the price of one of those DVDs in the U.S. that only has three or four episodes of the same series (with all the &quot;extras&quot; - some sketchbook drawings &amp; trailers for other DVDs aren't exactly extras in my book!), I'll pick reading any day (especially since dubbed English DVDs are becoming more prevalent overseas). DVD producers will say that they have to charge that much because it's a niche market, etc. All I can think is that it will never stop being a niche market until people can see an entire series without having to pay $100.00-$300.00 to watch it
Rudolf, Go Play Your Games. I never liked this story.  First of all, I didn't like the island of unwanted toys.  I also didn't like the way the movie ended because I didn't like the way the scene of Santa's noisy sleigh flying to that island made me feel.  And what was wrong with the doll on the island?  We had Charlie-not-Jack-in-the-box, an ostrich riding cowpoke, a jelly squirting gun and a doll with no visible challenges.In addition to being maudlin, I didn't like the way Rudolf was accepted only after he bailed out the other reindeer.  Sure, the other reindeer loved Rudolf and shouted out with glee - they could afford to after he bailed them out.  Like couldn't he be accepted before he pulled that sleigh that foggy Christmas?  I'd recommend all the other Christmas stories before this one
The Beginning of Disappointment. As a big fan of Ralph, I was looking forward to The End of the Affair.  Maybe my expectations were too high, but this movie is dreadful.  Ralph is a brilliant actor, but not even his flawless acting can't compensate for the nonsensical plot and the horrific casting of Julianne Moore.  What happened to Moore?  It is NOT hard to learn a British accent.  From the sounds of it, Moore didn't even try.  She sounds so American she fails to convince anyone she has an ounce of English in her.  And if that weren't bad enough, the plot is as unconvincing as Moore's accent.  She's an adulteress, but miraculously heals a young boy's facial disfigurement and brings Ralph back from the dead. Even the priest admires her--adultery and all! Her husband does not know the meaning of jealously and lets Ralph live in the house even though he knows of the affair.  Still amidst the unbelievable, the plot is so predicatable.  She coughs a few times here and there.  So we know (before anyone in the movie figures it out) that she's dying.  We also know why she &quot;ends&quot; the affair long before its &quot;revealed&quot; to Ralph. And by the way, what was with all the nudity?  Totally unnecessary and vulgar
Not entertaining. Actually not much of anything... This DVD set doesn't look professional. Cheap camera work combined with ok (at best) music make this DVD a mildly entertaining 40 (x3) minutes. The sequencing is ok, each DVD starts with a visual tour of each city accompanied by music. There are maybe a total of 20 girls dancing in this DVD set (some of which are far from attractive). Some of the girls are on two different DVD's, which is kind of weird since it's supposed to be a different city on each DVD. I bought it so I could play it in the background on mute when I spin at parties, but this is not the right DVD for that. The music in this DVD doesn't match the dancing, and since the girls aren't professionals, the dancing itself is pretty awful. If you want to see girls dancing to techno music, go to a club. The last ten minutes of one of the DVDs are a lame interview with some unknown DJ, which is totally pointless
The second dvd is much better!. I purchased this dvd because I own the 2nd one and like it so much.  Boy, was I disappointed!  The abs diet people must have decided to create the second dvd because this one needed a good edit.  The second dvd covers basically the same exercises but with better instruction and form.  Skip this one and buy the Abs Diet Workout 2
BAD BACKSTREET BOYS. If you've ever seen a David DeCouteau movie (Brotherood, Leeches, Werewolves of New York) you know what to expect:  a homoerotic mishmash of ridiculous plotting, hunky boys in skimpy underwear; and relentless padding consisting of slow motion swaggering and lots of pecs and abs.  In RING OF DARKNESS, Adrienne Barbeau (Swamp Thing, Fog, Creepshow, Maude) plays the boy band's seductive manager who stages an audition to replace the band's lead singer who tried to leave them after he found out what the boys in the band were in reality.  Barbeau does well as always, but the rest of the insanely attractive cast needs acting lessons badly.  By the time you've figured out just what these hunks do to keep their looks, you've had to sit through some pretty derivative plotting and a predictably campy ending.  DeCouteau needs to rethink his future projects and at least come up with more than just pretty bods
NO BLOOPERS!!!. I hate to say this about such an amazing show, but unless you can find it for $19.95 or less, do not buy it.  This season does not have an out-takes feature.No comedy on TV should release a DVD without a bloopers reel.  Scrubs has always been known for the best bloopers.  It's why many of us shell out $25-$30 for the season as soon as it hits the shelves.  Interviews with the cast and crew are only valuable to the cast and crew, and deleted scenes are useful to remind the writers that you care about them.  But the audience wants to be entertained with more than what we can see on Comedy Central in a few months.  Seriously, the show is in syndication now, and the value of the actual episodes goes way south after that.Give me more to make me laugh
King Tut??. I took my grandchildren to see this movie. After the movie we went to have ice cream.  My oldest grandbaby who is ten asked me,  Was King Tut from Great Britain??....I know I know its laughable isn't it.King Tut  - Blond hair, blue eyes with a British accent
Another cover-up?. The content of the DVD "National Geographic - Is It Real? Da Vinci's Code" appears to be very badly researched. Assumptions made by National Geographic are presented to the viewer as facts. Conclusions drawn are in general not supported with plausible evidence. The views projected are bias and I wouldn't be surprised if the Catholic Church was the main sponsor of this movie. All in all a highly disappointing DVD
contrived, implausible crime drama. "Four Brothers" is yet another nail in the coffin of John Singleton's increasingly moribund moviemaking career.  The director - who burst upon the scene in 1991 with the vibrant and gritty "Boyz n the Hood" - has here mounted a film so burdened by implausibility and contrivance that it makes one wonder if the once-promising filmmaker will ever be able to get back on track again.  The story, reeking of artificiality, features Mark Wahlberg, Tyrese Gibson, Andre Benjamin and Garrett Hedlund as four troubled young men raised by the same foster mother.  When she is killed in a convenience store robbery, the quartet launches into action, seeking revenge against the perpetrators and becoming slowly convinced, through their investigation in the neighborhood, that the killing might not have been as random in nature as they had been initially led to believe.The main weakness of this film is that it gives us virtually no reason to care about any of the characters.  By not showing us any scenes between the boys and their foster mother (except for one embarrassingly bad Thanksgiving dinner fantasy sequence that looks as if it were conceived by a first-year film student), we are forced to take their relationship totally on faith, rendering the boys' thirst for revenge arbitrary at worst and academic at best.The acting is uniformly flat, with the characters little more than wafer-thin stereotypes, and even the action scenes come across as surprisingly mundane and second-rate given the Singleton pedigree in this area.  The boys' running around from venue to venue in their Detroit neighborhood, brandishing guns in full view of the populace and screaming for information about their mother's killer, is ludicrous on the face of it and often reduces the film to the level of cheap low comedy burlesque.With nary a single moment that rings believable or true, "Four Brothers" is by-the-book filmmaking from a director who has proven that he has the wherewithal and talent to do so much more.
It's bad in a very bad way. I try very much to be openminded when it comes to horror movies, but this? It's so bad my eyes started to hurt, bad idea and very bad acting.It's so bad I barried it deep deep down in my garden so no man could ever reach it again
A disappointment if the little things matter. I bought this season (which really should be season 3) of Baywatch episodes because I am a die hard fan of the show. However, this set of DVD's was very misleading and poorly made. If the show started in 1989, then this set is Season 3 not Season 2. The very first 2 episodes of this season which weren't on the DVDs should have been included. It was the episode where Mitch and Hobie got up to the river to go white water rafting gold country and Shauni gets kidnapped by some gold theives. Plus Eddie and Shauni get married at the very end of the 2nd episode. Very disappointing! The theme song, "I'm Always here" performed by Jim Jamison is not the title theme getting replaced by something very cheesy that doesn't even fit the show. None of the music video songs are the same because I remember every episode from that season like it was yesterday. I will buy the other boxed sets, but the only reason why is because Baywatch was my favorite television show. If First look entertainment is going to make more boxed sets, please bring the old theme song back and place some of the missing episodes on future discs or you will have more disappointed customers. I only gave this set 2 stars because it was my favorite show at the time
Technical problems render this oater virtually unwatchable. This undistinguished oater is made much worse by technical problems.  It isn't a bad little western, and the two lead roles are played competently by Vera Miles, whose most famous role was Laurie Jorgensen in "The Searchers," and Sam Elliott, who was born to make westerns.  It had a good plot and some beautiful desert locations.Unfortunately, the film was not well shot.  None--and I mean not one--of the interior scenes is adequately lighted; you can barely make out dark shadows moving around against a black background.  The scenes in the Cactus Jail, which are key and set up the movie, might as well be taking place in a cave without even a candle for light.  Then there's the DVD which is full-frame and was mastered from an extremely distressed print of the film.  The DVD is blurry and shows every scratch, spot, and speck of dirt that 33 years of obscurity could inflict on the print.  Too bad.  Miles and Elliott deserved better.  Frankly, because of the technical issues, the film is probably not worth wasting 90 minutes on.
Another over rated movie. Please do not compare this with Clock Work Orange. It's shame. This movie is shame on director. Cutting many heads or killing more bodies does not prove movie is good. This movie is like B grade stuff.Plot is good, but not the direction or screen play
I wouldn't ever watch this movie again!. When I saw this movie, I knew that all of the truth wouldn't be in the film. I just didn't know they would bend the truth that much! It was poorly researched the facts wern't straight and they over exaggerated her sex life and made her out to be a codependent woman who would sell out to any man that was "someone". I mean come on, I know she was a sex symbol of her time and wanted attention, but they took it to far. Another thing that really bothered me, was how they made it seem like she was a crazy loon, a huge junkie and a stupid person! She was not any of those things. Anyone who has ever read a book or interviews with her, would know that. So I'm telling you now, if you want to "know" about Marilyn Monroe, your better off buying a bio about her. The only good thing about this movie, is that Ashley Judd and Mira Sorvino are really good actresses
Take Me to your Greenhouse Baby. This film is a bunch of disjointed skits. Thy try too hard to be campy; however with not enough lead and no finish each disjointed sketch just leaves you wanting. There are a few made-up ersatz songs and Jayne Mansfield's accoutrements; aside from those everything else is flat.There are a few personalities but they never shine:Phyllis Diller (fully clothed)Brian Donlevy (storms the beach)Jayne Mansfield (always points north)The Wild Ones (People Sure Act Strange)The introductory song was the best part of the film.A final thought "Love is a rose, but you better not pick it"
Starts well, goes downhill. Secret Things starts well, but descends into a plot about vindictive females and males, involving too many characters, none of whom are likable. Toward the beginning, the movie seems to be about two exhibitonist females and their bond together. But the film becomes a workplace drama involving bosses and the company's son, who is like a French version of Caligula. The movie is some kind of cross between Dangerous Liaisons and the last 30 minutes of Eyes Wide Shut. It has some hot sex scenes to be sure, but not a strong enough plot to rescue it. Disappointing
This dub is sickening, Why did Sonic X have to be ruined in English?  Especially Series 2?. If this was dubbed well, I would rate this a 5, I love series 2 of Sonic X, but NOT THIS VERSION.  I'm sorry but this was the worst dubbed 26 episodes of Sonic X ever.  They delete Cosmo and Molly's death, and change Tails' feelings completely showing NO love or romance. Cream, Vector and Sonic's horrid voices or the screechy Rebecca Honig, the painfully annoying and Barney Gumble sounding Carter Cathcart, and the bland, emotionless, and dweeby Jason Anthony Griffith (Though on voice matters, if there was ANY voice that made me stop watching this show ever again in English, it's Rebecca Honig as Cream, gave me a headache listening to it, that is NOT how a kid sounds).  That horrid replacement music.  The original made me cry, but after episode 74, I stopped and just read the edits and such, and what I read about episodes 77 and 78 appalled me, no true anime fan should buy this DVD set, it's an insult to anime, it's an insult to emotions, and it's an insult to Sonic.  download the episodes in Japanese or French if you can find them, it's better then this.  Trust me, I watched the English episodes as well as the Japanese episodes.  Naruto was a good edited dub, this is not.Some of the edits involve editing out Molly's death, Changing Cosmo's death completely to something else that makes it look like a bad fanfic (and if my friend Jason is reading this, I said BAD Fanfic, NOT JUST fanfic), they also cut out the part where Knuckles was trying to save Zelkova which I felt was an inportant character part  for Knuckles and even the bad guy before he died.  They also changed Tails feelings towards Cosmo to just friendship rather then love, why?  it was some junk on seeds and such, it made no sence and made it sound nasty.  the ONLY episodes I think were dubbed decently were episodes 73 and 74 but they were still badly voiced and the music was still annoying.  And even so, some translations was pathetic, like when Tails attacked Shadow to protect Cosmo, when Shadow struck Tails, instead of Cosmo yelling to Tails by name in fear for his safety, she just said quietly "he's hurt" talk about stating the obvious.......  Why does Cosmo's actress have to sound old and emotionless?  in Japanese Cosmo is an 8 year old girl full of emotion, did 4Kids not know that?Being the Sonic fan and Anime purist I am, I am making a fandub of this show to see if I can make a better, uncut and more in character English version.I can say this, THIS IS the final release of Sonic X, TMS and 4Kids confermed it to me resently in a email from each.  So maybe with this gone for a bit, things can get back on track for Sonic, and when another company hopefully licences Sonic X, they can make a better english versions with the original music, original story and better voices, especially Sonic's (it doesn't actually have to be Ryan Drummond or Jaleel White, just someone who can fit Sonic's character like those two were able).So for now I do say SO LONG SONIC
American Pie: The New Lampoon. Is it just me or is American Pie becoming another National Lampoon type thing where they just create a bunch of weak, strait to DVD movies that are trying to sale based on the American Pie franchize name? About as lame as the Dukes of Hazzard sequal, Dumb & Dumberer, and the numerous Disney movies comin' out with strait to DVD release sequals to movies made like 50 years ago
"Who would want to kill the sweetest ****** woman in the world?". I knew I was in trouble with FOUR BROTHERS when I saw that Josh Howard (of SPORTS NIGHT fame) was scowling hard, trying to be a tough Detroit cop. Not believable for a nanosecond. And then it got worse when Marky Mark said, "Why don't you two cops get some doughnuts and coffee?"The rest of the film veers along in that kind of lame and clichd rhythm. Almost every scene in this thing is a howler. And watching it, I remembered I hadn't forgiven Tyrese Gibson for the travesty that was 2 FAST 2 FURIOUS. Still, Tyrese is better than Garrett Hedlund, who looks like he's a refugee from THE OUTSIDERS.But the movie's not a total wash; after all, it's got a GREAT soundtrack
A drama? A romantic comedy?. This was a black comedy that unfolded over the first 30 minutes of the film, revealing one surprise relationship after another, until you realize that all the major characters are related in surprising ways.  It's kind of strange, because this movie wasn't terribly complicated, but I'm still not sure what to make of it.Catherine O'Hara has her two military helicopter-pilot sons scare her cheating husband, whose cheating on her with Drew Barrymore. The husband is successfully scared (to death) and Drew Barrymore is an earwitness through her headset at a burger joint.  I won't say "Home Fries" is a complete waste. I was somehow taken in enough to watch the entire movie. One shining light is Luke Wilson, who steals most of the scenes he has, and the crazy thing is that he's stealing them from actors like Jake Busey and Catherine O'Hara.It was the overall movie premise and plot lines that were average at best. After the first 30 minutes of the movie you could see the direction the film would take.Overall, this movie didn't know which way it wanted to go. A comedy? A drama? A romantic comedy?  I'm still not sure
For DVD... THE MOVIE KICK@SS!!!! HOWEVER, DO NOT BUY THIS DVD... STICK WITH PREVIOUS 1 Disc Set DVD... It's exactly same DVD except... Disc 2 contains M:I:III Trailer and WE-LOVE-TOM-CRUISE STUFF... A BIG WASTE!!
Amazingly Average Low Budget Feature. Not surprisingly, the AFTER DARK FILMS are weak or average...The hype is silly.If you want a movie "too scary or whatever for general audiences" may I suggest Henry:Portriat of a Serial Killer, heck, even American Psycho pulled more intensity than these films.The Hamiltons was Ok at best, The feature was what it was, low budget horror, fine... love them... but, I failed to see what was so impressive, it looked, felt & unfolded by the standard formula, like thousands of others released all the time...I suggest a rental even for hard core horror feinds like myself before buying it...Worth a watch if you see nothing else on the rental rack, nothing more...nothing less..
Just my 2 cents... I've loved this film forever.  It's a yearly viewing at Halloween for me.  My VHS was looking more and more worn out, so a DVD announcement was met with much excitement.  However, for everything that's already been mentioned here, I didn't buy the DVD.  I've seen shots of the image quality and it looks excellent enough to make my mouth water.  But all the bad comments about it still stop me from buying it.  Now, it's much cheaper in some places but even so I find it hard to waste money on something that has essentually been ruined by a wrong-thinking studio.Closing:  read the comments here and realise that we will all buy this film (heck, even for the price this one was listed at) if you will just restore it to its original print, complete with all scenes and musical score.  This version isn't even worth 6 bucks.Thanks in advance.
Soo primitive. The movie is a about a guy, who does a lot of work and no fun and then feels sorry about that. That's pretty much the whole story. Well, the idea is quite powerful but not new, the characters are done in the "comics" style and very primitive, the jokes are quite boring.Actually what is really amazing, that it could've been ok to watch as a family movie, but a few really tasteless jokes made it PG13 rated without adding any fun, so the movie about family values is not appropriate for kids.Too boring for adults, not appropriate for kids, too much moral for young crowd - I can't really think who might like it
A Misfit Copy. of The Fast & The Furious movie and only 20% of the movie time contains racing, Simply the movie is an advertise for a Misfit car called 2005 GTO (a.k.a Holden Monaro desgined and produced in Australia) also released as 2003 Chevrolet Lumina SS Copue in the Middle East (I bought one before & sold it after one week only), This car simply not Pontiac or Chevrolet it's Holden and you can find alot of them in the streets because of it's cheap price as a sports car.for more info. check: www.holden.com.au / www.chevroletarabia.co
Title misleading. We thought we would hear more of Bill's well known "here's your sign" routine - what you get in this DVD is some stand up routines with the last 5 minutes or so "mentioning" the "here's your sign" lines ... very dissapointing.  Would not recomend to those looking to here his well know routines
Mud. Slow,dull and done on the "cheap"....stick with "Zulu" and read your history book's ....far more entertaining
A sad history. I was kinda disapointed by this film.Hardcore and punk can sometimes represent what is beatiful and what life should be about. But this film is just sad. To see these musicians talk about how many people they fought and how much cooler they were than the rest is not punk at all. Punk is freedom and what hardcore became is prison. The conformity they tried to escape is what they became in the end
Annoying and obnoxious. This is a ridiculous and pointless film. The terrible dubbing only adds to the displeasure of viewing this film. The story is non-sensical; the "shocking" parts of this film are not really shocking; the characters are one-dimensional caricatures; and what is up with that stupid suit that Ichi wears? If you must watch something by this director, then watch Audition, which actually has a point to it.
The book is fascinating; the movie fails it. I'm a retired attorney. I enjoy crime novels and the movies that bring them to us visually. However, this movie simply is a pain to watch, IF one enjoyed the drama of the book. The book "Blood Work" is very detailed and the solution to the "who done it" is very well hidden. I won't bore you with details but if you want to know how the movie compares with the novel, read the review by "km southern" dated Oct 19, 2004, that is available below. She is right on. The movie has so many flaws that even without having read the book upon which it purports to be based, it is a poor choice
No Habeas, not much Corpus, and definitely not Delictus. I hate lawyers.What is a lawyer, anyway? Basically: it's a telemarketer in a decent suit, a guy who would be hawking the latest Ronco Hair-in-a-Can super-duper late night special to folks in Akron over his plantronic headset, only he won the genetic lottery and got shot out of an upper-middle class womb.Shakespeare said it first and best: "First, let's kill all the lawyers!". Former Enron uber-dealmaker John Wing put a little fast-times Houston spin on that one: "get all the lawyers in a room---and shoot 'em!---in the mouth, so you *can't* miss!"Exactly. Anyway, "The Firm" is a flick that purports to make the world of high-priced yappers jaw-rippingly exciting, so I was probably all amped up to despise it.But not really: back before I dug into a gig with the Dark Side in high finance, back when I was hefting a backpack over the sodden campus of my old alma mater, I briefly considered going into law: briefly, for about an hour. It was a desperate time, and I needed money.Why did I consider walking Hell's Highway, if only for an instant? Because John Grisham, boring lawyer-turned-ripping-potboiler-writer-turned-back-into-boring-lawyer, a kind of Tom Clancy for the paper-pusher and green-eyeshade set, made it all sound pretty damned funky (and lucrative! Hey, dig that BMW 7 series, baby, beep beep!) in his engrossing little novel "The Firm": granted, I've read better prose on the backs of cereal boxes, but it held my attention.I mean, seriously: you're 19, and the whole flying out on the corporate Lear to Grand Cayman and switching out briefcases full of cash sounds kinda cool. And strippers, man, plenty of strippers. Oh, and did someone mention a BMW?What's the difference between a lawyer and a snake? The snake at least has the decency to hiss before it sinks its fangs into your a**.Now it's true: Grisham writes like Kim Jong Il sings, but---in "The Firm", anyway---he was a master craftsman at moving things along at a bristling pace, from the pedestrian---hotshot Law School whiz kid gets picked up by a Memphis white-shoe law firm---to the Pretty Damned Atrocious, all while keeping the pressure ratcheted up with a dense, suffocating sense of malice.Grisham, like Michael Crichton, isn't a prose genius: he's not even mediocre. But he writes for film, and "The Firm" cried out for cinematic treatment.So it's baffling that, with all the right Stuff---Tom Cruise as winsome lead Mitch McDeere, Gene Hackman doing his chain-drinking Gene Hackman thang as the corrupt (but ultimately worn-out and pathetic) senior partner, and Sydney Pollack helming it up---that the big-screen treatment of "The Firm" is such a yawner.Talk about contempt of court.Pollack takes all that intricately woven little Grisham-plot and barfs big ugly chunks of it up on the screen. At its guts, really, "The Firm" was really nothing more than the Big Career Nightmare: I've bet the farm on this gig, I'm getting big money, I'm working like a fiend, my wife is having trouble remembering my name, and evidently I'm not doing tax-deals for loaded clients---I'm doing money laundering for The Mob.Pollack just mangles the whole thing, convolutes the simple, and renders up a flick that will have you checking your watch and yawning. Casting is part of the problem: Cruise does his thing, running around Memphis with his briefcase. Hackman drinks a lot and exudes pure Armani-clad sleaze: "The Firm" is all funny-wrinkles when he's onscreen, but hey, a man can only do so much.Jeanne Tripplehorn (Cruise's squeeze), who plays Lara San Giacomo when she's not playing Tripplehorn (seriously, google the two of 'em: astounding!) is a bitter old battleaxe who made me want to stick forks in my eyes. Wilford Brimley is just plain wrong as The Firm's security chief: too bald, too cracker, too rotund, too silly, too low-end, to do the role justice.Holly Hunter is even worse: Hunter is one of those eighties thangs who got pumped up as Something Sexy, which is baffling, given that she's about 3'8, and has all the sex appeal of an Oompah-Loompah. It doesn't help that she's a big, ugly Southern stereotype, the caricature most denizens of dumpy Michigan towns imagine Southerners to be. You want her to die: she doesn't. Pollack wants us to think she's clever and funny. She isn't.Ed Harris, I think, is in this movie. So is Hal Holbrook, which kinda ruins everything, because everytime Hal Holbrook is in a movie you know you're dealing with a bunch of friggin' crooks.Anyway, the coup de grace to the stupidity is the entrance, Deus Ex Machina, of Paul Sorvino (Don Morolto---what kind of Goombah name is dat, anyway? Somebody call Tony Soprano!), who takes this juggernaut of boredom from the merely stupid to the totally ridiculous.If you wanna see Tom Cruise running around Memphis with his briefcase for two hours, by all means belly up to the bar.Otherwise, case dismissed.JS
Ryan Gives Standout Portrayal in Noir Misfire. Robert Ryan never delivered a bad performance. His memorable portrayal of a Tokyo crime boss is the best thing in "House of Bamboo" (1955) -- director Samuel Fuller's flat attempt at Japanese film noir. Ryan easily towers over Robert Stack's routine characterization, which looks like a dry run for "The Untouchables." Apart from Ryan and Joseph MacDonald's on-location CinemaScope photography, this reworking of the superior "Street With No Name" collapses at the starting gate
empire of the wolves. So whose brilliant idea was it substitute Jean Reno's trademark french accent with a bloody yank's?  What a total let down, the entire appeal of this bloke is his gruff, natural french accent and to trade it off with a yankie accent is beyond comprehension. Idiots.Ray DuncanAustralia.
They have certainly got some explaining to do. Parents and children who loved the other Leap Frog DVDs about letters, words and reading will find this one disappointing.Advertised as beginning math, this one is mixed up in its focus, spending quite a bit of time on recognizing the numbers from 0 to 10 (especially zero) and relating them to &#8220;quidgets&#8221;, then quickly jumping to addition and subtraction without sufficient explanation or introduction of the concepts.  Starting with simple counting, by the end of the 35 minutes, they&#8217;re showing us ten times tables up to one hundred.Very young children will probably like the repetitive cowboy &#8220;numbers&#8221; song, and may even stick around for the &#8220;circus&#8221; acts and accompanying slapstick routines, but the concepts advance too quickly for this age group.  Kids who already know their numbers won&#8217;t learn anything new from the beginning of the presentation, but then again, they probably won&#8217;t learn anything from the rest of it either.Clearly one should not expect kids to learn math in 35 minutes, which makes you wonder what they were thinking when they made this one.  A more sensible approach would be to have different DVDs for each level, as they did in the reading series, so that they could spend more time going into the nitty-gritty, and making it fun.This one is a rush job, and was not properly thought out for the intended audience.  Definitely not a tool you should count on to introduce your kids to math.Amanda Richards, May 4, 2006
Sad to say this lowered my opinion of David Cross. Don't get me wrong--like a lot of you looking over this DVD, I like David Cross's stand-up comedy a lot and I've always enjoyed Mr. Show, too.I think this documentary disappointed me so much because I found its overall effect neither very entertaining nor engaging (things I like about some behind-the-scenes documentaries), but instead rather formless and mean spirited.While we do get a candid look at the exhausting realities of life on the road on a tour (I admit Cross does run into some impossible crowds and pain in the a** people), so much of this DVD seems designed to make other people--including *fans* of Cross--look stupid.  For a comic who routinely (and hilariously) criticizes religious and political thinkers for their intolerance, Cross himself frequently comes across as a pretty intolerant and elitist guy.It's just odd to me that Cross would take his tour out of comedy clubs (a neat idea) and into rock clubs, then get irate when crowds behave like they're at a rock show.  Director Lance Bangs had the opportunity to: (1) widen our understanding of what it's like to be on the road and (2) ask some interesting questions (how do you make people laugh? how do you deal with the exhaustion, the disappointments, of being a performer?).Instead he just delivers a documentary full of easy cheap shots and unenlightening minutiae.  Bangs has done some good work in the past with musicians; I don't know what happened here.Save your time and money
(mumbles...) (mumbles...) (mumbles...). When I first picked this up back in 2003 when 50 Cent was hot, I was thinking highly. I mean, a full-blown documentary, music videos, new songs and sessions@aol at my disposal. Once I saw the documentary, all I have to say is that I cant understand a damn thing that 50 Cent is saying. He cant speak English to save his life, and that destroyed everything because I couldn't hear a f***ing thing that he was talking about. As for the music videos, it was 50 Cent walking around with his ho's with his muscle shirt and his 9's with his g-unit gangstaz. The sessions@aol was a joke. The extra tracks sucked. All in all, a huge waste of money. So, it is used rehularly as a coaster
Very wearying tale of nonstop bloodshed. I'm a fan of Miike, but _Izo_ is just too much. There's no plot whatsoever, just a poor unfortunate reincarted samurai wandering through time and space and killing everyone who crosses his path. That's it! End of sentence! If you think you can stand over two hours of this, give it a try. If you're looking for something with even a rudimentary plot, you might want to try something else, like _Audition_ or _Ichi the Killer_. I'd rather watch the incomprehensible _Gozu_ again than be forced to sit through _Izo_. It is a beautifully-photographed, but ultimately pointless film. Maybe the 6th or 7th other film Miike directs this year will be more interesting
Predictable But Entertaining. I liked this movie, but I can't for the life of me tell you why. It features Nicolette Sheridan as "Donna Randal," a wife and mother, who has a brief affair with her daughters teacher while her husband "Jeff," played by Robert Seeliger, is away on assignment. The affair is actually encouraged by her best friend and co-worker "Roz," played by Leni Parker.Donna is upset because her husband's job as a foreign correspondent keeps him away for extended periods of time, and while on his current assignment he has forgotten to call her on their anniversary. She meets her daughters teacher "Adam," played by Andrew Jackson, who sympathizes with her, and she is quite taken by him. She runs into him at a concert and one thing leads to another and she ends up in his bed for one night.As it turns out when she gets home and takes a shower to wash off the effects of her adultery, her husband shows up while she is towelling off, and announces that he is home to stay. She doesn't seem to be really overjoyed by the news, taking advantage of his presence to chew him out for past absences, but they do come together when he shows the proper remorse for his past sins of doing his job,(a little sarcasm there). As it rurns out, Adam, the teacher, shows up that night not knowing that Jeff has returned, and after an awkward few monents leaves, pretending to have been concerned about the daughter "Melinda," played by Amanda Tilson. Jeff seems a little suspicious, suggesting to Donna that since he is home and Melissa seems to be OK there will be no need for Adam to pay any more visits.As the plot develops it turns out that her dalliance with Adam was videotaped and a copy is delivered to her husband at his office. He is understandably upset, and after playing the tape for her he leaves, taking Melinda with him.After few days she goes to see Jeff to plead for a reconciliation. This is where the movie drops from a "4" to a "3" for me. When he makes it plain that he is through with her and can not forgive her adultery she tries to excuse it by saying she had been angry at his absence, was lonely and upset at his forgetting their anniversary. It seems to me that his reply should have been "so your reaction to being angry with me is to go out and have sex with someone else?" The logical follow-up would be "how many other times have you been angry with me?"But he passes up that opportunity and the movie progresses to what I consider a  formulaic and predictable conclusion that leaves me mildly dissappointed. All in all it was worth an evenings viewing and Nicollette in a tight tee shirt made it worth watching for me
ok.. not a great movie... someone made a comment in these reviews about.."Have you ever screwed up unintentionally in a relationship?".. and all i can think is please, the guy in this movie goes out with another girl cause he wants to sleep with her, even tho he doesnt want to admit it to himself, but he does admit it to his friend... he knew what he was doing when he went out with that other girl, it wasnt unintentional, he was a jerk, and he deserved what she put him thru, i found the main actress very funny, and i dont understand why she wanted this jerk back, wont she keep wondering if hes straying? its kinda sad, if a guy with a g/f that pretty strays, what hope is there? i suppose not all guys are jerks...this movie was a rollercoaster, shes showing his whos boss, and he shows her they make eachother jealous, blah blah blah..
Terribly Disappointed!!!!  Curse Words!!!!. I purchased this movie for my 7 year old twin boys birthday thinking that because it said the rating was PG that it would be fine.  Also, the market for Transformers is huge with boys their age and the toys being sold everywhere.  Wow, were we hugely surprised to hear curse words on this cartoon movie.  These were not just words like shoot or dang, but the real deal.  I remember Transformers when I was growing up and I certainly do not remember their being foul language in the cartoons.  I am going to take this matter up with higher management and at least get my money back and try find out what they were thinking.  Who knows what the rating will end up being for the upcoming movie at the box office.Concerned in Alabam
One of the most overrated films of all time. The best thing about this tiresome mess is the stunning cinematography and Scorsese's knowledge of New York personalities. But the film utterly fails to capture the magnetism of boxing in its heyday, or provide a fascinating insight into a driven contender from the streets.From the all-too-obvious movie references to the overweening sentimentality, Scorsese tries to make an Elia Kazan-esque masterpiece and fails miserably. DeNiro's performance as LaMotta is a lot of what we would see from him in later years --monomaniacal mumbling, zero charisma; an almost self-congratulatory exercise in the excesses of dramaturgy.Who was Jake La Motta? Why was he this way? What was his background? What did he hope to achieve? On the Criterion Laserdisc of this film, La Motta himself in three minutes gives more insight into these things than Scorsese and Schrader's drama does in over two hours. To me, that's BAD filmaking.I have heard from film snobs that much of Raging Bull's fascination lies in the significance it holds in the oevre of Scorsese. He had just failed miserably with New York, New York and this was almost a religious purging of his soul. I suppose if you want to read into it, be my guest. I consider that self-absorption. I have also heard the patronizing "it's funny" angle regarding LaMotta. I do not think this was Scorsese's intention and I do not find the serious issue of spousal abuse very funny
iNCREDIBLY STUPID FILM. This film really made me angry and pissed off I bothered watching it. The characters were cardboard and I can't believe Ingrid Bergman starred in this junk.The main character totally lost it, believing all what her husband was saying about her. She was totally unthinking in the whole episode until it was revealed that her husband was a con
"A Promise is a Promise". It Could Happen to You was a bit of a disappointment, considering the makeup of the cast: Nicolas Cage, Bridget Fonda, and Rosie Perez among others.The movie brings to the screen the story of a policeman who after winning 4 million dollars on the NY state lotto, decides to share half of it with a waitress he met the previous day.The acting is surprisingly (!) below average, the dialogues are way below average, while the plot is not bad at all.Nicolas Cage's character is too naive and too slow, and that was just sad/pitiful!Bridget Fonda was unexpectedly plain and bland.Rosie Perez's character was overly exaggerated to the point that it got tiring AND annoying very early on.As for Wendell Pierce and Stanley Tucci this film does not seem to be their thing; they don't seem to belong.  Subsequently, they are not convincing in their roles at all.Finally, somebody shoot the "Narrator," PLEASE!Though the potential for a great movie was definitely there it fails to take off.  A shame really...  No masterpiece here.If Nicolas Cage is what you had in mind, check out the AMAZING movies City of Angels and/or The Family Man.
Not Even Entertaining. Chris DeBurgh should get a marketing manager or at least someone to keep him from embarrassing himself with a product like this one.  Half the time, even the audience doesn't know when they are supposed to be excited...except the paid ones.Also, it's great to see a 20 to 30 minute set of acoustic Chris during a concert...but Chris DeBurgh NEEDS a band...without it, his songs go as limp as they do on this DVD.Sorry Chris, I love you, man...but could I have my money back this time
just ok. the show lost it's zip by season 7. the chemistry wasn't the same. the scripts had gotten watered down&you could sense a show just going through the motions on quite a few of these episodes.the show had it's last real peak during Season 4.i still enjoy watching the show though
Blame Michael Flatley... ... for giving every dance studio and popular dance genre the hope that they too can be the "next Riverdance". The dancers are all talented, if self-consciously hip, and in great shape. But the numbers that focus more on T & A than fancy footowrk really did this show in for me. I love it when risks are taken with conventional dance forms, but ballroom dance is OTT enough ( if you've ever watched a competition) and doesn't need to be tarted up beyond recognition, the way it is here. Add the disjointed lighting and editing effects and what you have is a hot mess
Worst of the films to die for. The worst of the set 'GraveDancers' there was not one likable character in this one I didn't care about any of them, I wanted all of them to die, and it contained overblown special effects that were stupid at the end. Big ghost head chasing in graveyard, wow that is dumb.
It is worth seeing, but Michael Morre missed the point. He thought the columbine incident was about gun control.  It was not.  It was about anger and bullying.  That is the problem.  That is what would have fixed that problem.  We need to help children be better to eachother or problems like this will keep going on.    It is worth seeing because it is interesting, but he is wrong on this one.  Micahel Moore is a good director but people are not always right
Not quite as boring as Second In Command. Again as a Van Damme fan I'm disappointed. The Hard Corpse is slightly better than Second In Command but still boring and cheap, failing to hide its low budget. Sheldon Lettich directed both Lionheart and Double Impact, arguable two of Van Damme's best movies as well as the enjoyable if a little silly The Order so what happened with The Hard Corpse. The plot is predicable, boring and full of stereotypical characters, terrible acting and all wrapped up in a cringe inducing script. As one reviewer noted below, this is basically a cheap rehash of the The Bodyguard with Van Damme playing another boring, zero emotion, personality void, haunted past character that he seems to be drawn to lately. As bad a thing as it is to wish upon anyone, I preferred his performances when he was coked out of his head on illegal narcotics of various types, at least he was entertaining! Another irritating annoyance with this movie is when characters, some ex trained US Marines fail to take any cover during the shoot outs and when will people learn that cars are not bullet proof. They may as well have a sign on their heads saying "look at me, I'm going to die next". Van Damme then runs over to them after they have been shot so he can do his little bit of acting where he shows his fans that wonderful new acting technique, giving us his new facial expression of looking mournful and pained over the death of his friend that unfortunately comes across more as if Van Damme is trying to take a dump. As for Van Damme's fight choreography, it has now entered the realms of the ridiculous. Van Dammes character is a trained killer but he can't block a punch or take an opponent with no martial arts experience? The character Van Damme is protecting is the former heavy weight champion but can't knock Van Damme out even after hitting him square in the face several times without gloves? Van Damme's fight scenes are now filmed much like Steven Segeals, all you see is legs and fists flying at the camera or hitting opponents with some close up, camera as tight as possible grappling were you can't see Van Damme's face. I wonder if Van Damme is now using a stand in or double for his fights because you very rarely see him doing any actual martial arts. I've said it before and I'll repeat it again, someone please give Dolph Lundgren more than $5 million to direct and star in a decent action movie because he has shown lately with The Defender and The Russian Specialist that he takes pride in a movie that he has control over. In short, in my opinion this is another disappointing boring entry from Van Damme with very little martial arts, unexpected below average directing from Sheldon Lettich with no entertainment value to recommend to anyone except hard core Van Damme fans and even they will probably be disappointed. Definitely rent before separating with $18's DVD unseen
THE 4TH DISK NEVER WORKS HAVE REPLACED 3 TIMES. I GIVE UP I LOVE THE DVD BUT CANNOT VIEW AFTER 3 ATTEMPTS THE LAST DISK ..I ALSO HAVE 3 DVDS RANGING FROM GREAT TO JUST OK. SO IT IS NOT MY PLAYERS. I WENT TO ANOTHER STORE AND THE SAME THE LAST OR 4TH DISK DOESNT PLAY SKIPPING ETC . THEY WONT TAKE IT BACK JUST EXCHANGE. I GIVE UP. NEVER TO SEE LAST DIS
Movies leaves questions. The movie never does explain the bed in the basement? & it does not explain who is seen by Abby sneaking around outside?Movie was going along fine but lacks in that it never substantiates the above two items & their signifigance to being seen in the 1st place
Not all that great, but in all fairness.... I did laugh and was mildly entertained and never bored with thisone.   The DVD commentary also includes some other storiesthat are also pretty funny and explain some of the pitfalls of an underfundedmovie, which explains some of the end product here, I would think.Of course, I had seen the Ebert&Roeper review of this movie beforehandso I was not expecting much.  In fact, I was curious about a movie theyfound so terrible.  And "Dirty Love" is not all that great, it was not as badas I expected either.My wife hated...HATED...this film, so I would not call it a "chick flick".
A rotten tomato in a golden box. This is a relatively well-made ballet DVD among others. However, the cheesy performance really is not worth such a luxury.  Compared to the fascinating 1988 Kirov version by Tatyana Terekhova and Farouk Ruzimatov, this one is on the kindergarten level, I'd say. I really don't know why Lucette Aldous was able to get a chance to play the leading role with her flat, robot-like performance. What's more, in the final act she seems to be totally exhausted with sore legs that couldn't stretch or even stand at all. I think the only reason Kultur Video made this DVD so well is simply because it presents Nureyev, whose name is supposed to attract lots of ballet fans (although I personally don't think his performance could compete with Ruzimatov's in the Kirov version).  My own suggestion is that don't pick this version, if you are not a big Nureyev fan
WRONG TITLE. THE ONLY THING I SEE WRONG WITH THIS MOVIE IS THE TITLE BUFFALO SOLDIERS. WHY WOULD THE PRODUCER OF THIS FILM DISHONOR THE AFRICAN-AMERICAN ARMY MEN WHO ORIGINATED THE NAME BUFFALO SOLDIER. HE COULD HAVE CALLED IT DUMB SOLDIERS. THIS MOVIE POISONS THE MINDS OF YOUNG PEOPLE WHO THOUGHT BUFFALO SOLDIERS WERE GOOD ARMY MEN WHO DID THEIR MILITARY JOBS WELL. WOULD IF I MADE A MOVIE CALLED TOP GUN, AND SHOWED YOU HOW SUBURBAN WHITE KIDS SHOOTING UP A HIGH SCHOOL IN COLORADO. AND WHATS REALLY SAD IT'S THAT NATIONAL CABLE TV WILL NOT SHOW DANNY GLOVERS BUFFALO SOLDIERS MOVIE. I SERVED IN THE ARMY AND THE MARINE CORPS, SO CAN YOU UNDERSTAND WHERE I AM COMMING FROM
"R"-Rated movie, NOT PG-13!!! Buyer beware!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. I've read the other reviews and I don't know what version they got but the DVD I received has more than a brief scene of David with his wife (breasts CLEARLY exposed)in bed. That scene alone would not be allowed in a PG-13 movie. There is another scene where David is viewing Bathsheba bathing. She is standing, completely nude and you can see everything. Then the camera pans in close for a "waist up" scene and Bathsheba and her female helper are washing her breasts and body.This is diffinetly an R-rated scene. This movie is not biblically accurate as others have claimed. People need to read their bibles before making such a claim. There are many scenes that are accurate, but there are many that are not. One example is that in the movie Bathsheba wouldn't sleep with David while her husband was alive. Not true in scipture. In the bible, David saw her, had her called to the palace and slept with her. Then David sent a letter to have Uriah killed. Would of been a decent movie without the smut
Booooooring. I've been had is all I can say, after reading other reviews I really thought this would be an interesting, exciting movie. Instead, the story is lame, the acting is pretty pathetic and it is so NOT scary or at least gripping. I watched the whole thing as I thought maybe I am missing something, but no there is no twist thats worth mentioning as the whole movie is predictable from beginning to end. Sorry guys, but this is nowhere near, Audition, Tale of two Sisters or even Whispering Corridors
not as avertised..editted movie. the movie is good except this version has been editted and cut out sceens, very disapointtin
If Only Life Were That Simple. In GOOD ADVICE, director Steve Rash presents a view of upper class urban life that is supposed to be funny in a slapstick sort of way but quickly enough morphs into the world of fairy tales that is unified only by the most unlikely concatenations of events. Charley Sheen reprises his WALL STREET role as an upward bound stock broker who, in this film, has learned that humor can be the leavening agent to success that was denied him by his earlier confrontations with Gordon Gekko. Sheen has a live in girlfriend (Denise Richards) who comes across as exactly the sort of blonde bimbo airhead who has little success as a girlfriend and less as a lonelyhearts advice columnist. Richards dumps Sheen because he has lost his job in a manner that draws uncomfortable dramatic parallels with his previous WALL STREET role. He becomes boozy, depressed, and frankly not a little pathetic in his slovenliness. After Richards exits for Brazil, Sheen needs a job. Then he gets a bright idea. Why not take over hers? First, he must convince Richards' boss (Angie Harmon), who can't make up her mind whether to toss Sheen out of her office or into her bed. At this point, GOOD ADVICE has already crossed the line into a Drew Barrymore fairy tale where things and events always break exactly right for all concerned. I kept waiting for reality to intrude. When Harmon pays Sheen with a paycheck for his columns that she thinks Richards is writing, I wondered when he would ask her to write the check in his own name since he could not cash checks in Richards' name. Jon Lovitz and Roseanna Arquette are only props for Sheen to bounce off of. Estelle Harris is more amusing as an oversexed septuagenerian who saves the day. Not for one moment did I accept the plot premise that Angie Harmon might not fall for the manly charms of Charley Sheen, but then again, in light fluffy romantic comedies like GOOD ADVICE, all that is required to maintain viewer interest is for the cast to pretend that they like each other, or failing that, hate each other. GOOD ADVICE does the former to such an extent that the lack of the latter is hardly noticed. It is not likely that one would want to view GOOD ADVICE more than once. Take my good advice for what it is worth
no fun at all. Loosely connected to the first HM of '81, this sequel has a single tale of lust and immortality in place of the anthology of the older movie.  While mining an asteroid, one of the miners finds a crystal shard - the key to a fountain of immortality.  The fountain itself is on another planet thousands of light years away.  Unfortunately, the miner is played (okay, "voiced") by Michael Ironside and, faster than you can say "Oh No, General Katana is approaching!!" the key consumes the miner's soul and sends him off on a quest of conquest to find the well.  First off, he must ravage a remote planet whose few human inhabitants contain traces of an element that staves off death.  While successfully carting away most of the population of this distant planet, he misses Julie - a six-foot hottie with a big gun and a bottomless reservoir of rage.  The two battle across the galaxy - first to satisfy her thirst for revenge, but then for the sake of immortality itself.Even having been warned, this flick is still a big disappointment.  The first movie was guilty fun - catering and yet lampooning the rock-fan in each of us.  The animation was crude, yet in a charming way that today's assembly-line animation or CGI will never know.  (Imagine a story built on all those way-out 1970's album covers, and you get the idea.)  With animation reflecting an era that predated Japanimation, "Heavy Metal" grew better with age - a time capsule of bad music and laughably bad humor.  The new movie offers none of that - no memorable lines, images or characters.  Though patterned largely on "Taarna, the Terakien" from the first movie, HM2 has none of the spirit or wit of the earlier story, and Julie emotes less character (which is bad when you remember that Taarna was mute).  In short, the movie offers less than a fraction of the entertainment value of a single episode of "Heavy Metal" the magazine
Hunting dvd... Not the show. I'm sure this is a lovely dvd but it wasnt what i was looking for. There is no other information that informs me what this dvd is actually is. This is the worste ad I have ever seen
Another Chase Film. Company Business, 1991 filmThis film starts with a simple deal. An imprisoned Soviet spy and $2,000,000 will be exchanged for a captured American. The deal will be done in an underground station in Berlin. But something is wrong, and the deal is canceled before the swap is done. The opposition open fire, but they escape from them, and the people Sam works for. Now the plot has them on the run with the Two Million in marked money. They escape from the people who pursue them. Until they are found.The CIA wants to turn over the money to the KGB so they can ransom the captured American. [This money seems to come from a South American drug exporter who makes deals with the right people, the aftermath of the "Contragate" scandal.] But there are complications in the plans. Sam and the Russian plan to take the money for their retirement to the sunny Seychelles. They are found and one is captured. So now they plan to escape with the money. These two manage to outwit the combined forces of the CIA and KGB. Believable? You will see many sights in this film, with humorous scenes.It will remind you of countless similar stories from "The Defiant Ones" to whatever will be in the movie theaters this year.
This is supposed to be a comedy, but where's the proof?. This isn't funny. It isn't well directed or scripted. Perhaps it could have been great, if it had had a decent scriptwriter or director, but it didn't, so it turned out mediocre at best. Unfortunately, I believed all the hype on this website and bought a copy of this for my boyfriend and I to watch. I told my boyfriend that according to most of the reviews I'd read, this was going to be a brilliant, hilarious cult classic. But now that we've watched it, he and I both know better. We know it's dreadful, and I can only imagine all the nice things I'm going to have to do for him to make up for my expecting him to sit through this tedious monstrosity. The only highlight for us was a spirited argument he and I got into halfway through the movie about where we'd seen one of the actors in the movie before. I'm pleased to say I won the argument. That was pretty much the only highlight of the movie for me.In my opinion this is not a 'hilarious cult classic' as others so often describe it. I don't know how drunk I'd have to be to agree with that assessment of the movie, or to find it even a little bit funny, but I suspect I would have to get smashed enough that I'd need a stomach pump afterwards.If you want to see a genuinly hilarious cult sci-fi classic, pick up a copy of Flash Gordon. That has great actors, great sets, wonderfully campy scripts, brilliant humour, and a soundtrack by Queen. Furthermore, it has stood the test of time and is still great today, unlike 'The Ice Pirates', which has dated REALLY badly.Better yet, get hold of some 'Red Dwarf' dvds...seriously, Red Dwarf is sci fi humour at its BEST! It's so good, it will spoil you for other sci fi comedies
Boring and dated. I've been wanting to watch this film for over 20 years, but sadly, like most other films of the era - The Longest Yard was flat for me.  Some films don't age well and this was no exception.  Everything seems hackneyed rather than real.  Sure, I wasn't expecting "Any Given Sunday" but something a bit more compelling.  I couldn't finish this, but maybe BR fans will have better luck.
One of the worst movies I have ever seen. Saw this on the box last night. I sat through the whole thing just to see if it would improve - it didn't. I kept wondering whether this was a radio play that someone had decided to film. The dialogue is wooden, the plot is pathetic, the whole set-up is unconvincing. It looks like something the actors did in a couple of days due to contractual obligations of some sort or maybe to cash in on the whole &quot;Vegas&quot; craze - which ranges from CSI to &quot;The Cooler&quot;. (Incidentally, &quot;The Cooler&quot; is another one to avoid.)I would give this zero stars if I could
What was the director thinking?. This movie really sucked. It was very sad. What was the director thinking? Rent it first before you think of buying it. It's not good at all. If you want a great movie watch The Perfect Man, A Cinderella Story, Cheaper by the Dozen 1 & 2, or Material Girls.
Good movie but.... I find this movie to be a really good young people's movie.  There is a lot of a somewhat realistic fantasy mood here.  Good songs, good dancing.  The fact they went half way around the world for a different backdrop is also a positive.  This at least has some young people looking for the location of Spain, just to be informed.Inspirational in a way to send a message you can make it if you try.  Not just singing and dancing, but translating in to anything you might attempt.  Work for your goal, and be willing to work hard.But there is just one very big glaring misstep, no a dilibrate oversight.  Here we have four very lovely young ladies, of color, but there are purposely no young men of color in any major role in this movie.  Why?  Socially in the 21st century Disney has deleted a part of our society.  From "The Cinderella Story" starring Brandy, to the "Cheetah Girls 2".  No young men of color.  Shame on you Disney.There is an old saying, "It is not what you say, it is what you do".  What you have a habit of doing sends a very, very negative message to all our young people.
Dumb Story. This is the worst Asian movie that I have ever seen.  The story is dumb and doesn't make any sense, especially the ending.  And to top it off it isn't that scary - it only gets a little bit scary at the end.My recommendation:  Don't get this movie.  It is also too expensive.  It you want to watch a good Asian horror movie, I have lots of recommendations.  Wishing Stairs is pretty good.  Koma is an excellent movie. A Tale of Two Sisters is pretty good. Good luck
Not worth the money. I just got this in the mail today.  I was thrilled and excited to put it in, especially after all the great reviews.One word to sum it up:  eh.The first few minutes of the DVD is all introductory stuff.  Almost like you're watching the previews waiting for it to start, but it's part of the video.  So that made it even shorter than the description because it was just people talking.  Not really many characters.The Put Down the Duckie song gets 2 stars.  The rest of the footage doesn't even get any stars.   Yes there are a few random old-school skits.  But when I say a few, I mean VERY few.  Like, 2?  And I would think they could have chosen better ones...I watched the whole thing, sort of with out emotion, and then it abruptly was over.  And you're watching like "It's OVER?  That's IT?"If it was longer, or less money, I would have given it more stars.  But for $12, there was definitely not enough quality footage and not nearly enough material to make it worth it.I am sorry I bought this
April's wet blanket. I appreciate the effort. I really do. Especially from a woman filmmaker on a tight budget. I applaud the movie for that reason only. 1 star for effort!But, honestly, aren't there any decent scripts and actors out there? Isn't there anyone willing to invest money in lesbian films? We are STARVED for anything half way decent, and will shell out some bucks on Amazon to get it. But I refuse to part with hard earned cash for something on par with the very bad "Bar Girls," which describes this movie to a T.Unfortunately, this film gets one star from me because (a) it was completely unbelievable, (b) the pacing was terrible, (c) the acting was energetic, but not in the right places, and (d) I was bored.A MUCH better low budget/made by women film is "Kissing Jessica Stein." Even "Go Fish" gets points for style (and 2 stars from me, although it DID have worse acting). Back to the drawing board! And don't ask for my money until you have something at "It's in the Water"-level or better
Disturbing. I may have once considered this movie to be somehow romantic, like so many other reviewers.  But, that would have been during my single days or during the years of marriage that I thought were happy and stable.  However, after having my world turned upside down by infidelity this movie just serves as a disturbing reminder of the weak emotional nature of so many people who lack the discipline to be true to the fidelity they vowed on the alter.  Now I have to wonder if total reconsiliation is really possible or if people predisposed to this behavior are destined to seek happiness outside of marriage at any cost.  I was starting to believe that couples who survive infidelity can have stonger, happier relationships than they ever experienced with each other before the affair but this movie casts doubt on the cheaters - can they ever really be content with their spouses?  It's a sad reflection on the human condition.  Yes, bitter sweet indeed
The difference bewteen the two series. Theirs, ours. The original British series The Office: Like watching a clever, intelligent, and hilarious comedian (Robin Williams, for instance) perform a monologue that is so side-splittingly funny and satisfying, you'll wish you could replay it forever in your head.Watching the profoundly un-funny and tasteless U.S. version of The Office: Like listening to a zit-faced teenager who thinks he's Robin Williams tell a fart joke. You'll wish to get the hell away from him after about two seconds.What is it about The United States that we ruin everything? =(This series is obnoxious, it's annoying, and I hope it dies a painful death.
Well that was tedious. Well folks, looks like we may have the most over praised movie of the current millennium right here. ("Crash" comes close, but that film has a lot more detractors than this one, and many of those who liked it seemed to do so because they imagined, somehow, that it would "change the world".)  My beefs are not the same as most of those who don't like the film:  I don't much care that it may show an unrealistic picture of drug abuse, nor do I find it overly depressing.  Fact is, it isn't depressing at all cause I didn't care.  It's just boring and annoying, sometimes at different moments, sometimes simultaneously.  This not a good combination.All right, here's a plot summary:  Jared Leto, Marlon Wayans, Jennifer Connelly and Ellen Burstyn all do drugs, and this really messes up their lives. I hate to give it all away like that, but there it is.  The fundamental flaw is this: I don't like any of these people, so their pain doesn't mean anything, and since that is all there is to this movie it absolutely fails to have any sort of effect.  Maybe if Aronofsky had put more time in to characterization it would've worked, but now there just isn't anything there.  As far as what's actually in the movie, we've got  Jared Leto as a stupid chunkhead who has inane conversations with his equally chunkheaded girlfriend Jennifer Connelly, who wants to be a fashion designer, or something.  Beyond this we've got Jared's mother, Ellen Burstyn, who is a weird old woman and Marlon Wayans as Leto's friend who deals drugs with him at times and appears headed towards the big leagues.  I particularly love how there's no real attempt to make Wayans into a person.  He's got one flashback about how he wanted to make his mom proud and that's it.  The doubly sad fact is that he's the most likable of the three.  He at least displays a little life.  Connelly and Leto apparently just wandered here from a Bergman film and are so dull and slow that it's a wonder that the smack doesn't cause them to cease to exist entirely.  (Well, Connelly actually does coke, I think, but it fails to liven her up any.  Also, I actually *like* the Bergman films I've seen, so that's not really a fair comparison.)  They love each other, apparently, but since I don't even like either of them I'm not much interested.  Finally, Burstyn is mostly just creepy though her performance does take a turn for the hilarious as she goes off the deep end.  Perhaps it wouldn't have been funny if I cared about her, but we've been over that...And I want you people to know that I'm not utterly heartless when it comes to movies.  I can care about the characters, but none of these people did anything for me, so the movie's dead in the water.  For good counter examples watch "Trainspotting", which has drug-addict characters with enough humor and life to be likable and interesting and "Bubba Ho-Tep", a film which displays the plight of the lonely elderly 50 times better than this film despite being a silly horror-comedy with a mummy in a cowboy outfit in it.  On the other hand, neither of those movies is nearly as pretentious as "Requiem For A Dream", so watching them will do nothing to stroke your ego.  Still, if that's all you want to kinda find plenty of films better than this one for that purpose."Requiem For A Dream" isn't helped any by Darren Aronofsky's repetitive, derivative over-direction.  The trouble is, this movie hasn't got any plot to distract you from how redundant the visual style is.  There's nothing inherently wrong with any of his tactics, but they're hopelessly driven in to the ground, as we see fast-motion a thousand times, quick-cut montages a million times and plenty of wonky camera-attached-to-the-actor junk, and they are, again, impossible not to notice cause the plot sure ain't drawing me in.  I imagine that the overdone, repeating visual style is meant as a representation of the endless cycle found in drug use, but that doesn't make it any more pleasant or entertaining to watch.  The score suffers from the same problem as they use the same handful of themes over and over.Truth be told, I thought this movie was pretty okay for about the first half, but then it really started to grate on me.  It became evident that no, Aronofsky wasn't going to introduce any new visual tricks and no, these characters weren't going to get any more interesting.  I looked at the timer continuously for about the last 40 minutes of the film, and was so uninvolved that the supposedly horrifying conclusion where all the characters really get it bad was utterly ineffective.  It was kind of uplifting, really:  Now that these tedious characters have finally hit rock bottom I can go do something else.  Now that's a good ending.Grade: D+PS This is 500 reviews.  I doubt if I will write 500 more, but who knows
Story was good, acting good, singing??? What singing?. Sorry, if one is casting for a MUSICAL movie, one should actually cast actors who can SING, not just actors who have big names. Sophia Loren couldn't carry a tune to save her life.I love musicals, but this is one I do not like at all
Buyer Beware False Advertising. The movie is great the one star is for the dvd.Just want to let everybody know this version doesnot have 2.35:1 aspect ratio, it's the same dulllooking 1:85:1 aspect ratio version. Come on Amazon.
waggy mcwaggster. Man! this movie is soooooo boring. I literally slept through this movie. If I die not having watched it again ill be happy.   i dont even know what its about cuz i watched it when i was like 5 yrs. old, but i dont care cuz just thinkin bout it makes me wanna cr
2nd rule of fight club dont buy fight club (WArning Spoiler). this movie is flat out doa. great filming great acting. BAD Screenplay!during this year that fight club came out every movie ended with a skitzo type thing, and if you really want to see a good Edward Norton movie see primal fear. this should be on the top 100 dumbest movies of all time list. even if the ending was different that movie would still suck!
Notice that all the 5-star reviews are people involved with making this trash!. everyone who has rated this film over 1-star is involved in the making of this crappy movie. Click on the link to see their other reviews... where are they?!!this movie is absolutely terrible. If you can handle more than ten minutes of it, you're a tougher man than m
Where's The Action ?. I Bought This Movie On DVD And Now I Wish I Didn't . First Of All Where's The Action And Adventure ? The Movie Is More About Arnold Searching For The Terrorist Who Killed His Wife And Child Than About Him Getting Revenge On The People Who Did It. I Expected To See Arnold Shooting It Up And Kicking Butt . Instead I Got Borring Dragged Out Scene's Of Him Going To South America , Getting Lost , Kidnaped And Then Ecscapeing Before He Finally Get's Back To The United States And Tracks Down The People Who Did It . The Only Action You Get Is In The Last 30 Seconds Of The Movie , When Arnold Kills The Terrorist's . Why Would You Pay 19.95 $ To See 30 Seconds Of Action ?? Forget It ! Save Your Money And Stay Away From This Borring Put Me To Sleep Movie !
My Own Personal Hell. This is the first time I delved into the HellRaiser series, and I have to admit, I kind of regret it. The film opens with a collage of disturbing images, I guess to get my attention, but there is no real reason for them to be there. From there the film falls into a freefall where it jumps from one messed up scene to the next. It all looks perfectly twisted, but who really cares. Clive Barker, as he did in "Night Breed," shows his taste for creative costumes and set designs. Of course they are all very self-indulgent, but beautiful nonetheless in their own little way. Had this film showed up at a modern art museum I would have labeled it pretentious. But since it showed up in movie theaters I have no choice but to label it crap.I would love to describe the plot to you, but it didn't make a ton of sense to me. Kirsty (Ashley Laurence) is in a mental hospital and is convinced that her dad is calling out to her from inside hell, and thus she must go save him. Meanwhile her evil step-mom (and speaking from experience they are all evil) is reemerging from hell with the distinct disadvantage of not having any skin. Upon her return she uses her bloody pulp of a body to engage in a sexual act with another evil doer. I'm sure that gets laughs every time from the children who are watching, but to me it was silly and unnecessary. She goes on a quest for skin which goes off without a hitch, and from there a battle ensues between Kirsty and her step-mom over the soul of a little girl named Tiffany (or so everybody calls her). The whole point seems to be that our minds make up our own personal hells, and that is an idea I can get on board with. One overview shot of hell has it looking strikingly similar to an M.C. Escher print. With dead ends and trap doors and boogeymen we all travel through the labyrinth of our mind on a daily basis. But I cannot get on board with this film. It is sensational for the sake of sensationalism, which is fine with me, but not when it is mixed with a brain dead plot. What do I, or anybody for that matter, get from watching a man carve himself up with a knife? I guess that at least it is not soft like modern horror movies, but this one does not earn its gore.For those of you who demand nothing out of your movies other than the experience of a bad dream where nothing makes sense then this is your film. For the rest of you this is failed storytelling of the highest degree. I still have "HellRaiser" on my shelf to watch and I must say it won't be hard for that one to top this mess. I may never understand why people think atmosphere is enough to create a scary movie. It is the major flaw of this film and Japanese Horror in general, but I want a story to go with my scares. What this one is selling is a chance to be grossed out of your mind or bored stiff. . .or both. I hated this movie, and no I don't care how realistic it looked when the characters were peeling the skin off of their faces. *1/2
Great Classic Needs New Transfer Badly. There is no reason to wait any longer for a better transfer of this classic.  There was a Japanese laserdisc release fifteen years ago from a pristine film source; the intertitles were in Russian and Japanese (an interesting combination since the events of the film took place during the Russian-Japanese War of 1905).  The opening sequence of water rushing over a diversionary dam, and of the sailors on their cots, is simply astoundingly better than any transfer we have seen released in America on any format.  If the rumor is true of a 2004 digital remastering, we have waited three years too long for a quality DVD release.  A film this great needs to be seen in the best transfer for its reputation to be understood by all.  Eisenstein directed the details, and the better the transfer the more details will be seen.  None of current DVD transfers are at all acceptable
BOYCOTT THIS GARBAGE! EDITED MUSIC LOW GRADE PICTURE AND SOUND!. This is really irritating! This show (at least in the early years) is as good as any show ever was! The fact that the studio is too cheap to pay for the rights to the music is ridiculous! To add insult to injury the picture and sound are bargain basement quality! I think everyone who bought this or any other show that has been altered should return the shows for a full refund. Let the cheapskate studio eat the loss instead of making the fans digest this SH**
Wish this rating system would go all the way down to 0.0.0.0. Nothing much to say exept Worst movie I've evere seen. I'd recommend Cat. 6 Day of destruction!
Better not shown. I imagine this movie might be funny if you're really into dog shows.  I'm not, so I couldn't tell you.  Mediocre at best.  "This is Spinal Tap" was better
Silent but deadly dull. I feel like a bit of a Philistine for not appreciating this silent German comedy more.  Despite many interesting visual flairs, such as the inventive set designs and the use of offbeat framing techniques, I couldn't see it as anything more than a very slight, silly story that went on far longer than it needed to.  It failed the most fundamental test for any comedy: I did not crack a smile even once
Crichton's Japan. This is the Jurassic Park mentality of dealing with xenophobia. You just treat the Japanese or any other foreigner with the same awe and fear that you first saw (or even read) the CGI dinosaurs in Spielberg's blockbuster.Crichton's novel is essentially a pot-boiler of a homicide thriller. To make it sound more exotic, he added a Japanese-cum-American rivalry context with any a healthy dose of "yellow fever" and xenophobia thrown in.Sean Connery "water walks" through his usual role of the umpteenth time of being a master detective with a younger co-star being tagged along. He has seen better days. (Namely, The Name of the Rose and The Untouchables). Frankly speaking, he could have had just played Sherlock Holmes and get it done and over with.Connery plays a so-called legendary cop who is trained in the way of the Japanese culture. So, he more or less knows a thing or two about the Japanese. Wesley Snipes, acts as a hot-headed "fool" of a co-star who fumbles and tumbles till Connery rescues him in the Highland way.The fact that the kung fu action scenes are being inserted sparsely throughout the movie shows that the director, Philip Kaufman is using martial arts as an alarm clock to wake any uninterested audience members who dozed off in his convoluted plot.Tia Carrera in another thankless role that requires her to draw upon her Asian background to act as a foil for both stars. The ending in regards to her is so lame and in fact ambiguous speaks for the rest of the movie. It remains respectful and xenophobic about the Japanese at the same time, that the movie doesn't know who or what it is, and this turns out to be an identity crisis, in terms of plot and direction
I give it 2 stars for it's unintended comedy. Thank goodness my wife and I rented this movie because it is a one-viewing-only experience. We are introduced to Patrick Swayze's character and he seems the country hayseed who just got off the train from Booniesville. Later, we learn he's been "all over the world". Then we have to endure watching Lisa Neimi having, or reliving, her repeated emotional breakdowns. Boo hoo. Oh, don't forget George De La Pena. One minute he's prodding the two former lovers, (Swayze and Neimi), into dancing the production they've all reunited to do. The next he's crying at his makeup table because he never believed he, himself, could complete the darn task. Oh please!!! The story is so full of drama queens it's beyond belief!!! I have to admit that my wife and I spent most of the movie chuckling at the acting, the story and finally the lover's dance sequences. My major complaint was we hardly got to see these "great dancers" dance. There were plenty of waist up shots of the pair emoting their polarizing love/hate feelings. Demonstrations of their dance skill? It seemed to be a case of hiding their weaknesses. And, then there's Neimi's fatherless daughter. It wasn't too hard to figure out who's daddy. This plotline is so tired and comes at you thousands of miles before it's revealed. No surprise here.Now let's be real. The threesome, who are supposed to be saving this dance company with their performance, were all pushing their mid 40's when we see the flashbacks of seven years prior!!! Now the movie is trying to convince us that not one, but three people are going to beat the odds, and are expected to perform like the kiddies?!?!? As I said, we had to hold back the giggles.Three things of note should be added here:1. Watch the extra feature on this DVD. Neimi and Swayze, (real life husband and wife), show SO MUCH more of an emotional connection there than they ever could muster for the movie's performance. When not of the wooden variety, their emotional range swung to a stupefying over acting. Again, boo-hoo.2. The movie's lighting director and photographer should have been fired on the spot. Miss Neimi  looks quite ancient and Swayze looks like his face is plastic. During one scene Patrick wants to practice a jump-catch!!! We cringed because it was like telling us our grandma was going to make the same attempt. We were convinced if Lisa fell it would be the preverbal "old woman" breaking her hip. Again, refer to the extra features. They look quite pleasant and Neimi looks like she may even be able to pull this wishing well story off.3. Lastly, I would say the sequences with the other dancers gathered for this movie were very good. They were quite entertaining to watch and were performed with inventive choreography. Three cheers for the understudies!!! Hurrah, Hurrah, Hurrah!!!I have mixed emotions about this film. On one hand I like to root for the "old-timer" who makes good. On the other, it is tremendously embarrassing watching "old people" look foolish. Unfortunately my rooting turned to laughing in disbelief. Rent, don't buy, this movie as ironic camp and for the intermittent supporting dancers' sequences.
DVD keeps sticking while playing ...will need to return. DVD sticks at time during playing. we played it once and couldnot get thru the movie,,,,need to return. i think that i have 30 days and yes time is ticking and will do it
Clint's Worst Film - Hands Down!. Throughout his long career, actor-director Clint Eastwood  managed to avoid the pitfalls of Bad Cinema. However, there are a few wretched exceptions, such as &quot;Pink Cadillac&quot; (1989). This brain-dead romantic comedy, with an offensive white-supremacist subplot, makes &quot;Every Which Way But Loose&quot; and &quot;Any Which Way You Can&quot; look like minor masterpieces. Clint has nothing to work with here -- and registers zero chemistry with co-star Bernadette Peters. Not surprisingly, &quot;Pink Cadillac&quot; went straight to video in Great Britain (perhaps the only Eastwood film to receive that dubious distinction)
Blind buy gone wrong. I bought this without previously knowing anything about it, not knowing it was a sequel. I was taken in by the title, and the blurb. That's it. It sounded like a really romantic film, one that I might identify with, as I've always wondered what would happen if I met my first love again, if I would have the same feelings. After watching the very, very long trailer, I was slightly disappointed, and I only managed to half an hour into the film, before I started to doze off. It's so incredibly boring! And although I wouldn't say I normally mind "real time" films, it's all set in the mid-late afternoon, a very dull time of day if you ask me. It was the only time of day director Richard Linklater would shoot the scenes in the film. He felt it added to the reality of the film, and often relied on the actors to get perfect takes at the right time, and it shows, as it was shot in a mere 15 days.But it's nothing but talk and meandering around Parisian streets in the parts I watched. I just didn't identify with it. Nothing happened. And I hated the two actors. I don't normally like Ethan Hawke anyway, but I thought I might be able to ignore this, but no I disliked Julie Delpy too.I wouldn't recommend this film to anyone, although I know other reviewers are gonna disagree with me, but it just wasn't what I expected.
Very weak narrative, but some nice takes. The narrative is very weak up to the point of being embarrassed for those who wrote it..  But--the takes are nice and it gives a pretty comprehensive overview of what the exercise is all about.
Would recommend ONLY for someone who has never attempted to play a guitar. I bought this book for my son who has never had a lesson but has been self teaching himself for a few years. The things I was disappointed about 1) the singing is so HORRIBLE it is almost impossible to watch.  My son became frustrated with this alone and never wanted to continue...His exact words, "This is LAME."  He wouldn't use it, so I decided to try to learn guitar to keep from wasting my money.  2) The descriptions on the cover are misleading and lead you to believe there is much more advanced instruction than is actually in it...there is little about much of it and then it is not what the instructor leads you to believe it is...for example the jazz chords are not actually what you expect to learn.  3) The instructor uses different fingering techniques than he instructs you to use, so learning it is very hard...part of the advantage of buying a dvd is WATCHING the instructor...which is totally useless if he is doing something different than he instructs you to do.  Also it is hard to keep up with him as his fingering techniques allow him to change chords much more quickly and you are struggling to keep up.  Being frustrated when you are trying to learn is NOT a good way to stay motivated.  My son had to tell me it wasn't me it was the instructor. 4) my son knew ALL of the material in this DVD although he has never had a lesson.  I would recommend this for a very early beginner who had no clue about chords or guitars at all.  Otherwise, SAVE YOUR MONEY.  I did learn a little. I am a complete idiot about guitars but knew a good bit of what was presented just from guitars being in my home.  This is the most elementary information you can imagine
live or memorex?. After listening to The Power of Love, it was clear that Celine was either lip syncing or singing along with a taped version of the song.  Any musician can tell that the band behind Celine is not what's on the audio track: live performance does not sound exactly like &quot;the record&quot;.  The fact that you can't tell if Celine is really singing (on many songs) even makes this more disturbing. Applause is faded in and out like a laugh track on a sitcom
all humans must go. this is a "horror" movie in the sense that it is incredibly grating and all the people in it act like total garbage.  I don't mean the acting is garbage, though it is.  I mean that all the characters in the movie are complete human garbage, such as make you want to start your own special death camp just to get rid of them.  If the aim of the movie was to turn the viewer into a one-man murder wave, then... bingo.  I am locked and loaded and ready to ratatatatatatatattat.... blow away the cast
No Way. Only one * because...great actors, totally unbelievably bad plot. I also didn't like the overly synthesized background sounds or the music. Old b/w movies have had better wardrobes. The booklet was missing in the dvd case, and I doubt that I would have added another * for it
DVD IS NOT THE ORIGINAL DEMON MOVIE SCENES CUT OUT OF IT. I would have given this movie 5 stars instead of 1.This is without a doubt the scariest movie ive ever seen in my life.it was originaly released in 1985.the reason im giving it one star.is the movie demons on dvd,is not the exact same movie released on vhs video in 1985.they have redone it on dvd.and taken mosalot of the gore and hard rock out of the movie.The reason is Anchor bay.the movie was originaly distibuted by new world video.then anchor bay got there hands ahold of this mordern marvel of terror and redone the movie,they cut out alot of the gore,alot of the original rock music was completely taken out,when the womans on the theatre stage and transforming into a demon.you see a bright lite shot on her and you can see when her tounge shoots out thats its a mechanical pupet.in the orginal the lighting was kept dark and they may have been the reason.If you are one of the lucky ones to hold the original 1985 release of DEMONS on vhs from new video you have without a doubt the scariest horror movie of all time.If your one of the unfortunate ones to get the new dvd you will be left in the dark on what was once a true horror gem.i happen to have the 1985 copy of demons.released in the aqctuall year of 1985.i vdieo store went out of buisness in my home town.i remember the day they got it in 1985 like it waqs yesterday.i purchased the some 20 year old copy from them in 2001.my copys about had it its 21 years old..i wwish i could find an oruginal copy.cause u nolonger can get it now.i wonder if they have done the same things to demons 2 the nightmare returns i wonder if they cut and edited it 2...talk about being crapped on....IF YOUR LOOKING FOR THE ORIGINAL demons first off saty away from the dvd.go for teh video and make sure it says 1985 on it and not 1999 on the side..
Uneven plot, unlikeable characters and just plain worthless... When I first started watching this movie, I couldn't help but notice that the plot sounded familiar.  Well...the plot is not unlike most romantic comedies or "chick flicks" out there, but the plot was similar to a novel I read a while back but couldn't remember the title at the time.  This is based on the novel Asking for Trouble by Elizabeth Young.  I wasn't impressed with the novel and I have to say that I wasn't impressed with the film either, but for different reasons.  Kat Ellis (Debra Messing) doesn't want to go to her half-sister's wedding in London without a date, for her ex-fianc is the best man.  Desperate times call for desperate measures and she hires a male escort (Dermot Mulroney) to pass as her boyfriend to make her ex jealous.  Things seem to go well for her and attraction ensues between Kat and Nick, but then she uncovers a terrible secret during the rehearsal dinner.**This second portion of the review contains spoilers.  Read at your own risk.**  I agree with the people who said this is similar to Pretty Woman and My Best Friend's Wedding, except that this one isn't half as fun or as entertaining as the aforementioned two movies.  In fact, this film is uneven, unamusing and pointless.  The scenes are all over the place.  It appears to be quite poorly edited.  One moment Kat sees Nick as nothing but a tool to make her ex-fianc jealous and the next thing I know she has a drunken one-night stand with him.  And you know how in some movies, despite its weak plot, the chemistry between the leads is so hot that it doesn't matter that the rest of the film sucks?  Well, you won't find that here.  I felt no heat between these two leads.  Debra Messing is very pretty and she's a great actress, but with the exception of the scene where she confronts her sister her performance is wooden and one-dimensional.  At times I felt she was playing Grace Adler from Will and Grace all over again.  And Dermot Mulroney is gorgeous and I enjoyed getting an eyeful of his great bod, but his role could've been played by Hugh Jackman, Matthew McConaughey or any other romantic comedy poster boy.  Nothing stood out from this character.  The Wedding Date is populated by unlikeable characters who get away with the disgusting things they do.  Ugh.  The only good things about this film is Jack Davenport (whose character is kind of a dork, but is about one of the very few likeable characters here), the lovely scenes filmed in England's Lake District and the awesome soundtrack.  This film contains some wonderful songs.  Other than that, this is a waste of time.  I can't believe I bought this previewed at a DVD rental. I won't buy a film like this before watching it first again.  Thank goodness I've finally joined Netflix.
I have got two words to descibes what I thought of this... AND THAT IS BORING AND SNOBISH!  I watched the first two hours of this and coudn't keep awake.  The narritor's voice was monotone. I wanted to shout at his pompous, snobish demeanor SHUT UP!!  In my opinion is not the proper way to educate is to entertain at all god's peoples. With the narritor, granted he is educated but does he have to shove his creditals and his attitude from the gecko. When you take people on a educating journey (such as nine hours long) invite them like you would invite into a warm a loving welcoming home. I felt with his demeanor and atitude felt beat up and like I was crawling on my hands and knees through out the first two hours. I am not watching the rest of the seven hours and returning this DVD set back to the library and saying "Check Please".
And the bolchevik propaganda continues. This documentary is filled with bocheviks lies to reinforce the mantras against the imperial Russia. It was a religion war to destroy christianity and culture and to rob the russians. This is still going on. Those thoughts are wrong. Wake up
Same Time Next  Year Comments. Not a bad movie...not a great movie.  Ellen Brustyn was great
Don't even steal this movie!!!. This tripe was horrible. The only reason i gave it 1 star is because of the bus wreck that was very gory. Besides that, and when the boy scout zombies attack, I fast forwarded thru the entire movie. Even the nudity was horrible. If all other movies on earth are destroyed and TV is abolished, you should STILL not watch this film!!!!
Just plain Bad. The so called acting alone will make you want to toss it out the window.  Don't waste your money on this loser
for die hard fans only. I really love the first Nightmare on Elm street movie. the rest of the series are just absurd and borderline ridiculous. I thought this movie would be better since Wes Craven was directing/writing it.In my opinion it's everything but scary.The concept of this evil entitity trapped in stories for eons is interesting, however not very well explored in my opinion.The scenes remind us of the first Nightmare on Elm Street, a bit cool when it comes to nostalgia but they completely have no surprise effect whatever.It was nice to see some people of the original movie, like John Saxon and Nick Corrie. Yet they have such small roles which undermines their presence in the movie.Corrie doesn't even have a line.The "scary" scenes are actually hilarious at some points. This movie could have been better in my opinion..
Thanks for the nihilism, Eastern Europe!. Nothing more than a retelling of the Merry Melodies classic, "The High and the Flighty." In the 1956 toon, Daffy Duck sells torture devices to both Barnyard Dog and Foghorn Leghorn who have drawn the lines as if battling over territory -- or perhaps just intentionally aggravating one another -- in the manner of the "Lord of War"-friendly Israelis and Palestinians (even so direct as Foghorn uttering the line, "This, I say, this calls for massive retaliation," after getting hit in the head with a watermelon). Except that in the cartoon, the two warring parties eventually unite against the "Lord of War." Cartoon director Robert McKimson presents a much more optimistic view on humanity. Nicolas Cage should be ashamed that he signed on for such an unoriginal and weak-spirited project. Er, never mind, he's sort of left a guinea-pig turd trail of stinkers: "Honeymoon in Vegas," "Con Air," "8MM," "Gone in Sixty Seconds" and "Leaving Las Vegas," just to name a few
wish I could get it to review it. I ordered this DVD the week after Christmas from Amazon and still have not received it yet - just got a email today from Amazon stating it will be delayed until at least March 20 - I wish when you order it would flash something up stating it is not available until such date - I love the fact I order something that is not available and find out after the fact. Not the first time they have done this - so I wish I could enjoy this DVD but I can't seem to get it to me. I guess it would be worth it to spend the extra money that to have wait forever to get it
Miscast & misdirected to the hilt... Nearly 3 hours of posturing & bad accents (except for Jack Thompson - why it is only Brits & Aussies can do justice to a southern accent?). Spacey doing his usual smirky cryptic shtick & Cusack his typical jittery post-teen. The inclusion of Lady Chablis seems gratuitous, a kind of synthetic shock element for viewers who need pc frissons. Which kind of sums up the whole movie for me
Hey WB !!! Put out the season box sets already!!!. Warner Bros. has consistantly failed to please fans with their dvd releases of their animated series. They fail to recognize that Justice League as well as their Batman and Superman animated efforts were created not just for children but for adults as well. Yet they continue to market them for the kiddie market.It just demonstrates the short sightedness of their home ent. people. Come on now !!! The new Spiderman animated series on MTV is already being released as a season box set. Don't be stupid WB !!!!!!!!!
Pretentious and Dull. Personally, I found 8 1/2 to be one of the most boring films I've ever seen.  It was a pretentious, self-indulgent trip down the director's memory lane.  I understood the plot, and enjoyed some of the thoughts raised near the end, but overall was bored silly by stilted, pointless dialogue.Having said that, the cinematography was stunning and the music almost made the film worth watching.  Perhaps 8 1/2 would have been better off as a series of photographs with musical accompaniment :P
A Horror Film. This is more of a Rorschach Test than a movie. You may takethis film as*an 80's cautionary tale about the dangers of extra-maritalsex,*a feminist revenge fantasy*a post-feminist conservative allegory*a modern update of Monday Night women's wrestlingA happily married man (Michael Douglas) has a perfectlyinexplicable weekend affair with a business associate. (GlennClose). What is a fling for him is the start of an obsessionfor her. When he tries to retreat, she follows him-even intothe bosom of his family. She visits his wife, kidnaps theirchild and even kills and boils the family bunny.(this lastscene alone should earn Fatal Attraction a place in theHorror Hall of Fame)Fatal Attraction did very well indeed at the box office,perhaps because it touches so many nerves. It gives the aud-ience a chance to identify with the wimpy, cheating husband,the borderline-crazy associate or the brave, injured wife.It also creates an atmosphere of partisanship in whichto cheer for our favorite.All this shared psychodrama doesn't make for a good movie.There is not a shred of motivation for most of the action,the suspense comes mostly from some laughable director'stricks. In fact this movie has nothing to offer exceptunrelieved operatic hysteria and this is its final, fataldetraction
TO MANY THINGS GOING ON AT THE SAME TIME. I FELT THIS MOVIE WAS A WASTE OF TIME AND THE DIRECTOR SHOULD NEVER DIRECT AGAIN!!!! IT TRIED TO PUT EVERYBODY'S LIFE IN THE MOVIE, INSTEAD OF CONCENTRATING ON GLOVER AND KLINE
Jack Warner Was Right..... During her Warner years, Bette Davis constantly lobbied the studio to let her play Mattie in a film of ETHAN FROME.  Jack Warner was sure no one would care to see such hopeless material filmed, no matter how starry or surefooted the treatment.  On the basis of this plodding version, I have to agree with Jack.  American Playhouse's theatrical wing has managed to turn the book every high school student hated (Wharton's novella has done more to kill the idea of reading for pleasure for generations of students than any literary work since SILAS MARNER was thrust upon an unwary world) into a picture that's more grim duty than pleasure.  A game cast struggles to animate Richard Nelson's bare-bones screenplay, but they're soon defeated, lost in an endless progression of drab scenes that sit there, inert, rather than smouldering with emotional subtext, as presumably was intended.  Neeson and Allen come off rather better than Patricia Arquette; very attractive in other films, she seems slackjawed and dimwitted here.  A pleasure to see Katharine Houghton, aging well and in there pitching in a thankless role.  Think of this version as taking about an hour longer than reading the Cliff Notes, and feeling only half as enjoyable, and you'll be in the right ballpark
Unimpressed. I only caught the 2nd half of this movie on tv last night so can't comment on the movie as a whole except to say that I am no fan of ludicrous caper movies.  But I must point out that the scene near the end where Julia Roberts runs up to George Clooney as he's being led away by the cops is totally stolen from the final scene of "Green Card" (Andie McCowell & Gerard Depardieu) and it's not done nearly as well, either.  Don't want anyone to think that got past me
Another Gay HIV+ Demon Infects Another Innocent Wife (YAWN). Intensely homophobic, heterosexist, and hateful, this film represents the twisted fears and logic of the early panic stage of the disease in the 1980s. It was a time when the public was eager to pin the epidemic squarely on the shoulders of gay men, blaming antisocial "AIDS carriers" for carelessly or intentionally infecting chaste wives and innocent babies. It was a time when the public blamed AIDS on lust-driven, irresponsible gay men and cheating husbands. The film is pretentious and overbearing in its failed attempt to masquerade as a sophisticated inquiry into moral responsibility in the age of HIV. It reinforces the simplistic outdated idea that those who are infected with HIV can be neatly separated into the categories of "deserving" or "undeserving" - immoral monsters and their innocent victims sitting together on death row. Twenty years ago, perhaps this film would have its place as a document reflecting our social ignorance and failures in coping with a new epidemic. We did not know then that HIV was a predominantly heterosexual global pandemic. Today this film is a sophomoric attempt to assign blame and reinforce old prejudices about HIV and HIV+ people. Most importantly, HIV is no longer a death sentence to Americans who discover their status and enter medical treatment early. As someone who counsels and tests hundreds of people for HIV infection every year, I would not recommend this film to anyone seeking knowledge or entertainment
Wish I had known. I wish I had read the reviews before buying this DVD set. I was stunned when I started watching the first disc and the familiar and much-loved My Life theme song was missing, and that was one of my favorite parts of the show. And had I known that these were the edited syndication episodes and not the original, I would have passed on this set and waited for a better version. This show deserved better
3 terrible movies, 1 low price. These 3 awful soft core erotic thrillers are some of the worst movies ever made.The only reason to watch them is to see a 17 year old Drew Barrymore strut her stuff in the 1st film playing a very bad girl (though she doesn't do any actual nudity, her body double was Jamie Pressly ironically enough.)The 2nd film has Alyssa Milano looking really nice in the buff.And the 3rd film has Jamie Pressly discarding her clothing for most of the film.But as for the films themselves? Terrible.At least in the 1st film, they seemed to actually be reaching for something more artistic than just exploitative trash, but due to a pathetic script, they ended failing.  Didn't register as a blip at all pretty much during it's original theatrical run after the whole Drew-Barrymore-sheds-her-good-girl-image press had run its course.The filmmakers involved with the 2nd and 3rd films just didn't even try. They were also done as straight-to-video releases.The films are all 3 shown in their unmatted full frame theatrical ratios, which actually helps as the full frame versions show some more flesh in some scenes.These are also the more explicit unrated versions of all 3 versions as well.  The pointless R rated versions available on the old DVD's have been jettisoned.Only for super, super hardcore fans of the 3 actresses involved in the films.There's nothing at all otherwise to be gained from watching these 3 cinematic abominations
Worth Seeing Once Maybe, Then SLAM on the brakes. So I got this movie free with my new PS3 and was thinking sweet, now I dont have to rent or buy it.  Well I can see why they were giving it away.  It does have some clever one liners but some parts of the movie are just so dumb.  Too much of the humor is tasteless and not funny. The Jean Girard character is so ridiculous and not funny or entertaining.  Ok he is homosexual nascar driver, how hilarious, what genius writing.  Then the reaccuring part where Will Ferrel runs around and thinks he is on fire is enough to make you want turn off the movie.  It is kind of hard to explain, but they took most of jokes and punchlines to the extreme thinking it would be funnier, but it missed.  Or the fact Will Ferrel had to drive the Wonderbread car, even though Wonderbread refused to pay any for it.  The writers were so set in their ways they gave Wonderbread all that free advertising and no other product would be funny on a racecar.  I even tried watching this movie a few more times to see if I missed something, still not funny.  DO NOT BUY this movie if you have not seen it, you are not missing much if you choose not to watch it at all.  Half of the good parts are in the previews for the movie anyways.P.S.  I think Nascar fans may enjoy this movie more than someone who has no opinion of Nascar.
Don't let go of your old copy, this is a mixed blessing. 1 star is for the DVD, 5 stars for the movie.  I don't need to say anything about the film; those familiar with Bava's work know this is among his masterpieces.  I'm writing this review to clear up some things about this new "Unslashed" edition.  On the positive side, this version is Anamorphic widescreen and it does present noticeably more picture information on the right and left sides of the frame (the old VCI version was leterboxed a 1.66:1, where as this one is 16 x 9). Now the bad news.  The color and contrast have been boosted/altered to the point that the image appears blurrier, grainier and more damaged than the previous version.  Also, the interior sets (especially in the fashion house) have a putrid yellow/green hue to them not present in the old version.  The soundtrack is horribly remixed, making the dialogue sound like it was recorded in a tin can and it pops quite a bit through the opening of the film.  The French and Italian audio channels are reversed.  None of these audio problems are present on the old version by the way.  To top it off, the dvd menus are gaudy and offputting, trying to make this seem like a bloody slasher pic.  In summution, the extra picture information just doesn't outweigh all of the drawbacks of this edition.  My advice is to hold on to your old release until something better comes along.  Thanks for reading.  -JWH
Not my cup of tea. I rented this movie because I like Luke Wilson and I was in the mood for a romantic comedy, but I was very disappointed. There's just about no chemistry between Wilson and Kate Hudson, and she was just terrible. Throughout the entire movie, I could practically see the acting wheels turning in her head--her portrayal as a somewhat prudish, somewhat mousy character was both unnatural and incredibly annoying. If not for her bad acting, I would have given this movie a higher rating, because it did have its funny and some sweet moments (if you can ignore the implausible plot). There just wasn't enough "good" to compete with Hudson's "bad.
Curious Mix: Some Good Acting & Lousy Script. This movie verged on a 3-star rating just because I really liked 75% of the acting. The script and story have little muscle and barely outline motivations that are supposed to be subtle. The script nudges the action with stereotypes. The story is dated by its emerging feminism that might not be so obvious on that side of the planet now. I watched the whole thing because some of the actors presented interesting characters - they brought presence to the movie in a way I don't think an American actor and director could have done. (Isn't the U.K one big chamber ensemble anyway?) Amanda Donohoe, Sean Bean (a current favorite of mine these days), and Adrian Dunbar pulled my interest along while I did chores and had nothing else to watch. Theresa Russell is a problem. She is pretty, [physically attractive], spunky and had no chemistry with the other actors on screen. In a profession where work is so sparsely available, I am grateful that the producers hired these talented people to keep the paychecks coming to tide them over for a better script and production. The photography is well done
original is better. If you want UNCUT ORIGINAL version, ALWAYS look for ORIGINAL LICENSED Production. NOT US Release. Its a foreign film, it should not be US version to begin with~! HELLO!!!?? Why settle for LESS with US Version where they edit and cut so many excellent scenes especially with Jackie's Fighting Scenes. And US Release ruins the speed and sound as well. I have been collecting JET Li movies both HK and US Release Version for quite some time now. I found HK Version to be MUCH MORE in enjoyable, and HIGHER in Quality. American Market always like to "Americanize" and "Control". Regional Code Regulation thing is one of the example to CONTROL the Market. Why not let everyone enjoy the same HK Original Release move the same way REST OF THE WORLD enjoys it ?? No one makes Hollywood American movies to "French version" or "Chinese Version" ~! This what Americans are doing~! Well, enjoy the cheap "American version" then~! LO
"I can't see ya, but I know you're here.  I can feel it.". The story of Wim Wenders' "Wings of Desire" is told through images and thoughts.  Abandon all expectations of seeing anything resembling a conventional film before watching it.Two angels glide through the streets of Berlin surveying its inhabitants.  Cassiel (Otto Sander) embraces his role as witness but Damiel (Bruno Ganz) wants to break free of his ethereal existence.  He is willing to cast aside his immortality in order to experience the simple joys of everyday life.  The primary catalyst for his desire to change is his attraction to trapeze artist Marion (Solveig Dommartin)."Wings of Desire" does not quite work.  It stumbles not because it is too pretentious or too ponderous.  Rather, it stumbles because it is just too abstract.   Relying on imagery and monologues to tell a story makes for an interesting lesson in unconventional filmmaking, but it also leads to frustration and annoyance to anyone conditioned to more traditional narratives.  "Wings of Desire" deserves a lot of credit for its innovative approach toward its material and its beautiful dream-like visuals.  Yet, it is a film that unfortunately will not appeal much to the mainstream viewer.
too loud. When the background music completely overpowers the dialogue, you may as well turn it off.  The background music was piercing and I needed to have the remote in hand to keep adjusting the volume.  Not everyone has perfect hearing and shows with overwhelming background music are becoming the norm.  A shame because otherwise I could have enjoyed Crash
If you find another source... If you find another source for this movie, pursue it!I liked the movie very much, and saw it first produced on Showtime Entertainment.  This copy appears to be burn made from someone's TV set.Good movie for cheesy fun films, poor quality recording.
Boy, do I miss Luke, Han and Leia. Years after its release I find myself writting what I consider a completely biast review for this film (being somewhat of a Star Wars fan had made it difficult to look at it with any negative light before). Let me first start by saying that my two daughters love the film. For me, I grew up watching the original Star Wars (now titled Episode IV, A New Hope). When the original Star Wars came out, it changed the way people looked at Sci-Fi. I saw it several times just to be able to focus on the different aspects of the sets, props, costumes, etc. It was the best eye-candy of its time by far. Substance became less of an important factor and if the movie had a couple of "holes" in the story we forgave it and watched-on mesmerized by its visual splendor and the likability of its characters. Almost thirty years later the panorama is completely different. Star Wars movies still hold the bar for special effects but in a computer-generated world, amazing visuals ocurr within any television comercial, even the lowest budget Sci-Fi television show has special effects that are somewhat convincing or at least cool to look at. Effects do not make a movie and "Attack of the Clones" is more about effects than story or even acting for that matter. Awfully silly dialogue doesn't help it neither. In retrospect, I wish that George Lucas would have come up with two completely different droids than C3PO and R2D2 (the latter even flies! Imagine that, more capabilities than in the future). This premise is even absurd for the world of Star Wars. According to the story, Luke Skywalker and his uncle Owen in episode four bought two droids that are about thirty to forty years old. As I'm typing this review I can imagine myself typing it with a Royal ribbon typewriter, that just wouldn't happen. It is scary to find things that are even too far-fetched for the world that Lucas created but the movie is full of them. He doesn't really give any explanation in the whole trilogy (I,II,III) as to why in the future the ships are not as cool or look and act clunkier, or why everything looks dated thirty years from now. In his world technology goes backwards and not the other way around. I, however have a solution for all these. George Lucas should keep meddling with the original trilogy until all that is left from the original films is the faces of the protagonists. Everything else should be computer re-generated in order to keep pace with a future more in sync with its past. Then, you could buy all versions of the original trilogy (IV,V,VI). As originally shot, the revised version that we all saw in re-release on the theaters, and the "Ultimate Enhanced Version" to better match the second trilogy (I,II,III). Maybe he could even re-edited where the actors look as if they had no personalities and change the dialog to sound more confusing. Then, you would have a whole set of six films that look fantastic but lack in every other aspect of story telling (ie., compelling characters, continuity, interesting plotlines, etc). The only reason I give the movie two stars is because the wonderful effects created by ILM still makes the film worth watching at least once. Otherwise, I rather watch "Serenity" which has a more Star Wars feel to it than this Star Wars film. The nickname of "Mannequin" to "Annakin" is well-deserved as it is any negatives regarding the characters of this poorly told story
The Cruel Sea. This is one of those unfortunate attempts to translate a tremendous book into a two-hour movie. Good try but it didn't work. The Cruel Sea is one of the greatest novels to come out of World War II and a must read for anyone who ever lived on a ship. But the characters are too complex, the war too long and the sea too treacherous to be captured in a short film. They would have been better advised to develop one or two incidents in the novel
WORST FILM EVER. I have seen many pathetic films in my life. This topped them. Did I rate one star? Sorry- I meant negative 11 stars. It was the absolute worst movie I have ever seen in my entire life. It was a total waste of three hours when I could have been sleeping. There was no point. The script and storyline were pathetic. The gore was overdone- too much blood, killing, and the like. It was totally historically inaccurate, and the Civil War scenes were so grossly unrealistic that it was laughable. All Civil War veterans are rolling over in their graves. Any scene that was supposed to be touching was pathetic. One of the abolsute bombs was when Clint Eastwood fires off a canon twice with his cigar- yet he does not even load it- either time. And somehow, without even aiming the canon, he knocks his 'friend' off his horse.The movie is a failure. F-A-I-L-U-R-E. Crappy. Junky. Just plain DUMB. STUPID. PATHETIC.I am not going to waste any more words on it. Just....whatever you do....save your money. Don't buy it. It's not worth 50 cents
Disappointing. I'm giving this dvd a 1 star not because all three episodes are crappy but because 15 is such a let down. Don't get me wrong, 13 and 14 are a must see but in 15 way too much is changed within the personalities of the charachcters it just seems like there are totally different writers this time. Episode 16 isn't quite as bad as 15  but you can tell the story has been greatly thinned out compared to  the first 14 episodes
where did they go?. I came to learn of AFI (as many did unfortunately) through SING THE SORROW.  it was allrite, but i never really got into them untill i heard their other albums.  After i got ALL HALLOWS it was on, i must say it was quite good.Now, look at this!  Compare the show to any of their older stageshows, there are plenty of tapes lying around.See anything you like?Now, the terrible rating would not generally come to a band because of this music.  It's not TERRIBLE.  maybe two stars i guess, but when you know what this band used to be and how they have suddenly shunned hardcore with no goodbye, it's really just insulting and demands some retaliation.i feel similarly about their latest ...  album?  decemberunderground.  blech
Disappointed. The cast is great! Not sure how they got the stars to do this movie The story line about an aging Robin Hood and Maid Marian as a nun just doesn't do well. Filming is below standard and dialogue is weak. Save your mone
Good Production--ripoff price!. 35 bucks for a 3 hour documentary!  Please.  Some good stuff though, esp. when the family talks about the insight to some Hendrix lyrics.  I never heard that before.  It is unauthorized so of course it doesnt have any Hendrix music.  Buy it used, I would have added two stars if they sold it for 20 dollars because it goes into a lot of detail and has some great intervieews and was overall a good production
No spanish subtitles???  We're insulted. We're huge Monk fans, but how could they tear-out the Spanishsubtitles for Season 4?  This is an outrage and an insult.We're two hugely disappointed fans.  Tony, make it right, please
nooooooooooooooooooooooooooo. this movies horribl;e its so stupid the babies are gross and sooooooooooooooo annoing see spongebob or hey arnold or fairly odd parents skip this
Possibly the worst movie I've seen. I purchased this movie without reading the reviews, based only on my fondness for older movies and the other movies I've seen the two main stars in. This movie was awful, and the sad part is, there were sooooo many opportunities to save the movie all throughout.  The acting was obviously overdone on purpose, I just wish I knew why - it didn't come off as funny or as a satire if that was the intent.  In the end - I threw out the DVD so as not to accidently subject someone else to it
stupid. I love Vincent Price and have many of his movies but this one I wish I had not bought. It is really stupid. It was one of his later movies that he probably made just to have work
Spacey must have had a double!. Spacey's character moons the press near the start of the movie.  However, the moon was hairless and curvy.  In "American Beauty," Spacey showed that he has a nice posterior, but it was hairy and a bit flat.  Like Kevin Costner and Val Kilmer, Spacey must have added to the list of Hollywood actors who wimp out of nudity.  He is not as brave as Harvey Keitel, Ewan McGregor, or Jude Law.  What a shame coming from a man who is usually so edgy in his work
Don't let the cover fool you. Ok, I'm sure Cal Pozo is a good guy and a great instructor but the cover is WAY TOO MISLEADING!!!  Don't be fooled thinking that there is anyone under 50 associated with this DVD in any way, shape or form.  There are a couple of steps that you might find useful but for the most part the rest is useless unless you plan on taking a senior cruise anytime soon.  If you're looking for a Lawrence Welk experience (Not meant as a shot) then by all means pick it up you won't be disappointed... but for anything else... stay away
Worst. Movie. Ever. OK I have seen a lot of bad movies but this one takes the prize for worst movie ever. I am generally a big fan of 80's movies, especially 80s high school movies and chick flicks. But this was just so horrendously unfunny, pointless, dull and banal, with unsympathetic, flimsy characters and a weak plot. It tires so hard to be funny and emotional but fails miserably. I mean, the part where she says about how she's with Lloyd because he told her there was glass on the ground is just so artifical and contrived, yet it is supposed to be profound and emotional. I was actually embarassed to return this piece of garbage to the video shop. The two leads have no chemistry whatsoever and I fail to see what on earth John Cusack's character saw in the selfish, stuck up Diane. I can not understand how anyone can give this movie a high rating, I can only assume that you 1. have all been smoking crack or 2. are all the same person. Thank goodness Cameron Crowe's films got better. Please, don't buy this pile of junk if you have any brains! It will be two hours of you life wasted
Not what I expected. I read the only review for this item and ordered it, expecting to see a fantastic display of sound and some of the interaction of these artists with Mr Hancock as they created music, each colaborating to have a unique blend of sounds.Actually this is only a documentary showing this interaction, and as such is very interesting.But if you are looking to see an hear the full length videos of these great colaborations you will be disappointed, that is not included in this dvd. Only small samples are there for you to see.This was a real disapointmet because the quality of video and audio are fantastic.
not even good. When I purchased devils rejects this movie came free. I watched it and hated it.Its about a sick individual who is on the internet trying to get women to come over for "a party" when they do he torchers them, with hooks piercings, the whole nine yards. After he is cought he is put into a mental institution. When he comes back as a nice guy the town people still want him dead. He gets beat up so slowly he tries to take on some of the town people 1 by 1. Now he then goes back for the girl that escaped and well doesnt live because her father kills him. Its not a good movie at all
I wouldn't recommend it to anybody. I like Marlee Matlin and some of the other DVDs in the Baby Einstein series so was looking forward to this one.  It is unfortunately not that great for teaching sign language (I prefer both "My Baby Can Talk" and "Signing Time").  The worst part of it is how long a child has to wait for the actual content; there is no way to skip the COMMERCIAL for "Disney's Little Einsteins"
Brings back memories but ultimately it disappoints..... Yep, like many viewers I watched this when I was too young and was scared for like weeks on end and couldnt get the tall man image out of my head. Well, when this got re-released I just "had" to have it figuring it would bring back memories and really allow me to get into once again. Unfortunately because I am now older and hopefully a little wiser, the film ends up being a rather cheesey horror movie with a mix-mash plot and NO tension or scary moments whatsoever.Hey, I wasnt looking for a Dustin Hoffman like performance in a horror movie but geeez the acting was pretty rough and forced. The plot started off pretty cool but then began to not know what to do with itself and got almost silly towards the end. The mausoleum itself was eerie but the dwarf guys (Star Wars Jawas?) were pretty funny and the whole thing just didnt add up. As always in horror films a quick call to the police is all it would have taken to stop this Tall man, but no.... lets grab the trusty shotgun and take care of it ourselves...... c'mon.The scene with the plastic bug in the jacket made me laugh outloud and I rewound it just to get another laugh. The film makers had to know how silly this looked.... didnt they?  I hope that scene was supposed to be tongue-in-cheek or the film makers need to rethink their film careers. And of course, the thought process of the characters just didnt make any logical sense. I wont go into details, you'll see what I mean when you watch the movie.  Oh yeah, the mustard-covered fingers was also a classic laugh moment.The silver fyling ball is still cool as hell and that alone earned the movie an extra star rating from me. I do like Jody, he tries to do the right things for the most part and has that waaaay cool 'Cuda that he drives around.  Little Mike was just a young kid and you almost felt bad for him losing so many people he cared for.... it had to be tough.  However, that doesnt excuse the inherent silliness of the movie or the plot that just doesnt unfold correctly or logically.  Maybe I expected too much, maybe I've become an overly-critical movie watcher, but nontheless, I cant recommend this other than for a quick watch.  Rent it, dont buy it since it has really zero redeeming qualities or multiple-viewing value.This could have been soooooo much better with a the proper direction and a little more time put into the films flow. It was  a great concept for horror. Sci-Fi thrown in with mystical elements as well. Great starting point and it was refershingly different as opposed to the usual "10 kids go camping and get hacked by an ax murderer" [...] that you always see. Again though....it was NOT polished at all and just didnt work well enough.Sorry If I've burst the proverbial bubble of the movies fans. But, its a "cult" classic for a reason. Much like the Rocky-Horror Picture Show, the event is the real attraction for the fans...the movie itself is horrible and pointless but fans dont want to face that fact so they hide behind the "cult classic" label.  Hey, whatever.... :)By the way: The DVD quality is only average.  I expected a better transfer but on my plasma based Home theater, it was pretty grainy and not up to par with  what a re-release should be, IMO.[...
Had Higher Expectations... This movie could have been summed up in 30 minutes. I fell asleep several times trying to get through it, good sleep aid, not such a great film. I had way higher expectations from watching the other AMAZING Miyazaki films. This movie isn't a bad edition to Miyazaki's portfolio, but it's not even close to his best
I love David Cross but. this movie was kinda boring. Not enough of Cross' standup. Also when there was footage of his stand up, it wasnt that funny
The Four Feather Bore. Sorry but if this movie gets better with time I wouldn't know. I was too impatient and bored to wait. If a movie doesn't capture me in the first 5-10 minutes I'm finished. This could be a five star movie for someone who has some patience and willing to invest the time
Somebody Made My Point. Based on a true story?  If this is true then it is more horrible than being a fictional fantasy.  Did anyone witness this woman being raped?  People are just going on a murder's word that she was rape by these men.I made two previous attempts to try to explain my point but as I started reading the other reviews I found one that explains everything I was trying to say.  One review stated the following:I gave this 5 stars because men who rape women deserve an awful death.Why?  When is it justifiable for a man to take revenge by killing a woman?  This movie was a fantasy and I feel sorry for a person who thinks it represent reality.  To state that anyone should have the right to take the law into his or her own hands is a crime.  To defend your self is one thing but to intentionally want to kill is simply murder.  The fictional female character (not the actor) in that story should be sent to prison for life for her alone deciding to be the Judge, Jury and Executioner.  I also despise movies where the man does the same thing.  But, it is only a movie.I gave this movie 1 star because you have to give it one.  Yet, that one review makes my point about the majority of these kind of movies.  Movies should stick more to reality when they are doing a film about something that could happen.If this movie really is based on a true story than it is sick.
not for most people. I cannot imagine an audience for this movie.  It is flat, disjointed, with poor production qualities.  It smacks of a film trying to be really artsy, but it fails miserably.  If you enjoy confusion and disjointedness, this is the movie for you.  Otherwise, keep looking
Still updated even after all these years!. I have been looking for a copy of this movie for a long time now because I wanted my kids to see it. I was very young when I first watched this film and it stuck to my mind somehow. Good thing amazon had it and they do make shipments to my country here in Asia.Daryl Hannah played a beautiful and believable mermaid. Tom was also perfect for the role. I can't say their chemistry on screen is as perfect as that of Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan, though, but it wasn't bad. I can't imagine any other actor for the lead role in this movie.I let my kids watch it finally together with my niece. We found ourselves teary-eyed in the end. It was just so touching, we couldn't help it. Even the theme song sang by Rita Coolidge was perfect for the ending. For those who wanna know, the title is "Love came for me".I'm glad I purchased the anniversary edition. I have a home theater and the dolby 5.1 surround sound was just what I needed. It would have been better if DTS was used but I'm not complaining.For those who are thinking of getting this, I hope you make the decision to do so. Tom Hanks is a certified great actor. This movie will soon be in line with the classics like "Gone with the wind" and "Breakfast at Tiffany's". It's already a collector's item. You won't regret it! Besides, love stories don't get out of style
Teen Titans......NOT!!!!!!. I normally don't write reviews on items so trust me if I take the time to write about how absolutely bad this DVD is it means something.  If you are expecting some great animation and stories similar to the George Perez Titan days FORGET IT.  The target audience is for kids 6 and younger.  The characters are far too silly for this to be good story telling.  This is by far the worst animated series ever made based on comic characters.  DC and Warner get a big, fat "F" for this!  Go back and try again
Poor Quality DVD. The quality of this DVD is very poor.  I would not recommend purchasing this item
a very scary terrorist. The plot revolves around a loanshark and his confederates. The cabby/terrorist is really a backdrop to the major scenes but brilliantly done. You actually have to believe these people really exist. The girlie and sex segments are probably the worst I've seen in contemporary cinema. The gore is too much and too long. The actors go from "right on" to miscast.Perhaps, on a larger budget, this indie could have given Mr. Carter more time for a broader perspective
Good Story Idea. Wooden Acting. Apparently, this is a film that many women, who have read the book, can make enjoyable.Characters, including Anne & the Captain, display wooden acting. Poker-faces. Others speak at a clipped pace. The properness of the times allowed for personality, as shown well in "Pride & Prejudice" 1996 & 2006, but not here. Shyness, plainness, or slowness, may be portrayed likeably, with some personality.Both Anne & the Captain maintain wide-eyed, desperate, looks, constantly. Many of us do get nervous within romance; but we are compelled, by conversation, and activity, to interrupt our nervousness with personality. Thus, Anne's & the Captain's constant, wide-eyed, nervousness is un-natural. All of us at the age of Anne and the Captain, would have refined our nervousness to be responses of: shyness, thought, distance, hopefulness, approval, or alarm.You understand the quiet thoughts, because of the story, in spite of the confusing, paralyzed, looks; rather than because of them. You come to like Anne and the Captain toward the end, in spite of the wooden acting, because of the story's ending.This film has pretty scenery; such as walks along the ocean. The costumes are often very unique and well done. There is beautiful singing in one scene, and even better, wonderful singing over the closing credits.Good period, romance films are so few, and so desired, that many women labor to imagine this film better than it is. I applaud their positive imaginations. However, they continued their fanciful, wishful, thoughts into rating this film. A reviewer, who liked the film, says she had read the book, and she cites a huge amount of important background from the book that is not shown in the film. A poor script for those who have not read the book. Awful directing made awful acting.I would like to see this good story re-made by a better Director.Well-made romance films are: "Pride & Prejudice", "Wives & Daughters", "North & South". Fairly made is "Under the Greenwood Tree"
The Four Feather Bore. Sorry but if this movie gets better with time I wouldn't know. I was too impatient and bored to wait. If a movie doesn't capture me in the first 5-10 minutes I'm finished. This could be a five star movie for someone who has some patience and willing to invest the time
Yaawwwwnnnnnnnn. This movie is offensive and probably would be beyond hurtful to children actually caught up in our foster/adoption system.  However, the biggest issue this film has is that it is totally boring.  Although the script was written with an everything-but-the-kitchen-sink mentality it fails to capture the interest of child or adult
I disagree with J. McCormack...it is horrible. The movie is frustrating and a big disappointment. And, what is the point of everything being so white?  Is there some deep meaning here or something?  This movie is exasperating
Great for tango fanatics but maybe not for others. This movie did have some great music and a few very interesting dance scenes, but overall comes across as a slow moving art film with not much of a story line.  And, if you don't speak Spanish you'll have to pay attention to the subtitles or you'll lose track of what little plot there is.For those who have invested much of their lives in dance, and tango in particular, this is likely a very enjoyable movie.  However, if you're just a first time tango lesson taker, or a non-dancer, you might find this movie tedious to sit through and you might be tempted to hit the fast-forward button.
Not that great :(. I enjoyed the other Pilates for Dummies workout video, but this one was not that great.  First I did not like the instructor.  Her voice was annoying, and although her body was obviously built, she looked like some weird giant :).  That aside, I didn't like the workout.  The standing work was just ok, and the mat work was no different than the other PFD that was much better.  Rent it before you buy it, and you will understand what I am talking about
Boring and quite uneven. The three stories are quite uneven, being the Wan Kar Wai's segment the most interesting: well acted, well photographed and with a kind of catchy story line. However, the other too are a wonderful invitation to sleep. The Steven Soderbergh tale is awfully dull and nothing really interesting happens. The Antonioni piece is the most disappointing one, not only for being the worst but for being Anyonioni's. It's absolutely pointless and confusing; in many instances, it seems to be an amateurish test from a lazy cinema student. It's a pity it's Antonioni's since his reputation deserves more than this. Only for the Wan Kar Wai piece, I give this movie 2 stars
Truly Disappointing. After I read Erik Larson's wonderful book "The Devil in the White City" I was fascinated by the brief glimpses at Holmes' story. But this documentary was a phenomenal disappointment. The production is amateurish at best, complete with needlessly corny reenactments worthy of "Mondo Carne." With such a wealth of fascinating information available (court transcripts, etc) do we really need filler footage of some faceless actress wandering down dark hallways acting frightened? This man killed countless people and yet the producers of this documentary thought so little of their audience that they hired a narrator who sounds as if he is the chief ride operator of the Haunted Mansion at Disneyland. Truly disappointing. Perhaps someone will make an interesting documentary of Holmes. This most certainly isn't it
Quote for Never Die Alone. Theres ups and downs in this movie. To me mostly downs.When I first seen it in theaters i loved it. So when Igot the DVD ,iloved it.3 months pass i get sick of it.For 3 reasons First The picture looked blury even on DVD.Second iz the actin iz the same. Third just lookin atDMX abusing 3 women by getting them addicted to coke and heroin.And him abusing his own son, what is wrong with that man.I think this movie make X alot Crazyer.I wouldn't reccommendthis movie for relegous people, HELL NO!!!! If you worshipthe devil andU want to die,And like looking at people being killed ,then it's strongly reccommended 4 U
Overwrought. Sorry to be the nay sayer here gang.But, this puppy's going out with the next trash pick-up.First off, can we talk MISCASTING here of Patrizia Ciofi? Like, come on--MARIA is meant to be a fun loving teenie bopper in a comical setting. Ciofi takes the hard edge approach; almost like something out of "Das Madchen in Uniform".Super man tenor himself, Juan Diego Florez, try as he might, can't keep this fiasco afloat. Even his stunning vocalese fire works display seemed dampened by this whole Titanic like voyage. But most siful, on the musical side, we're treated to sloppy ensemble; just can't even think of doing it with BEL CANTO; Maestro Riccardo Frizza mostly at fault--but hey, there's blame enough to go all around. Lastly, the overall production concept--of updating this piece--just doesn't hold water. Heck, even the principals and chorus onstage don't seem convinced of the notion; so then, how are we expectedto by into this ill conceived premise. Oh, PS. One five star reviewer was so smitten by a "third act aria"--sorry, dude; but Mr. Donizetti only penned two acts to this opera
'Original crew' Trek movies started to get silly with this one. I wanted to like "Star Trek III," but it was bogged down by a thin plot-line, weak action, a story that was too interpersonal between the principles, over-the-top humor, some scientific/technical absurdities and weaker special effects than the two previous "Trek" movies.A story based solely on finding Spock's body and putting the spirit back into it, is just too interpersonal and small a story for the big screen.  A big screen "Trek" movie should involve a larger set of circumstances involving Starfleet and others in the galaxy.Scotty sabotages the Excelsior's warp engines so they wouldn't be able to pursue the Enterprise when Kirk steals it from spacedock.  Once outside spacedock, the Enterprise goes to warp one (with light streak effects very inferior to those of "The Motion Picture") from an almost standing still position.  No more having to first go from warp point one to warp point nine, before you can achieve warp one, as it was in TMP.  Welcome to the subsequent "Trek" movies where even if you're standing still, just push one button and you're off to ludicrous speed in a flash.  The Excelsior pursues and tries to go to warp drive, but konks out due to Scotty's sabotage.  It then immediately comes to a complete stop (which would not happen in space), but it first makes a sound like a car breaking down.  Oh, what a knee-slapper.  Humor in Star Trek is fine, but not spoof humor.  That should be reserved for movies like "Airplane."  And the Enterprise is being operated solely by Kirk, Scotty, McCoy, Sulu and Checkov, when it normally requires a crew complement of hundreds.  Well, I guess it was all about forgetting serious sci-fi, just do whatever you can to appeal to the casual movie goer and the non-"Trek" fan.  And the action in "Search" was few and far between.  And unlike TMP, it didn't really compensate with any kind of intellectual journey or many interesting things to look at.Well, buy if you must, but the problems with this movie all tie in to the unfortunate direction the "Trek" movies went in after TMP.  They should've stuck with real sci-fi and exploration, which is one of the main things Star Trek is supposed to be about.
Average at best, but good role in here by Webb Wilder that his fans... MAY WANT TO PICK UP ON
This DVD was dark and hard to view. Though I like the stories in this series I was disappointed in the quality of the DVD.  The picture was dark and hard to view
Laugh Out Loud Bad!!!!. Take Hammett's "The Glass Key" (and be sure not to credit it), muck it up with pointless violence, mix with stilted, often inane dialogue which would not be out of place in a comic book, stir in over-the-top ham acting by just about everyone, add cartoonish, cliched scene setup and direction and you've got "Miller's Crossing", the most unintentionally hilarious gangster movie I ever saw.Was there a script? Did the actors ever see it?Were he not dead, I would have suspected the immortal Ed Wood Jr. of having directed this film! Then again...A marvel of directorial ineptitude, this a "must see" comedy experience!
This is innovation? Keith, you need to stop!. This DVD is buttersoft, a joke on the Keith fans once again. Seriously, why would such an amateur effort get Keith's seal of approval? That's right, you will buy it no matter how horrid it is (check out The Undertakerz for a great example). This is the "Personal Album" all over again. You will get nothing out of this DVD that hasn't already been said before. What a joke. I know that you kids will blow the $10 to get a glimpse of Keith's personal life but after watching this I am not so sure what to think of this man's motivations.Why would you want to waste ten minutes of your life while Keith tries to use metaphors on why he likens his style to seltzer water instead of soda pop? That's right he is ahead of the game, everyone else drinks his soda so he needs to be different and drink things he does not like, only to find that after years of drinking crap he begins to like it. That must explain why he keeps releasing garbage like the "Lost Masters" and the "Personal Album"Time to move on to the real meat of this disc, Keith's man on the street segment. Another waste of time and pointless ramble on why he's so ahead of his time. This has only confirmed the fact Keith has run out of stem, no longer running Diesel. Great, I get to see three minutes of Keith in a bodega purchasing a box of oj with a $100 bill. Great, I get to see Keith and some wack producers hang out in a hotel room with a 40 year old hooker for a photo shoot.Give it a rest, it's over. Save your loot and stop buying this garbage just because the man's name is on it. This is just another insult from him and those around him
TIME BETTER SPENT ON SOMETHING MORE UPLIFTING. INTERMISSION was filmed in Ireland and you have these Irish actors with their heavily-accented English, which is wonderful but hard to understand at times. This film has been described as a black comedy. Black, yes, but I don't recall laughing at this essentially violent film. If we don't have blokes hitting lasses in the face with their fists, we have cops beating up suspects, kids flinging stones at buses and cars causing wrecks, robberies and kidnappings. And then there is the emotional violence: a bullying supervisor, a deserting husband, people made fun of for the way they look. So this is Ireland? Or a slice of life in Ireland? Well, I hope not. Almost all the characters in this movie seem angry or drifting. That some of them calm down and find a better direction in the end is redemptive for INTERMISSION but the viewer is still left with a bad taste in his mouth. After watching so many of these art house flicks, one wonders if the time would be better spent at the Gaugain exhibit at the museum or on a Louis Auchincloss novel. Something, anything, with a little class and some uplifting spirit.
1 of da best movies i have ever seen. i enjoy this movie very much it is da looked at 2 underrated actors Glynn Turman "preach" and Lawrence Hilton Jacobas "Cochise" who both play their roles well as high school senoirs that were best friends almost consider as brothers Cochise was da ladiest man n da film who had all da ladies even though many of them were average looking he went out with them anyway while preach was da brains who was a professional lier this movie is mostly funny that turns out serious toward da end of da movie because of da death of Cochise when 2 gang acquinatances thought told he and preach told on them 2 get bail out of jail when stealing a nice car he was jump by da 2 gang guys and a punk he beat up at a house party ,earlier in da film, da endin 2 da movie was da saddest thing i have ever seen in a movie up there with menance 2 society when caine got shot several time again and u didn't no if he was goin to live or die this movie takes place in chicago or detroit in da 1960s and was based a real life story this movie was 1 of da very first all black movies and change da movie industry by allowing more black movies 2 be created while this is a classic 4 da sad ending of losin cochise i have 2 took of a star because it was just to sad 4 me 2 watch and preach didn't get together and marry his pretty light skinned girlfriend who was looking 4 him at da funeral i am nearly crying by writing this sad stuff down i no this was a real life story movie they could have created a happlier ending but i guess creativeness at da time was limite
Could have been better. Well, i rented this from the video store, and i am awfully glad i used a coupon to do so! this movie could have been so much better.Summary: Single dad Ashe and his son Danny witness a murder. Following their bosses orders to not leave any witnesses, the thigs murder the two, then throw their bodies in the harbor. Ashe comes back to avenge his and his sn's death. He's helped by Sarah, who i think is supposed to be the orginal Sarah from the orginal movie. Eventually, Ashe goes up against Judah, the very odd drug lord.What i liked: Well..not a lot honestly. The look was pretty cool, and the first part had me watching. Sybil, the blind girl, was interesting. And i liked the moments with the little girl, Grace. I was glad to see Sarah was in this.What i didnt like: the story just didnt grab me after a while. to be honest, it seemed like the screenplay writer was a bit confused as to what to do between Ashe and Sarah. you could tell had Ashe not be doomed to go back to the dead, there might have been a relationship. But that just wouldn't have fit. The bad guys were pathetic, except for Kali, she was pretty good. Even Judah. It seemed they tried to make him almost godlike, and that dosn't work very well.Sarah: she was weaker then i thought she'd be. I mean, if thats the Sarah from the orginal, then they changed her.Its worth a look, since it's the second movie, but i wouldn't buy it. Rent it from the video stor
Some amusing points. First of all whats with this DVD including #1 and #3. What happened to the second movie. The best part of #3 is that apparently halfway through the movie changes who the bad guys are. I think the original script was used and after about 40 minutes the director realized there were only 2 pages of script left. So the last 1/2 of the movie was written and the 2 were badly stapled together  - I mean come on whats with the voiceover at th
Ugh - its widescreen. The film is great, but I was extremely disappointed because I didn't realize that it is the widescreen version - i.e., it doesn't cover the screen top and bottom. Beware! No wonder it was only $9.99...
UGH, ack, pt-ewy!. Murial Hemingway is the only thing worth 5 minutes of your time on this one
Too late!!. I totally agree with the previous two reviewers.  Unfortunately, I got this DVD before they posted their reviews.  I came back here to warn people not to be misled by the title and the rating.  There is absolutely no sex or violence in this movie.  Keri is not such a great actress and the plot is not worth mentioning.  So what's left!
Too bad I'll have to forego........... The many reviews I have read of "The Merchant of Venice" make me thirst nearly unbearably to purchase this DVD.  However, I cannot, for it offers no English subtitles, which I need to get the most out of a movie.  Especially Shakespeare, whose language is difficult enough to begin with.I have "Much Ado About Nothing" which I adore & which does have subtitles.  Will look for others
Not good... Just rented this dvd and was quite surprised.  Normally, I'm a big George Clooney and Matt Damon fan.  However, in this film, their talents were underutilized and did not make up for the poor script, editing, and direction which made this film quite dull to watch.While the idea behind the movie is good, it could have been more entertaing, dramatic, or suspensful.  As another reviewer remarked, I was quite tempted to shut it off after 45 minutes and watch something else.  But, I did suffer through to the end, where the film just sort of ends and leaves viewers hanging..
poor and lazy. With a very good scenario and a fantastic Kris Kristofferson the film is slow, over male attitude, and finally  poorly made and boring
the squatter as hero. In terms of both format and style, "Rent" - despite its superficially modernist tendencies - has its roots firmly planted in the grand old operatic tradition.  Yet, it suffers from the weakness common to most modern musicals in which the characters sing virtually nonstop throughout the entire production - which is that it makes it hard for the audience to connect with the characters.  In more traditional musicals, the long stretches of spoken exposition between song-and-dance sequences serve as an opportunity for the audience to get to know the characters as recognizable, flesh-and-blood human beings.  This is less of a problem with a florid romantic fantasy like "Phantom of the Opera," which seems a natural for this type of approach, but with material like "Rent," which is small in scale and intimate in scope, the constant singing serves as a distancing device for the audience.  I know that this play (and, perhaps now, even the movie) has generated a passionately loyal fan base who considers "Rent" practically sacrosanct and therefore beyond criticism, but to someone, like myself, coming cold to the work, "Rent" adds up to much less than the sum of its parts.The story, a modern day update of "La Boheme" set in Greenwich Village, starts on Christmas Eve, 1989, and ends on Christmas Eve, 1990.  This was at the height of the AIDS epidemic, and, indeed, many of the film's characters - primarily gay men and former junkies - are struggling with the disease (AIDS being the modern equivalent of the consumption used in the original story).  There's also a wheezy subplot involving a real estate company that wants to evict the starving artists (one is tempted to call them "deadbeats") from a building in order to further their diabolical scheme of re-developing a city block."Rent" - with its noble "performance artists" doing battle against the Big Bad Corporate Bullies - feels less like a relic from the `80's than one from the `60's.  Though intended to be the heroes of the piece, the artists and bohemians often come across as nave, painfully self-absorbed, and annoyingly self-righteous, an attitude epitomized by one of the characters rigging a local ATM machine so that his buddies can withdraw unlimited amounts of money from it using his dead boyfriend's name (the heavily allegorical "Angel") as the password (this is somehow supposed to be seen as admirable and a tribute to the spirit of the dead man).  Anything`s better than actually working, I suppose, and becoming a tool of corporate America.  When one of the men finally takes a dreaded "job" ( a mere sinecure, I might add) so that he can actually pay the rent he owes (horrors!), he acts as if he is selling his soul to Satan, and has to have two of his lady friends accompany him to the interview for moral support and to offer him assurances that he will still be able to live with himself even after he has soiled his hands with the dirty mammon from an honest-to-God paycheck.  I wonder why it never occurs to any of these characters that the capitalist system they loathe so deeply is also helping to produce drugs that will one day lead to a possible cure for the disease that afflicts them.With the exception of newcomer Rosario Dawson, the filmmakers have retained most of the original Broadway cast members for the movie, and even though their acting isn't all that impressive, some of them do very well indeed at singing and dancing.   In his direction, Chris Columbus has broken away from the confines of the original production, but he never manages to bring us into the world of the people we're watching.  Despite the constantly tracking - sometimes even spinning - camera he has chosen to employ, the film still feels stagy, over-stylized and artificial in almost every scene.As to the libretto by the late Jonathon Larsen, only one tune strikes me as truly memorable, while the rest all sound like repetitive musical doodling.  One of the problems, too, with having so much of the conversation sung rather than spoken is that the lines are sometimes so utilitarian, pedestrian and prosaic - when they aren't pseudo-intellectual drivel on the order of "the opposite of war isn't peace; it's creation" - that they become unintentionally funny when set to music.  It's not for nothing that the Sharks and the Jets didn't actually sing out most of their confrontations.There are, admittedly, some very moving passages in the last half hour of the film as the disease finally begins taking its grim toll on several of the characters, but those moments of quality are completely undercut by one of the silliest copout endings I have ever seen in a motion picture.  In that one crucial moment, the movie descends to the level of low comedy and farce, taking any pretensions to seriousness right down the drain with it.I don`t question for a moment the basic humanity and sincerity of the people responsible for "Rent" (or of its many devoted followers), but it`s hard to get too worked up over a story whose premise seems to be that people - especially "sensitive" artists - should be allowed to live on other people`s properties for free
jamie lee curtis must have been offered a ton of money to come back to the series, at least i hope so. pretending that 3-6 never happened (don't we all wish that!) this flea bag starts with ms.curtis hiding out as the head mistress of a private school(with a false name what kind of back ground check did they use on her) and still living in fear of her brother michael. well as you can guess he's back and still a little pissed off that she became a star and he has had to do all these bad sequels.nothing new here and nothing worth seeing (but at least we do get to see jamie and her late mother janet (playing her "pyscho" role once again) act together for what would be the last time).just a waste of time but i hope it helped put ms. curtis's daughter in collage, as that is the only reason i can think of that would get her back into this mess
Par for the course. A boy has a college interview at a small academy and meets the other guys there.  And they talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk.  They go to classes and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk. Then they go down to dinner and and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk and talk.  Then nighttime comes and the boys all feel themselves up.  In other words, this movie is vintage DeCoteau.  It defies all known logic (the boy shows up for his college interview, is accepted immediately and somehow moves in the same day with no luggage or discussion with parents), has lame effects and lots of half naked boys.  It's hard to tell if this is a commentary on the Catholic Church scandals or just another excuse to show writhing youg men in bed. Definitely another laugh riot from the director of such "classics" as Leeches and Leather Jacket Love Story
A vain attempt. Like my title suggests this movie is a vain attempt to take credit from the first movie to sell sub-par music to a new generation of viewers.  The first Heavy Metal obviously had some thought put into the scenes and the pace of the story line.  The artistry was phenomanal in the first movie, much better than the mish mosh of computer graphics and hand drawn animation in Heavy Metal 2000.  The first movie made sure the music reinforced and enhanced whatever scene was being played, the second, well the music really did not add much if anything at all the movie.  To sum up...boring plot, no imagination, and a sound track to not die for.  My advice?  Use the DVD as a coaster and read a good Frank Herbert novel instead
You'll never get this time back, so take my advice and don't do it. Brittany Murphy and Holly Hunter star in this way below mediocre "romantic comedy" about two producers at the Jerry Springer-esque Kippie Kann show. Kippie Kann (Kathy Bates) is supposedly losing viewers and they want to give the show a new twist. Accordingly, they take all sorts of new ideas for shows to make Kippie a bit less trashy. One of them: Little Black Books, or electronic ones like Palms and Blackberries. After her boyfriend lets it slip that he used to date a well-known model, Brittany Murphy's character, Stacy, takes her work home with her when he goes out of town and she finds herself inexplicably drawn to the Palm he left at home. Before you know it she's contacting all of his exes under the guise of getting them to be guests on the show, but in reality just because she can't trust her man.This movie was tedious in a way that I can't even put into words, but I think it's enough to say that the hour and a half of my life that I will never get back will be sorely missed. The plot hinges on the idea that if you're dating someone who doesn't tell you every single minute detail of his dating life before you got together, that it's okay to snoop through his belongings and use duplicity and manipulation to find out the things you want to know. It paints a dreary picture for the state of true love, and it doesn't even do so with good acting or a strong plot. In fact, the only reason I gave this movie two stars instead of one is because Gavin Rossdale has a cameo and I just don't see enough of him these days. Take my advice and stay far far away from this stinker. If you want to be depressed about the state of relationships in today's world rent Closer, at least then you'll have some good acting to enjoy with the movie's pessimistic view of love
Better Off with Seasons 1-3. Without a doubt the season had some pivotal moments. But too few and far between and without a clear story arc for Sydney. The return of Ms. Lena Olin gave it a shot in the arm, but too little too late. Dull villains and dispensing with the cliffhangers were major mistakes that effectively rendered the show toothless. A relentless snorefest considering the brilliance of previous seasons
So Bad. Awful...Truly awful.  Joanne Sellar and Daniel Lupi (producers of Boogie Nights and Hard Eight) should be ashamed of themselves and so should the Weinsteins for producing this piece of crap
The movie we lesbians love to hate!. OK, OK, we've all had years to take pot-shots at this semi-stinker of a movie...What I hated: the acting is pretty bad, especially Trisha Todd.  Yeesh, what a spoiled little brat her character was too!  I hated the dialoge, so contrived and AWKWARD!  In the "making of" tape, Conn describes the actress who plays Maggie as some sort of female Clark Gable - UGH!  Wrinkled up truck driver with an overbite..not suave and sexy!  The guy that Claire kept "doing it" with was annoying the heck out of me.What I liked: the fact that Karen Trumbo is so sexy is about all that saved it for me.  (except, did anyone notice that she kisses like she's about to swallow the other person whole??)  I also liked the stretch when they began to find peace with each other and became friends.  The fantasizing about each other was cool...Definately of dubious quality, just a sexy setting, some good "tension", and a few funny lines...I think if most women are honest, there's a place for this on their shelves.
Hellhounds on my Trail: Lost Scent. &quot;Hellhounds on my Trail&quot; is a disappointment. The legendary Robert Johnson, perhaps the greatest blues musician in the history of this country, is unseen and effectively unheard in this collage of generally mediocre performances by admirers and wannabes. In fact, the two weakest performances in the film are the opening and closing sequences. The only insight which comes through clearly here is the vast gulf in talent between Robert Johnson and his imitators
Legends Of The Dull. More predictable than an old TV Land episode of Bonanza and much less entertaining, this story of an anti-government rancher and his three sons, one the upstanding sort who seeks to work for good within the system, one an idealist, and the middle son, Tristan, played by Brad Pitt, a tormented man who seeks to find peace within nature's anger. At least that's what I think he was doing. The fact is I never was a fan of this movie, not back in the 1990's when my best friend loved it (and predicted Julia Ormond would be a superstar--sorry, Gina, if you ever read this, I just couldn't resist working that in there, ha-ha) and not upon the occasion of a recent second viewing. I don't think there's anything to really recommend this movie to anyone. It's not spectacular in its setting, it's not revolutionary in its by-the-numbers story, and I found then and still find now that it is highly melodramatic and boring. To each his own, I know some love this movie, but from where I sit, this film is a would-be epic that never rises above fluff
Ratner is a lousy film maker.... This man is like Michael Bay.  Using high speed action sequences and terrible casting and script writing, the fact that Chris Tucker appears in this and almost every movie that the man makes signals a trend to do these as not so much movies as they are music video comedys only it's patheic and not funny, and that is also why the man who is now making X-Men 3 will cause that movie franchise to die a quick death at the movies.  The man is a joke
You get what you pay for!. This product was a bad choice for me. It was a poorly done product. It was washed out, the quality, both audio and video was terrible. It was not enjoyable to watch. The packaging was cheap quality. I should have known better. Pay more and get a nice set, and a better product. Don't try and save a few dollars if you want something to enjoy. Paper sleeves make for a cheap copy.
Confused by this 'classic'. I am convinced you have to be one of three things to enjoy this film: male, born before 1935, or a huge Monroe fan smitten with anything she ever put out. Marilyn is so annoying in this I wanted to smack her, and Tom Ewell's character is equally a jerk. I am not sure why this movie was supposed to be funny. Is adultery funny? Not really. I don't mean to sound so conservative, in fact I'm quite the opposite, I'm pretty liberal, which may be why this movie bothered me so much. It is very sexist and dated and Monroe's usual portray of the harmless, stupid, breathy blonde bimbo so eager to please isn't very empowering to young women. The character she portrays has no name, is simply titled 'The Girl' a female puppet manufactured for pleasure. The jokes are dated and fall flat, no longer funny to modern society. I think 'The Seven Year Itch' is one of the most overrated 'classics' ever but what can I say, my 84 year-old grandmother enjoyed it. Maybe she was just nostalgic for the '50s. A much better Monroe comedy is 'Some Like It Hot' where she is less annoying and the humor still resonates to this day
Not a First Choice. I purchased "ABC's of Newborn Baby Care" and another video called "Bringing Baby Home". The "ABC's" video uses a baby who is not a newborn. The umbilical cord is healed and the baby is at least three weeks old. The video does go over basic care of how to hold, change, dress a baby, bottle cleaning and baths, but skips over the details I would have found useful. "Bringing Baby Home" by the Liandrea Company is a much more complete video that uses actual newborns and parents (no actors)and covers a wider range of information. I do not recomment ABC's of Newborn Baby Care as anything but a suppliment to another video
Horrible. Samuel Jackson, Juliette Binoche...I thought it's gonna be a wonderful movie. To my greatest disappointment this was one of the worst movies I've ever seen in my entire life.A married mother with three children has an affair with a journalist and yet she's the one to fight for someone rights or to be compassionate about someone. What a non-sense!Hope the greedy amateurs who created this movie WON some moneywith this crap movie by LOSING their chance to ever film again!Never ever I will watch a movie with Samuel L. Jackson or Juliette Binoche, again. I'm surprised how did they agree to star in this kind of "movie" that wastes your precious time
Amazon are sick for selling this. The fact that Amazon are selling this sick footage...well, let's just say that legal action is pending.
Give me a 'real ' Pilates instructor,please. After working out from another Pilates instructor,I fould this one hard to take.Then I observed that it was her voice,why is she speaking like she is talking to first graders?I couldn't go on to part 2 cause I felt really annoyed by her presentation.Then I read from another reviewer that she's toned down a bit.Wow,I just like the direct approach and proper instruction.Interesting video.  I need to sell this copy
Movie great, DVD substandard. The sound on this DVD is absolutely horrible.  The dialogue is at a much lower volume than the music and sound effects, making it impossible to view without constantly tinkering.  I also have the VHS, on which the sound is perfect, so I can still watch this wonderful movie.  But I would sure like to get my money back for the DVD
Uninteresting one-dimensional characters, interesting art. I have seen several films about Van Gogh, all which were fascinating.  In each Van Gogh was a character that was portrayed in a manner that was human and who had ideas and humanity as well as a need to do art.  By contrast, Harris' Pollock lacked any humanity, except for one scene where he takes a dog to a vet.  And Pollock didn't seem to be someone who thought about life at all.  He hardly cared about anyone and in the whole movie connected with no one with the exception of his wife, and that was far more a practical relationship than a love relationship.  His wife Lee was portrayed as a generally uninteresting person as well.  I was not drawn in by the film at all by any of the main characters.  Pollock's gift to the world was his art; who he was and the life he lived were not worth making a movie of if this is the best the story can be told in film.
What a disaster!!!. I thought this movie would be fantastic with its all star cast of superb movie stars like Kevin Kline, Meryl Streep and Lily Tomlin etc.Instead the movie was extremely slow, boring, and drawn out!! It was so bad that 45 minutes into the movie, I couldn't stand watching another second of it. So, I stopped the movie and promptly returned it to the video store I rented it from.If the movie moved at a swifter pace and was a bit more witty, then perhaps it would have been good
Worst. Movie. Ever. OK I have seen a lot of bad movies but this one takes the prize for worst movie ever. I am generally a big fan of 80's movies, especially 80s high school movies and chick flicks. But this was just so horrendously unfunny, pointless, dull and banal, with unsympathetic, flimsy characters and a weak plot. It tires so hard to be funny and emotional but fails miserably. I mean, the part where she says about how she's with Lloyd because he told her there was glass on the ground is just so artifical and contrived, yet it is supposed to be profound and emotional. I was actually embarassed to return this piece of garbage to the video shop. The two leads have no chemistry whatsoever and I fail to see what on earth John Cusack's character saw in the selfish, stuck up Diane. I can not understand how anyone can give this movie a high rating, I can only assume that you 1. have all been smoking crack or 2. are all the same person. Thank goodness Cameron Crowe's films got better. Please, don't buy this pile of junk if you have any brains! It will be two hours of you life wasted
Who wrote this?. Waste of time.  I turned it off.  The "extra features" were slightly interesting.  The actual film was just a vehicle for the creators to show themselves dancing.  A vanity piece.  Why not present just the dance and save us from excruciating, badly-written melodrama.  Don't bother
Like Chewing on A Handful of Sand. Man oh man...I love documentaries and character studies.Crumb, Capturing the Friedmans, The Thin Blue Line etc...But THIS...my god, the mind boggles at the level of pretentiousness of the folks who claim to "love" or "get" this horrible mess.Over an hour and a half of two crazy women who are essentially shut-ins rambling on about nothing at all in what looks like an abandoned shack surrounded by vermin and garbage a foot deep.The two women in question are "Big Edie" and "Little Edie", the aunt and cousin of Jackie O respectively.Let me sum up the whole 100 minutes for you;Little Edie: I hate it here. I had to leave New York to come here and take care of my mother.Big Edie: I was fine. I used to have a lovely singing voice.Little Edie: But I missed out on my big chance to make it.Big Edie: Oh well. You missed out.Little Edie: I miss New York. I hate it here.Big Edie: Did you feed the cats?Little Edie; YES!!! I fed them!!!Big Edie: I used to have a lovely singing voice.Now imagine this being repeated over and over again for 100 minutes.Do yourself a favor; Before you let anyone talk you into seeing this piece of dreck just go sit on skid row for 2 hours and listen to the rambling of the hobos and mental patients.You'll save the money and get some fresh air at the same time.Horrible.Just plain horrible
Blood is thicker than Water: Gory, Flawed---& Beautiful. Nobody in Hollywood would deny that the movie business is War. And as we all know from General Sherman, War is Hell.First-time director Kevin Yagher found that out the hard way. When studio chiefs brought in Joe Chappelle to fill in what they thought were gaps in the movie, Yagher walked off the set, pulled his name from this fourth Hellraiser installment and cursed it to movie development Hell, branding it with the ultimate shame of having been directed by "Alan Smithee", the Hollywood calling card of a disaffected director.Frankly, I think Yagher acted prematurely---"Bloodline" is flawed, one of the weakest of the brooding "Hellraiser" franchise---but taken on its own terms, it bumps and grinds quite nicely and sheds plenty of the red sauce along the way."Bloodline" is an entertaining little wallow in the ghoulish legendry of the hellish Cenobites, their tormented minions, and the earthly conjurers who hope to bring the Demons into the material world for gain and glory, and end up giving "body piercing" a whole new meaning."Bloodline" feels like a film created by committee, which is exactly what it turned out to be. It is uneven, jumping from scene to scene in fits and starts; it's evident that Yagher's vision was unfulfilled and his contempt justified.The film begins on a space station, with Science Officer Dr. Paul Merchant (played by French Canadian actor Bruce Ramsay, who does a stellar turn with all of the Le Merchant/Merchant roles) interrupted by a security team while trying to summon the demonic Cenobites using a high-tech version of the infamous Lament Configuration.Interrogated by one of the marines (played by the lovely but underused Christine Harnos), Merchant reveals that he is the last in a bloodline of inventors and scientists, and that his ancestor Phillip Le Merchant was a fabled 18th century French toymaker who first created the hellish Lament Configuration.Here's my advice: while I bought "Bloodline" for its gaudy, gory imagery and style, I would rent it and watch the first 40 minutes, if only for the fact that Yagher commits to celluloid some of the most graphic, stylish, erotic and disturbing images ever filmed.The story of the toymaker's design and delivery of the wicked box to a French nobleman, hedonist and sadist (played to the wild-eyed feverish hilt by Mickey Cottrell) is both hellacious and eerily beautiful, shot in natural light, the candles and firelight glittering on a palette of flesh, bone and blood. It is beautiful stuff, and I can see why Yagher resigned in disgust when his vision was commandeered by Chapelle.Oh, and Chilean actress Valentina Vargas is glorious as the demoness Angelique, with or without skin: she can rend my flesh any day of the week.Other than that, "Bloodline" is forgettable: we move from Le Merchant to his 20th century architect descendant and a skyscraper crammed with Cenobites, and thence to the haunted space station. While some reviewers have complained that the gory sequence in which two hapless twin security guards are transformed is both gratuitous and brings the movie to a halt, I enjoyed it: it's a wickedly bloody, gory piece in prime Hellraiser style. Finally, Douglas Bradley is in fine form as Pinhead---but then again, when isn't he?For the hardcore Hellraiser fan, buy this DVD---if you don't have it in your collection already. For the casual gorehound, a rental might suffice, if only to savor the supple, gorgeous, haunting 18th century prologue. For filmmakers, it's a prime example of how not to go about making a horror movie.JS
Pure Hollywood Garbage. Simply BAD!. My husband and I LOVED the original Amityville and were SO disappointed by this remake. With the special effects we have nowadays I thought this movie would have been great, I was wrong. It was pure Hollywood garbage.
Racist Jokes Unfunny. Let's face it; some of the jokes are funny. The one about Mike Tyson been like someone else's bulldog let loose in the room was really funny. I also found the bit about Bill Clinton and Osama Bin Laden also funny. However, Jamie dwells too much on the fart joke. How can you tell a fart joke for 6 minutes? After 2 min it becomes worn and so "unfunny". Why does he repeat himself so much with that line, "I am not saying she's a crackhead, just a bit crackish"? It sounds very rehearsed after the second time. If it were only for these errors I would have found the jokes altogether acceptable.What I found completely unacceptable were the racist jokes that he made against Arabs. I am black myself but found some of the jokes about Islam and Arabs to be in bad taste. Jamie could not even get an Arab accent right. C'mon, guys the accent Jamie pulled was an Indian accent and not an Arab accent.I kept asking myself, "what would black people do if a white comedian (say Robin Williams) makes the same crude jokes about black people?" Would it be acceptable?". I think not. I am sure the black press would slaughter Robin if he did. I wish to call a spade a spade. Nonsensical, crude racist jobs against any ethnic group (black, white, Asian and yes Arabs) are not funny. They degrade and demean. For not even managing to get an Arabic accent, Jamie deserves 2 stars from me.
Read the book instead. If this movie was ever going to have a chance, it needed to be about 4 or 5 hours long, or never attempted in the first place. Some books adapt well to being edited and condensed as a screenplay - Possession just can't be dealt with that way. What you have as a result is another story entirely. There just wasn't time enough, I guess, to develop the characters, or even to include half of them. The only character true to the book and left almost intact was Sir George. The rest were stripped of their layers and everything that made them fascinating, and we are left with painful stereotypes and, in the case of Roland Michell, a character who seems to have wandered on to the wrong set during filming. My best advice is that if you've read the book, skip the movie, but if you saw the movie, you should do yourself a favor and get the book
This just didn't do it for me. Maybe I loved the original one too much, but this version of the story did not work for me. I especially was dissapointed in the music and the oompa loompas. Stick with the first one. It was perfect
Total disappointment!!. Blech!  I really like all the young actors that were in this movie and expected it to be really funny and cute.  WRONG!  It was a bizarre combination of shock tactics trying to show how edgey they all were.  The only redeeming actor was Justin Long.  The rest of the movie was a waste of brain cells
One for the garbage can... If you are a Blackmore fan stay away from this piece of crap because during the guitar solos all you will see is Gillan shaking his butt or "playing" the congas and everybody else except, of course, the guitar work. I couldn't bear it anymore in the middle of Child in Time and will certainly not check the rest of this mess. On another level, I am just appaled by the extremely poor musicianship of Jon Lord! This guy just Stinks so bad that even I could take him on the Hammond; I'm a guitarist by trade. Heck, even Blackmore is very ordinary from what I've se...heard. Can't say anything about Glover because you can't hear what he's playing. So the only high points of this video, as far as I could stand it, is Ian Paice's performance which is excellent as usual and Gillan's incredible voice. A very sad thing because DP was my favorite band and one of the major reasons I took up the guitar in '69. I can certainly live with the bad sound and picture considering the time that the show took place but absolutely not the crappy playing. This one is NO keeper and I simply threw it away, but if you really want to see DP at it's best go for the Concerto For Group and Orchestra DVD, with the Royal Symphony Orchestra, but there again you won't see much of Blackmore's work but the musicianship is way better
Tim Allen is a talentless moron!. The Santa Clause is just another stupid movie starring that no talent lowlife Tim Allen.  Bottom Line: this movie isn't funny, Tim Allen isn't funny (never has been), and by spending money on this movie you will not only be as stupid as Tim Allen, you'll be throwing your dollar bills right out the window.  It's a shame that a drunk driving, drug peddling, zero like Tim Allen can become so popular amoung children by using family films as his bread and butter.  I tried on a pair of shoes yesterday that were funnier than Tim Allen!  What a lame excuse for an actor.
Last Van Damme for me. Van Damme will keep making these awful pictures until fans like me quit buying them, I quit.The shame is that his new movies are most likely watched by his fans and yet very little in them appeals to fans, IMO. Why
lots of visual style.......little substance. me and my partner are both real open minded people who enjoy a huge range of films. And we do really like The Thin Red Line. But this was a real boring piece of film making.....The whole film was just one huge poetry reading and I prefer to read poetry from a book.....It just doesn't goe anywhere and we found the love scenes even worse than those directed by George Lucas.Even the battle scenes were just poetry readings..........Watch Thin Red Line instead if you are interested in this director's work...That film is a masterpiece....This isn't
Knocking 'The Rock". This film is about as weak as I remebered it to be when I first saw it 50 years ago. I only took it because it came as a package with Rock Around the Cloc
They're bound to disappoint, I suppose... With few exceptions, (CIGARETTE BURNS) I think we may all be coming to realize that this series and its vignettes are by in large disappointments.  Horror fans do have high expectations, and perhaps the bar keeps getting raised in what may be unrealistically large increments.  But also, these stories are not that clever, and the execution isn't generally very scary or original.As for this episode, I am a BIG fan of Don Coscarelli, and perhaps that may be a factor that resulted in impractically high expectations.  This film definitely wasn't the worst of the bunch (HOMECOMING, CHOCOLATE).  It wasn't terrible, or even all that bad.  It was competently made, with a creepy and disturbing atmosphere, which is what the director was trying for, and did generate some chilling moments.  But it wasn't all that great either.  I don't even know if I can say it was very good.  Even an actor whom I am a fan of (Angus Scrimm) portrayed a character so poorly written for, that it was difficult to tell if he was supposed to be funny or not.  It was a wasted appearance of a fine actor (and very nice guy in real life).The bottom line is, the rating system we get doesn't examine complex criteria that goes into film-making, nor other objective measures of quality.  Simply put, it is based on whether you love or like or dislike or hate a film.  In the end, I just didn't like this all that much - not enough for a 3-star anyways.  Maybe if the cute actress (BREE TURNER) had gotten nude...
"O" Please!!!!!!!. For me this movie is a painfull thing to watch. I wish that I could give this 0 stars. The infamous fake "O" scene kind of recked true intamacy for me. It may be true that women do this but it is one of the worst kind of lie imaginable.One of the truths for us guys is that when we are cuddiling with a woman we fanasise that we are with the first girl we fell in love with.Just FYI.
Buy the other version -- the Tai Seng release. I would like to give this version 5 stars, i love the movie, but this is the Dimension release which only offers an English language dub. If that's OK by you, then this is the cheaper version, but if you are a purist like me, you'll want the Cantonese/Mandarin version with English subtitles
dont bother. It is ok if You want to see it, but I wouldnt recomended to buy it, cause I wont see it more then the timne I saw it, I really do not know why people have given so much stars to a very regular movi
when a great actor meets a godawful director. ed harris was perfectly cast as artist jackson pollock. sadly, he was also the producer, and hired a horrible director. a director named ed harris. i have never before seen a movie where you could sense every damn scene being held a beat too long. over and over and over, harris keeps the camera running too long. it is as if he was so in love with his pet project (he worked on the movie for many years) that he could not bear to not put forth every single one of his notions. sad, because it couldve been a good movie
Sliding Scales. This is the first movie I have seen whose rating slipped further the longer it played."Eight Women" is the story of, well, eight women, who are trapped by a snowstorm -- all 5 inches of it. The man of the house has been murdered in the night. Young and old, black and white, of different classes, the women must try to determine who the killer is. "Eight Women" is also a movie about secrets, of which everyone seems to have several. The plot has more twists and turns than an Alpine road on the Tour de France. Yet the first 2/3 of the film is tolerable, funny and even a bit interesting. The characters are self-interested and fun. There's dotty old grandma, a prissy, hysterical virgin aunt, the dead man's vampish sister and coltish young maid, two daughters, a somber yet elegant wife (Catherine Deneuve) and a black cook. Plenty of class and age tension to make three movies.Did I mention the music? Every twenty minutes or so, one of the characters breaks into song. These are always those stereotypical French songs -- full of longing and sadness and references to sleep and springtime -- that are tedious to American ears. And bizarre. While one character sings, the rest do slow little dances. Strange.By the 2/3 mark, I was going to give this quirky film 4 stars. But soon, the plot line spun out of control, getting more and more manic until it finally derailed completely with a tragic ending. Definitely not recommended unless you are desperate need of a bizarre experience.
CRAPPYDOOO!!!!!!!. NEVER EVEN SEEN TONY JAA TILL THE END!!!SAVE YOUR MONEY ON THIS FILM.,IT'S NOT WORTH IT!!!!!!!!!!!
Crammed a 1 hour movie into 3 = BORED out of my mind!!!. This movie is quite possibly the biggest waste of Christian Bale and Colin Farrell to date.  It was boring, overblown and incessantly long.  It's one of those movies where you keep hoping it will get better, but it never does - and then it just ends.  Don't waste the time or the money
a sorry movie. I wrote a huge review for this and don't know where it is but let me give you the short version.  They don't continue the story, that is until the end of the movie.  AND THAT WAS THE PART TRHAT RUINED THE MOVIE FOR ME. The movie is about this kid from the wudang sword school and he is going to get married.  Enter the Bride.  She of course doesn't want anybody to be happy so...The story is not really worth going over, it is just injected and there are no real emotions.  Except of course for an ending that really PO'ed me.  The only reason this movie gets a 2 stars and almost gets a 3 is for Christy Chung.  Not only is she one of the most beautiful women on earth, she is a great actress.  So I know of 2 movies now that are only worth watching for her, this and Red Wolf.  It may be because the people she works with are so terrible, but to tell the truth, Christy Chung actually made me pop this dvd in for a second time.  Not a big deal since it was only like a 77 minute long movie.
not worth the buy. dont buy it not enough action but rent i
Do nit buy this item @ marketplacesales-vmh. Buyers beware! this company claims to have DVD's in stock and will hold your money for weeks.Don't you want your DVD in a week rather than months
ripped off. Never received the movie and have not heard a single word from the seller despite my emails
Not funny. Jamie Foxx is very talented AS AN ACTOR, but he does not even hold a candle to the top comedians.If you watched this and thought it was funny, then do yourself a favor and see more stand-up comedians.  Foxx's routine gets put to shame by the big names in the industry.If you are just a Jamie Foxx fan and want to see him perform, then by all means by this DVD.  But if you are searching for a quality comedic routine that you can laugh at, look elsewhere
Absolutely Horrible. I watch a lot of stand-up comedy and this by far has to be one of the worst I've ever seen.  The jokes are all old and stale.Oswalt opens with a few lines about midgets.  At this point, while these jokes weren't particularly hilarious, the show looked to have promise.  It was all down hill from there.He jokes about President Bush, and for as much as I can't stand Bush, hasn't it been overdone by now (or politics in general for that matter)?  And then there's the baby jokes, which even though cliche', are usually still a bit funny.  However, this guy manages to make them not-so.I know I've seen Oswalt somewhere in the past before and it wasn't this terrible.  However, this performace will be burned forever into my mind as a comedy atrocity
Horrible. This is the worst sequel I have ever had the displeasure of seeing. I knew it wasn't going to be as good as the first one ,but did it have to be this cheesy and boring. They aged mia, got rid of michael, threw her together with some loser, and made up some bogus law about marriage. I was really disappointed
No "When the sun goes down". Wouldn't you think with the title of the collection being "When the sun goes down" that it would actually include the video to the song "When the sun goes down"?  Apparently NOT!  The only reason I ordered this DVD was for the video/song titled the same as the collection and it's not even there.
you can record these episodes for free. As already stated Disney did not say that these were not new and we were very disappointed to discover they were ones we had already seen. Very misleading advertising
Dated and Dull. The central idea of this movie is the activities a 1920's Robin Hood and his band of gangsters. Unfortunately, even the Rat Pack cannot save this movie. The script is slow, dated,and dull. Barbara Rush's scenes are especially confusing. Her scenes almost seem to be part of a different movie. Nothing comes of her apparent interest in Sinatra or Martin which makes me wonder why they made the final cut. The main actors seemed to be bored, and with the exceptions of Bing Crosby and Peter Falk, walked through their performances. (Maybe they were hung over most of the time?)Save your money and borrow it from your local library.
REINVENTING THE WHEEL. The flight into New York had been a long one; but I was gently revived when Kirsten Dunst met me at the airport.  She was to be my escort that night at the Lincoln Center where the President would present me the Distinguished Writer's Cross-the highest award this nation can bestow on an author.  I quickly slipped my only suitcase in the backseat and sat next to her as she drove her Mercedes S class sedan to the Waldorf Astoria downtown."I have to admit that I didn't you who you were until I read STARLESS GRASSLANDS.  I don't mean to embarrass you; but that book changed my life."I tried to be polite and gracious toward the compliment.  For the remainder of the trip we had a nice conversation while I approved the fluid motion of her hands and legs as she maneuvered the controls of the automobile.  I very much approved of her legs.As I departed the car, Kirsten leaned toward the open door to catch my eyes."Don't forget.  I'll be by at seven so we can go to the ceremony together.  Please be ready."I expressed gratitude for her generosity and promised to be waiting for her seven sharp.  The hotel staff greeted me and soon I entered the elevator for a quiet ride to the eighty sixth floor.  As I entered the suite, the steward took my request to have my suit blushed, prepared and returned in a few hours.Finally, a bit of peace.  I poured a small measure of whiskey into a chilled tumbler and then walked over to the large window looking out over the city below.  For a few moments I contemplated the remarks I was to make at this evening's formal ceremonies, then I heard the hushed movement of stocking feet behind me across the room.I turned around and out of the bedroom to my left in walked Sandy Bullock dressed in a black sheer see through cat suit."Well, Crabby, aren't you glad to see me?"Before I could recover from my surprise another set of feet wisped across the floor from the sitting room on the right.  It was Jennifer Aniston dressed in the same black sheet cat suit."Sweetheart, don't look at her.  Come here to me.""Get out!" screamed Sandy."No, you get out.  It's not fair.  I left Brad for him so I get him!"The two of them stood in angry silence staring at each other for a tense moment.  Then Sandy leapt at Jennifer and instantly they were in a bitter fight hissing and scratching each other.  It was a ferocious sight as pulled hair, shrieks of pain, and nylon tearing could be heard.  Then almost a quickly as it began, the fighting pair disappeared into the sitting room.  Several sharp punches were heard then a definite thump as a body fell to the floor.Sandy marched back into the room victorious.  I ran to the door of the sitting room only to see Jennifer laid out on the floor out cold, spread eagle and naked.  Before I could think of what to do Sandy tapped me on my shoulder.  I turned around and there Sandy stood.  A little worse for wear.  Trying to catch her breath.  Nude with her torn cat suit draped across her feet."Forget her.  She won't bother us now."Sandy brushed the stray hairs out of her face, smiled and stepped out of her nylon costume.  She posed standing and anticipating my admiration."Now I'm all sweaty and warm.  I need a shower."  Sandy turned her lithe body and walked into the bedroom and into the bathroom beyond.I turned around and wondered what I should do for poor Jennifer still laying unconscious on the floor.  Then I heard Sandy calling."Crabby, why don't you come and help me?  You could soap up my......"OOPS!!!!  Sorry!!!  Err...just a little fantasy of mine.  I meant to honestly review this movie but my more realistic nature took over.  I swear my pitiful fantasy is actually much better than the story told here.  You see, the cover of this DVD displays Ms. Bullock prominently with her name in big font letters.  But in truth this movie focuses on Tate Donovan as the main character and only on Ms. Bullock as his unlikely love interest.As much as I "love" Sandra Bullock, I have to admit her filmography has not been kind to her.  Her best films have been WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING, WRESTLING ERNEST HEMINGWAY and the much-unappreciated HOPE FLOATS.  Unfortunately for each of these gems are several terrible movies like FIRE ON THE AMAZON, HANGMAN, SPEED 2 and this movie.The plot revolves around two "losers in love" who are unappealing both in looks and personality.  Donovan comes across a love potion from a gypsy woman (an unrecognizable Anne Bancroft) and soon both Donovan and Bullock have the most desirable members of the opposite sex at their feet.  All goes well until others find out their secret and Donovan and Bullock discover that their true love is actually between each other.The story is predictable and unfortunately not very funny or all that sweet.  Chances are you can find a copy of this DVD fairly cheap and it is not a bad way to kill some time while you're waiting for your own boyfriend or girlfriend to get off work-or your friends to wake up from their naps-so you can really do something worth wild.
Watch out for cheap copies. I ordered this and got a version from Beverly Wilshire Filmworks, not the version in the Amazon product listing. This is a cotinuing problem if you order used Hong Kong films. You order the film used and dont get the advertised version and instead get a cheap (maybe even illegal) copy. It is a grainy pixalated version with blurry lines across the screen. Amazon really needs to crack down on this and make them specify or ensure that you only get the advertised version
Who is the protagonist?. There are a few funny scenes in this film ("Bobby-Bobby-Bobby-Bobby..."); but they are too few and far between to overcome the chief flaw with the movie: There is not a single likeable character in it. From the scene with the very annoying little girl, fast-forwarding to her adult self on her morning power-walk to the newspaper stand where she buys a half-dozen papers to read before work, the Holly Hunter character is really, really grating. Albert Brooks' character is self-centered and whiny. How can you root for the Hurt character, who epitomizes the dimwitted TV talking head? You just can't find a protagonist to care about. And that's why it will definitely be on my list of single-viewing movies -- no reason at all to watch it again in the future
I must have received a bootleg version. The additional features on this disk don't work.  When trying to access them, your given a totally different thing.  I think this package was actually a bootleg version, cuz the package and other disk features are different from the BlockBuster rental version
SENDING IT BACK. I cannot rate this item because it came DEFECTIVE.  I have not been able to view it.  VERY disappointed by this transaction.  I plan to send this item back
Did I miss something?. I saw this movie about 20 years ago when it was on Cinemax. I fell asleep while watching it then. I bought the DVD as part of the Controversial Classics set, and was looking forward to seeing the parts I missed.This time, I fell asleep twice watching it; it took a total of three nights to see it all. I found it just as talky and heavy-handed as I did when I saw it back in college. Further, I didn't pick up on any chemistry between the leads, and found James Coburn's character loud and annoying. Finally, the great MGM hairstylist Sidney Guillaroff was way off the mark on this one. Almost all of the women had mid-60's hairdo's that were distracting, particularly Miss Andrews, whose distracting poofie 'do often changed from shot to shot within the same scene.I get it; war is bad. Nevertheless, this film did little for me. It did, however, look very nice; the DVD transfer was well done
Dreadful movie from the big hair 80s. A dreadful movie depicting men as macho s#$! and women as tarts.  This was made in an era when people wore revolting tight stretch denims and hung out in pool halls and bars.  It was also made to capitalise on the popularity of Patrick Swayze who had just appeared in the over-rated 80's teen musical "Dirty Dancing".A very pointless movie is "Roadhouse".  It does not deserve a bare bones DVD release let alone this new special edition.  Is there really a market out there for rubbish like this, or am I the only one with taste in movies
Not what I expected. Sorry but not even my kids wanted to finish seeing this video. They never touch it again
Disappointed. This movie needs a serious steroid boost on creativity, believability, and budget. AND can we say... just squish the leeches already. Not worth your time
Hmmmmmmmmm. Ok I gotta start off by saying this is without a doubt one of the WORST movies I have ever seen, if there was a zero on that star scale thats what it would be getting, how anyone got this horrible film made is beyond me. First off, what a concept for a movie, a man who runs around with a drill and kills random people on the street! The storyline was weak and there were plotholes everywhere. Half the movie was made up of unnessecary scenes that were just there to fill time such as: the random lesbian shower scene, the annoying shots of the band practising and the disgusting scene where Reno chops up the rabbit. The reason for Reno's sudden insanity is hardley explained, he just starts drilling bums on the street, oh and by the way I think it might take a little more then one drill hole in the stomach to kill someone! And whats up with the red screen! That was just annoying! This movie is honestly horrible in every single aspect, it has no redeeming qualities whatsoever and all copies of it should be destoryed! Just to make this clear to everyone I am a huge horror movie fan, this movie was just a sorry excuse for a film. The director should hang his head in shame. Cult status for this movie? WHAT IS WRONG WITH YOU PEOPLE! How anyone can like this is beyond me! Trust me, dont touch this movie with a ten ft pole!
Even the 1971 Zodiac movie was in the theater longer than this flick... And that's not saying much.  Believe it or not, I actually liked this movie.  Well, to be honest, I liked the concept behind the movie, but this flick otherwise sucked.  The history of the Zodiac Killer as recounted in this movie was almost completely fictitious, and it looked like some of the "crime scene photos" were pulled from a website specializing in gruesome pics (which made the Zodiac Killer seem to be more like the Zodiac Butcher.  He didn't seem to have a problem dismembering his victims in this flick).There were holes in the plot big enough to drive a truck through.  Simon Vale, the retired Zodiac Killer, wrote a book in the 1970's in which he detailed the life of the Zodiac, and yet it never occurred to anyone how he could possibly have known anything about it.  No one suspected that Vale was the Zodiac Killer despite the intimate details he revealed about his young life that only the Zodiac could possibly have known!The Zodiac "copycat" (he wasn't really) buys a nerve agent in pill form (at $50 each!), uses it to knock out prospective victims, then kills them.  In one absurd scene, a gasses a pizza delivery girl, decides against killing her, then chows down on the pizza!  In other words, he just blew $50 on a single pizza and didn't even kill anyone!  Riiiiight...Then we find the Zodiac Killer, who for years never had a problem murdering and butchering his dozens of victims without a second thought suddenly feeling remorse when he sees how a family member of his last victim was traumatized by his crime!  Huh?  Then he turns his back on his evil past, becomes good and writes a book about himself, and no one figures out who he really is?The cabal of black hooded men are suddenly thrown in for good measure (although I still can't figure out why they're in the movie in the first place), but the gratuitous gay sex scenes left me feeling like I'd accidentally walked into the wrong theater and was watching a cheesy porn flick instead.The acting was terrible, the dialogue trite, and it looked like it was shot on Lommel's camcorder.  It was especially amusing to see the copycat Zodiac, a good 30-40 years younger then the real Zodiac, suddenly cower in fear when he realized who Simon Vale really was and try to escape, but how often do we see this kind of clich in the movies where the characters suddenly turn stupid and don't know what to do?  Why he didn't pull his gun or even just punch the old man out is beyond me.That being said, I liked the idea of the original Zodiac Killer stalking the younger Zodiac "copycat."  It's too bad Lommel otherwise had no clue what he was doing behind the camera.  Give this one a miss
Absolutely waste of money!!. I bought this DVD a while back from Amazon. I was very disappointed with the dvd. It's a joke!,really. He was worse than the beginner dancer. I watched the DVD for about 5 minutes and it made me sick thinking that I paid for this?. I will not accept this if someone give it to me for FREE. If you're serious in learning salsa, the New York Salsa DVD series are very good. Don't waste your money on this one!
Butchered for your protection. Trying to make a film concerning Studio 54 for a mainstream audience is a really bad idea. It's just not possible to do it and actually stay truthful to the climate of that era. Gays had a lot more influence on that scene than the film lets on. From what I understand, the original director's cut was gutted by Miramax before the film was released it and it shows. Other than Mike Meyers portrayal of Steve Rubell, there's hardly a gay character in sight. There's some very good actors in the film and their talents are simply wasted. Thank goodness the good music helped me get through this drivel. Anyone with a taste for fine filmmaking need not bother with this cinematic mistake
Euuuwww......Creepy!. This movie creeped me out and not in a good way. Johnny Depp is an awesome actor and I usually find him sexy but in THIS stinker I find him really creepy and gross. Maybe it's the Michael Jackson-ish look he has going on with the black wig and white face. Could they have picked a more horrible look for WW? It looked like they took him to a costume store and put a 10$ wig and 5$ clown makup on him! I love Tim Burton's other movies but this one sucked BIGTIME! It gives a new perspective on Willy Wonka but this Willy is someone I would keep kids AWAY from. This movie is childish if you're an adult and pales compared to the original. If you're a kid it's way too dark and scary and has some adult humor which will leave kids asking "Auntie Zoe, what does that mean?" When are screenwriters going to figure it out? EITHER WRITE A KIDS MOVIE OR WRITE A GROWNUP MOVIE!!! It's really hard to do both in the same film. It seems like when writers try to make movies that appeal to adults and kids, they end up appealing to nobody! Maybe I am biased because I loved the original Gene Wilder version. I would have been open to seeing a remake if it was GOOD but this movie was dissapointing. It's amazing how so much money and effort go into special effects and expensive sets and the script itself is hollow with lousy characters. The whole thing just had a creepy vibe with almost sadistic undertones. The only reason I gave it 2 stars instead of 1 is because I love Depp and Burton, if you are not a fan of either, don't waste your time with this steaming pile of poo!
"Mr Funktastic???". Bulletproof Monk was quite a disappointment, considering the presence of Seann William Scott!A Buddhist monk with amazing martial arts abilities is trying to avoid capture by a 90+old German Nazi (!), his granddaughter (!) and his henchmen, while at the same time find someone to succeed him as "the keeper of the sacred scroll..."In short, the acting is pretty good (but nothing great), while the martial arts sequences, the dialogues, and the plot are way below average.Specifically, the characters are plain, weak and not original at all.  To a certain extent it's like a sad attempt at an Indiana Jones film.There is the usual German "bad guy" cliche, and together with the usual "doomsday machine," this time in the shape and form of an ancient scroll which can restore youth.  All this does not help in making this film anything special or out of the ordinary.Can we not find something more original than the USUAL German/Nazi "bad guy" cliche, (AND/OR the USUAL crazy/deranged/dangerous Russian "boogieman") leading to the USUAL need to be rescued by the benevolent Americans?  Is that too much to ask?Moreover, it seems as though the chemistry between Seann William Scott and Jaime King is not all that great.  To that, one has to add the poor dialogues and the bad choice of lines that the actors are given (what were the writers thinking?).  A bit of a waste there...Though the potential for a decent movie was definitely there it fails to take off.A shame really...In a nutshell, it's an ok movie if you're a teenager and/or are heavily intoxicated, and that's about it; no masterpiece here... Wait till they show it on TV.
Don't bother. After reading all these 5 star reviews i was confident I had myself some real, sick, perversely arousing to my macabe taste and this over-priced movie was such a bore i didn't finish it. Maybe that was when it got good, but I doubt it.  There was a lot of human waste shots, but, it's obviously fake, the "torchered" youths seem to be enjoying themselves, there's no attempt at penitration, no terror,& no reckless tastelessness.I don't get it I guess, I was literally bored to sleep.
Bab really Bad in a bad way!. I had heard alot about this movie when I was a kid. So when I saw it on DVD I though it would be a good time to see it. I was wrong this movie is Bad and Boring. My advice, don't boy this DVD!
The DVD I received is messed up!. The soundtrack does not match the film you are seeing, and it is really irritating. (It's off by a few seconds.) I'm sure I would have enjoyed it more had it been in synch
A devoted Murder She Wrote fan but DVD quality is not good. I came here to Amazon recently intending to buy this DVD boxed set as I love Murder She Wrote and would like to be able to stop missing episodes when they are aired on television. After reading all of the comments about the poor DVD quality I decided instead to check this second season out from my local library before purchasing it. Aaargh!My all-time favorite episode is "Keep the Home Fries Burning" and I couldn't even watch the entire show before the DVD froze up. I tried wiping the disc off several times with a flannel cloth but that did no good whatsoever. I also tried fast-forwarding past the glitch but I couldn't. Then I tried selecting the scene after the problem place but the disc froze there, too, and I could not move from the scene selection page.Here's something strange! My son belongs to a well known DVD-by-mail rental company and he ordered one of the MSW discs for me as a surprise. It came yesterday ( the company only allows you so many DVD discs out at a time depending on your rental plan) Well, the disc they sent is one of SIX, not three as in the box set and it is not a double-sided DVD! I'm wondering if maybe Universal made these one-sided discs especially for this company. Everything else on the DVDs looks the same, only they are not two-sided.The disc my son rented for me was from the first season and it played beautifully. I guess I'll just keep renting these discs from this company without purchasing the boxed sets. I don't understand why the one-sided discs aren't being sold in the boxed sets.Murder She Wrote is a wonderful and delightful program and one I always enjoy watching. I hope this DVD quality problem is fixed soon as I would still love to own these sets
'Fear as subtle entertainment'. *PLOT REVEALED*An utterly worthless foray into English overbearance and haughtiness, this film marks Hitchcock as a worthy propagandist and architect of 'fear as subtle entertainment' in the pre-War 1930's.  Working and financed by the ministry of propaganda in London to indoctrinate subordinate English audiences into supporting the rationale for the vilification of Germany, Hitchcock eases the tension by making this a "comedy".Wasting the first half on indulgent emptiness (the scene at an Austrian Hotel where the boring Brits are talking about Cricket and drinking tea), he then goes on to flabbergast us with indecipherable montages that are the most rank and absurd creations, the fight scene in the baggage cart for example.His support for the upper Brit classes is especially drab and tedious, meandering between hero worship and idolatry, not to mention the wooden acting of the actors.  The story concerns a "secretive plot" about an old woman who has disappeared from a train traveling in the Austrian Alps, simplistic, innocuous even but Hitchcock wants us to believe that it is a most urgent matter because a fluffy headed ingenue doesn't want to think she imagined it all.  Of course, she will be the agent provocateur for exposing a nefarious plot by 'evil men'.  Immature plot?  Definately.  Banter, insipid and devoid of any vivacity, is exchanged between high brow English snobs in the most elusive way, bordering on reductio ad absurdum and yet they seem to be assured in figuring out what has transpired on the train.  This is nourishment for those who can't think very well.The story continues until the stuffy, pretentious, oaf-like English on the train become diverted by bumbling and incompetent foreign agents in one of the most pathetic scenes ever in cinema, the Brits, debating the attack itself for 5 minutes in proper English, sit there in front of open windows, with one gun and hold off 24 well armed foreign agents for 20 minutes.  Also in this scene, the 80 year old woman "spy", jumps from the side and runs away into the forest just as easily, how 24 well armed foreign agents could be held from the train itself is a question any reasonable human can debate, or why they were even too stupid to see the old spy jump off.  If you can believe in the superiority of British snobs, then you must believe in the idiocy of this whole conniving film.Of course you can guess the ending, the woman falls in love with the English chap who helped her on the train, and England is saved and her glorious social structure remains intact, an utterly absurd film from a director who is a specialist in fear and suspicion during the paranoid 1930's but most audiences will take this as merely a "thriller" instead of understanding its proper origin and purpose in ideology of propaganda.
OK for its budget. This is a low budget with a script that had great promise. This action-packed military movie stars Wesley Snipes and Emma Samms. Both of these actors do an ok job with what they are given to work with. Like another reviewer said, let us be thankful they did not try for any flashbacks to tell back-story in this film.The story line has the U.S.A. being tricked into targeting a fully functional nuclear reactor that was captured by Chechen rebels. And as we watch the missile being launched that will cause massive chaos for the region, if not the world, the Special Ops team led by Snipes figures out a way to stop the disaster from happening in an all to convenient and simple way. Still worth grabbing a bag of popcorn and checking it out from your local library.
What is the hype???. This movie was so extremely boaring.  I made it to the part where he said, "I think I'm pregnant," then turned it off.  Get this guys it took a complete 45 minutes for him to find a tooth in a wall and another 15 minutes to dress in drag and say, "I think I'm pregnant."  I understand the story line completely, after girl supposedly kills herself her neighbors try to make the new tenant be like her in every way, shape, and form.  This film deserves below a star, it has no suspence, no action, no terror, no real mystery, just boaring talking through atleast the fist hour of the film... I didn't care enough to finish it
Extremely Disappointed!!!!. I fell in love with the "Anne of Green Gables" movies when I was a little girl because of they were such lovely interpretations of the L.M. Montgomery books. Meagan Follows IS Anne Shirley. When I found out that a third installment of the series was coming out, I could not wait. However, what I received left a very bad taste in my mouth. "Anne of Green Gables - The Continuing Story" was horrible! The story was terrible and did not live up to the previous installments that drew you in to the story. With this film, I really didn't care about the characters the way I had in the past. The only thing I did care about was the fact that Anne and Gil were FINALLY together, but was still disappointed by their rushed wedding - something I had been waiting for for a very long time. I don't think that we, as fans, had the opportunity to really enjoy their wedding the way we had always imagined we would. I also hated the fact that the character of Jack and his son, in a way, came between Anne and Gil. Sometimes I felt like Anne was cheating on Gil with her interactions with Jack. I wanted to see Anne and Gil have their own children and raise them in the wonderfully heartwarming way they were raised, not with all of the melodrama of WWI.I truly wish that a better ending to an extraodinary series could have been made, but I guess I'll make do with the first two movies. I can't say enough great things about those films!The only reason I am giving this film one star - I would like to give it zero - is because some of the original cast is back. It was great to see Anne, Gil, and Dianna once again!If you are a fan of "Anne of Green Gables" and "Anne of Avonlea" (aka "Anne of Green Gables - The Sequel"), don't bother purchasing this last installment. Although I'm sure you will want to see what happened to all of your favorite characters, your hopes will certainly be dashed and disappointed by a poor story and poor dialogue
apalling. This is probably the worst film I have ever sat through.  Completely unfun and cruel.  You a sick person to want to buy this.  Watch it once maybe yes.  Buy it?  Sick and not fun.  No redeeming context either.  The film is its own punishment,  if you can get to the cheery pop song at the end
Pathetic. I first viewed this as a VHS about three years ago as part of a research project. Not only is the Tai-Chi and Yoga useless, and the girls completely ineptthe girls also spend most of their time covering their genitals with their hands whenever they go into an open-legged squating position as if they are frightened and embarrassed by what they are doing. If the DVD is the same low-quality production as the VHS, I would not waste my time and money
Cheap Switcheroo... Originally placed the order for the non-Thinpak release as Amazon had listings for both the original-style 5-discs box set and the "new" slimline Thinpak.Seems MGM decided not to release this box set in the original style; annoying to say the least.  They've previously released seasons 1 through 8 in the old-style.  SG-1 is now a cancelled series -- so what's the harm with releasing the same style for the last two releases (Season 9 & 10)??This is not unlike the Simpson's box sets which were changed in season 5 to "head shots" of Simpsons characters.  After much protest, their distributor came out with original box set-style releases.Smaller package... less inserts... looks puny on the DVD rack next to the other EIGHT seasons... same price.  Gotta love that marketing plan!I'm returning mine and waiting on the hopes MGM will come to some sense and release the final two seasons old-school
Worst video game movie. We rented this movie, knowing it wouldn't be an Oscar winner or anything. I've seen some bad movies based on video games and comic books, but this took the cake. It was so lame! We thought it would at least be entertaining...no luck there. The best part about it was when it ended. What a relief!
If you liked the original theatrical release... If you liked the original theatrical release (which was the first version of the film that made it to DvD) and own it, more than like you have all you'll need from KoH. I REALLY enjoyed the theatrical release, purchased it...and then later bought this version of the film based on many of its Amazon reviews. While it does add a great deal of watching time to the film, the extra footage really does little to improve the quality of the story or increase the depth of the characters to any "interesting" degree. Add to that, that this version of the film doesnt include the great documentaries(History Channel) found on the original DvD release. As I have shared, I REALLY enjoyed Kingdom of Heaven.....but didnt/havent found the purchase of this version to be an improvement over the original in the least. More doesnt always equal better....
i guess you have to be in the right atmosphere. Well, I recorded this movie last night on Starz and watched it this morning alone (husband had gone to work), I turned the lights out, watched on our big screen tv, but, I don't know, maybe I'm getting too old, but I never got tense, nervous, and certainly never jumped with fright. I have never played and know nothing about the game.  I have to admit that it was very atmospheric, eerie and creepy looking, just not atmospheric enough to impress me that much. One problem may be that either my tv is too dark(or was it meant to be seen like that in the movies?), but I had a hard time actually seeing a lot of the demons/monsters clearly and not sure exactly what I was seeing.  While I don't mind this to an extent if it's done for the look of the movie, I really needed to see everything a little clearer.  The only way I found out what the triangle/pyramid head demon did to the woman Anna or Anne (forgot her name) was through the reviews that I have just read.  And I agree with 1 reviewer who doesn't like reviewers to reveal the endings of movies but in this instance I am glad one did because my tv stopped recording with 24 seconds left, and I just know something major was going to happen in those last seconds.  I had a lot of problems with the plot, so again I'm glad some people spelled it out somewhat.  I really think you have to have some knowledge of the game to appreciate this more.  I thought the acting so-so, good enough for this type movie, since you usually go for the visuals/horror/etc, not great acting.  Even though I didn't think much of it overall, I'll still watch the last 24 seconds when it's shown again on tv, just to see the ending even though at least one reviewer already spilled the beans ( I guess their review's are fairly accurate).  I think had I seen this at the movies on a really big screen with surround sound, audience reaction, etc, I would have enjoyed it more. It's kind of like watching  a good special effect/battle/epic movie on tv a year after seeing it at the movies, it becomes deflated somewhat.  But to be honest, I have never jumped in my seat, or been afraid to look at the screen during most horror movies I have seen.  I really wish I could have seen the monsters/demons better, I assume had I  been able to do so it might have scared me some
Another disappointing Marvel movie. Who's idea was it to put Jessica Alba as Sue Storm?  Chris Evans's portrayal of Johnny Storm was somewhat disappointing too, although not as bad as Jessica Alba's portrayal of Sue Storm.  Why do they cast Hollywood big names in these movies just for the sake of having big celebrities in these movies?  They really need to cast people who actually fit the roles and have talent for portraying the characters.  This movie was somewhat good, but it didn't feel all that great.  So far, this movie is just another of Marvel's somewhat disappointing movies along the lines of Elektra, The Incredible Hulk, Xmen 3, Daredevil, and The Punisher.  I was so happy to see Marvel characters getting their own movies, but after seeing what Hollywood does to them, I would rather see Marvel's chracters go back into hiding.  Special effects were good in this movie, and so was the story.  Michael Chiklis as the Thing was great, and his The Thing character makeup was done very well, and he played the character well too, as did Ioan Gruffud with Mr. Fantastic.  Jessica Alba and Chris Evans definitely demoted this movie
Not impressed - A Big Disappointment. This dvd barely worked and didn't do any good. This might be good if your potty training a boy. It is very boy oriented. They need to list it for boys and make a separate one for girls. How can a girl relate to a story about a boy potty training, they are not the same
2 stars for the movie. 5 stars for the extra features. The extra features on this disk are well worth the price but the movie itself is full of holes. Too much is left out. Paul Bryant comes out looking like a bad guy here which I'm sure doesn't sit well with many college football fans. The extra features however are excellent. The ESPN presentations of Sports Century and The Real Junction Boys alone make this a worthy addition for any football fan. If you are intersted in this story buy the book. It's much more informative and portrays Bryant in a much better and understandable light. Was he mean? Yes! Was he ornery? Always! But you will understand why he became this way at this point in his career.
I can see why this was rated "Youth". You'd have to be either a young kid or young teen to enjoy this shallow, pointless trash.  The characters are totally flat.  No character development.  I've seen more character in a Flintstones or Scooby Doo rerun.Nor is there any signifigant plot.  There's about as much plot as a wrestling match.  BOTTOM LINE: It's basically just a bunch of random fighting scenes strung together, and adds virtually nothing to the star wars story.  *Don't waste your money.
he fell off.. pablo francisco is like michael jordan on the wizards. he just isnt as good as he used to be. i hope he proves me wrong in future material. save yourself some money and get his old work.
The film deserves NO credit. Disney thinks that people are too stupid to read the great stories that they changed. I am so mad at Disney and their movie "Hercules" because they changed the film just because they think they will get away with changing stories. I like Greek Mythology, but the movies have not been good at all. And this weak effort is not going to do anything about it. The plot has been changed completly, Pegasus is never mentioned in the real version, He is not trying to impress people, he had no trainer, the lion and the lion skin is not mentioned, the hydra fight is because of a different reason, ugly characters, Hercules was never in love with a chick, Hades is not a bad guy but he is not good either, and all kinds of things that I won't mention.Don't buy this movie because it is completly different, why don't you read Greek mythology instead of watching this
A very long political attack ad. I was trying to think of the best short description of what this is. Sure it's a propaganda film but that doesn't mean much to most people. However, most people have seen attack ads around election time. That's what this is, a very long political attack ad, full of all the things we commonly see in such ads: distortions, sarcasm, scary close ups, mood music, mocking tone, glaring omissions, out of context quotes, etc.That said, the most rewarding review so far must be the one by AT "DL" (New York), who basically condemns Michael Moore as pro-Bush because Fahrenheit 9/11 doesn't say Bush engineered 9/11 himself. What's next? A review that condemns AT "DL" (New York) as pro-Bush because his review didn't say that Bush flew the planes himself? Or that Bush is an alien who gave birth to Saddam and Osama on a UFO?Just when you think you've seen the craziest conspiracy theory ..
Wonderful film, terrible DVD. I'll leave comments about the value of this movie (which I love) to other reviewers.  what I want to warn buyers about is the rediculous lack of features on this DVD.  There are, literally, NONE.  There's not even a language menu for close captioning... it's essentially like buying a VHS tape that's been transferred to DVD.  Don't waste your money
VERY anti-Christian. The movie has many none-too-subtle *VERY* anti-Christian elements, particularly in the typical Hollywierd portrayal of money grubbing "Christian" TV Evangelists and Christians themselves as stupid zombies; life as basically pointless.I am sick of Hollywood rubbish like this! So, if you're a Christian, stand firm -- DON'T BUY IT!!
Cracked DVD. While the other DVD was fine.  THis DVD was probably defective as it cracked as I removed it from it's case
Naughty but clever. Yes. Wild things is what I recommend for our jaded eyes. Aren't we sick of all the crowd pleasing PG-13 shows which are neither sexy or action packed - most of all with hardly a plot? Wild Things is sex sex sex but with witty capital H humor and a twisted story.Recent eye candy shows could learn a thing or two from this film. Candy can remain sweet and sickening but a great script and a good cast (from Oscar nominee Matt Dillon, Kevin Bacon etc) can turn candy into cuisine
What A Silly Movie!. Why the production team of this movie didn't film in New Orleans is beyond my comprehension. When I first saw this movie, I could see based on the footage that it was filmed in Canada. The terrain is totally different from south Louisiana. It looked like a movie set. I guess the set designers thought they could put a few stands of fake Spanish moss on the trees and a hunk of it in the fountains and a banana tree in that corner and a palm in the other. It looked like a theme park! The streets looked too clean. For some reason they could not depict the elegance of decay of old New Orleans which to me is paramount in the telling of these people's lives but maybe I am being too technical. All the principle characters  all had straight teeth and clear skin. Back in the 1840's just about everybody had some sort of illness then and they looked it. The actor who played Marcel could not act. The actor who played his white father did not age at all for 18 years. Still looked the same, yet he had very young children by his white wife who he married 18 years before. The architecture of the plantation house was also wrong. It was'nt even FrenchNo live oaks anywhere which are major icons in southern Louisiana.The supporting actors and actresses were quite good.Let me just say this, white men maintaining women of color was not only prevelent in New Orleans but also other states in the south, the difference is is that in New Orleans, the white master would leave them property and money. Not so in other southern states.The more beautiful the woman, the more she would receive from the white man.The placage system in New Orleans was a business arrangement and it worked for both parties.
Loaded deck shoots blanks. Considering the sensational cast (Eli Wallach, Terrence Hill, Bud Spencer, Kevin McCarthy and Brock Peters), the Euro-western era it was made in and the locations where it was shot, Ace High is a major disappointment. The plot is uninvolving and incoherent, the cinematography is cramped and completely lacking in style, the music is weak during a time that spawned so many memorable soundtracks and the direction lacks any focus whatsoever. The editing looks like it was performed with a butcher's knife. After the first ten minutes, I knew I'd made a mistake buying it. A boring 120 minute piece of junk, Ace High is hopelessly outgunned by any number of great Italian westerns including Corbucci's The Mercenary or Parolini's Sabata series. Save your fistful of dollars for a better film
Disappointing. When Fantasia came out in 1938, it bombed.  Many years later, the movie received the acclaim it deserved.  Fantasia has enchanted me since I was a child, and I eagerly awaited Fantasia 2000.  The possibilities!  I was sure Disney would come up with something to rival the original.What I saw was a humorless, boring mish-mash with only a few bright spots.  The opening segment of whales flying through space was embarrassingly bad.  Silly flamingos also fell flat.  Donald Duck as Noah was terrific.  The Gershwin piece was ok, but not for Fantasia.  And what should have been the crowning achievement, a forest nymph battling to save her beloved forest, was predictable and stale.This film was almost a complete waste of my time and money.  I heartily, heartily, endorse the orginal Fantasia as a timeless classic for all ages
Blech...Horrible!. What a disaster!  This movie is a complete waste of time from start to finish.  The animation is ugly, horrible, and unrealistic and the three stories are bland and boring.  What was Disney thinking?  Oh, I know!  "Let's see if we can eek a little more cash out of Cinderella.  Who cares if we destroy a beloved classic?"Several main characters are completely different from the original movie and it makes no sense.  In the first story, the King has turned from a happy-go-lucky doting grandpa-wannabe into a stuffy, sour old curmudgeon.  Suddenly there's a rule about no commoners in the palace?  Uh...isn't there a line in the original about "every eligible maiden in the kingdom?"  The palace was FULL of commoners that night.  The story picks up as the Prince and Cinderella return from their honeymoon, so in the space of a few weeks, the King has completely changed.  I guess they weren't creative enough to come up with anything that would stay true to the characters.  The other two stories are equally nauseating and are not worth my time to review or your time to read.  Avoid this mess of a movie.The really sad thing is that "ugly, horrible, unrealistic animation and bland and boring stories" pretty much describes any Disney sequel or direct-to-video slop on the market
We all know this is a good movie, but.... AVOID AT ALL COSTS! I bought this for a little over $15 at another store and returned it within a week...Horrible transfer (if it were ALPHA video i wouldn't care, but come on...this is a major DVD company we're talking about, SONY!!!!!). Aspect ratio isnt the theatrical format, but rather PAN AND SCAN cropped sides bulls#it. Plus its missing like 20 minutes! I wouldn't recommend this for anyone. Just the thought of this release makes me angry (to the point of inarticulate). AVOID AVOID AVOID! and write a letter to your congressman (ha!)...or perhaps SONY/MGM. This release is inexcusable
For Die Hard fans only?. I was disappointed with this DVD. Other reviewers made it out to be an amazing performance, but I have a feeling they're just sending underseved praise to their favorite band. The performance is mediocre, at best. As a matter of fact, it's clear that the band is holding back, A LOT. Perhaps the guys knew they were being filmed for a live DVD, and took extra care not to mess up any of the songs, but the performance suffers as a result. There's far less intensity in this performance than in other live performances, or even in the CD recordings. Dan doesn't even bother attempting some of the more difficult licks in a lot of the songs. The lighting is also another sore spot on this performance. There's a crazy red tinge to everything that makes it difficult to see the band and almost hurts your eyes after a while.That said, this DVD does have a lot of nice extras if you're a big fan of the band. There's interviews, music videos, photos, and the sound quality is excellent, but the performance itself is severely lacking in intensity and quality. If you're crazy into the Black Keys you'll probably want to pick this up, but if you're just the average fan, pass this one by
Morvern Callar: Requiem for a Plot. The pretentious film goer has never had a greater ally than Lynne Ramsay's Morvern Callar.What is little more than a bland stew of typically successful indy film techniques (hand-held shot, character-based, amoral, unique, hip, naked) becomes an immenitely defensible, but truly awful film.To merely skim the surface:Why Morvern is touted as a study of progress, liberation, or self-discovery is dificult to see when both the plot and character remain static throughout the film; indeed the initial party scene and lingering final shot seem to echo each other in a way which makes the beautiful cinemotography seem little more than a thoroughly convincing blue screen selected to flash in time with a cautiously hip soundtrack.Although other indy film goers may crucify the non-believers, this sort of  movie is equally disgusting as the bloated star-powered behemoth that has equally little depth of thought or genuine vision.  That sort, however, is only after our money.  Morvern Caller is after something much more dangerous: our admiration.For more information on Lynne Ramsay's film, see: "No Skin Off My Nose," a succesful, art-house play prominately featured in The Fountainhead.
I bought my DVD copy from Amazon. I love Sophia Loren as an actress however this DVD as 3 movies in one package is a very very very poor quality DVD. Colors are bad, picture is bad and the sound is even worse. don't waste your money. My DVD copy was bought from Amazon.this is my advic
I'm astounded. at the ratings. This is one of the worst films I have ever seen! Terrible acting, storyline and special effects! I actually threw it out. It makes Kilmer's/Clooney's versions look good and Keaton's looks like masterpieces
Boy Is This A Stupid Movie. Forty years ago Hogan's Heroes worked because it was pure farce and its German POW camp was acceptable as a setting for a comedy, while Life Is Beautiful failed in large part because a German concentration camp is not a place to set humor. I was told this was a charming movie with a lot of joy within it. "Joy despite the misery," is what someone said. I found it ridiculous, boring, and an insult to the memory of those who were murdered by the Third Reich. Roberto Benigni wasn't funny, just manically irritating. The actor needs either animal tranquilizers or a punch in the mouth, I'm not sure which. Maybe both. Life Is Beautiful was a horrible film that shocked me with its idiocy, far-fetched plot turns, and overall annoying awfulness start to finish. How filmgoers ever fell for this incredibly unfunny waste of time baffles me
The worst movie I've ever seen. There are cinematic masterpieces, and there are films that really make you feel the producer knows how to use film to its fullest.  This stinker convinced me Mr. Lynch owned shares in Kodak and wanted to sell film by the mile.  The only reason you may want to see this is so you will convince yourself never to see a David Lynch work ever again.  Do not buy it!!  Manos, The Hands of Fate is much more watchable than this.I get Brian Eno and ambient/atmosphere music is so you will use it as a background along with your imagination to create your own inner experience.  Film doesn't work that way (another reviewer compared this with Eno).I find Memento a brilliant piece of work, really making me forget I am watching a film.  I think Videodrome is wonderful and compelling.  This - make sure you can watch something else.  Watch this in 100x speed.  You won't miss a thing.Okay, I just remembered, there is one movie worse than this one.  Reflections Of Evil.  If you actually like Eraserhead then get that movie too.  Me, I'd rather put a brain-eating worm in my ear from whatever planet Kahn was exiled to in Star Trek II.  Much less painful than watching this
Not in good taste... Although I did buy this to entertain my 2 1/2 year-old daughter, I had to turn the movie off within the first 5 minutes. In that short amount of time, the word "hate" was said at least 3 times in addition to "numb-skull" and "dumb." Such name-calling and negativity should not be so prominent in a children's video
Sound is So Bad Almost Inaudible!. Ok now I am afraid to try any other Our Gang DVDs! No one mentions how poor the sound is, so that it it almost impossible to understand what is being said! This made this DVD worthless in my opinion
What a soundtrack. Too bad the movie couldn't keep up. This movie is one of cinema history's seminal examples of a soundtrack carrying a movie to success. "Saturday Night Fever" from a few years before is another example, but that movie could actually stand on its own. Jennifer Beales' torn neck sweater and table dancing routine aside, I don't think this one could.I understand this movie is near and dear to the hearts of a lot of 80's children, and I will agree this is one of the all-time great soundtracks of cinema. The problem is, the movie's plot is a slow-moving, wasted opportunity.Physically, Beales is sexy enough to keep your attention, and her portrayal of working-class girl in a man's job striving to express herself was a pretty novel idea when this movie was made. But her unsympathetic personality and mediocre acting undermine her character. Come to think of it, the acting all around is a bit weak.But that's not the problem. The movie suffers from two fatal let-downs. The first is the plot itself. Feminism-affirming depictions aside, it's pretty simplistic, unimaginative stuff, even for a dance movie. What's worse is how slow it all moves. The drama sequences in-between dances drag on, straining your patience and sympathy for the character's plights.The other more tragic flaw, since it is a movie about dance, is the cinematography. While it's certainly not the worst cinematography ever, (check out "the Limey" next time you want a headache.) the dance sequences look like they've been salvaged from scraps on the cutting room floor. We're supposed to be moved by Beales' character's natural talent, but for most of the movie we never get to see her do much except walk and pose in a crazy mashup of bad edits. By the time the final dance scene finally comes along, the drama of her audition performance is ruined by drawn-out, bad editing. It almost seems the judges let her into Juliard simply because she was able to stay in the air for longer than a minute.Perhaps I'm a purist for asking for good dancing onscreen to consist of more than rapid-fire editing. But if it's a movie about dancing, one would think the least they could do is show dancing. Many movies before and after Flashdance managed to get this right ("Saturday Night Fever" certainly did, to its great success), but maybe nobody told this movie's director. It's a shame
sum of all stars? zero!. Maybe no one noticed but towards the end of the movie when the Russian President and Jack Ryan are talking to each other through the computer, repeat is spelled "reapeat".  On top of that, the acting was horrible...this movie didn't take itself seriously enough.  Ben Affleck sucked as much as he did in this movie as he did in Pearl Harbor
Slow research film with some good 'gore' scenes... Fans of the Beyond might want to watch this for the "Frankenstein-like" man living in the basement of a creepy old house in the woods. A little kid ends up in the cellar with horrible results. Most of the film is spent researching the history of the house and owner via audio recordings, as a few guests, including the babysitter discover the nightmare waiting below, who happens to be looking for bodyparts to add to his own body.Some classic Fulci gore here and there amongst the very slow, drawn out story, and a great worm gut scene at the end.Worth a look for gorehounds who don't mind a whiny kid. Fulci's "The Beyond" ranks way 'beyond' this however
Adam Sandler pumps out another mediocre movie. The movie the Longest Yard staring Burt Reynolds is an absolute masterpiece, a movie that didn't need any remaking. This movie, the one starring Adam Sandler is a true shame to the original. The movie could have been made better with anyone but Sandler at the helm. The inclusion of Burt Reynolds was a litter different, don't know if he should have even had a role in the remake, was good for him to score the touchdown. This movie did have some laughs but overall I don't think that I see myself ever watching the travesty that is the remake of the Longest Yard, I'm off to watch the original and remind my self as to how much this Sandler garbage ruined it.Brian Bowe
disturbing character, but kids love it. My son loves this video, but I find the character Francine a little over the top. She is just plain mean!No adult ever questions her behavior,which I find disturbing. I prefer the other Arthur videos.This one makes me  nervous
zzzzzzzz. Hey all ! I highly do not recommend this movie. First I can not understand how this movie shattered the box office? Is this really the best that a Korean film can offer?I already know that no is the answer. The movie was so boring i found myself fast forwarding through the so called action scenes. Anytime there is action the director chose to use the violent shaking of the camera technique. All that does is make you feel dizzy and confused. This movie introduces nothing new and is not unique in any way . At least in this movie its still possible to dodge automatic weapon fire from 20 M-16s , avoid being blown up by diving towards the camera in slow motion, and stop bombs from exploding alwasy at the last second! yeah for over hyped movies !
No OAR = No Sale... A fun movie for sure; but where's the theatrical widescreen edition?  Sorry, but I only purchase DVDs displaying the film's ORIGINAL ASPECT RATIO
A Celebration of Hopelessness. I give this film one star for the acting, which is often very good. However, the plot and message of this film revel in hopelessness, and debase every aspect of lower income, urban people. In all honesty, I've seen more joy in an African famine. I sat through this film, against my better judgement. Still, if you're truly interested in investigating the dark underbelly of urban American misery and frailty, then I recommend "A Streetcar Named Desire", "KIDS", "Last Exit to Brooklyn", and "Traffic".
They Were Onto Something... This is definitely one of the strangest superhero movies I've ever seen.  Daryl (Damon Wayans) and Kevin (David Alan Grier) are two brothers who grew up on watching "Batman"...and nothing else is explored with that opening scene.Kevin has grown up to be an writer for one crazed editor.  Daryl, on the other hand, is an inventor who, of course, has dozens of ridiculous gadgets that will somehow pay off...or will they?  Yes, his tools are creative, but they serve no purpose other than comic relief, which I didn't find funny except for Daryl's embarassment.Sadly, the two brothers' grandmother is killed because she works for a City Mayor nominee who ticked off a cliched mobster (Jon Polito).  Daryl swears revenge by dressing up in a ridiculous costume and using those odd gadgets to fight crime and build a secret hideout (which I'm surprised nobody finds since it's at the end of a train track).Let me make this clear - there are some hysterical moments in this movie.  The bickering between straight-laced Kevin and wannabe idealist Daryl is side-splitting.  In fact, just about every scene with these two is very funny.  The problem with this movie is that it has such a dark, dramatic tone in some scenes that just doesn't fit.  For example, Blankman takes a reporter (Robin Givens, who's basically a black version of Lois Lane - that's not a racial slur) to this hideout, but there is some music that reminds me of a despressed version of Danny Elfman's score of "Edward Scissorhands," and some comedic actors trying to be serious about the world and love.  That scene is absolutely disastrous.There's another scene when the Mayor is going to publicly open a bank and asks Blankman to be present for the dedication.  But then Polito's mobster and several thugs chain him up and set off a time-bomb that kills the Mayor, and possibly other people.  THIS IS NOT FUNNY!  The movie is not trying to have a dark sense of humor at all, but instead goes for laughs that seem like they belong in "Don't Be A Menace In South Central..."The contrast of tones and themes don't work.  Another case in point, Blankman fights crime on his first night out and confronts a pimp slapping a woman around, but then Blankman's genius idea is "Slap me around and call me Susan!"  The scene is funny, if improbable...but seeing a woman slapped around and turned into comedic violence feels wrong to me.Maybe I'm taking this movie too seriously, but when I see some jabs at classic superheroism that make me laugh uncontrollably (Daryl's inability to face life seriously instead of as a TV show is priceless), and then see some drama that is not only misplaced, but also horribly filmed and acted, then the potential hides itself underneath a movie that's trying to be a superhero comedy "PLUS" an urban drama "PLUS" a hip-hop flick.This movie has a serious case of split-personality with no hope of control.  I really want to like this movie, but it strikes so many wrong notes that I can't quite recommend it
Damaged Package for DVD. DVD came in the mail ripped up.  DVD lose inside package
Beware! Close-out-goods/Amazon are DVD Pirates. I just want to let potential marketplace buyers of SALO that the seller: closeoutgoods and other Amazon marketplace sellers are selling pirated (bootlegged) editions of this movie and other Criterion DVDs. If Amazon were legitimate, they would ban these marketplace sellers from their website. Every potential buyer should report these crooks to the FBI and Criterion
Are you serious?. I bought this DVD for my sister who is expecting.  I see that this DVD won awards but I don't know how.  This video is cheesy and hard to watch.  I would not recommend this video, it was not worth it
Avoid this one altogether!!!. Between the amended "politically correct" ending to this famous tale and the so-very-hokey interaction between Kirstey Alley and Lloyd Bridges, I couldn't wait for this to be over! The animation was very poor quality... the music was not the focus, my grandchildren lost interest. Shat else could possibly have been wrong
The Product has not reached me yet. This is bring to your notice that the product that i have orderd has not reached me yet. I request you to do the needful.Thanking youPrince Georg
Do yourself a favor, skip this dud. This is one party I'm glad I wasn't invited to. Celebrity couple Joe (novelist and now director) and Sally Therrian (actress) throw a party to celebrate their 6th anniversary. It's been a rocky marriage with jealousy and petty squabbling. They throw a party with "close" friends, neighbors they are feuding with and a up and coming actress that Sally feels her career threated with. It gets messy as the night goes along and lots is said and done because they are tripping on Ecstasy.Another the-world-spins-around-me movie. I don't know which would be worse, to have be surrounded by people like them or to be them.
not as avertised..editted movie. the movie is good except this version has been editted and cut out sceens, very disapointtin
Defective DVD?. I'm a fairly dedicated Blur fan, so it seemed that I'd enjoy this DVD.  The only problem was the sound...which was mostly distorted and sounded like it was "static-y", for lack of a better term.  After watching it a few times, I went to the fan site www.blur.co.uk and in the forums found that many others had experienced the same problem.  Apparently "Starshaped" was originally realeased on VHS when this footage was first captured in the early 90's and the VHS version has much better sound, confirming that the sound isn't just "raw", as it is live concert footage.  One theory is that the sound was not correctly "mastered" when this DVD was produced, hence it is likely a problem on all copies of this DVD.I do have to say that the US version of the video for "There's No Other Way" was good (it's a hidden easter egg - click on the star in the top level menu).  But I couldn't justify spending $13-14 for just one music video.I have returned the DVD for a refund
Science???. The two principal personalities interviewed in the movie, theologian Jay Richards and astronomer Guillermo Gonzalez, are involved with projects and organizations that are busy rewriting science and history from a Christian perspective (the Discovery Institute, the Center for Science and Culture, Wiki or Google them). The Privileged Planet is a thinly veiled appeal for Intelligent Design.The science in the film starts honestly enough with numerous observations of the remarkable beauty and complexity of life on earth. But when the list of wondrous observations is completed and the work of science begins, this film takes a sharp right turn into speculation and theology. The calculation used to speculate on the rarity of life in the universe (us on earth) is laughable. A list of 20 or so requirements for life on earth are each given a 10% chance of existing on any given planet, then multiplied together as if they are exclusive of each other. Scientifically, this is useless math. It is rabbit out of the hat speculation, but it is the principal 'fact' that underscores the premise presented. This film's science credentials are best described as pseudo science, or agenda science, or top-drawer science (the stuff that supports your conclusion stays in the top drawer, everything else goes in the bottom drawer).Real science is far more wondrous, awe inspiring and spiritually satisfying than anything that Christian apologists like Richards and Gonzalez and the makers of this film can conjure up
ABOUT AS ENTERTAINING AS WATCHING MICHAEL JACKSON DRY-HUMP HOWDY DOODY. I WOULD LOVE TO SEE THE CAST OF THIS MOVIE DRESSED UP AS HOT DOGS AND THROWN INTO A CAGE WITH STAR JONES AND MARV ALBERT.(...
A Paltry Shadow of the Original. Thanks to falsified dental records supplied by his former neighbor Nicholas Oz Oseransky, retired hitman Jimmy The Tulip Tudeski now spends his days compulsively cleaning his house and perfecting his culinary skills with his wife, Jill, a purported assassin who has yet to pull off a clean hit. Suddenly, an uninvited and unwelcome connection to their past unexpectedly shows up on Jimmy and Jill's doorstep: it's Oz, and he's begging them to help him rescue his wife from the Hungarian mob. To complicate matters even further, the men, who are out to get Oz, are led by Lazlo Gogolak, a childhood rival of Jimmy's and another notorious hitman. Oz, Jimmy and Jill will have to go the whole nine yards--and then some--to manage the mounting Mafioso mayhem.There isn't much about this film to enjoy. I was hoping it would be a lot funnier than it was, but I just didn't laugh at anything except Kevin Pollack's character who was hard to understand most of the time. I had no problem with the cast, I enjoyed all of their performances. Especially Kevin Pollack and Natasha Henstridge who really made the film at least somewhat watchable. If only Bruce Willis could have had more funny lines, or Matthew Perry been a little funnier, or if Amanda Peet...wait there's nothing wrong with her. Anyway, I can only recommend this to someone who likes the cast but not necessarily the story, otherwise, this movie gets a 5 out of 10 because they did try...to some degree.
not more then 183 minutes disappointment. Director Michael Bay had some good ideas about blowing stuff up but absolutely no clue as to structuring an interesting, intelligent and engaging story. Even with blatently ripping off the far superior Tora! Tora! Tora! he still manages to produce this amazingly boring and inept clunker.Why Hollywood has to shoehorn love stories into every second movie regardless of their subject matter is beyond me. Let's see Micheal Bay do a film with a love triangle about the atomic bomb. Couldn't get much worse than this. You can comfortably fast forward through three quaters of this movie and not miss much.The second star is for blowing stuff up. Overall not a fine example of film making
Complete disapointment. This DVD is mainly about the cinematographer's ego, lots of artistic shots of nothing. Having heard and seen Glennie perform, I was hoping for some of that magic on the DVD. There was none
Confused. I like Japanese films, and really wanted to like this one. However I must say there are a lot of confusing parts to the plot. Now I have read this is going to be part of a trilogy one day. If that is true I might give it a higher rating. As of now however, there are just a lot of things that don't make sense
Pure P.O.S. My god this is so bad and could have been good if it had a plot. The bad dude looks like something off H.R. Puff and Stuff and about as dumb as the smiley face at wallmart, witch is were I bought this P.O.S. for $5.50 and that was $5.40 to much.Stay away.Barr
1 Good !  2 Bad !!. Thanx For MUSIC Of James Otto. The Best Part Of The Flic. Watch It People James Is A RISSING STAR. James Otto Has 1 CD Out. "Days Of Our Lives" And It Is Worth Having In Your Stack
DO! NOT! WANT!. Flowers in the Attic (Jeffrey Bloom, 1987)I wish I could say that Flowers in the Attic is the worst movie I've seen this year. Unfortunately, it is not, for I have been embroiled in a two-week crapfest the likes of which I would not wish on my worst enemy. With that frame of reference, when I say Flowers in the Attic is more of the same, hopefully you will understand.The story, which was beloved of grammar school and junior high girls everywhere when I was a kid (it was THE cool book to have read when I was in fifth grade in 1979), but which may have faded into obscurity: there is a family. The father (Jagged Edge's Marhsall Colt) dies. Mother (La Peste's Victoria Tennant) takes the four kids-- Chris (Jeb Stuart Adams of The Goonies), Cathy (Kristy Swanson, the only Buffy the Vampire Slayer who really mattered), Cory (Ben Ryan Granger, who recently, before his seeming retirement, popped up in Ed Wood), and Carrie (Lindsay Parker, who enjoyed a few years of child stardom before scaling back to occasional guest performances)-- and heads off to the family homestead, run by the dying Grandfather (Nathan Davis, recently of Holes) and Grandmother (Louise Fletcher, most recently of The Last Sin Eater). However, Grandma tells the kids in no uncertain terms they're evil little beasties, since it seems mom and dad were related; Grandpa is not to know they exist, so Mom and Grandma keep them locked up in the northern wing of the mansion, where they develop their own little world-- except not everyone is content to leave them alone in it...The original posters for the movie declared it had been written and directed by Wes Craven (facsimiles of them are included with the DVD); it should take the average viewer about two minutes to realize this isn't the case. Subsequently, Jeffrey Bloom took responsibility for this travesty, and (perhaps not coincidentally) did not work again in Hollywood, aside from an extremely short-lived TV show he produced and directed, for eighteen years. Yes, this movie is that bad. The novel is, of course, a genre potboiler, practically made for the purpose of being filmed, and yet the script (also written by Bloom) still manages to leave out large sections, both in the (seeming) interest of "cleaning up" the novel to get a more family-friendly rating and in order to streamline things, we assume. Unfortunately, the streamlining, as much streamlining does, gets rid of the vast majority of the stuff that gives the book any emotional impact whatsoever.The acting is bloody well atrocious. I'm half-amazed any of the principals ever worked in Hollywood again, and completely amazed Kristy Swanson was actually nominated for an award for this (more so that she won!). I've seen less melodramatic soap operas.There's really nothing else to be said-- if you never read the books, read them instead. If you did, don't see this, for you will end up hating everyone involved with a passion you didn't know you had. Absolutely awful. (half)
Ever seen a made at home movie? Nows your chance!. ... Now how do you start a review of this kind of movie.  Was it a movie?  When all of a DOZEN towns people at the gate are waving farewell and sending the would be heros into battle against the (wonderfully computer rendered)dragons doesn't that just somehow seem sad. We six Heros will die so that the dragons won't eat the rest of you!  Thats right all 11 of...oh Im sorry didn't see you there, ALL TWELVE of you.  I especially like how in this town of twelve+heros there happens to be a traveling deadly martial arts guy, a beautiful girl with a huge crossbow on wheels,(talk about envy) and the robin hood guy, except he's actually from outside the town.  So I'm going to stop now before I cry... Yes it was that bad.  But as always watch it for the Heck of it and try not to be upset about time lost in a vigilant attempt to make sense out of the dragon storm movie thing..experience thing
Movie sucks. Movie Boring...Story Drags...barely any action...if story drags should have atleast good story to keep interest but it had nothing...booo
dirty deeds indeed. watching this film i felt i had seen it before . it follows the same teen movie cleshays that we know so well offering nothing new for this type of movie . saying that i've seen worse and fans of teen comedys will probable find it entertaining for the most part . the main reason i got this was that the talented Lacey Chabert is in it . acting in the type of film that she made fun of in not another teen movie . lacey does her best with the material and what little screen time she has but she is not aloud to show her true comic potenshal as she was in films like mean girls .in my opinion this film is not bad it's just very avarge .thank you for reading my review
Waste of talent...waste of time... This movie is a waste of time. I love Rosannebut her comic abilities are ignored (and she is miscast)in this silly film as it seems the plot (a jerk gets his just reward)is the only thing valued or 'allowed' to star. What a waste of talent!This is a boring stupid movie. Be sure & miss it.
Big Mistake! Very disappointed!. I made a big mistake purchasing this DVD! What a waste of my $20.00. It's way too basic and very short. I didn't learn anything that I and most of the world already knows. Too bad I can't return it because it's been opened. I guess I've learned my lesson the hard way
Speeding to hell. The story here dosen't matter. The main characters fuse into a missle of meth and insanity towards an explosive ending. Scwartzman escapes his fate temporarily and murphy is blessed with a reprieve but rourke pays the full price for his evil concoction, meth. Quirky directing and film editing can be somewhat distracting but not meaningless. Roberts is so gay you want to smack his face. he an rourke have history on film and play out their familiarity. Rourke is phenomonal again as an immoral genius, a role he plays better than anyone today in film. BR
Not too Great. Unfortunately, this was one lackluster flick.  The Last Picture Show was great; Texasville just did not get off the ground.Too bad.  The cast was capable of something far better.If I had the DVD, I'd put it out where a garbage truck could run over it.  To put it out of its misery
AUGH!!!!. So Close, and yet so far.  I have been watching Swamp Fox since I was a kid.  Unfortunately, one horrible night, I accidently hit the record button when the tape my dad had it on was in the VCR.  We lost 2 and a half epidodes!!!!!!  Maybe 1 and a half, but all the same, I have always grieved the loss.  Anyhow, My little bro saw this in the store and started dancing.  Much to my dismay, however, when I investigate it, I find not only not all the episodes, but they are out of order!!!!!!!  How could this happen?As for Elfego...  He is great too.  My dad also had him on recordings, and we watched him all the time.  So this was a doubly pleasant surprise.... until I read the details.  ONLY 3 BLOOMIN EPISODES?????  You have got to be kidding me!!  And they are out of order as well.  Disney, You were so close to getting $30 of my money, and you just lost it...
Not the same... When Pokemon first debuted, I thought it would rock, and Misty, Brock, and Ash would stay together as a gang forever, and Ash would love it to just be walking around the world, earning badges, etc., and that's the way it would stay. Maybe even Ash and MIsty would fall in love! But, nope. The dudes who are creating these movies are sucking kids in with exclusive Pokemon cards, and the animation is just getting cheaper. This movie is totally different from the original movies and the TV series, and it sucks. I'll hold on to the older series and DVD's, but, nowadays, Brock and Misty are gone, and it's just boring without them. For those who agree with me, get the message out there that Pokemon is going down the tubes and it stinks. Bring back Brock and Misty!!! IT WILL SAVE THE SERIES! Oh, and I'm only giving this movie two stars because they went so far as to make a movie about something so ridiculous, with so much change, and so little things the same. :-( Boo
Needless Gore. This movie was as one of the most disappointing in its genre, far less interesting than Pulp Fiction and even below the level of Reservoir Dogs. It is said that in the violent late Middle Ages street shows were  often staged in European cities where fake blood flowed like water, heads fell off and stomachs erupted sausages to simulate intestines  during an evisceration delighting  the crowd. It seems that in the violent final decade of the twentieth century we had come  full circle from Barbara Tuchman's gripping account of the  awful fourteenth century.  Despite the abundant gore if the film had been  better handled it could have been quite good. There are  glimpses of its failed potential at different  points. For instance the scene  towards the end where the prison governor's head is impaled on a broomstick and carried around by the revolting inmates seems to be a direct  copy of an actual event at the  Bastille during the days of the early French revolution. In sum, as a special kind of disgusting  art form it is interesting, as entertainment though Natural Born Killers sucks. I admit some  people will like it , no doubt the same crowd who would attend  public executions if they were available for viewing
Agatha Christie Fan. While the Margaret Rutherford portrayals as Miss Marple were highlyenjoyable, with welcome splashes of humor, the Geraldine McEwan portrayalsare better compared with those by Joan Hickson.  It would be difficultto top Joan Hickson as Miss Marple, and Geraldine McEwan's performances,while credible and enjoyable, aren't nearly as good.  The best aspects of the Acorn Media versions of Miss Marple mysteries are the carefulattention to detail in scenery, props, etc.  The interiors of the rooms,seem to be nearly perfection for the period.  The casting was well doneas well, and the characters are realistic.  To me, the greatest disappointments in the Acorn Media films are the unnecessary and offensive inclusion of lesbiansism.  The ending of one of the mysteries was even inexcusably changed such that the two people involved withthe crimes are lesbians instead of man and a woman.  Without themorally offensive aspects of these films, I would have rated them with at least three, possibly four stars.  Without the wonderful attention to detail in the settings, my rating would have been one star.  GeraldineMcEwan is a fine actress.  I'm disappointed that she lowered herselfto appear in these versions of Miss Marple mysteries
A few slices short of a pie. This one will be brief. The movie is an excuse for young actors to use the "F" word and demonstrate that cannot act. The characters are cheap rip-offs of the original, which is to say one-dimensional. American Pie presents Band Camp certainly does not flesh them out. One final note: Eugene Levy- How much cash had to be thrown at your to take this one on
defective merchandise. I received the DVD and it skips, I was very dissatisfied.  I would have returned it , but since I have never had a problem before, I had thrown the receipt away.  Patrice Trace
Don't Purchase. I think if you are sincerely looking for an experience of the Cross and the Christ of the Cross you should not spend one cent on this DV
Bad one for Charlie. Charles Bronson is one of my favorites, but VIOLENT CITY is example of 70's trash at it's worst.Boring slow pacing and a "see-saw" action that gets old really fast.Bronson's character is so stupid acting in this film for a hitman that you wish he would get killed off himself.I love Charles Bronson... but this is one of his dud films
worse zombie movie evar!!!. i don't even know where to begin, you would think after 28 days later and the reimaged day of the dead george romero would at least realize that slow moving zombies just don't cut it anymore.don't get me wrong i love the original movies but they are a product of their time and horror/action (movies in general) have come a long way since the first romero zombie movies came out, and what passed for a cult following movie twenty five years ago just doesn't cut it today. it was as near to impossible as it gets  to loose myself in this story, i think i agree with an earlier reviewer that i didn't even feel like i was watching a zombie movie, at some points  i had to make sure this wasn't a made for tv movie, the actors all did an okay job, actually they deserve oscars for carrying this horrible movie and making the best movie out of a terrible script and terrible special effects (special effects seemed like a weird mix of george lucas' jumping yoda and troma videos.)the whole time,  i kept thinking "jesus george didn't you ever hear the phrase, less is sometimes more?" you get saturated with so much zombie perspective and gore that the movie quickly becomes comical and even quicker boring..
Purchased for my nephew. I would never have bought this movie for myself - I think the movie is lame.  I borrowed it from my nephew to see it and a friend "borrowed" and never returned it.  I just bought it because I owed my nephew the movie.  There were very few original funny moments in it
Okay, so it's a "Sopranos" wannabe, but it has its merits. Yes, it's about "good fellas."  Yes, it's peopled with alumni from the "Sopranos" (weakly cracking wise).  And there are too many requisite bullets-to and through-the-head cinemagraphic moments.  The plot is pretty weak - the downloading of money from a satellite requires a great deal of imaginative assent - the development of the story is uneven, and the acting is transparently bad on not just a few occasions.  Still, the actor-writer-director, Provenzano, shows flashes and this would have been a very good end-of-college project for a cinema student.  (Is that what it was?)What you have to like about it is what he tries to do, not dislike what he doesn't do.  Provenzano occasionally gives us - just now and again - the atmosphere of the NY-NJ crime-world, but these are far, far better than any portrayed in the "Sopranos."  The dedication to business, the rock bottom-line mentality, the utterly cold sides that appear inhuman, in short, the "other" side of the human coin are nicely revealed in some very chilling scenes.  Uncle ordering the death of his nephew's friends before his eyes;  Johnny Irish bashing heads or killing; the torture scene:  to paraphrase Tessio in "Godfather I," "nothing personal, just business.")  (Of course, it has been alleged that the members of the underworld carted away and sold much metal from the WTC towers in the immediate aftermath of 9-11. "Just business.")Thus, there is none of that revolting soap opera component that is increasingly dominating the "Sopranos" has become.  (Indeed, the "Sopranos" jumped the shark many moons ago.)  So try this one on for size.  Sure, its production values are poor, some scenes are painful, you keep comparing to other Mafia-movies.  But there are some hidden gems for those who look.  (Yeah, I agree:  Johnny Irish was a good character.  The FBI guy, however, was agony to watch.)Two stars for effort and for promise.  Serious cinema students should check out Provenzano's next
A Horrible Movie. The first X-Men movie was fantastic. The second movie sent chills down my spine and was even better. This third movie was absolute trash and I will never buy it
Needless Gore. This movie was as one of the most disappointing in its genre, far less interesting than Pulp Fiction and even below the level of Reservoir Dogs. It is said that in the violent late Middle Ages street shows were  often staged in European cities where fake blood flowed like water, heads fell off and stomachs erupted sausages to simulate intestines  during an evisceration delighting  the crowd. It seems that in the violent final decade of the twentieth century we had come  full circle from Barbara Tuchman's gripping account of the  awful fourteenth century.  Despite the abundant gore if the film had been  better handled it could have been quite good. There are  glimpses of its failed potential at different  points. For instance the scene  towards the end where the prison governor's head is impaled on a broomstick and carried around by the revolting inmates seems to be a direct  copy of an actual event at the  Bastille during the days of the early French revolution. In sum, as a special kind of disgusting  art form it is interesting, as entertainment though Natural Born Killers sucks. I admit some  people will like it , no doubt the same crowd who would attend  public executions if they were available for viewing
save thyself, do not even rent this joke of a history retelling. I can make fun of this without mercy because everyone involved with the project made a billion dollars.  OK, The person who you thought was your grandfater, is not your grandfather, the holy grail, was not a grail, ?!?, The real Grail was in janitor's closet in England.  I'm not making this up.  Actually no, the real, real Grail, is underneath a tourist attraction in Paris, throw in an albino, and some Catholic priests who attack people other then young boys and presto changeo whammo bammo, you have the Davinci CodeORRR   just call it "Dogma meets JFK" only with more conspiracies.
I hated this movie. I never read the book, but I hated the movie. The acting was weak, the dialog was elementary and the plot was unremarkable. Let's hope they don't make a sequel. The final straw was the Avril Lavigne song over the end credits
ugly american revisited. If cruelty, sadism, and abuse are to your taste, then this is the film for you.  It is a full-length feature expanded from the bucolic short film, 'Fishbelly White', but which contains none of its lyricism and rural poetry.Duncan is a 14-year-old misfit known for the chickens that he cares for like pets.  He is isolated and lonely because his mother has just died, and his mono-syllabic father ignores him.  And, in keeping with a time-honored cinematic cliche (starting with `Tea and Sympathy'), he is teased, tortured, and threatened by his macho peers for being 'different'.  It seems that he may have a friend in leader-of-the-pack Perry but this is where the two versions part company.  In the short, they develop a lovely, understated homoerotic romance.  Here, Perry is violent and brutal, like his abusive father, ultimately instigating Duncan's final humiliation.There is not one moment of tenderness in the entire film until the final 'reconciliation' between Duncan and his father but, considering the unrelenting nastiness which has come before, it feels highly contrived.  Duncan is such a willing, unquestioning `victim' throughout the film, any resolution-of-conflict which might have raised this to a true coming-of-age story is lost.This is a surprising entry from the usually gay-friendly Showtime Network.  There is nothing friendly about this one.
WORTHWHILE. As slasher flicks go, this one wasn't that bad. The only obvious negative is the killer/creature. It too closely resembled Swamp Thing and the outfit was too silly. But the story was good and entertaining.The acting was professional. The sheriff was a characature. How did all of the killer's victims disturb the land? Why was he killing everyone and why did he not kill the young lady at the end. The actual murders were a bit overdone. Gore does not necessarily equal quality storytelling. There is something missing to the plot. The relationship between the blossoming teens did not develop enough before he became hamburger helper. This movie was worth what I paid for it, but not much more
No Diamonds....Just Rough. This movie was so horrible I don't know where to start. Maybe I could start with the fact the actors were so horrible it was as if the director picked them randomly off the street. Or maybe he just casted his own family...at any rate they were untrained and stale. Secondly, I had a serious issue with this movie not following basic christian principles. If Tyler Perry manages to tone down the swearing in his semi-christian plays, why wouldn't this movie director have enough sense to follow suit...If you're trying to actually sale to a christian audience. Furthermore, I thought the bible said a little something against divorce; like it wasn't permitted unless your spouse commits adultery/fornication. This movie seems to say it's okay to go against the word of God if you're in love. In fact, christianity was more of a theory in this movie than it was a practice....by even the protagonist! I laugh as I think of the scene where Ce-Ce Peniston's character says seductively, "I'm looking for a man with his mind on Jesus" Yet she's dressed like a hooker. Speaking of clothing, why did Ce-Ce seem to change outfits even in the middle of scene. They go on a date and she's dressed one way, by the time they come home she has on something different; with no logical explanation. And please explain why they had someone's grandfather playing the role of Rico Suave. Maybe the movie would have actually been worth while had he looked more like the man of any woman's dream. I felt more like telling him about AARP than I did falling in love with him. In addition, the soundtrack, IT-WAS-JUST-ANNOYING. At some parts it was even hard to hear what the characters were saying because of the music. I just wanted the maddness to stop! Lastly, It seems as if the director tried to portray single church women as being overwhelmingly desperate (although some are) However, having pamela fall so quickly for bryant was just, well, almost juvenile...perhaps even a disrespect to women at large. Overall, this movie made me want to puke. PASTOR Larry "Flash" Jenkins really needs to get some true insight on the conditions of the church and maybe even go back and read the bible for himself for clarity
Go home Smith. This is a terrible missues of one of Asimovs greatest novels. The relevance to the novel is only marginal.Will Smith is (as usual) doing a terrible job at being an action hero. He should have stayed with the sit-coms
A Great Vehicle for Walken, but Script is Too Weak. For those familiar with and sympathetic toward the story of Whitley Strieber, this movie is worth watching once, although you will likely find it disappointing.For the uninitiated: Whitley Streiber is a science fiction writer who claims to have been abducted, probed, and otherwise hassled by alien life forms. Communion is based on his best-selling book of the same name, the first book from a series that details his alleged interactions with little grey men.Walken is perfect for the role, and he seems to relish the opportunity to release his weirdness so freely. Fans of Walken such as myself also owe this one viewing, though like our UFO-loving counterparts, most of us will also be disappointed.For each chilling moment in the film - and there are a few - there is a sibling moment which is overly amateurish and undeniably boring. The dialogue during near the end of the movie - where Walken's Streiber character contemplates the aliens with his wife while perusing an art gallery - is poorly written and the actors clearly know it. The soundtrack is hopelessly-dated guitar wankery.A closing scene where Walken gets chummy with some aliens is confusing and embarrassing to watch.This movie could have been good. It should have been good. Another six months writing the screenplay might have gotten it there.
I give it zero stars. Complaining, whinning, mumbling, beer drinking, bathtub soaking, unattractive Alison and her overgrown, teenage hairstyled, beer drinking kid of a husband and their apy middle daughter.  The most horrible series I've seen on TV, in the end Alison seems to "solve" whatever the problem is but it's not worth the watch. No one in my family enjoyes this show
Michael Moore is an idiot. This was a ridiculous documentary. I watched with an open mind, and after it was finished I was so irritated because he showed such a one sided biased view, it was ridiculous. Being that it is a Michael Moore movie I should have expected this but I tried to view it openly. Let me warn you now, don't waste 2 hours or 20 dollars
Too basic even for a new mom. There are about 18 chapters of information on basic newborn baby care.  Each chapter is covered in brief one to three minute sessions and there's no depth in the information.  Each content just scratches the surface of newborn care without detail information.  If you've already read books or magazine articles on newborn baby care, this DVD is not worth the money.  If you have not ready anything about newborn care (books or magazine articles), maybe this DVD can get you started with basic information as a new mom.  I have found that some information differs with information found in newborn care books and magazines (and from prepared childbirth classes)
Aerial Gunner. Typical of the war movies of that age.  Very much the Americans are all good clean kids who will overcome injustice.  I enjoyed looking at an America that was.  Would purchase again but this is not a documentary or even a close approximation of real life
Lordy. At its outset the update film version of Golding's classic novel is creepy and cinematically mysterious. We see the commotion as the boys try to make it to the island while many of the adults are apparently dead or clinging to life, all trying to swim towards shore after the plane went down. In this version, the boys who make it to the island are from an American military cadet school instead of being English. The early stages of the film really do keep the impact of the story alive, but as the film wanes, so does the mystique of the tale.It's really hard to know who to blame, the child actors who played these characters ineffectively, or the screenwriters, for putting in a slew of profanity and inane parts to the movie. The children who played these characters for the most part did what they could with this script. For what it is worth, I really liked how Simon was personified in several of the scenes, especially the one with the "monster" (the "beast" in the other movie version). You really get a sense that he is like the character in the book, as he connects with nature and seems to not fear what the others do: the mysterious "creature" in the cave. Ralph's character was depicted in an appropriate way also for the most part. However, Jack's character was just way too one-demensional: he seemingly never had a chance to grow into the antagonist because he was already one when the movie started. It probably didn't help that Jack's character had profanity-laced tirades aimed at Ralph and Piggy for a good deal of the film, and these moments seemingly killed any originality that the movie could have had. Lines from some of Jack's "servants" were kind of asinine also: "The Chief has spoken."Perhaps this film could have also done a better job of building the momentum of the story. It seemed like events were happening too quick. One minute they don't know how to hunt; the next they are experts. They could have also built up the character conflicts between Jack/ Roger and Ralph/Piggy a little better. They are seemingly friends one minute and enemies the next.If you completely forget that this is Lord of the Flies, or even related to it, and take this movie as just a modern survival story you will be better served. For what it is worth, I am not a big fan of the other version of Lord of the Flies either, although it is better than this one.  Maybe they can update the novel one more time and get it right.2 1/2 stars
It's not Grease, it's lard!. Terrible follow up to the first movie. This movie does not hold a candle to the first classic movie staring John Travolta and Olivia Newton John.The acting is bad, and it is not worth the money.It belongs where most grease belongs ... in a bucket under the sink.
Another Pac DVD?. Another in the endless list of DVD documentaries chronicling the life of late rapper Tupac Shakur. Running at about an hour and featuring interviews with KRS One, Mike Tyson, Lisa "Left Eye" Lopez, and Pac's group, The Outlawz, "4-Ever" really doesn't go anywhere that previous "Pac-umentaries" haven't been. A lot of the Pac footage has been included in other releases and the interviews aside from some interesting stories from Tyson really doesn't bring anything new and insightful. For die-hard Tupac fans only.
PC Version: Made for screen shot marketing. Pretty graphics, no art.  Looks nice but playability sucks.  Terrible keyboard controls, requires multiple clicks from scrolling lists to do simple things like cast a spell.  Quests confusing, sometimes screen pixel hunt and click required.  Very limited, laughable, quick key assignment.  Can't even bring up the area map with a single click/key!!!  No personal journaling or marking maps on this huge game area.  Wait for it on the $9.99 rack, or maybe user content will make something of it.  Seems like a great graphics engine with little RPG behind it.  Seems very much designed by committee with features removed when anyone didn't like it.  Get NeverWinter Nights 1 instead.Update after about 50 hours into it:  The inside caves, it seems, are made of a very limited tile set.  There is a narrow tunnel, an open cave, and open cave with upper shelves on each side, or a cave with an above cross-over.  Textures are cut stone, some are rough stone, but the shapes are the same.  Very boring, you now know where to look for the monsters.  Guess console players are less demanding.  Too much money went into the cut scenes, not enough into the RPG engine
BLACK YAWN. Remember when Steven Seagal was a hot property and his action films were decent?  Well don't expect that in this wearisome retread.  Seagal plays Jonathan Cold (thank God they didn't call him Jonathan Hott!), an agent for some deep dark secret covert organization with "four columns"?  Tamara Davies is the requisite hottie agent who wonders what Seagal's up to and carries on like most female agents in these Romanian movies--makes one dumb move after another.  The storyline (ho hum) centers on terrorists out to set off a nuclear bomb in downtown Los Angeles.  Seagal is hardly seen during any of his few hand to hand combats, pretty much confirming that the beefy actor's stuntman did all the work, of which there is very little.  A preposterous chase scene in a garbage truck is reminiscent of Roadrunner cartoons in its lunacy.  Two stars for the hammy but effective performance from John Pyper Ferguson as the villain.  At least he looks like he's having fun
ITS OFFICIAL - BRAD PITT  CANNOT ACT. Ive read reviews for this piece of schlock calling it a "  cult classic" ( isnt that  what they always call crappy movies that only stoned college kids can watch? )  or "underated" (theres a reason  it was underated -IT SUCKS). Brad Pitts performance was laughable. Watch any episode of Gunsmoke and tell me Early Gracewasnt a bad impersonation of Festus from start to finish. And that guy from the X Files ,David sumthin or other, mumbles in this annoying monotone throughout the whole film. This guy adds about as much to the movie as those ads for the concession stand.And Juliet Lewis playing a  yet another brain dead bimbo. Who woulda saw THAT one coming??? The only reason I gave this one 2 stars is its so bad it just kept me on the edge of my seat. I think its called " morbid fascination", like when you stop to gawk at a really bad traffic accident - it repulses you but you just cant turn away. If you want my advice ( and you probably dont) take the money you were gonna spend on this movie and go buy a Gunsmoke DVD. That way you get Festus AND you get to watch Matt Dillon beat the h*** outta somebody
Horrible Quality sinks DVD Double Feature. What is wrong with Artisan?  Finally releasing the final two &quot;Prom Night&quot; films on dvd that were previously issued under the IVE Home Video label should have been a good thing... but it went horribly wrong.&quot;Prom Night III: The Last Kiss&quot; continues the storyline set up in 1987's &quot;Hello Mary Lou: Prom Night II&quot; in which a murdered Prom Queen has returned from the grave to wreak supernatural mayhem.  More of a parody than horror, the film offers up some rather inventive ideas, even if its ending is weak.&quot;Prom Night IV&quot; takes the series in yet another direction as a demented preacher ruins Prom Night for a group of four friends.  This movie has some moments of real suspense admid all of the nonsense, and the final twist is indeed memorable.But the problem lies not with the movies themselves, but with the horrible transfers.  They are full frame only, and look like they were taken directly from the old VHS copies.  &quot;Prom Night III&quot; is even edited from a television print.  Much like the god-awful &quot;Fright Night II&quot; release earlier this year, this double-pack is a great disppointment for those fans who were looking forward to these movies' DVD premiere
Reiner's bomb. This is supposed to be a black comedy.  In fact, it is an ineptly directed, unfunny, obscene mess.  It features filthy language, the required men's bathroom scene, rape, racism, hatred of America, and ridicule of the mentally ill.  Attention all Altzheimer's patients, Reiner thinks you're hilarious.Watch Harold and Maude or, even better, Little Murders if you want to see black comedy.  This bomb is best forgotten.  I'm not selling my DVD copy, I'm throwing it away
THANKS.....BUT NO THANKS!!!!. Let me accept the fact that LOTR is my most beloved film and I already own the extended editions of the films in one set! I'm really not surprised to see New Line coming up with another edition of the trilogy. With films like these they will squeeze the collectors as much as they can!! Still, inspite of this new set containing both the theatrical versions and the extended cuts of the films and also the much hyped Costa Botes documentaries, my advise to anyone buying LOTR for the first time is- DO NOT BUY THIS SET! Spend a little more and you get all the movies in full 6.1 DTS EX glory, alongwith hours of endless in-depth bonus features which probably you'll spend rest of your life watching!!Please be aware, these new editions DO NOT contain DTS tracks, no commentary tracks by the director, Weta workshop or the cast. All you get is both versions crammed into one single disc and just one documentary as a bonus on the second disc...AND NOTHING ELSE. It would have been a better idea had New Line released the documentaries separately without forcing the consumer to buy the films again....And even this is not the end, once the HD format gains a little more acceptance, they'll have another excuse to come up with a new version of the trilogy!Beware, Extended edition set is the ultimate LOTR experience, in terms of films or bonus features. Go get it...Its worth all the money spent!
Great book, disappointing movie. I thoroughly enjoyed reading "Running With Scissors" and was thrilled to learn that they were going to make a movie of it. Sadly, the movie was a big disappointment. Yes it follows the plot-lines of the book, but Augusten Burroughs's wry, entertaining voice is completely lost in the translation. The movie plods along, and although Annette Benning is terrific, and Evan Rachel Wood good also, they can't save this one. The worst thing about it is actually the soundtrack-- not the music itself, which is a grab-bag of unremarkable 1970s songs-- but it's loud, intrusive, and badly placed. Again and again the characters are talking OVER a song and you can't even hear them.Save your money. Buy Augusten Burroughs's next book instead
what's Up, doc. It is not as good as her The Owl & The Pussycat movie. It was more silly than I remembered. But it is nice to see Babs in her youth
ABSTRACT FILM BASED ON REALISTIC PAINTING. I think Grant Wood's painting "American Gothic" created in 1930 is a great piece of art (not only American but in a world's scale). Having read the synopsis for this movie I thought it'd be something really interesting. I guess I was wrong. First you got to understand it's not quite a movie. It's more like a collage of photos and images put on industrial and death metal music. The movie is surreal and abstract unlike the painting itself. I doubt it's possible to understand anything watching it. Maybe some will be exclaiming "Ingenious! Brilliant!" after the film but then they have to be big connoisseurs of post-modernistic art. Carlos Batts is an acclaimed photographer, photography is his first speciality and I somehow missed it before buying this DVD. I think this film would be a nice part of some contemporary art exhibition, among some weird statues and installations. But to pay $23 for watching it at home - no, that's too much, and I'm talking not just about the money.Don't say you haven't been warned :)
This movie is a clunker. Wasted talent.  None of the characters are believable in the roles they are portraying.  Some funny stuff.  Craig Ferguson can do better.  Charlotte Church should stick to singing as acting is not her forte.  Every thing in this movie seems forced and there is no chemistry between the characters
Best DVD Ever??? Umm, that would be a NO. I cannot believe someone would come here and say its the best DVD ever and the best thing on tv in the past 50 years! I should sue that guy for my money back! Talk about obsessive fans who need to get a life!!The DVD? Its a concert of a very young girl named Hayley Westerna from New Zealand, that much should be obvious from the title. There are some good songs like Both Sides Now and Amazing Grace and others I cant recall right away. Mostly its very boring. Her voice is pretty for certain and its a classy production and yet I was yawning throughout the WHOLE thing. A guy did a duet with her and did his best to YELL instead of sing. You have to see it to believe it. He YELLED throughout the whole song. I had to turn the volume down by half just so it was bearable.Now I am upset about purchasing this thinking it was going to be this grand musical experience according to prior posters, one whose name I wont utter but should be ashamed. Upset to put it very very mildly. Best DVD ever. Best thing on tv in the past 50 years. RIGHT!!!! Those extremist reviewers who have no life should not be allowed to post on here and I mean it.Almost half the songs were nice to listen to and the singer has a pleasant voice so I give it 2.5 stars.Oh, the extras. If you like there is a documentary on her and some really badly done videos.
A travesty of the Middle East. To describe Three Kings as absurdly comic is to describe a war as such.  This film is filled with an excess of gratuitous violence and unnatural foul language.  While greed & cruelty may be rampant in the region, Three Kings is simply absurd.  At best, it is nerve wracking entertainment and does (handsome) George Clooney's reputation no favors whatsoever.  Any Indiana Jones episode would run circles around this thin and preposterous plot.  I would rate this "B" movie a miss on all fronts
NEGATIVE... Negative...The 1st season of The Batman was ok, but the second season ruled...third season is mediocre so far.  I want the second season.  The only worthwhile episode on this disc is "The Big Chill".  The other 2 are lack luster.  The Big Chill had a lot of stale "Freeze" jokes, but was well presented.A 2 out of 5 stars
Midly entertainitng, but a bit off. Parts of this story are entertaining, but parts of it tended to bother me.  What really bothered me was that Harriet did some mean things to people in her class, but her nanny never told her that what she did was wrong.  She seemed to tell Harriet to pretend to be sorry, even if she wasn't sorry.  That attitude is what really bothers me about the movie and the book
bad baby, bad!. Okay, it's not high art but this film has something to say all be it in a round about fashion.  It does make the viewer wonder about modern medicine and how it can possibly affect those who take it on a regular basis.  On the other hand, the film lacks true suspense.  I was hoping for an explosive opening scene when the baby is first born and instead was offered a yawn.  The baby itself is about as scary as fozzy bear and while there is some blood flow it is kept to a minimum.  The pacing is too slow at times and it just doesn't stand up that well today.  The actors who took part in this didn't go anywhere say for the father who went on to appear in the sequel.  Why there was a sequel is beyond me.  I recall how frightening the commercial was for this film when it first came out but I was only five at the time.  At the most this is a rent not a buy.  I guess good for it's time but perhaps a re-make would pump some needed life into the story.
One Last Dance. I am sorry but I was unable to watch this product as it is not for Australian viewing which I did not realise or understand at the time.  I have received a full refund for these goods but I would have rather been able to watch them.  Thank you for your help and I wish I could have done your review - Iren
Sentimental and fake. Having enjoyed LOST IN TRANSLATION, I thought I might like this one, which seems to have some sort of cult reputation-- why I can't fathom. The entire plot is self-serving, shallow, and unrealistic. I guess it's supposed to depict the horror of repressive religious values, and while I don't condone those, the film lacks clear characters or any motivation. A lot of people have buttoned up parents who don't get it, and it doesn't mean they kill themselves-- because they were grounded!?Since the writer-director gerw up in Hollywood, she may not be aware that you can't keep your kid home from school without a very good reason-- social workers and what not come after you. So the entire premise is false.Romanticizing mass suicide by having a bunch of soft focus young blondes do it-- after which they supposedly ascend to erotic eternity in the imaginations of their boyish peers-- could actually encourage the act. It's not caring, not real, and not responsible.But I guess that wouldn't bother the rich, overfunded daughter of a Hollywood genius out to make a name for herself.
I want a good copy!. "Way Out West" is my favorite Stan & Ollie film. It is consistantly clever; the horse on the balcony, the head under the pail, the bodies in the piano, and of course, the delightful dance sequence. Alas, I sold my really fine VHS version, expecting someone to eventually give justice to this fun romp. When do you think someone, even Criterion, will wake up and realize that quality entertainment cannot be compromised, and a loving public will not settle for mediocrity?
Belongs in a Litter-Box!. When I watched this stinker, I felt like sniffing it and covering it up.This is just another attempt to cash in on nostalgia.  Obviously the producers of the film were aiming at parents fond memories of the Dr. Seuss classic childrens book and tried to exploit it into an updated version. It fails miserably. It is another example of Hollywood dumping tons of money on the look of a movie instead of the script. Dont get me wrong, this movie looks great. It has awesome costumes and set design but the problem is, it seems like they whipped the screenplay out in 20 minutes. Even the kids think this movie stinks.Do your child a favor, avoid this film and instead sit down and read your child the original book. They will appreciate it way more.
Typical Horror Movie. This movie was alittle better then expected but not by much.  The movie definently had a good choice for a cast.  Each star of the cast did a good job, but the plot could have been alittle better.  The end was something I was not expecting.  I did make me wonder what would happen next.  Although it was alittle confusing.  But it was an okay movie, definently one to rent to see if you like it
Classic film - Horrible DVD!. "Raise the Red Lantern" is justifiably recognized as one of the great films of the Nineties and one of the most visually striking movies of all time. Unfortunately this DVD release by Razor Digital Entertainment is a travesty. The colors are dull and washed out and the English subtitles are poorly translated, ruining the stately mood of the movie.  This is not how a classic film should be watched! Hopefully a legitimate DVD company like Criterion will decide to release the movie with a properly done transfer. In the meantime, avoid this hideous DVD at all costs
I didn't recieve the original. I bought this because the reviews visible at the time said that this was the original animated version - the one with the sad ending.The first thing I did when I got the movie was skip to the end to see if it was the right version.  It's not.  The mermaid and the prince get married, and the king makes a little speech about ending evil pollution.It's probably a good movie, but I'm so disappointed that it's not the one I was hoping and searching for that I can't bring myself to watch it
I never want to hear the word MAK..again. if you want to see a movie of equal quality turn on usa or tnt. the plot is about a women (nak) who wont let go...of her life. she dies during labor and her ghost convinces her husband (mak) that she is fine. and the rest is to rediculous to tell youthe two stars are for the filming (a few parts have there moments), the lighting, and a few scenes with a buddhist monk toward the end that were enjoyable.over not worth buying -  asian cinema has so much to offer... but this is not one of the
Broken by Sony Copy Protection. The movie itself was pretty good - however, there is a good chance this movie will not play in your DVD player.Sony added a new copy protection scheme to this DVD which causes the movie to be unplayable in many DVD players.  Many different players from different manufacturers are affected.  I learned of this problem after it did not work in my RCA DVD player, and searched on the internet and found many others with the same problem.So, there is a good chance that this movie will not be playable, and I don't recommend purchasing it
Lousy picture quality. I don't know what the last poster was thinking... This DVD goes to the top of my worst quality list. I wouldn't complain as much but they are advertized as &quot;Digitally Remastered,&quot; which is obviously meaningless. &quot;Long John Silver&quot; is soft-focus, borderline blurry, throughout; marred with constant flecks and blobs; and has countless vertical scratches that score the full image. It's like watching some old home movie you found in a trunk. Haven't viewed &quot;Captain Kidd,&quot; but a cursory scan indicated it too is in poor condition. If that's the best the films come, and there's no money for clean-up, so be it. But get that misleading &quot;Digitally Remastered&quot; off the box. That's a hoodwink if ever there was one
What?. I can't believe how many great reviews this horrible film got. The acting is laughable as is the writing. There are also many mistakes and inaccuracies! They depict the heroes as perfection and the enemy as monkeys.  Real life isn't like that.  I guess just because this movie is pro-war people automatically back it up.  But this is the worst movie I have ever seen.
These movies have not  withstood the test of time. These DVDs are poor quality.  Some have dubbed-in dialog, some are kinescopes from the 1950's, and all are grades below a B-rated movie.  The common denominator is the poor production by the original directors which no amount of nostalgia will forgive. The TV plays are really the bottom of the bottom.  Unlike "I Love Lucy" TV productions or full length movies from the 1950's, these have not withstood the test of time.
ZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZ. Me and a female friend went and watched this one in the theater. I ... was ... bored ... out ... of ... my ... skull. After about a half hour my friend, who tends to be more "progressive" than I, actually suggested we leave. It was the first time either of us have ever left while the movie was playing. Ever!Perhaps I'm biased. However I highly recommend that no one get this movie. The only reason I can think that anyone would give it a good rating is because of its political slant. I tend to lean to the right, but even I was entertained by V For Vendetta, despite it being blatant liberal propaganda. If you are going to pontificate about how we conservatives are evil, at least make it interesting
WOW. Boy this movie was weird and psycho. I happen to like the weird movies but it was WAY off the psycho side for me. Friends try to cover up an "accidental death" from one of their friends when they try to pull a prank that goes horribly wrong. Things like this, I try to stay away from. Although I am glad I saw it so I won't always wonder if this movie was actually watchable or not. Now I know. I gave it 2 stars because the movie DID have it's charms.
Silkwood + Norma Rae Go to Minnesota. North Country has a few things going for it and plenty against it. The magnificent photography and gritty settings give a rare view to the forboding Iron Range in Northern Minnesota and the script and performaces by major-league talent have the best of intentions. Unfortunately, the sum of this film is less than its parts. The storyline is simply too familiar and cliched - even the run-down town and factory settings smack of "Silkwood." The backstories of spousal abuse, family dysfunction, and (gasp) Lou Gehrig's disease are right out of a "Lifetime" movie.So are the "dramatized" scenes of a labor meeting and the tepid courtroom confrontations.  The perfomances are mixed: while Harrelson walks thru his role with one eye on his paycheck, Theron - "uglied up" yet again - has her eye on Oscar. She scored an undeserved nomination for this role as she fails to convince on all fronts.   The best performances come from supporting players: McDormand is excellent as the ironically named Glory who is beaten down the the Union and by life. Spacek is equally effective as Theron's Mother (she played a similar role in "Marie" in 1985). Overall worth watching for the scenery and supporting cast
I would have picked zero stars but it wasn't an option. First of all, the only reason I started watching this movie was because my roommate got it and we're both lovers of the Romantics. The only reason I kept watching this movie after the first 5 minutes was because I could already tell it was going to be completely and totally awful and would make for a few good laughs between the two of us.Beyond some very basic facts about the party of writers, this movie is not grounded anywhere in reality. The acting is way overdone and quickly becomes grating. There is no plot whatsoever to speak of and the movie lacks any sense of clear direction or purpose -- it is simply a collection of random, inexplicable, and nonsensical events filled with frenzied sexuality, animalism, and vaguely-defined hallucinations. While I'm sure the actual experience was not entirely tame and prudish, I find it hard to believe that this is anywhere close to being accurate. Even when it tries to delve into pseudo-philosophical discussion about the nature of love, fear, poetry etc., that you would expect to emerge among these great literary figures (which, strangely, does not happen often)it utterly fails to make any understandable conclusions or statements and their real views, beliefs, and visions become hysterical ravings rather than the passionate philosophies that they were.The film does not deal fully at all with Mary's creation of the Frankenstein story, nor do any of the other characters write ghost stories as Byron challenges them and as really took place. The idea that the story was born out of Mary's personal fears is an interesting one but this too spirals out of control and has almost nothing to do with Frankenstein.The premise behind this disaster of a movie is a good one and I think with the right script, actors, and director it could be an amazing exploration of authorship, literary exploration and exchange, and this fascinating group of writers. That is not, however, what this film is.P.S. If you do get seduced by the other reviews, pay particular attention to the scenes in the billiard room...I didn't know they had light bulbs in 1816!
Too SLOW. Very beginner. Slow as can be. If you are just starting Yoga let this be your instructional DVD.NOT FOR THE EXPERIENCED.
don't be &quot;con&quot; vinced into watching this. To be honest with you I thought the movie was really bad. the acting was ok but the only good part about the movie was that ricky (Rodney Eastman) was in the movie. (for about 5 mins) but i would not suggest renting this movie and waisting 4 dollars
This is an excuciatingly dull, BAD movie. As a lover of film noir and proud owner of most that are on DVD or VHS, I can say without hesitation that this is one of the very worst ever. The only reason I gave it two stars, instead of one, was because of the fine performers who were saddled with this inane script.Joe Ferrer's hypnosis of Gene Tierney to allow her to sleep is nothing compared to the yawns brought about by the agonizingly slow pace, lack of action, and interminable pauses between lines. At one point, Gene Tierney swears that she hasn't been lying, and you find yourself wanting to respond: "Of course, you haven't. You haven't said anything of import."The storyline makes absolutely no sense. Jose Ferrer has setup the perfect crime so what does he do? He returns to the scene for no apparent reason other than to be captured. He hypnotizes Gene Tierney to steal incriminating evidence and then has her place the items where they will inexorably be discovered.A complete waste of wonderful performers. Cross this one off the list, and donate the $9.99 to your favorite charity.Or pourchase "The Dark Corner," a truly memorable Fox noir with an outstanding performance by a breathtakingly gorgeous Lucille Ball
Unwatchable and barely listenable. Sorry - there is no forgiving the editing of this DVD.  It is in a word infuriating.  There is no way to connect with the living, performing musicians on stage "captured" (presumably) by the cameras.  The editing is an object lesson in how to wreck performance footage.  I find it hard to believe that the creative forces behind Iron Maiden talked themselves into this massacre of the footage.Add to that (or subtract rather) that the sound is thin and I guarantee I will never watch it again.  I didn't even make it thru once.  This product should be taken off the market and redone.  Period
"slice of life"?. I've seen the phrase "slice of life" used many times to describe this movie, which makes me wonder - whose life is this a slice of? Certainly not mine, and not most people's. The Anniversary Party is a slice of the lives of a group of people who are extremely vain, self-absorbed, jaded and rich beyond most people's wildest fits of imagination. Worse, there isn't much of a hint that the filmmakers were aware that most people, or at least most people who are fun to be around, don't act the way these characters do.Good films can be made about Hollywood - in "Mulholland Drive" it's kind of a dream world, both in the sense that it's hazy and ambiguous and in the sense that one of its characters dreams of being a bigger part of it; in "State and Main," the self-absorption of many of the characters is offered for our amusement. "The Anniversary Party" is presented as if most viewers will be sympathetic with the characters, but I can't imagine them elicting much sympathy from anyone who isn't also a bored rich prick. If this is truly a "slice of life" for the Hollywood set, it is no wonder that so many films produced in Hollywood are so cynical and shallow.
Knock-off of a knock-off.... Saw the knock-off series "Jeremiah" when it was the classic Star Trek episode "Miri", in which all the adults past puberty were killed by a virus originally meant to prolong life.  Also saw it as the Canadian TV series "The Tribe", in which all the adults are killed by some sort of plague.  Also read it in "The Kindling", by Jennifer Armstrong, a novel in which teenagers must care for the younger kids after a virus wipes out their memories and kills all adults.I laughed when the Amazon reviewer called the premise of "Jeremiah" "intriguing".Well, the other works don't have Luke Perry or pretty F/X.  Maybe that's the "intriguing" part of this latest adaptation of one of the most overused themes in Science Fiction.
Some movies should not have made it past VHS. I rented this flick cause at the time it had 2 and a half stars. Wow was I horribly mislead. Some have said this is so bad it's funny. However unless your high...very high, I don't think you'll find the humor in it. Sure it has lots of attractive naked women, but the quality is so poor I can't even recommend it for that. Your better off surfing the net for porn. The sound effects were so bad, were talking sounds of someone splashing around in the bathtub for the lake scenes. There is no gore, infact the closest they come to it is a splash of `blood' on a victims neck. It's boring, drawn out, and really the only positive thing I can take from this film, is the hope that I will spare some of you the wasted time and money
Don't bother with this dvd. Hands down the worst episode of the Masters Of Horror television show. It's dull, boring, and not scary. It will leave you scratching your head saying "that's all?"Don't even bother with this dvd. It's a waste of your precious time.
Good for a while, but, geez, then George Peppard shows up!!. The opening 30 minutes of this movie is pretty interesting. It reveals the Nazi struggle to launch the V-1 rocket and the British effort to figure out what the Germans are up to. The story of Hanna Reitsch, a top FEMALE Nazi test pilot is a movie in of itself. Her scenes are very good. Also Paul Henreid of 'Casablanca' fame (Victor Lazlo)  plays a Nazi General. It is interesting to see him 23 years after Casablanca. But then, the great wooden actor George Peppard makes his appearance. You talk about a movie losing steam, it loses steam quicker than a tea kettle taken off a hot stove. The plot then becomes dreary and dreadful and predictable, and it becomes for me a '0' star film. The incredibly sexy Sophia Loren is in the movie, but they have her dressed in a dark blue TURTLENECK sweater!! You can't even see her beautiful body. What a waste. She was married to the Producer so I guess she worked cheap. At several points in this epic they use black & white WWII STOCK footage (its a color movie), its laughable, as is most of the acting.
HUGE disappointment. I was so excited to buy this video for my 3 year old daughter, as she is absolutely fascinated with My Little Pony toys, books, etc. What I never expected were the comments she made while watching it. I certainly never expected that I needed to review it for content before putting it in. When your daughter keeps saying, "They are being really rude and mean, mommy... we should take it out..." I knew I had a problem. The video actually scared her, as the movie is a FAR stretch from the innocence and sweetness of the other My Little Pony products. I absolutely would NOT recommend this for other children. If you do buy it... I recommend you watching it BEFORE letting your child watch it.
The worst film ever... I am a big Steven Seagal Fan, and loved his movies in the 90's...but I have to say that this film is the worst Film I have ever seen. The acting is embarassing, the overdubbing of the voices is so unatural and cheap looking, the story (why does every one of his films have to be about an ex CIA agent, or a Mercenary, or Ex special forces...so cheesy and predictable) the script was just written by someone who must have got all his dialogue from the "eighties!!!" and lastly the fight scenes were just awful..I think that the reason that all his films now go straight to video is that no one in their right mind would pay $10 at the movies to see such Junk... Steven Seagal is a great martial Artist I'm sure..but I just cant believe that he doesnt quality control his films, and he he does, then he needs to get someone else to do it..I would have given this film 0 stars if I could but amazon wont let me.Steven really needs to get some quality actors, and quality producers in to do his next film.... Just because your good at martial arts, and your ok at acting, doesnt mean you will be great at producing a movie... and it shows
Not one of his best. Seagal teams up with a rapper, again. Plays slappy hand/paddy cake fighting with some guys. Escapes from prison (always fun). Then blows some stuff up. And finally, copies Bad Boys as much as it can before it races to a close."Today You Die" is a movie that goes a long way in showing that one picture is worth at least a thousand letters of hate mail.  Write in and tell Steven Seagal to give the rest of the money he would spend on making movies to the homeless and dedicate the rest of his creative energy into ending world hunger, saving those trees he cares so much about, or getting a hair cut so he doesn't look like the Count from Sesame Street after he wakes up after a full day of drinking beer and eating cheetos in his trailer. To tell you the truth, I actually like Steven Seagal. But his stuff is getting worse. Trying to watch his films now is like trying to read cursive from a cerebral palsy sufferer.Do you even care about your work anymore?As for the three writers (and one who wisely wanted to remain uncredited) who put this masterpiece of gratuitous violence, cursing, and aimless wandering together, if you guys can call yourselves writers, then the guy who decided to put "Famously Fresh" on the top of Planter Cashews Nuts can call himself a writer. Why did you put the psychic woman in the film! You guys must have smoked some crack after you wrote yourself into a corner. Have you ever heard of continuity? Well, maybe having the little girl at the beginning and at the end of the movie was an effort at that. Good Job on that one boys! You confused most of your audience again b/c the girl has no significant meaning to Seagal's character except that she is in the film for him to hug. Or maybe you were just trying to tell me that he is a deadbeat dad/friend/uncle (who is she?) who only cares about this girl in a superficial way. I'll buy it then. Nevertheless, when you write another script, here's a hint about the whole girl signifying a return to family/normal life thing: have Seagal call her/look at a picture of her when he's alone/bring her up in a conversation. Or actually put her in the movie in a significant way. Just a small suggestion.
Shallow characters, bizarre story. That's basically my two cents. Shallow characters, bizarre story. I am not the kind of person who usually watches romance films, but I do like a good story and heard this was one. It was not. All of the characters were inverted - Ada and her daughter were utterly irritating, George was disgusting from start to finish, and Sam Neill's character (supposedly the heartless jerk) was actually the easiest to sympathize with. How frustrating!On a positive note, Michael Nyman's score is unbelievable. I love it
Not what I expected. It's a narrative. I thought it would be the life of Buddha as portrayed by actors. Kinda dry. The cover art is beautiful tho
Hold your nose. I thought Colin was sleeping at first. I didn't realize he was "acting sensitive".  It would be more interesting to watch paint dry, than this slow, boring, pointless movie.  So, his friend is gay, big suprise, and Colin movies to New York to live with him and kooky girl.  Who ever thought Robin Wright could look ugly?  She used to be an attractive girl, I guess living with Sean Penn must be very stressful.  You probably guessed the plot - kooky girl really loves gay friend, but Colin shows up and she sleeps with him gets preggy and they all move to hooterville and live the "unconventional life" thats even more boring than living in the "burbs".  They are the most conventional "unconventional" bores of all time.  Either overdose on black coffee or skip this one.  For extreme Colin fans only.  Enjoy!
A Bing Crosby Christmas. I was very dissapointed when I watched A Bing Crosby Christmas.  There was very little of his old Christmas shows and a lot of stuff I didn't care to see.  If I had wanted a biography on Bing Crosby I would have ordered a biography.  I would send this DVD back if I could...don't waste your money on it
Better see Kill Bill and Storm Rider. Sonny fans, want to see Sonny Chiba, better see Kill Bill I & II Or Storm Rider Or Explosive City.
bad disc made for unhappy gift. i gave this as a gift, but it turns out that the transporter disc would not read 3 chapters. the transporter 2 disc worked fine.
One of the worst films ever!!. I bought this DVD hoping that it will be a good one but it turned out to be awful and trashy. There is no story or plot to it, so I ended up throwing it away. I really regret buying it.If you're into sex, then this film is for you but let me tell you this, it is boring like hell.
No English audio track. Beware, that this DVD does not have English audio track despite its Amazon description. This is an outstanding movie, but Amazon has wrong data and issued a full refund for me
Couldn't be more wrongerererer. As stated in other reviews, this movie is a joke.  Granted the cinematography is good, and there's excitement, but if you film a pig flying and have good cinematography and story, you'd get the same 'excitement'.  I also am in Army aviation, and it's disappointing to have such a deviation from the truth filmed.  Many movies make some adjustments that border on reality and some go outside that boundary.  This movie transcends to another plane of existence and commits suicide.  If I were an actor and offered a role in this movie, I would have run away knowing the repercussions it would have on my career.
A boring let down. When J.P. (Kevin Bernhardt), a playboy club owner, buys a mysterious-looking puzzle box and mistakes it for a work of art, he has no idea that Pinhead, "the Black Pope of Hell" (Doug Bradley), is trapped inside. Playing tricks on his captor's mind, Pinhead tries his best to manipulate J.P. into breaking him out of his prison -- that is, until an astute journalist (Terry Farrell) begins to suspect something.Watching "Hellraiser III", it's obvious that the producers were trying to make a poor man's "Nightmare on Elm Street" rather than a proper continuation of the first two films. "Pinhead" spouts bad one-liners like Freddy Krueger in the lesser "Elm Street" entries; and a significant part of the premise even involves the hero having dreams about her father's death.The result is a watered-down, unsteady film that contains only a small morsel of what made Clive Barker's first two "Hellraiser" films so interesting, substituting tired slasher film ingredients instead. A real let-down from the first two films
I won't buy it... Someone just today told me I should see this film.What a disappointment to see these warnings of poor quality DVDs being produced by Fox Lorber.Oh well
An ironic anachronism, replete with Hollywood PC shibboleths. You can tell this movie was released in 1998 because you can still see New York's Twin Towers standing, and because of the groveling incantations of "Islam is a religion of peace," repeated often enough (along with casting a Good Guy Arab Cop, Tony Shalhoub) to offset any PC-incorrect image of portraying Islamofascist terrorism.A measure of how silly this movie appears from the rearview mirror of 2006 and all the ghastly Islamofascist atrocities since 9/11 is the first terrorist scene in the movie, where Denzel Washington as FBI agent tries, via megaphone, to talk the terrorists down from a hostage situation. He succeeds in getting the terrorists to let children exit the bus. Jihadis with a conscience -- now where have we ever seen this actually happen - Beslan (186 children killed)? London? Madrid? Mumbai? Only as old people start to exit the bus on a second appeal by Denzel does the bus blow up.After a series of bombings in New York's supermarkets, movie theaters, restaurants, etc., pressure builds to call in the U.S. Army under martial law. Bruce Willis, the Army commander who is to take on this task, warns time and again that this isn't the proper role of the Army, but then, as one of the President's advisors explains in the movie, as if this is just one of those political things, the "President wants to appear presidential." Remember, this is 1998, and though critics of the movie, such as the New Yorker, refer to Willis's character as a "fascist U.S. Army general", the decision to grant him martial law authority would have been, ahem, none other than Bill Clinton. The movie slides by that little detail, however, to make it look like Willis, all on his own, is rounding up all able-bodied men of the Muslim persuasion (less draconian, by the way, than the rounding up of all Japanese-Americans on the West Coast by FDR, where the threat was less real and imminent than in this movie, but let's not talk about that, either; we're still in 1998, after all).Of course, the CIA comes in for its usual whipping by Hollywood, where CIA agent Annette Bening has kept crucial facts to herself because she has personal scores to settle -- you see, she is the one who trained and armed some of these terrorists who are now running amok. Oh, yeah, sure, women-hating Al-Qaeda types would allow somebody like pretty Annette to train them!But the best nonsense comes at the end: Denzel Washington and a handful of FBI agents rush into Army combat HQ and somehow surround Bruce Willis and pull their guns, saying he is under arrest for "violating the Constitution" (hey, why aren't they arresting the guy who ordered the martial law, Bill Clinton?). The general's clueless security detail also draws its guns, and there's a Mexican standoff. Denzel, using the same powers of persuasion that freed at least the kiddies from Islamofascist murder on the bus, appears to be succeeding in talking the Army soldiers out of using their guns to protect Willis. So Willis accepts the situation, allows himself to be arrested, and as the credits roll we see all these Army vehicles leaving Brooklyn in shame -- all it took was to bust the "fascist" general. Ta-dah!So the movie, with a heap of literary license, proves at least one point at the end: back in the 1990s, it didn't take much for Bill Clinton to wuss out and avoid taking on the terrorists.Meanwhile, some day, sooner or later, the idea of pre-emptive internment of Jihad-age Muslim men as a defensive measure will indeed catch on, if not here, then perhaps in France, the Netherlands, Russia, Israel -- it will be interesting to see who goes first. Because it is not just the Newtonian laws of physics that decree that for every action there is an equal and opposite reaction. When they do the sequel to this preposterous movie in New York sans the World Trade Center, Willis will play the part of the hero, and whoever gets stuck with the FBI agent role will be the fool.I give the movie two stars instead of one, because I would hate to discourage the making of such a sequel, and two, because any movie with Annette Bening in it automatically gets an extra star in my book
What in Hell?. What in Hell is wrong with the AH sets? Why do we have to buy the same movies that are REPEATED the each box set. It's bad enough that we suffer at the hands of studio's that keep adding supposedly &quot;newly found&quot; extras. I Love extras but being &quot;Force to get the new material each time is outraegous.I have three versions of Star wars and two or three of the Godfather.Several of the same movies are repeated in the box sets.Watch out,you are being taken advantaged of.  Bummer . . .
Great Acting but unbelievable story line. This movie has such wonderful reviews from both professional critics and Amazon customers that I was expecting great things. While I agree the acting (especially the girls playing Christy and Ariel) is excellent the story is just too implausible and I got that impression from the minute we see the family crossing from Canada to the US (yes they are Irish but for some reason they have to sneak in to the US from Canada). Anyway why on earth would an apparently intelligent couple enter the US with their two kids illegally, without jobs or much money to settle in the most expensive city in the country?  I know the dad is an actor but couldn't he have settled the family in one of the less expensive boroughs and taken the subway in to Manhattan? The mom is a teacher but can't find a job but no wonder if they are in the country illegally. Yet there is money for private school, fixing up the dump of an apartment, an expensive camcorder, betting the rent money on an ET doll etc.  I can't imagine any parents moving in to an apartment building known as the "drug house" with two young girls and then letting the girls wander about as they please.  Mind you the parents are a couple supposedly almost crippled by the guilt they feel over a third child - a son - that has recently died.  I kept expecting someone to call Social Services.   And the medical situations with both Frankie and the mom and new baby are not well thought out or researched. The symbolism between Mateo, the new baby and Frankie is very heavy handed. Though the film is told through the oldest daughter's eyes  because of several scenes and elements the movie is not suited at all to children.  And there are also several scenes that are really not connected with the oldest daughter at all.   Maybe if I had taken it more as a fable I would have "gotten" this movie more but I was expecting a straight forward drama and was disappointed.
What a Dud!!!!!!!!!!. Just saw this on TV today after seeing in the theater in 1986. It was a dud then and it is a dud now. I took a first date to see this in 1986 and neither of us laughed except for one or 2 scenes(The canteen and lip balm scene for one). I wanted to walk out but being a first date I didn't. The girl I had a date with seemed to be in a stupor watching the movie( I see why) the whole time and I was too embarrased to ask her out again. Chevy Chase(who I really like in the Vacation movies) has less lines than Martin Short or Steve Martin - Why? He seems to be wasted and playing a bit part. I do not understand all the great reviews here or on the movie data base - were you watching the same movie I did? The jokes are few and far between(and not very funny) and the movie moves at a snail's pace. I was thinking about buying this for Chevy Chase but have changed my mind. I read somehere that Chase didn't like this movie himself and it shows - he looks bored a lot just standing around with few lines. I would rate the worst Vacation movie(Vegas Vacation) 100 times better than this odd movie.
Walt Disney Would Never Have Put His Name on This. "The Wild" is under the "Walt Disney Pictures" banner, and even rated G, so I expected it to be a picture for the whole family, of which the studio is proud. I hoped it would put me in the Disney mood prior to our family trip to Walt Disney World.Disappointed am I. It's mediocre and has just about nothing in common with the Walt Disney legacy. To be sure, it is not unusually offensive (the way the usually superb Ron Howard offended me with his witless and crude destruction of "Dr. Seuss's How the Grinch Stole Christmas"). It is just irritating and amateurish in its writing and direction. For those of you who know something about animation, has no one informed the director "Spaz" (his self-chosen moniker) or any of the animators the concept of the "hold"? A "hold" in animation is when the movement stops for a moment to emphasize an expression or an attitude or a gesture. It is priceless when used well (and gives the animator a few frames worth of a break, besides). Perhaps the all time masters of the hold in animation are Chuck Jones (think of Wile E. Coyote and the Road Runner), Tex Avery, and Bob Clampett during the golden age of Warner Brothers cartoons."The Wild" has a total of zero holds. Everyone and everything is moving twenty-four times every second from movie's beginning to end. Who can watch that? My eyes just couldn't take it. The attitudes and gestures were all there. They were just there ten times more often than any human mind could process.But that could be forgiven if the story was clever, conveyed a meaningful theme and was told with clarity, drama, and humor.Instead of clarity, every sentence of dialogue was written to sound ironic or sarcastic or "funny" or "witty," never actually achieving real humor or wit. It's hard to know what any character really wants if they never express themselves clearly and simply. (I suppose once in a while they did, but that was the exception.) There is no attempt to make the squirrel's romantic crush remotely believable, and the father-son theme is trite as can be. Finally, there is so much slapstick violence (characters get hurt a lot) that I almost question the G rating. It's a valid rating but the film is definitely too full of scares (like the far superior "The Incredibles") for anyone under age 7. (This is not new in the Disney tradition, as "Snow White", "Bambi", "Sleeping Beauty" and maybe "Peter Pan" are also too intense for the very young).There is no less artistry required to make a kid's comedy animation than any adult movie. In fact, more awareness of one's all-ages audience is required to make it entertaining and meaningful rather than irritating, boring or traumatizing. The theme of "The Wild", trite as it is, has potential value but it's ineffectively communicated.I think "Spaz" and his crew believed they had a film so full of roll-on-the-floor belly-laughs it would excuse the flimsiness of the story. Unfortunately they were mistaken. This was not a Pixar movie if you didn't figure that out yet. The good news is, Pixar is back in business with Disney and we can look forward to their consistently superior material, which has already started with "Cars"
The guys can't act. I'm not a professional critic or one that watches many movies.  I just love 80's movies and since this movie had good reviews, I had to watch it.  I was so dissapointed with the nerd and the rebel's bad acting in the movie; It was just horrible!  I like the storyline and the soundtrack, but the acting really ruined everything.  If you just want to watch it to see some skin and not for good quality acting, then this is your movie
WAY overrated. I've always been a fan of Roger Moore's James Bond, but what I've discovered in recent years is that only a couple of his Bond movies were, like, actually good.  "The Spy Who Loved Me" is not one of them.  Oh, sure, it's fun -- almost ALL of the Bond flicks are fun -- but it's basically just a kid's movie, and that's not necessarily a good thing.(1)  Stromberg is a lame villain.  Yes, his underwater lair is well-designed, but it's silly.  Not as silly as that ice palace in "Die Another Day," but pretty silly.(2)  Barbara Bach is one of the very worst Bond girls.  She's not an ugly woman, to be sure, but she was a terrible actress; she sounds like she's reading -- poorly -- from a cue card in ever single scene she's in.(3)  Jaws is a stupid character.  Having metal teeth wouldn't actually make you capable of biting through metal.  The metal you were biting would resist, and you'd end up just tearing up your gums.  I don't expect realism from 007 movies, but I also expect them to not be outright idiotic.  (That said, Jaws is effectively used, and Richard Kiel was excellent in the role.)(4)  The disco score is terrible.  TERRIBLE.(5)  The plot is nothing more than a rehash of "you Only Live Twice," but on the ocean rather than in space.  Certain elements of the big final shootout are even the same in both movies!  Embarrassing.I love Bond, but this is not one of the highlights.The DVD is good, with a couple of fine documentaries, but the commentary track grates, because the director and other commentators spend WAY too much time patting themselves on the back for the great job they supposedly did.  Even if that were true, it'd be annoying
Stuck in B Action Fomula: Seagal in Tokyo Still Needs Better Script and Above All Better Actions. So what do you think of this? `Out of Reach' 'Into the Sun' 'Submerged' `Today You Die.' They are the list of recent Seven Seagal films. Don't they sound like a message or warning from the Heaven to the star of these films? Well, anyway, I really hope that Seagal is aware of his career decline that really coming to the end very fast.`Into the Sun' has one interesting thing, and that is the location of Japan. Considerable amounts of the film are, I think, shot somewhere outside Japan (like the inside shots of the Yakuza's office), but the unique urban feeling of Tokyo should be called one of the merits of the film. Unfortunately, neither director Mink nor Seagal seems to realize that, wasting every chance to make the film more original in whatever way they want. (By the way, this film was released theatrically in Japan on November 26, 2005, in more than 90 theaters all over the country. Can you believe that?)Anyway, the film starts with the assassination of the Governor of Tokyo Prefecture, whose aggressive views on foreigners are causing controversy. (And here, you can see a ten-second cameo of Chiaki Kuriyama, `Go-go Yubari' in `Kill Bill Vol.1'.) The governor's inclusion is a nice touch for his outspoken portrait suggests the real governor Mr. Ishihara, who is equally outspoken.But everything goes down from there. I don't know why, but one CIA agent Travis (Steven Seagal) is called in to investigate the case with FBI (why?) agent (Matthew Davis), by another CIA agent and Travis's acquaintance William Atherton. Before you say `CIA agent, not again!' listen, the story/script is co-written by Steven Seagal himself. No Japanese police would interfere with their jobs, because none of them appears. Even though the governor of the prefecture (of which population easily exceeds 10 million) is gunned down, the police in Japan is not needed.Instead of Japanese police, Yakuza step in. Actually, as you see, it is one of the young ambitious Yakuza Kuroda (Takao Osawa) that is responsible for the attack, and Yakuza of older generation don't like it, especially ... but wait, where does Seagal fit in? Oh, don't worry, what he does is simple. He goes where he should go (I don't know how, but he knows the right person), and he kills whoever attacks him, or whoever looks very bad, using swords and, if he likes, chopsticks. And romance? There is one, and Seagal's Travis and his love talk about love in a Japanese-style garden in a very childish way.The story makes no sense, but it's OK as long as the actions are reasonable. Are they reasonable? Admittedly, considering the film's B-movie status, the actions as a whole are better than some of the previous films of his. They are what you call `just OK,' but as you see, he is no longer the Seagal in the 80s, when he could display the real martial arts with authentic touch. Again, his actions here are helped by fast and quick editing.Some of the Japanese actors are respected veterans such as Masato Ibu (who plays the older Yakuza boss) and Akira Terao (playing a tycoon of big company). Their acting is more than decent, that of the professional actors.Just in case you're interested in trivia, here's a brief note about the film. You can see the clip of one `Gamera' film, in which the face of Seagal's real-life daughter Ayako Fujitani can be seen briefly on the TV twice in Yakuza's room. And you can hear the voice of Seagal at the end credit song `Don't You Cry' co-written by Seagal ... again.So, is he getting better? I don't think so, and probably I think he missed the last train to leave the direct-to-video land where he got stuck for a long time. What he needs is better action or commercially viable support (like DMX), definitely not singing
Watch out! Zombies! Oh wait, they're not zombies anymore. This movie was kinda stupid, the beginning was all thriling and boring, and the characters were really boring, the girl cop barely did anything, zombies were everywhere and she had a gun, but she didn't do anything, she just stood there. None of those 6 people got killed by the zombies, except for the big dude with the hat on at the ending. At first people turned into zombies by meteors, after that everyone who tuened into zombies turned back into regular people, but then all of the sudden, an infection spread and turned people into zombies again. Stuuuupid! We don't see how the big guy looks without his hat. Not even scary, just stupid
I Know Fred twoo. The personality of a Nazi brownshirt was one of a heightened need for acceptance.  Fred Leuchter was painted as such by many people, some who knew him(and I'm guessing knew better) and as we may be witnessing others who didn't.  Brownshirts insult, assault, rather than intellectually confront and expose objections to their popular ideas.Maybe a major lesson of the Holocaust is that the brownshirt mentality can live in any culture so long as a popular movement of idea is available for them to cling to.  So long as the need for acceptance outweighs the need for a competition of ideas.  There must be someone to hate for the brownshirt to exist, so that they may prove their allegiance to the group.  Maybe a great contribution one can give to their group is sincere dissent, as dissent does not equal disloyalty...except in a Nazi state.There was a great free press in Germany in Nazi times, so long as that free thought was constrained within the preset boundaries."Mr. Death" is not representation of Fred Leuchter.  Fred Leuchter is representation of Fred Leuchter.  Might I suggest NOT suggesting a collection of articles by many of the same people in this documentary.  That's not clarification, that's reinforcement of one idea.  Rather go and find Fred and speak to him.  Get his view.  If you don't have a preformed agenda (like Van Pelt or Morris), you may get him to respond like I did.  I found a different Fred(and a much much different story) than I was given by director Morris and others.The question is not whether German gas chambers were used to murder people, the question is whether someone will be allowed to think contrary to that, or any other idea.  That is, without having his house firebombed, a concerted effort to ruin him financially take place, have his reputation ruined, or any of the other stuff happen.  If Fred's ordeal is any indication, the brownshirts are alive and well, but I don't think Fred is one of them.The one fact I would alter in my previous post is Rabbi Bauer's support for "no gas chambers".  Bauer supported Fred's methods, not necessarily his conclusion.  I tried in vain to contact Bauer, on where he differs with Fred.  Fred has high regard for Rabbi Bauer.  The Polish forensic investigation(which came soon after Fred's!) did not come to the same conclusion as Fred, but did essentially duplicate Fred's data collection methods and results.There was testimony at the Nuremburg trials by both inmates and German staff that homocidal gassings took place in those camps in Germany.  In 1960, physical and chemical tests showed that no gassings occured there.  It took 16 years(1976) for Simon Weisenthal to admit that no gassings took place in those German concentration camps.  A former inmate at Auschwitz has said that no homocidal gassings took place there.  But all this isn't to say that the Auschwitz gassings didn't occur, but rather to simply say that some may think they didn't occur and for that they shouldn't be condemned...unless the idea is to create an enemy out of sincere people like Fred
0 STARS - it's like watching a recruitment video for the KKK (filled with errors). I counted ~15 factual errors (aka lies) during Michael Moore's opening speech.*I stopped shortly after.I'm not going to waste my time on such obviously factually-wrong fiction.  How stupid does Mr. Moore think we are?  I was *there* watching the election unfold, and what he reported is NOT what happened.* Example: He said FOX News pressured NBC, cbs, abc, and cnn to change their minds, and give Florida to Gore, and then Bush.  What a load of lies.  FOX news has no power over the other nets.  NBC, cbs, abc, cnn operate independently, and reached their decisions independently, without influence from Fox.* And furthermore, the other nets did NOT call for bush (as Moore falsely claimed).  They labeled Florida "undecided", and left it that way for several days.* Also, Moore claimed that a recount showed Gore won Florida.  FALSE.  A bipartisan committee counted the votes a few months later, and not only did Bush win, but the recount *increased* his lead from a few hundred to several thousand, because of conservative communities in western Florida.  (Many other non-biased groups found the same result.)This video reminds me of his Columbine documentary, where men's ties kept changing colors in the middle of their speeches (it's called creative editing).   Moore has no ethics.  Propagandist.As far as I'm concerned, he's no better than a KKK member.Same mental disorder & illogic.
Brang, Brang...They Shot It Down. "Brangelina" shooting big guns at each other didn't do it for me, no matter how beautiful they (the stars or the guns) are.  My wife said it reminded her of "The War of the Roses" with Michael Douglas and Kathleen Turner, which I enjoyed.  Other than the very basic premise of hubby and wife trying to kill each other, I couldn't see much in common between that clever and entertaining film and this very predictable star and firepower vehicle.  Maybe it was intended as a date movie for dual markets--big guns for the guys and tabloid stars for the girls.  It's appeal escaped me
Boot Legged. The movie plays fine but it is obvious that Amazon sent me a bootlegged cd
no title. What a disappointment!  I remember Siskel and Ebert raving over this romantic comedy.  Romantic, maybe, but comedy - never.  Very predictable plot from beginning to end.  And Rosie Perez was truly offensive.  A few times I couldn't understand what she was saying.  There is no way I could buy that she and Cage's character were attracted to each other.  Maybe critics liked this movie because it had no sex, violence, or rough language.  Although Cage does get shot in one hold-up scene.  It was just that you knew what was going to happen every step of the way.  I am beginning to Like Cage more and more as he ages. [ spoiler] I was really disappointed at the end to find out that the real people whom this story is based on were always happily married to their original partners.  Either they shouldn't have changed it so much or they shouldn't have let us know about the real story it was based on.[end of spoiler]  But Fonda and Cage were very engaging together
Poor HD-DVD. I own both Blu-ray and HD-DVD movies, and have been consistently dissapointed with all the HD-DVD's.  They just don't compare to Blu-ray.  The Hulk was not a very good movie to begin with, and the transer to HD-DVD was not impressive.  Picture quality was average at best, and the sound quality was also mediocre.  I have yet to find any HD-DVD that is even comparable to the best of Blu-ray
Remember when you thought talking genitals were all the rage?. Ultimately nothing more than a snuff film for girls who like to get it on with the same sex via an alpha male vessel, Spikester goes to great lengths to make his locker room-talk experiment seem a product greater than the sum of its parts. Coffin-size office floors, psychic monkey sidekicks, a cabinet that spills onto an exit ramp, dysfunctional imps who made faces at the dinner table when they were kids and the "faces" stuck, Pinocchio fetishes. Watching "Being John Malkovich" appears to be a bit like going to a carnival put on by Aphex Twin. I'd rather drill holes through my kneecaps so I can whistle while I walk
Sealab 2021. I was very disapointed with the movie.  But the product was in good shap
Bond with no taste. Misconceived portrayal of James Bond 007 is not true to Ian Fleming's creation and cannot hold a candle to Sean Connery. No knowledge of food or champagne. The true Bond is a gourmet and wine connoisseur. Craig exposes his wweaknesses to all and sundry. The real 007 keeps his weaknesses concealed as all true Spooks do. Dr. Michael Lim The Travelling Gourme
Based On Conspiracy Theories Rather Than Historical Evidence. In a very convoluted plot, Harvard professor Robert Langdon (Tom Hanks) and cryptologist Sophie Neveu(Audrey Tautou) are chased through the streets of Paris and London by the French police and a crazed religious fanatic named Silas. It's your typical Hollywood action-thriller in most respects. Yes, it's silly and unrealistic. But if that's all there were to it I might go along with the "it's only a movie" argument.Unfortunately, this movie is also full of ideas, ridiculous ideas that run counter to the historical facts. As an atheist, I certainly have no problem that the movie brings up some of the darker moments in Christian history. For example, the Inquisition, the witch burnings and the Crusades are all mentioned. Yet these actual historical events are only brushed over. Instead the movie focuses on making up some bizarre conspiracy theory that the Catholic Church is involved in a grand cover-up to prevent the public from knowing the truth about Christianity. For example, it states that not only were Jesus and Mary Magdalene married and had children but that their bloodline has continued to the present day. They also portray a secret Catholic society that is involved in murder plots, strange sexual rituals and all manner of evil activities. It's completely fair to challenge the Church on its grave errors. For example, the shameful Inquisition involved the murder and tortue of many innocent people. I also disagree with the Vatican's present opposition to legal abortion and birth control. However, the sort of ridiculous conspiracy theory that this movie suggests is the worst sort of anti-Catholic bigotry. It's also dangerous to society as a whole as demonstrated by how similar lies and falsehoods have been historically used against Jews to justify brutal acts of anti-Semitism, including the Holocaust. No, I don't think it's likely that the "Da Vinci Code" will lead to the mass execution of Catholics. But any time a particular group is scapegoated it's a potential source of trouble.Basically, "The Da Vinci Code" is a bunch of mumbo jumbo, distorted information and flat out lies that are not supported by the evidence. But, unfortunately, as P.T. Barnum said, "there's a sucker born every minute," and some people are going to believe this nonsense. History is a complex subject and I have no respect for people, whether they be the book's writer, Dan Brown, or the film's director, Ron Howard, who play fast and loose with the truth in order to make a buck. This is garbage. Don't waste your time
Cost me more than $200 dollars. I am a fairly active woman and a physician.  I jog or treadmill daily and have been a yoga fan for years.  I tried this video for the first time at 22 weeks, and literally could not get off the floor after I finished.  I have had to see my OB and a chiropractor for a sprained sacroiliac joint.  The isolated leg movements basically caused me to sprain my pelvis.  In addition to being unable to walk and having to give up exercise *entirely* for several weeks, I've spent hundreds of dollars seeking treatment for this injury.If you're in your first trimester, or really used to pilates, maybe you can try this, but given the amount of relaxin in pregant bodies and the propensity for joint laxity, I am sticking to yoga and staying away from this or any other pilates tape
Getting Older Not Better. The Prisoner of AzkabanYoung Harry suffers as an adopted child and family servant. An insulting relative is blown away, and Harry leaves too. A magic bus takes him away. The special effects are extravagant, but seem senseless. The oddities are like something out of "Star Wars", amazing but irrelevant. The `Hogwarts' school seems to be overproducing the amount of wizards needed for their economy. Or do they have a short life in their future? Great power may create great faults.The computer generated images are what makes this film interesting. The hippogriff looks great! Let's hope it doesn't drop anything on the students. Sirius Black has escaped from Azkaban, where they keep the wizards who have gone bad. Black is said to be going after Harry Potter! This time we see the game of quidditch played in the rain. The winter scene and the invisible Potter recalls "The Invisible Man". Overall there is a creepy feeling to the adult characters in this film. The story begins to drag in the middle, but a big black dog shows up to drag Ron into his underground lair. A tree comes to life and attacks Harry and Hermione. Then they find a secret tunnel that leads to the castle and a surprising revelation. [Does any of this make sense to you?]Special effects are no substitute for a good story. It seems confused and meaningless. Can the wing loading of a hippogriff support three people? All seems to end well given the prior events. Professor Lupin resigns, his secret life-style has been found out and the parents of his students won't approve of this behavior. Parents don't like a teacher who exploits the students."Harry Potter" panders to children in giving superhuman powers to a select few who aren't fit to handle these powers. Or is this a subtle criticism of the aristocratic ruling class?
UH...NO!!!. Don't even think about it
Too Long Unnecessarily. Not very well done and boring to the extreme, overdone on the wolf character, definetly not a kids movie. Way too long and seemed to get stuck in the middle so to speak.  Definetly would not recommend it to anyone.  Most scenes could have been left out entirely,  most were just crude; it just seemed to go on and on, needlessly . Just plain bad
Why did they bother?. The books are witty and charming. This, in stark contrast, is formulaic schlock. Americans -- and much of the world's consumers -- prefer their entertainment predigested so it doesn't require chewing, so they consume the same nutritionless movieland cliches endlessly.In the land of limitless equality, everything is reduced to equal tastelessness. If you want impart the capacity for discernment to your child, you could start by avoiding this twaddle. The Eloise books are special, while this movie is mere product
The ending of this movie is SO STUPID!. Apparently, the Coast Guard only has one swimmer. When he disobeys orders and gets trapped in a sinking boat, their only choice is to send in the retired guy with mental problems who spaces out every time he sees a red flair. I mean, come on! Ashton Kutcher wasn't believable for a second in this film. It was pretty bad
Amazon Extremely Slow To Deliver. Item purchased Jan 30th 2007 and as of March 8th it still has not been shipped
Deathcab for Ambien....zzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzz. "Touring is an emotional rollercoaster"...wow guys, tell me something that Steve Perry didn't cover about twenty years ago when Journey did their own 'my life on the road is hard", video. blah blah blah. If you're looking for new ideas or insights you aren't going to find them here. If you are looking for any visual stimulation besides the "random town through window" b-roll, good luck. I admit, I love their music and, in print, Deathcab interviews well...but this little filmstrip fails to capture either very well. Which probably is less of a critique on the band than the film-maker/editor. (Who knows what a better cutter might have come up with.) On the PRO side, they did shoot it all in 16mm and some of the extras (the Lightness demo in particular) are excellent. Buy their music?  YES, see them live?  - YES. Buy this DVD? Only if you want something to half-watch while your doing your taxes.
No, thanks. I will not be buying this version. I have no desire to have a cherished Christmas classic with it's cover despoiled by an obnoxious picture of an obnoxious "musician".I will keep searching pre-owned DVD outlets for the previous DVD release of this, the one which hasn't been defaced by an ill-concieved marketing gimmick.What were they thinking? The people who don't care would have bought this either way, but they've lost those of us who do care. Seems to me like a counter-productive strategy. The people at Sony who made this decision should be fired
My 4 yr old thought it was scary.... From a parents view I definetly thought this sequel was violent comparedto the first one.  We saw this at the the theater, and almost had to leave.If your expecting this to be just like the first one, you'll be upset.  For afamily with young children, I would suggest renting this before you buy it
Outland on the cheap. I attempted to watch DARK DESCENT but failed. I saw enough to recognize that this seemed to be a remake of OUTLAND which in turn was a Sci-Fi translation of HIGH NOON. Both OUTLAND and HIGH NOON are classics with great casts and well crafted scripts, but DARK DESCENT is a remake of these classics only in the sense that Frankenstein's Monster is a recreation of humanity. Some of the parts are there, but you don't want to take them home. There is a lot of dialogue, none memorable, and little action. The plot pacing favors insomniacs. Many of the actors are unknown even in their own native countries, whatever they may be. Let's not forget the special features, which consist of a menu that offers a single &quot;choice&quot;: &quot;play movie&quot;, thus demonstrating that the menu's only useful function is to demonstrate that it has no useful function. I gave the movie one star because it is better than daytime television, but my advise is get OUTLAND and watch the best Space Western ever made
Poor man's truth serum: caffeine and sugar. There is a pattern in Hollywood when it comes to drama/revenge films such as Eye for an Eye.  It is an extremely simple pattern that is regenerated time and time again because audiences like to not be surprised.  They are prepared for the bad guy to die at the end, whilst the victim or top-billed actor/actress comes out as the hero at the end.  It is meant to give us a sense of security and comfort, but for this critic it is getting old.  Eye for an Eye is a perfect example of film that falls deep within that tired genre of film.  From the opening credits of this film, you could count the steps that each actor was going to make all the way to the very end.  The pauses could be guessed, the lines could have been written the night before, and the acting was nothing short of mediocrity at its best.  It was guaranteed that the actors would be overly dramatic, the violins would always shrill around Kiefer, and there would be horrendously underdeveloped plotlines that would lead nowhere.  This is your typical revenge film with no excitement, no frills, nothing that would make it stand out from the rest.  The late director John Schlesinger played it safe with one of his final films, which will promise to bore and completely not satisfy you to the bitter end.Where did Eye for an Eye go wrong?  I don't think I need to count all the ways for you, but some of the bigger issues that I had with this feature was the complete unknown of the characters.  I have major issues with stories that escape realism to allow the main character to seem more dramatic.  What was Sally Field's job?  I know that is a small detail, but it better highlights my complaint that our central family (the McCanns) were not as developed as I would have liked to have seen.  I had no clue her daughter had a stutter until two seconds before her death, yet it seemed to be a bigger key element as the film progressed.  Ed Harris literally walked through his character, proving that Field's husband could have been played by a plastic bag and still seen the same level of emotion.  The only character worth watching, and was developed briefly, was Kiefer.  He was 100% evil in this film and it kept this film geek worth watching until the very end.  Yet, we didn't even know that much about him either (which upset me).  Schlesinger obviously knew the story that he was about to tell with Eye for an Eye very well, the actors I believe even knew the story and they probably didn't even need to read the script, and the story played it safe from the beginning, but it wasn't what I wanted to see.  I expected film like this to come out during the 80s, not in 1996.  It was pathetic to see name actors like Ed Harris, Sally Field, Phillip Baker Hall, Keith David, and Kiefer Sutherland walk through this film like it was a fly in the pan.  Nothing stood out in this film, nothing made me want to rewatch the brutality of it, and nothing made me feel excited about these actors.  This was a literal "nothing" film.  It lent nothing to the cinematic world except (and I stress this a bit) another peg in a very tired genre known as the "Revenge Thriller".After watching this film I said to my wife that I thought Sally Field was completely overdramatic throughout the course of it, overplaying the small parts and completely exploding the bigger elements, which made me think of a High School drama production.  It was amateur at best, but she said that is why directors use Sally, because she is known for being overly dramatic.  This is a pure example of a good thing gone badly.  Sally saw success with it once, but as she continues it only creates bad cinema.  There were times during Sally's bigger speeches that I found myself laughing.  I couldn't help myself, but her focus on certain words and clich reaction to others just seemed cardboard instead of lifelike.  The same could be said for Ed Harris who obviously has discovered that he doesn't have to play the outlaying father any further in films.  He was completely wasted in this film.  Was there any emotion with him?  I didn't see any.  Then there was the pitiful contribution by Hall and David that begin with intrigue, but were dropped faster than a big ole sack of potatoes.  Also, did Mantegna take a class on how to be a one-dimensional clich?  Urg, his portrayal of the police office was a disgrace to those that genuinely play one-dimensional police officers.  Again, the only actor worth watching was Kiefer because he not only spoke with evil, but demonstrated that he was capable of anything vile.  It was his sole performance that made this film decent to watch to the end.If I have to talk about the story I think I am just going to go mad myself.  Field over dramatized the entire film, thus creating uncertainty amongst the viewer.  Did Kiefer get a bad image because he was bad or because Field wanted to see him as evil?  That could have been a great avenue for this film to travel, but alas, ole safe Schlesinger didn't take us down that darker path.  I needed more to develop what Hall and David were doing at the support groups, but it seemed like that story was dropped rather quickly as the ending needed to be wrapped up gently in a comfort blanket for viewers.  This was yet another dark avenue that was not explored.  I felt as if I saw these dark avenues with the director and the cast, yet we chose to stay on the lighted path.  That, coupled with the poor acting, just created a film that didn't catch my attention and fully contributed nothing to the cinematic world.Overall, in case it wasn't obvious, this wasn't a good movie at all.  In fact, I could go through the rest of my life without thinking of this movie again.  I thought only horror movies had the stated Scream rules and somehow could stick to the same tired pattern over and over again, but with Eye for an Eye it became obvious that it the "Revenge Thrill" fell into that same pattern.  The only trouble is that horror films actually have fun with that repetitive structure, this film did not.  Sally Field was horrible and should really consider a strong independent film to bring her back to the spotlight, while everyone else was forgettable.  The only fun part was watching Jack Bauer play the epitome of evil.  Watch this film for Kiefer, but nothing else.  Skip it!Grade: * out of ****
Natural Born Killer's  /  Y Tu' Mama Tambien (except not as 1/2 as good as either). Well I bought the VHS version of this film for three bucks at half price books because while I was glancing over the back I noticed that it was directed by Gregg Araki. I am not what you would call an Araki fan just because I had only seen one mof his other films before this one, Mysterious Skin. I happened to absolutly love that film, I really didnt know of Araki's other works so when I saw that Araki made "The Doom Generation" I was excited to see how this film compared to "Mysterious Skin" ...After veiwing "The Doom Generation" I can conclude that this film is in no where near as good as "Mysterious Skin".I thought that the way the this film was shot was kind of cool and unique but I also thought that the camera angles and all-around visuals were somewhat hard to see, the lack of lighting made some of the shots so dark that you could only see the make-up on the girls face.The acting was substantial at most. All three of the main charactors did OKAY during the sex scenes but seemed somewhat lacking during the scenes where they were just driving around or talking.The screenplay was very unique and could have been pretty good but I think that the movie put in so much of the run time into the sex scenes and focused on them so much that the short film (about 80 mins) did not have enough time to develop a plot and explain in more detail why the girl was known as "Sunshine" as well as a few other important details. In the end the screenplay just seemed like a jumbled and very confusing mess.Though everything in the film was either unexplained or just plain dumb I found myself pretty involved in what was happening as well as what was going to happen.I think that if the film ran about 2 hours, had three times the budget and had a script that explained things a bit better than it did, then it would have been a pretty good flick ...If you want to see a good Araki flick than you should see "Mysterious Skin". It had some outstanding acting, A well thought out and memorable screenplay & some stand out directoral efforts ... I also know that Araki made another film called  "Totally Fu*ked up!" that I have not yet seen.Grade: D
Yawn. My main dispute with this Cinderella romance between young sisters and the conveniently available rich bachelor's from far away America -- it's rated R.  Why did the director feel it necessary to tell what is essentially a chocolate-chomping girl's heartbreak with nudity and graphic groping?  Teens love their romance, boy-girl breakups, and crush's.  This media world of overt-sexuality and easy porn - come on --- let the kids have their childhood.Oh, how many young sis' have coveted their older sister's boyfriends.  All of them! And that sexual awakening thing is happening at breakneck speed, but in 60 percent of American girls - the actual event begins with marriage. In this film marriage is not portrayed as something folks do for love: the sisters want to marry up at any cost.  Is that a good lesson for teen gals?Perhaps I'm not being fair on the philosophical side, but how about a believable story we can care about?  You won't find it in I Capture the Castle.  You'll instead discover your first yawn developing about ten minutes into the production as the eccentric wife does her nude scene, the eccentric writer does his prison scene, the girls do their not enough to eat in this romantic castle scene, and suddenly the guys show up like Price Charmings out of nowhere like we haven't seen that one before.  I'm sorry.  I think I'll take a nap.
Two hours of misery among losers. For me, my low rating of this film might be, at least in part, the result of having wrong expectations about it.I had heard this film described as 'charming' and 'funny,' and was expected a comedy, albeit a somewhat black one. But despite the good acting, this film left a sour taste in my mouth.It is a dismal and agonizingly dreary film about people you never come to care about. I am an avid foreign language film buff, but I could not see the merit in this crude, hate-ridden and depressing story.
:( Sadly :( Disappointed :(. I am an Alice fan, so this is far far from my favorite.  The first star I gave was simply because I love Kate Beckinsale and the movie isn't scary.  The other is because It would be enchanting for a 3-4 year old or another youngster that doesn't know anything about Wonderland.  My 9 year old even got bored with this.  Kate Beackinsale plays the Mother in the beginning, and in 1999 she was much too young to be and definitely looked so.  She just didn't look well in this movie, and everything looked so cheap and fake.  The story was changed in all the wrong places and too much was left out.  I would not recommend this.  I would recommend the 1999 American mini series of Alice in Wonderland, it is my absolute favorite; with Martin Short as the Mad Hatter, and a long list of big names.  That one is fun for all ages
Like to waste your time? Then you'll love this one. I saw this one in the theater after a friend of a friend convinced me to see it with him (he was seeing it for a second time.) After the first ten minutes, I wanted to leave. If you like formulaic and predictable movies that attempt to convince dumb American youth from small, hick towns that they actually have a future beyond their local Wal-Mart or becoming mince-meat in Iraq, then this movie is for you!  However, if you like movies that actually challenge you to think, don't waste your time with this one
this dvd sux big time!!!!!!!!. this dvd is a waste of time. it's just a rip off.i do muso shinden ryu iaido n i have to say the techniques are all excecuted without zanshin at all. he seems to be rushing thru his techniques.....can't wait to get to the bank to cash in, perhaps?????the tameshigiri part was okay tho. to the guy who was doing the cutting, parctice more. as i know the chopped parts aren't suppose to go into orbit, its supposed to alide off after a slight pause.but i have to say i liked the old footage of the japanese doing the katas, wished there was more footage of that.the final word is.....it might be captivating to biginners and people who do not have knowledge in iaido.....but not to those who have the knowledge.ps....i wanted to givr a lower rating, but unfortunately the lowest i can givr is 1 star
I'm embarassed. I am embarassed to admit that I saw this video several years ago; I give it 2 stars.  I suppose the film quality is excellent, but in my opinion, a waste of film to make this.  The plot is forgettable, and, at the risk of offending those who like it, "I spent two hours out of my life watching this, and can't get them back again for something constructive.
The Magic isn't There. This is a fantasy film about a family of witches in modern times. The Owens girls are hereditary witches, any man who loves one is doomed to an early death. There is a scene where a woman asks for a love potion, this requires the sacrifice of a dove. Two little girls watch. Years later they're grown up. One leaves to live with her boyfriend. But the curse returns and a boyfriend is run over by a truck (never stand in the middle of a road). We see scenes where the neighbor kids yell "witch", as if to symbolize something.Sally goes when Jillian calls her; she has a problem with her boyfriend. But Sally uses a "magic potion" to eliminate the problem. Now Jillian wants to undo what was done. [The film began to lose me now, it wasn't funny.] The spell goes awry, they bury their mistake. Then there is a scene where the ladies are all giggles. Later an investigator comes around looking for Jimmy. [The story drags again.] More scenes follow; they are not funny or scary or even entertaining. But a scene in the attic will wake you even if you're snoozing! They call some friends over to cast a spell to drive a demon out of Jillian. It seems to work, even if they don't use the standard issue witches broom. There is a sort of happy ending.Sandra and Nicole are good actresses, but they can't cast a spell to improve the script of one of the worst movies I've ever seen. "Bell, Book, and Candle" is a funnier film, "Blair Witch" is a scarier film. This falls between the cracks.
In the shadows of Prague. This film is a documentary, not a movie.  For those of you who admire European films with honest, casual nudity, this film may not be for you.  European films with honest, casual nudity usually are non-pornographic in content.  This film brings the anatomy down to a degrading level.  If you want to view this film, fine, but be prepared for some tears and nausea.  This film is not for the faint-hearted.Though here in America we do need to let loose our prudishness when it comes to casual nudity, yet, to Europeans who tolerate young children being victims of sexual exploitation I ask, where are your child protection agents, your social workers, your law-enforcement agents, your religious leaders and, for crying out loud, the parents?I admire Europe's easy-going ways when it comes to casual nudity, whether on the screen or on their beaches, but when you view this film, you might think that a lot has to be said for the way we protect our children in America against sexual exploitation.  I cannot think of a more vicious, sinister crime.  I believe the body has a soul, only these young lads were cheated out of a healthy outlook on the body, let alone a normal, healthy childhood.  My poor heart just cries out to them.  I practically saw the devil through that pornographer in question.I was going to rent "Angels, But Not Angels," but this film, and "Mandragora", were enough for me
Role Model?  Far From It. Jessica Simpson is a talentless bimbo.  She is more concerned with shopping than she is with being a singer role model - a title that she so proudly proclaimed after bashing Brittany and Christina for showing too much skin.  We all know now that the hypocritical Jessica Simpson would shed her clothes if the price were right.  She is NOT a role model and her songs/tv specials are lower than below average
only has one hot guy--billy. I just bought this movie recently, and was disappointed with the results. I don't recall the amount of guys there was for the photo shoots, but the only decent looking one was billy, and he was the very last athlete.  Not what I call a good buy. Don't bother with buying this one. Next!
Only if you absolutely must have both versions in one set. My chief complaint stems from the "seamless branching" technique used on this DVD set. Instead of providing discreetly separate copies of theatrical and extended versions as with the 4-disker, apparently only the theatrical version is wholly present on this set and in the case of the extended edition, seamless branching accesses different areas of the disc, inserting extended footage into the theatrical version on the fly (back and forth, back and forth...). In theory this shuttling from one area to another is imperceptible to the viewer, although one does wonder about player wear and tear that this playback method must introduce.Perhaps hi-end DVD players genuinely do provide a seamless experience, unfortunately this is not true of my players (one computer DVD drive, one stand-alone). There are significant freeze-frame pauses every time the player jumps to access a remote section of film. No, this is far from "seamless," rather, it is very distracting.A much lesser complaint, although one still worth mentioning, is the physical condition of the two disks in the set that I bought: Side A of disk 1 was marred to a surprising degree with scuffs and scratches, looking much more like a used video rental than a new disk. Disk 2 was also marred but with an odd pitted mottling in one area. Even more surprising is how these defects don't appear to impact playback-- for example, the theatrical version plays without incident. I should also note that I did not purchase this set from Amazon, however I certainly wish I had purchased the 4-disker through Amazon as originally planned.Odds are I'll either buy the 4-disker for its superior features, or compile my own extended version on the computer to eliminate seamless-branching lag. Well, at least the theatrical and extended versions of this film are in the same set, and the new-but-too-short documentary is good
Awful. The depression era introduction was the best part of this movie as another reviewer mentioned. From the moment they reached King Kong's island the movie quickly spiraled to a painful viewing experience. I felt no sympathy for the big stupid ape. How can anyone feel anything for King Kong? He keeps a village hostage to a tiny part of an island, forces them to provide him sacrificial women, and tortures the female star of the movie. It seems so ridiculous that she ends up liking King Kong. The villains of the movie were my heroes. I kept hoping they would succeed in killing him so the pain of this awful movie would end
Vintage Garbage - Modern Marketing. This DVD set is just plain awful.Obscure, bottom-of-the-sewer episodes replete with authentic 1950s television broadcast quality.Avoid this purchase like the plague
Another Crime Against Humanity by Eric Shaeffer. Since, it would appear, all of Mr. Shaeffer's friends have weighed in with their positive reviews, it is time for some reality: This movie is the most self indulgent waste of celluloid/videotape/ metallic disk I have ever witnessed. I would have alotted it zero stars if that had been an option. To add insult to injury, the DVD release of this film contains Shaeffer's egotistical ramblings about how brilliant he is. He also defends himself against his legion of critics with the oft-repeated phrase, &quot;Get over it.&quot; It must be heard to be believed. There are numerous offenses against humanity contained on this film, but perhaps the most obvious is Shaeffer's casting of the extremely handsome actor Eric Mabius as a late teen/early 20's Wirey. Apparently Left on the cutting room floor was the nuclear accident that transforms Mabius into Shaeffer later in the film. As of this writing Shaeffer has another opus in production. It is hard to imagine it topping this mess, but, like a car wreck, I will feel compelled to see it
Ugh.... She calls herself a "singer"? She was lipsynching the whole way! Why can't she use her skanky abilities in adult performances? Sure, she can move and is a hell of a performer, but the fact that her voice is so feeble is like an insult to talented singers. Shame.
The DVD Cover Sums It All Up. From what was a landmark study by ethnobiologist Wade Davis into the folk preparations in the creation of zombies and the belief system associated with Haitian voodoo came a Eurocentric mess of a movie with the same title that was originally released in 1988.It was reported at the time that Davis only agreed to sell the rights of the book if Peter Weir was hired as the movie director and Mel Gibson would play the leading role (based on Davis). Neither person was ever involved in the movie project.The DVD cover tells the story as presented by director Wes Craven; the movie strips the book of its exploration into the real history and customs of the religious practices unique to Haitian society and pounds away at the the evilness of voodoo and the destruction it can cause to the human psyche.In the movie, the scientist is in search of a secret voodoo powder that places people in a simulated death. The setting is in a time of political revolution and the movie does touch upon authentic details of Haitian society. But the action degenerates into the overt racism of the horror genre that gets repeated over and over again; the darker the skin, the more evil the sin.To save time and money, purchase the book and appreciate the solid research and writing by Davis & disregard the DVD.
A big letdown. After reading the high praises on the cover of the DVD, I was expecting a good movie.  But it's such a letdown. Compared to The Godfather, this movie can only deserve a 2 stars.  The story line is so predictable, while the dialog is so fake.  All the main characters are just acting.  Don't bother watching this movie, go see The Godfather again.
Pretty Bad Movie. Brokedown Palace is bad.  How bad is it?  It's pretty bad, man.Don't tell me I didn't warn you
I won't say where the smoke is being blown... This film starts out so promising.  It could have been a punchy dramatic piece about the nature of belief, and the legitimacy of the concept of free will.  Instead, the characters dribble into infantile sexuality, and the film becomes a travelog.  I can't believe this film found financing...a real waste of obvious talent.  The effect of the ending is to trivialise the opening premise, hence the film winds up being an exercise in meaninglessness with an unpleasant aftertaste
I don't care so much about the foul language. I'm a big fan of The Sopranos so obviously the F word doesn't bother me but this entire series seems like an excuse to show cowboys say the F word and MF. The stories and characters are superficial, boring and unintelligent.People who like this show are the same people who think that what makes The Sopranos a great show is because people get "whacked" a lot.
lame soft porn. Teruo Ishii stretches the patience of his viewers again with yet another 'pinky violence' offering, continueing the tradition of bad story line, absolutely lame sword-fighting choreography and unappealing sex scenes. Yes, the tale does include women forced to smuggle drugs in their apparently gigantic private parts, but that's not enough reason to watch this. Two stars is generous. My recommendation is to buy yourself some good porn or a good samurai movie, but this combo does not work
The Rock and  Vaughn stole the show. Thankfully I watched this movie having recorded it on my DVR so I could fast forward through most of the scenes with Uma Thurman and John Travolta.  Their scenes and dialogue were so horrible that fast forward was the only way to get through the movie.  Besides, this is not the kind of movie that you really need their dialogue to understand or enjoy it.As usual, Uma's acting is simply dreadful. I tend to avoid any movie with her in it because I know it will be bad.  How she became a "star" in Hollywood is beyond me.  She is not attractive nor can she act.  She could have been replaced by a nobody and it wouldn't have changed the movie one bit.  I think when they need an actress who doesn't mind playing drivel roles, they call her. John Travolta is not much better.  His version of "cool" just doesn't do it for me. His diction is becoming more slurred as the years go by that I hate to hear him speak.  And someone please tell Uma and John that nobdody wants to see them dance so please just stop finding reasons to do so.The ONLY reason I gave this movie 2 stars is because of The Rock and Vince Vaughn.  Their roles were priceless and had me laughing all throughout the movie.  I never grew tired of Vaughn pimping and The Rock primping.  While I fast forwarded through Uma and Travolta's scenes, I tended to rewind during Rock's and Vaughn's scenes; they were so funny I had to see them again.  Cedric the Entertainer was also pretty good.
Not a comedy. I found this movie funny in all the wrong places.  It seemed so To me this movie was atrocious. It wasn't particularly funny in any spots, maybe a dry or dark humor. For me the movie was terrible in the acting of the "young girl". The actress playing the part I'm sure is a good actress, but the part she had to play seemed lacking to say the least.  After the movie started I had to grab the box cover and check to see if she was playing a mentally retarded person.  I am not here to offend mentally retarded people at all.  Finding out that she wasn't supposed to be mentally retarded I spent the rest of the movie wanting to reach into the television and either shake her or slap her for acting so stupid and clueless.  SPOILER ALERT COMING UP!!!  BEWARE!!!Spoiler spoiler SPOILER****** The funniest part of the movie was when the Alan Rickman character `fell to his death'.  The entire time he was running on the dock I kept yelling at the Television that he needed to be wearing deck shoes or he was going to fall, alas, he did and I laughed and for the next 30 or so minutes I kept chuckling about that scene.  Maybe in the end it really was a comedy?I took my copy of this movie and sold it to a used book store for a dollar.
I didn't like this movie, but you do get to see Purcell's nude butt!. I think this is the worst movie I have ever seen! And confusing too! The are a lot of bad flash backs, and fast-fast forward scenes of boats tied up in a dock, with the sun coming up or down.Lew(Dominic Purcell) is laughable as a sign painter.There is actually a scene where he is bent double hammering over his head on to a sign he's working on, that is down on the ground and half burried in the dusty dirt! You can tell he dosen't have a clue to what he is doing!Then after he finds out about the planned kidnapping, he is supposly sneeking, and peeking around bushes. Like a man of Purcell's size(he's 6'1"or so, and wieghs about 200 pounds) can sneek around in someone's front yard and not be seen?  Come on! I kept waiting for someone to call 911 to report a peeking Tom!I have to warn you that there are a lot of sex scenes!  Bad ones at that! I guess the director wanted to get them over with-real fast-to move on to the next badly written scene!At least you get to see Dominic Purcells nude butt! Which maybe the only reason to see this movie, if you like that sort of thing!And Purcell gets beaten up alot-by everyone in this movie. I kept thinking 'come on Purcell your a big guy, you can take that little guy!' And worse a woman beats him up too!I saw this listed as a comedy, well maybe a comedy of errors!While being intervied Dominic Purcell dosen't even mention this movie, when he lists all the movies that he has been-in.And that should say something about this movie, if the guy who starred in it, would NOT even SAY he'd been in it
Cynical Dark Comedy: Fall's Way Short Of The Mark!. I really like dark-comedy. I actually prefer it to regular comedy. However, one of the most important things that I look for is laughter. A film can be very dark, and make you laugh too. And while this film could have been good, the gratuitous violence takes precedence over a good plot,  and the film itself is lost in the "Let's see if we can shock everybody!" attitude of director Peter Berg. What a shame too; afterall, the film had a very talented cast. I have seen many dark-comedies, many that are violent. Yet they all had a common denominator: Violence for a reason, not violence for the sake of violence.This film felt more like watching a train wreck. The longer you watched it, the bigger the wreck got. One [many] of the reviewers wrote that people just don't understand what dark-comedy is. I do! And this isn't dark-comedy. However, I understand that comedy is a personal thing. What may appeal to me, may not appeal to others. Some will enjoy this film, and that's fine. I know that I have my share of comedies that many would consider pretty bad. And that is why I don't mark people with negative hit's. I always felt that a review should enlighten a person. And if it does, the better for it.Therefore, although I disagree with many of the reviews here on the merits of the film, some have put forth some valid reasons why they enjoyed the film. But the film was not that good to me. I have the film in my collection. It was given to me by a relative for a present a few years back. I would not say go out and buy this film, instead, I recommend the film with extreme caution. You must judge it for yourself. One warning however, it is not for children. [Most dark-comedies are not anyway]. So, while I don't think this is a good film, and definetly not a good dark-comedy, you must judge the film yourself. Rent it first. You may or  may not like it. It just didn't appeal to me
eastwood great as always, everything else.....eh. Being a big Eastwood fan, I bought this unseen and watched it for the first time last night.  Eastwood is great, as always, although his cop character in this one displays a little more vulnerability than most of his tough guy roles.  Locke's acting is over-the-top and annoying, as always.  This is a pretty good action movie, but the ending is ridiculous.  After blasting the hell out of this bus, the cops are just going to let Eastwood walk up the steps of city hall with a gun tucked into his waistband?  I mean, no one says a word to him.  And on top of that, he takes the assistant d.a. hostage and Locke's character shoots the police commissioner dead in front of the entire Phoenix police department, and nobody does a damn thing?  Are you kidding?  I'm all for suspending a sense of reality when watching action movies, but give me a break.  This ain't no academy-award winner.  Eastwood is the only thing saving this turkey
what a piece of trash. actually paid good money to see this at the local cinema ! went with a good friend who was a real fan of stokers novel, and before I even got to say a word she had already asked , " what the hell did we just watch , because it wasn`t dracula !" I`d have to agree with her ! the damage that copolla did to the story is absolutely unbelievable !the only thing in the film that even came close to being correct was the death scene at the end of the film , and the fools screwed that up ! another sickening point was the appearance of dracula when harker met him at the castle door , he looked like an old woman , not the aristocratic nobleman of the book .and where did the long red robe come from ? as I recall , dracula was described as a tall old man with a full head of curly hair , red eyes , and protruding canine teeth , dressed completely in black ! hopefully someday there will bwe a film actually based on the novel , this isn`t it !!!
PURE CRAP. This is one of the worst horror movie I ever saw. I just hate it.People dont waste your money renting or buying this crap.  If you want to see it that badly, just watch it on TV, like I did
buy the complete set of the show instead. this is the cut down version of the 3 hour pilot that universel released in theaters after the show went belly up in '78. if you buy the whole series you can skip this pointless rehash that isn't that good or very well thought out
defective merchandise. I received the DVD and it skips, I was very dissatisfied.  I would have returned it , but since I have never had a problem before, I had thrown the receipt away.  Patrice Trace
gay film at its worst. Overrated; slapstick; stupid. This movie gives "gay" a black eye. Don't waste your time. If you want to watch men dress like women and act like female dogs, then you will probably really love this movie. Honestly, you have better things to do with your time...and there are much better gay movies out there.  Try Maurice or Brokeback Mountain
Stupid Ain't Funny. Save your money.  This disk is raunchy (that's how Ron White is), but it's also not very funny, and it's quite short (43 minutes).  If you've seen "Tater Salad", you've already seen a lot of the jokes, and the new ones just aren't making it.  White's a very funny guy, but he needs some good new ideas.
Not worth It. Okay, I normally don't believe in giving bad feedback on an item, but this is one that just isn't worth it. Unless you live in a dance studio, there's no way you can learn this. Also, this is nothing like the dances done at the country clubs.
This idiot barely walks upright. the only thing you need to know about this DVD is that at the end of it he yells "Pray for mother f**cking war!"  This was recorded before the US invaded Iraq. Its one thing to support the troops, but to pray for war?  What a sociopath.Between his repetitive and boring songs, a drunken Zakk rants like an amphetamine addicted pre-pubescent boy with Turrette's Syndrome. Sure, he's a pretty decent guitarist, but he's a one trick pony. If you've heard 3 of his songs, you've heard his entire repertoire of pyrotechnics.  Too bad there's no song writing to go with the posturing.  I've enjoyed watching Zakk play with Ozzy, but on his own, this idiot and his music is just a mess.
OK, 5 Stars for the DVDs, 0 Stars for the inserts. Because...we never got the insert.  All the B5 DVD sets come with a booklet, so when this one showed up without, we returned it to Amazon.  They promptly sent out another one--again, sans booklet even though we had asked them to check.  We returned the second one, and have never received a replacement or the promised credit. So I'm without product and without money.  My follow up emails to Amazon have gone unanswered.Granted, it is Warner's fault that the set came without the booklet, but Amazon has the clout to take Warner to task and insist that they send out complete products.  It would also benefit Amazon, when they get this kind of complaint, to actually OPEN the box before shipping it, and if it is incomplete, to open ALL the boxes and return incomplete products to the manufacturer with directions to send out complete products.  After all, it is Amazon's reputation that is damaged.I am hoping that eventually, somewhere, we will find this set with the booklet, but undoubtedly it will be at a physical store, not online
Problem With These Discs. Is anyone else having issues with these discs? When you first place the discs in the player, it skips over the main menus. Then the "menu" button will only start and stop the episode selected, but it will not return you to the main menu. There is no Spanish or Portuguese dubbed audio on the discs (despite what the menus and packaging claim) and the episodes automatically play with Spanish subtitles even when the subtitles are turned "off." The only way to avoid this is to choose "other" subtitles with the remote. This appears to be an authoring issue, as I am using a two year-old Sony Dream System DVD player and have not had these issues with previous seasons. I'm exchanging my discs immediately, but I have a feeling they might all be bad. Anyone else hear about these issues
The Trip ...............................................to Hell. I was majorly disappointed in this mega award winning film. I give it a generous 2 stars because the actors were good and portrayed their characters very well. Photography was also good as was sound quality. None of this means a thing to me as the whole movie was stupid. This COULD HAVE BEEN a great film but the story was majorly lacking. The love story was good but you see very little of it in the whole film. Most of it revolves AROUND the story at what took place when the two were broken up. "The Trip" sequence was the best part of the whole thing, but very short and by this time, the two characters were doomed to never be together except for only a couple days when all was lost. If you're looking for something with a happy ending, this is not even close! In fact if you're looking for something with a happy middle, you will be disappointed with this one. The only real accomplishment to this film is the fact that a plant survived all the way through the 11 years spanned by this meaningless, very poorly written tale. (most likely to die in the deserts of Mexico). It is a chaotic, weird tale of the 70's radical gay demonstration era which praises drug addiction, hippies, yuppies and irresponsible sexual endulgence. It is a flaming queen kind of production and if you are anywhere near mainstream, I suspect you will, as I did, find it repulsive and just way too far out there! It is such portrayals of the gay lifestyle as this, which makes society in general hate all gays. I think there are a WHOLE LOT BETTER avenues for gay film making than this film could ever dream of. Perhaps if you have a widescreen television you will be able to see the whole picture or even read half the credits which are cut off on both sides of the screen for some unexplained reason. Very poor film making. I couldn't have been more disappointed. My recommendation is to pass on this one. There are plenty of good films out there to spend your money on. This isn't it. I had high hopes all thoughout "THE TRIP", that things would finally warm up and start going somewhere. It didn't. If you watch this one, I hope you get more out of it than I did.
Should sink 20,000 Leagues its so bad. This movie is apallingly bad.  I found that it has only a casual resemblance to the Jules Verne novel.  Aside from the Nautilus and Nemo, the rest of the story is made up from scratch, and is not very imaginative. The special effects are lackluster, and obviously cheap CGI work (a la Sci Fi Channel productions).  The story only vaguely resembles the Verne plot, with romance playing a large part of the new interpretation.  The dark soul of Verne's Nemo is lost, as is Nemo's twisted notion of waging war against the nations of the world, to end war and human suffering.  Its on TV enough, along with another similar remake, to avoid buying this sinker
One of the worst movies ever. The other reviewer must be related to this director.This is ONE of the worst movies I've seen, though right now I can't think of one that ranks below it.I was just about to shut if off at one point but made myself stick with it because there wasn't anything on TV.The acting was laugh out loud bad, the business about the shooter going insane went on and on and on. Yeah, beat the viewers over the head since they are too stupid to get it that he's traumatized.Several scenes started or ended without explnation. Scenes of, say, a card game, a game of catch with a soccer ball, and others - were supposed to be on different days but were clearly all shot the same day with actors wearing the same clothes, positioned the same and with props in the same place.I could go on but why bother.The story concept was a good one and needs to be told, but this was an embarassing attempt and casts a terrible light on Korean cinema.
From the opening credits. featuring cookie-cutter travel log footage of Scandanavian scenery to the very last scene with 30 exhausted extras shouting "God Save the King" at three better than average actors standing ill at ease on a wooden platform, it was all pretty disasterous.I knew that it was a no go at the first syllable of the "narration."  Instead of showing us the murders of Amleth's father and brother, we were told about it.   Instead of showing us the horror and mystery of Amleth's father's ghost appearing to him and telling him of his uncle's treachery, we were told about it.The poor actors were given almost nothing to play.  I imagine that they were pining for Shakespeare's genius for writing superbly playable scenes and dialog. He would never have left his actors so stranded.The story and the actors deserved far better.  What a total waste of celuloid.
Could you last from dusk to dawn?. I don't know how I managed to see this gory splatterfest TWICE in college.It's a terrible movie (next to that other awful movie "Wild Wild West" which also stars Salma Hayek)Quentin Tarantino&George Clooney play a pair of ne'er do wells who take a family hostage.They end up going to a strip joint filled with evil vampires...and battling them until dawn.Turns out that the strip joint is built on top of an Aztec temple,hence the bloodsucking strippers.George Clooney managed to overcome this,as well as "Batman&Robin" to get into "Syriana"&"Good Night,and Good Luck." He's a talented actor;too bad he couldn't save this movie through sheer charm.When it comes to heists,he's better in "Ocean'e Eleven" as a dapper casino-robbing metrosexual.Avoid this movie,unless you REALLY like gruesome,violent movies..
should have been better!!!!!. given that the first one was made and broadcast in 1979,this remake should have been better than this. all this one does is to make the 1979 version look even better(and it looked great then and still does today)!in tring to bring the story up to date they have once again missed the feeling of mr.king. the vampire is just part of the overall picture,and please read the novel,like the unlike first mini-series this one misses the boat in making the people come off as real,and the terror of the story is drained(pun ment)away as they don't let you get to know the people! a wasted chance here!!
Not worth the effort. Though not a 'B' movie, this just about scrapes the bottom of the horror barrel. An extremely elementary effort, I found myself endeared to no character, so I wasn't frightened about what might happen to any of them. I was also bored. No character development, no background information, a predictable storyline and ridiculous gore cheapened this film effort. I even wanted to turn off the movie about 30 minutes into viewing, but I figured I'd stick it out. Not worth it
okay melodrama....fuller style. Army sergeant, Robert Stack, working undercover, breaks up a syndicate led by expatriate Robert Ryan, in this hard-boiled melodrama set against the urban sprawl of post-war Japan. Expert commentary by Fuller scholars James Ursini & Alain Silver makes it all seem rather more interesting than it is - yet, effective characterizations abound, notably Stack's taciturn investigator, later honed to perfection as The Untouchables' Elliot Ness, a radiant Shirley Yamaguchi as the love interest, and Robert Ryan as an unusually sympathetic villain (more avuncular than sexually ambivalent, as suggested by some commentators).The letterboxed image is fine, though the drab color transfer blunts the immediacy of Joe McDonald's on-location photography
Lecture format; math and physics references for audience. The moonwalk image on the DVD cover is misleading since there is hardly any mention of that experience in this DVD.  Also, the format was not what I expected. However, there was information in Dr Mitchell's lecture to connect-the-dots between science and ESP research in recent years--primarily methodology to support quantum basis for sensory/extra-sensory data processing.  Promising work is going on.The lecture could have been presented in an audio version as effectively (with a card listing his talking points).
Meet John Doe. I purchased this DVD a while ago - FYI - A documentary of the anaconda was in the case and not the movie.  I went to the web site to complain and my profile could not be found.  Here, years later, when I'm finally placing another through Amazon They found my account and noted that I purchased Meet John Doe.  I guess it's a little late to complain now
What????. I bought this for my dad's birthday.  He is a fisherman.  This movie is one of the worst I've ever seen.  Not entertaining, not funny, not interesting, not even a fishing movie.  I bought it based on several reviews I read.  This is the first time I've been led astray on Amazon.  The "5 Stars" rating must be a review by people with a financial interest in this waste of digital energy
Love Samuel L. Jackson but not as Coach Carter. Samuel L. Jackson seemed somewhat tame in this movie, yet still believable as a coach of a high school in a rough neighborhood. I thought it could have been a little shorter but the time but it's only 76 minutes. That's pretty short. If it was 90 to 120 minutes I guess I would have been as restless as a 6 year old at church. It's kind of dull.
Not good... Just rented this dvd and was quite surprised.  Normally, I'm a big George Clooney and Matt Damon fan.  However, in this film, their talents were underutilized and did not make up for the poor script, editing, and direction which made this film quite dull to watch.While the idea behind the movie is good, it could have been more entertaing, dramatic, or suspensful.  As another reviewer remarked, I was quite tempted to shut it off after 45 minutes and watch something else.  But, I did suffer through to the end, where the film just sort of ends and leaves viewers hanging..
S.W.A.T. Aint nothing great about this movie. I think it moved along real slow. Not even that much action. This movie kinda sucked. If you want to save some time, just stay away from this movie. It isnt nothing great. It isnt worth the rent either. Wasnt really an entertaining movie, thats all I have to say about it
A silly mess. Alright, I'll confess to a slight infatuation with Jet Li, but even that did not make this movie more than passable. The plot is all over the place. It barely made sense - characters would suddenly arrive, locations would develop and then nothing would come of them. The bad guys were just silly - I like real malice and evil in my badies, I like to hate them and enjoy their come uppance. Well the silly twisted bad boy was just pathetic, and Jet Li, ever serene, was so far above the whole mess, so detached and lovely, just going through a very routine job of being Jet Li. The evil imperialist Yankees plotting to capture unsuspecting Chinese immigrants and enslave them were cartoon cuts outs.Like every other enthusiast of this genre I enjoy the carefully choreographed fights and they were good, but not good enough to redeem this film. Give me Kung Fu Hustle any time - now there is quality
Paycheck: A Forgettable Future. Paycheck is a disappointing and sometimes frustrating film because it clumsily toys with a number of potentially brilliant ideas without really knowing what to do with them. These key concepts come courtesy of Philip K. Dick, via his original short story, though the film poorly represents the themes and conceits that have made his stories into unforgettable classics.  As a thriller, Paycheck depends upon our identification with its imperiled hero, but the movie is never able to make us truly care about Ben Affleck's Michael Jennings or his fragile state of mind, and that's something Dick would have found unforgivable. Only Uma Thurman really earns her paycheck here. The premise is high concept, and the prophetic threat is revealed to be of apocalyptic proportion, but Paycheck is never more than a pedestrian action film spun from chains of meaningless chase sequences and flat fight scenes. The future world created by John Woo isn't nearly as engaging or convincing as, say, the captivating science fiction setting crafted by Stephen Spielberg for another high-profile Dick adaptation, Minority Report. For Paycheck, the comparison is not flattering. Sadly, Woo can't even keep himself from forcing his own creative preoccupations into the film, and a resulting motorcycle chase sequence is outright uninspired and may represent the film's low. Some scenes are enjoyable, and there are fleeting flashes of wit and excitement, but much of what unfolds seems inappropriately conceived or placed. Paycheck isn't a smart film and, what's more, it sometimes assumes that its audience isn't even paying attention. As a result, the film never comes close to living up to its potential. The material and the audience deserve better. Unfortunately, Paycheck is forgettable fare and, truly, it is without any real payoff.--Brian A. DixonRevelation Magazin
Dumb and not entertainingly dumb either. Ugh! SWAT is a miserable film. I remember when I was a kid and I'd play at Cops and Robbers with other kids. We'd run around with invisible guns indiscriminately shooting at each other. SWAT has that same mentality and is aimed at the same age group. It's not a movie, it's shamefully disguised pro-NRA propaganda. For all the gun glorification and random violence (PG-13 rated violence remember, as they want to expose this drivel to the little kiddies) there is not one subtle moment that tells us guns are dangerous. Here they are just toys and shooting people is just fun.I shouldn't really complain so hard as for the first whole hour of this film NOTHING happens. It's all devoted to pointless character building which never rises past cliched stereotypes (Michelle Rodriguez expands her range by playing an unhappy, scowling Latino-something she hasn't played before) and is totally ditched with the abrupt, anti-climatic ending.SWAT promises action and the not-quite high concept plot of a crime-lord offering anyone who can break him out of custody a $100 million reward is never fully realised. We could have had 2 whole hours of excitement but we barely get 45 minutes. It's a slow, boring film with absolutely NOTHING to recommend it. Plus it all seems very 70's. I felt embarressed watching it.The DVD is in 2.35:1 anamorphic widescreen with Dolby 5.1 sound. There are extras but do I care
Molotov cocktail please!. God what a turkey! But it was the 80's afterall
ron white? ron pale!. this is the worst performance i've ever seen. i guess this is a pilot for a tv-show that wasnt picked up. good riddance
Informative but difficult to watch. I purchased both of Annie Duke's DVDs. The information is valuable but as a No Limit player,  I found the discussion of both Limit and No Limit distracting.My BIGGEST COMPLAINT is that the setting is identical to a funeral home, including the crimson velvet curtains framing an urn. Ms. Duke wears the same ugly shirt throughout both videos.I would really enjoy these DVD's if they were produced in a visually appealing setting, and if Ms. Duke changed her peasant blouse. It is unfortunate that so much good information is wasted by poor production.
Lots of Promise, Shabby Delivery. I wasn't really expecting much from a budget-label DVD set, but I do pick them up on the cheap when I can find them as a means of screening obscure or hard to find films. That way I can decide whether or not to seek out better, higher-quality editions.In this instance, the films were the sort of 50's and 60's era blood and thunder you'd expect, but the faded, beaten and tinny-sounding public domain/TV prints used left them more anaemic and wheezing than blood and thunder.The fault is not the films, but rather the shabby, low-budget source material and indifferent digital transfer.As the previous reviewer stated, I would be embarassed to screen these for a Bible Study or film appreciation class, but for private home viewing they should tide you over until somebody releases better editions
Huh??. This is a rather peculiar film for Seagal, and the first thing that should be pointed out to any Seagal fan contemplating whether or not to give this one a try is that this is really not an action film.  Seagal only has a couple fight scenes in the whole film and they are all extremely brief.  In fact, they are extraordinarily brief, though thankfully free of wirefu.Though Out of Reach is by no means a total failure (it's actually pretty entertaining, Seagal as always is fun to watch, and some of the scenes are well done), the script nevertheless exhibits some problems and plot holes.  This film is a drama about a nature nut (Seagal) who roams the forest looking for injured animals.  He has a pen pal in Poland, a young girl, and when he hears that she will no longer be able to correspond with him he becomes so upset that he travels abroad to look for her, even though he really has no reason to suspect that anything is wrong with her.  This brings up the main problem with this film, namely, a lot of it simply doesn't make any sense.  It turns out that the girl has been sold to a human trafficking ring, and Seagal goes through the motions to save her.As per usual with Seagal nowadays, he obviously refused to actually finish the production, and so we have the usual dubbing problem here.  It is even more salient than usual in this picture, however, for here we have not one, but several different people dubbing Seagal's voice, none of whom even remotely sound a thing like him!  Here the most frequently heard fill-in for Seagal sounds like a knock-off Benecio Del Toro with a much higher-pitched voice.  As you can imagine, the effect is very humorous.As stated above, the main problem with this movie is that it simply doesn't make sense, which was apparently realized by the director, as he has, in many scenes, the voice fill-in for Seagal narrating an explanation of what the character is thinking! How obnoxious!Seagal's character likes to teach codes and ciphers to his pen pal, which she later uses to communicate with Seagal.  What makes no sense is that every time she leaves a message for Seagal, the villian, ineptly played by Matt Schultz, sees the girl doing it and yet leaves the message for Seagal to find! In one ridiculous scene the girl arranges some caviar on crackers to make a code.  (Apparently three crackers of one kind followed by three crackers of another kind followed by three crackers of another kind means "This is a trap.")  The villain sees her doing this, and, instead of destroying the message (which would make sense), later has it delivered to Seagal! Huh? In a scene when the girl leaves a message on a mirror telling Seagal where she is, the villian sees her doing it, comments on how clever she is, but then leaves the message!There are also quite of few mistakes in this film, several of which are laughably obvious.  At the beginning and end of this film, for example, Seagal has long hair which looks like frizzy, black cotton candy being pulled off the back of his head.  During the rest of the film, however, he has short hair.  At the end, after some BS macho dialogue about how Seagal hates taking life but will enjoy killing Schultz slowly, each character uncocks his pistol even though Schultz's pistol does not have an external hammer to uncock, and even though in the very next closeup Seagal's pistol is still cocked! After a sword fight, which ends on a classic move from older chambara films, notice that there is clearly no blood on the floor, and that then, all-of-a-sudden, there is a huge trail of blood between the two characters.In the finale, the above-mentioned sword fight, the camera cuts between closeups of the two characters to faraway shots that are clearly of someone other than Seagal.  This brings up another frequent complaint of many Seagal fans: his overuse of stunt doubles.  It's almost so bad now that one could say that he doesn't even film his own fight scenes now.  Have you ever noticed that in Lord Steven's early films, when there was a fight scene the camera would pull back and let you see his moves? Now what happens? The camera gets as close as possible, shows some shots of his face grunting, shows some arms playing paddycake, then pulls back showing some fighting while never showing Seagal's face.  Ever wonder why? It's because, surprise, surprise, that's not Seagal doing the fighting.In the gun fight, which is actually a very decent action scene, watch Seagal as he enters the room.  His character enters the fight by doing a foward aikido roll, which is probably the simplest move in aikido, though it is obvious that it is not Seagal doing the roll.  What is even more irksome is that both at the beginning and the end of the film, which shows Seagal's character "roaming the forest looking for injured animals," or whatever, it is clearly not Seagal that we see walking through the forest.  Was he afraid that he'd trip over a branch and injure himself? Was he afraid he'd be attacked by an injured animal in the woods? I don't know.  What is likely the case is that Seagal again refused to finish the shoot and some scenes had to be constructed after-the-fact, using another actor, in order to make the film work.  I'm really not bashing Seagal, I'm merely complaining because these are persistent types of flaws in his recent films that could VERY easily be fixed.Be on the lookout for the bizarre scene when Seagal goes to the post office.  The postal worker calls Seagal "Mr. Delacraw," or some such bizarre name, even though his character's name is actually Billy Ray Lancing.  Seagal then proceeds to mumble some French to the man, and then suddenly adopts a cajun accent.  This scene is downright strange.  What is also strange is how Seagal is dressed in this scene--like some kind of New Orleans Anne Rice fan, vampire wannabe in a strange, black fur coat.  I don't know, at least it's good for a laugh.If Seagal continues in this manner he will quickly find himself unemployable.  The only truly schocking thing is that this hasn't happened yet.  He shows up late to shoots, leaves early, refuses to finish productions, and yet people keep hiring the man.  He repeatedy refuses to do the requisite work for a complete production.  He needs to start finishing his films.  In closing, Out of Reach only has two VERY brief fight scenes, but they are somewhat well done.  Seagal actually takes a few blows in the climatic fight, which is a very nice change and certainly makes his character seem more human.
How good the movie. I seen this movie on saturday the 24 2002. This movie is soo good by the acting. There's pretty alot of action in this flick and pretty funny too. patrick swanye play a good role with his kids. They deathly need a dvd version of this movie I want it soo bad it would be a better picture. They should been create this movie on dvd too bad it's not on dvd yet. maybe this year or next year to be on dvd cause the dvd makers need to bring this out fast it's a real good movie maybe someday i have on dvd when it come out I be real sice
Seagal Saves the Day without Doing Many Actions -- So Boring. When I saw so-so actioner 'Belly of the Beast,' I thought Steven Seagal was well on the way to his 'comeback,' finally realizing that authentic-looking martial arts actions are what gave him the stardom, which is however fading away very fast.  Now I saw this film, and know I was terribly wrong.  His next film 'Out of Reach' is a huge letdown, probably the final nail in the coffin.Don't get me wrong, I really like his films made in the 90s, like 'Under Siege' action-packed escapism entertainment.  In 'Out of Reach' Steven Seagal plays one Billy Ray Lancing, an ex-agent living in the wilds of Canada, where he finds injured animals and bring them to health.  Yet another embironmentally conscious hero from Seagal, but ... doesn't he see that these social messages have nothing to do with making good action films?Add to that, Billy Ray exchanges letters with a little girl Irena living in an orphanage in Poland.  When it is reported that she is missing, and a nasty businee of 'human traffic' is suspected, he travels there incognito, secures a help from the local policewoman (while he has no ID), speaks a bit of French, and hits a PC keyboard like a pro, better than a Polish technichian, to restore a secretly recorded image.  We meet a hissable baddie (Matt Schultz), but anyway we are sure Seagal will win, because he has taught the little girl how to decode the 'cyphers' (and check out how she uses it, a scene which makes unexpectedly hilarious 'you-gotta-be-kiddin' 0moment).So, how about the fact-moving kicking and chopping, once Seagal's trademark?  No, these thrilling martial arts actions are gone forever in this new film.  You just don't have actions in 'Out of Reach.'  As I counted them, well, in the first 40 minutes of 'Out Of Reach' you can see only two action set-pieces: in one, Seagal's hero Billy breaks a few arms and legs of the unkind government agents (about 30 seconds), and much later Billy smashes the glass of hotel bathroom and drops an assassin onto a parked car (another 30 seconds).  That's it, that's all.There are more actions to come, obligatory shoot-outs and sword fights, but not enough to call 'Out of Reach' an action film.  The pace is terribly tedious, the images (when at night) are too dark, and worst of all, not only Seagal but slmost all the Polish cast sleepwalk in the pedestrian story.  Little girl looks bored while she is supposed to be in danger.Finally, about director Po-Chih Leong (fairly good in Jude Law's brooding thriller with a vampire theme 'The Immortal') who is the least likely choice in Seagal's entire filmography to succeed in staging exciting actions, and the results turned out as we feared.  The slow-paced story is sleep-inducing, and what little action bits in the film are amateurish at best, with poorly-constructed shots in which fast editing attempts to conceal Seagal is no longer moving his bodies like he used to do.
Arguably the worst movie of all time... "Camp Stories" is a movie that ironically does not have a story, let along stories.  David (played by Zach Zaylor) is forced to attend a Jewish all-boys camp when he would rather stay home and watch movies all summer.  His parents tell him the reason he must go is, "Because your Jewish!"  I knew I was in for a long 90 minutes when I heard that line.  David quickly establishes himself as a hot-shot when he accepts a challenge from the reigning rafterball champ, Paul (Kris Park) and beats him.  From there, David's camp adventures just get more and more exciting (YEAH RIGHT).  The movie suffers from a lack of anything that would keep a viewer interested.  The actors just plod along in a very episodic manner, there is literally nothing that happens in this movie that you will remember 5 minutes after you finish watching it.  I served as an extra in this movie, and was unfortunate enough to see how poorly this film was made.  How they got the actors they did (Elliot Gould, Jason Biggs, Jerry Stiller) is beyond me, but sadly I don't think any actor could have saved this script
COMPLETELY UNEEDED CRAPPY GARBAGE!. There was no room for a sequel at the end of the original C.O.T.C. It said the end; so no sequel! not to mention that it took nine years to do this movie
Have Gun Will Travel - The Complete First Season. Its been over two weeks and I still haven't received this order or an email saying why
Kate Hudson is the cute all-American girl-next door  type. albeit with an attitude. She's stuck in a way too predictible  formula comedy. All that is left is the particulars. A novelist, Alex is under fire, literally  to produce a novel quickly to get the money to pay off loan sharks who want to kill him. He hires steno, Emma & she  moves almost literally into his life as he begins to crank out a novel; with her critical comments along the way. It is soon obvious that the novel is paralleling their going relationship. Yes, of course, they are falling in love.The movie flashes between the present day & the 1920's Gatsby-like setting of the novel. The problem is they are all too aware that this is happening. That they know that this is causes the movie to lose much of the charm it could have had if the two stories proceeded with  Emma & Alex blithely ignorant of what was happening. Art imitates life. Or is it life imitates art? I could squeeze 21/2 stars
I made it all the way through. Alright, second time I did.   But I still enjoyed it.  I went into this just hoping bolo would be in a few one-on-one fights, and luckily he was.  He looks pretty tough and is not a bad kung fu actor.   But his directing job just fails miserably.  Btu with a ton of great character actors and all teh final fight baddies are funny, so it wasn't a total loss of a movie.  Not like some of bolo's newer day stuff.  Overall a comedy that works, but only in that aspect, the kung fu could have been really good, but then againagain, I have seen much much worse.  The final fight was fun  and was a good way to end the movie.Pai Pao is pretty good, but thsi movie I think would be really popular around the ladies, cause I got pretty sick at looking at bolo.  And his fake beard just ruined his character.  Also there is a part where bolo gets mad, and then smoke comes out of his nose.  enjoyAlso, the movie would have recieved a 3, but  some of the kung fu was actually really good and a widescreened presentation would have helped tremendously.  But then again, maybe I didn't see it very well cause bolo and pai paio were the action directors.So full screened and a watchable picture.  No distortion or fuzzy lines, would have been watchable I guess if the movie was better.
Not received twice. I have ordered this DVD twice now and it has not arrived in my house. I am very upset about this as it was important for a book I am writing. I don't think I'll be buying anything from Amazon again
MOVIE FEEDBACK. I AM PRETTY EASY TO PLEASE WHEN IT COMES TO MOVIES.LOW BUDGET,HIGH BUDGET,DOESN'T MATTER.THIS MOVIE IS ACTUALLY THE WORST MOVIE I HAVE EVER SEEN IN MY 45 YEARS OF VIEWING.WAS TOTALLY NOT BELIEVABLE AND THE WRITING AND DIRECTING WAS SHABBY AT BEST.DON'T WASTE YOUR HARD EARNED BUCKS ON THIS LEMON!!!!
no one has mentioned... that this film contains nudity involving little kids!! the boys butt is shown as he gets out of the water.... i was 12 when i first watched this and my mom and little sister flipped out! diff ppl have diff standards but i think this is worth bringing up
a lot of effort, little substance. There's not too much I can offer here, since I found very little to grab my attention throughout this movie.  A lot of nice shots of the robots in this, and the color tweaking really did help keep the cgi effects seem more real in their settings.  I'm sure there has been some debate over the use of Sir Laurence Olivier in this movie, but that's not something that I think really applies to my overall sense of the film.I am sure that a lot of nostalgia and sentimentality can be attached to this film in the way it pays homage to classic science fiction and old cinema.  A lot of the camera angles, costumes, the shapes of the robots and weapons, all reminisce upon cinema and comic books of yore, and in concept this film is a good reminder of those days of pure invention in science fiction, as silly as they may look to us today.But this trip down memory lane was down a poorly chosen lane.  There are plenty of comic books and movies of the time that were also very eerily accurate in their predictions of the future, and because of that they're not often harked upon.  Instead, this film goes for the silly sci-fi and wraps it in a package that was clearly tweaked by many a studio executive to make sure there were romantic moments, a spiffy sidekick, and enough explosions to keep popcorn eaters eating.This movie felt like a lot of effort with little substance.
Burr did not answer straight. Unfortunately I had already ordered these DVD's before I logged onto the bar method website, on the site there are news clips posted from old interviews etc. I read one interview where she was being interviewed at her studio and the reporter was being givin a lesson via a tv segment all about her method. when asked if this was all Burr did to keep in shape, she replied " pretty much" sounded like a vague answer to me, the interviewer asked again later in the segment, so, this is all you need to stay in shape,, once again she answered pretty much, seems to me if you were excited to share your program and sell it, you would say,Im in great shape and this is all I do! I have tired it once and you definately feel it the next day, so we will see. Yvonne
lite film with some Fun&Hot chicks. the film is pretty lightweight on a whole but it has a nice charm with a well known Hollywood cliche in film making.I applaud the effort.the chicks in this Film are Happening Babes Fo SHO.but there ain't much to the Film but it has some fun to it
Ed Edd N Eddy vol 2. I am a huge fan of this series.  This for the most part was a collection of the worst of the collection.  Wait until they put a better collection togather.
Wannabe Se7en. Bone CollectorUpon the opening scene of the movie, I was highly upset.  It was only after the movie had begun that I realized I didn't buy a porn.  C'mon!  Bone Collector!?  That was a clever little marketing ruse you did there Universal.  Nice one.  You won't get me again.It's a psycho-sexual thriller, with Angelina Jolie hitting on a genius gimp who has a knack for riddles, nuts and bolts, and jigsaw puzzles.  This guy is so smart he could probably beat Ken Jennings in Jeopardy.  He even has an awesome, magical straw that controls one of those Tempur-pedic beds.  He can make the bed recline with a magic straw!!  Unfortunately, he didn't do the bowling ball and wine glass trick.Together with the gimp and his incredible pull within the police force that he is no longer a member of, Jolie (who is transferred from to homicide because she used a dollar bill to measure something) begins to unscramble the riddle of corpses, clues, comic books, and ancient steam pipes, leading to a super-duper surprise hunky-dory ending in which everything is perfect, and butterflies land on retarded kids' heads.  Only, there are a few major plot-holes:1)	There is no way that Jolie would have switched departments.2)	There is no way that Washington would have had that much pull.3)	There is no way the serial killer would have left all the clues when he could just go for his main target to begin with.4)	The clues that are so cleverly figured out don't even lead to figuring out who the killer is.Things learned from this movie:-Ed O'Neill is more versatile than the Al Bundy role.-Make sure to never get into a cap driven by other than an Arab guy.-I hate the fact that Queen Latifah, a person as talented as a stick of butter, has somehow managed to squeeze into a small sliver of celebrity.  The fifteen minutes have been over for quite some time now.  Leave.In the end it's a mediocre movie from which I expected more.  Given the combo of Washington and Jolie, there really should have been greatness.  It's a preposterous renter at best
Too Bad,  It sounded promising. I have never played a game that crashed so often. Very frustrating. it was fun until it would crash the first time in a one hour session. But the second time in a one hour session is just Ridiculous. dont know if it is the programing or starforce but its frustrating. The game was fun for a while then became very repetitive
A Musical Museum-Piece. Oscar Ashe and Frederic Norton's musical retelling of "Ali Baba and the 40 Thieves," "Chu Chin Chow," made into a 1934 British film by Walter Forde, doesn't withstand the test of time.  If anything, the movie version of this 1916 London stage show illustrates how the musical has changed over the decades.In the years of "Chu Chin Chow's" success, the musical comedy was a relatively undemanding form.  In both Britain and America, popular musical shows used rather thin, breezy plots, stories that served primarily as a vehicle for the songs -- pop hits which were expected to be sung in concerts and over the radio long after the show had finished its theatrical run.  So entrenched was this tradition of the musical theatre, that very few shows before World War II strove to develop more substantial stories, and those that did have become enduring classics to postwar audiences: Jerome Kern and Oscar Hammerstein's "Show Boat" (1927), George Gershwin's "Porgy and Bess" (1935), and Richard Rodgers and Lorenz Hart's "Pal Joey" (1940).  The stage musical that changed the form into one that regularly developed the story on a level equal to the songs was Rodgers and Hammerstein's phenomenally successful "Oklahoma!" (1943).  Regrettably, "Chu Chin Chow" is not part of this more demanding evolution of the musical.Instead of employing its musical numbers to advance plot and character, "Chu Chin Chow" sings about rather arbitrary subjects not directly related to story progression, and then distracts the viewer with its Arabian Nights-style pageantry.  The musical's lack of cohesiveness is exemplified by its very title.  If a narrative is titled "Chu Chin Chow," after one of its characters, the audience would reasonably expect that character to be significant in some way, whether it's as the protagonist or as a thematic presence throughout the story (e.g., James Joyce's "Ulysses").  But who is Chu Chin Chow?  He's the murder victim of the musical's main antagonist, Abu Hasan (Fritz Kortner), and whose identity the bad guy then adopts for only part of the narrative.  (I'm led to believe by the DVD's supplemental materials that the character of Chu Chin Chow was somewhat larger in the stage show than in the film, but hardly more significant.)  Not only that, but the musical's Chinese title misleadingly suggests that the story is set in East Asia, rather than in the Middle East.  This would be like Rodgers and Hammerstein titling their Oklahoma-set musical "South Philly."When "Chu Chin Chow" was re-released in 1953, the film's distributor chopped out all the musical numbers and rechristened it "Ali Baba Nights" (included on the DVD), a less deceptive title.  This should surprise no one.  With the arguable exception of the love songs sung between the romantic leads, Nur-al-din Baba (John Garrick) and Marjanah (Pearl Argyle), the songs are intrusions onto the story.  For example, "The Cobbler's Song" is a relatively long number given to a character whose function in the story is minimal; the song comes off as an extensive digression.  As for Ali Baba (George Robey), he's given very few numbers, and his central showpiece, "Anytime's Kissing Time," is sung for polygamous reasons to a woman who is not his wife -- not something that will endear him to the audience.Indeed, the seemingly arbitrary use of non-germane songs by minor characters emphasizes "Chu Chin Chow's" lack of focus.  What is the central narrative thread?  Who is the main character?  Is it Ali Baba?  He begins the film as its most active character but then grows rather inactive by its conclusion.  Is it Nur-al-din and Marjanah?  They play a major role in the climax but have comparatively little impact upon the story until then.  Is it Abu Hasan?  Although Kortner plays the role with over-the-top gusto, Hasan is a hard character to like, and the narrative is too light and airy to demand that the audience plumb the dark depths of identifying with a bad guy.  The movie's razzle-dazzle Arabian Nights spectacle may distract us momentarily from these questions, but it can't rescue a movie sadly in need of a stronger narrative arc.The only reason to watch "Chu Chin Chow" is to behold Anna May Wong's performance as Zahrat, the slave who begins as Hasan's spy and lover, but who ends the story with different loyalties.  The movie is an all-too-rare chance to see the underutilized Chinese American actress in a prominent role, and perhaps the film's most important character.  But even Wong's admirable efforts aren't enough to reclaim "Chu Chin Chow" for the thoughtful viewer.  In keeping with the film's flamboyant tone, Wong joins the other actors in chewing the scenery and otherwise exaggerating her emotions; this is disappointing because her best performances are wonders of subtlety and restraint.  Also, despite her centrality to the first half and climax of the movie, Wong spends much of the film's second half off-screen.  "Chu Chin Chow" might have made for a more enduring tale if the narrative had made Zahrat the clear protagonist from the start and didn't waste so much time on Ali Baba and the other characters, who only distract the rambling storyline with expendable tangents.As an uncommon chance to savor the screen presence of Anna May Wong in a lavish-for-its-time British extravaganza, "Chu Chin Chow" holds some modest rewards.  But the film is, first and foremost, an artifact of the kind of musical that stronger and more story-driven Broadway offerings surpassed long ago.
2 stars for Jennifer!. Ya know, with Will Ferrell and Jennifer Love Hewitt in this movie, I thought it would be an awesome movie...Well, I can't always be right. The one part I did like in the movie was when Jennifer Love Hewitt showed one of her tattooes to a band member's wife... (requiring her to lift up her dress, catching a peak at her undies)  :D  Nice..
disc 1 shadow of the wolf has no data on it. I purchased the item listed below as a Christmas present so it was not opened until now.  the disc 1 shadow of the wolf has no data on it.ASIN: B000BPL2ISPrice Paid: $56.08Condition: New
leaves you hanging. Sports and movies - should be a PERFECT combination.  Especially a story of a true sportsman, a true gentleman of the game, someone who loved to play the game for the game itself.But this movie doesn't spend enough time telling us about the real Bobby Jones.  It leaves us hanging and wondering. There is one point where he is playing with a woman golfer and she is refered to as his girlfriend - WHERE DID THAT COME FROM?  At another point, he is in the hospital, temporarily banned from the game.  Then flip to him writing a letter of apology, then flip to him playing golf.  Well what happened to the hospital stay?  What happened to his ailment?  How did he get better, is it a long time/term disability?  Later, he and his wife are arguing over him going to another tournament and then PRESTO there they both are at the match.Scenery - beautiful.  Story - while interesting it leaves viewer disappointed.  It should just be, could just be so much more.
disappointing. i had never known that there was a movie made about the life story of one of my very favourite singers patsy cline.well they needn't have bothered as it was a very much by the numbers story something definetely not above anything that you would see as a midday movie on any weekday.i liked both of the main actors,jessica lange and ed harris.the problem for me was that there was no attempt at conveying any real depth to the characters.whilst i appreciate that there has to be some element of fiction in most bio-pics anyone watchimg the movie and not having heard of patsy cline would be none the wiser for her motivations and driving forces.the only saving grace for me was that patsys singing was used in the movie to at least try to convey the quality that others saw in her singing
Mostly a Waste of Time. The movie starts off very slowly, gathers a bit of steam, and then takes a plot turn that is totally inconsistent with the personalities of the two main characters, uptight writer Sarah and free spirit Julie.I'd quote one of Sarah's lines as she "assists" Julie with a task that they undertake, but it would be too much of a spoiler... in any case, once that line was spoken, I lost all respect for the plot.Some of the scenery in the movie is pleasing to the eye. For that, I'll give the movie two stars, rather than the one star it would have otherwise deserved.In any case -- don't waste your time watching "Swimming Pool." You'll drown in the stupidity
Now a longer version of a movie that was too long?. OK, the original is a classic and is what...90...100 minutes long? Jackson stretches it out to 3 hours and adds very little to the story.  The native were scary. The quiet scenes with Kong were welcome additions, they actually made him into a character...something that can't be said for any of the human characters.The insect scenes are ridiculous!! The dinosaur stampede was idiotic. Anything with the young cabin boy almost seemed like it was clipped out of another movie. Now Jackson is adding 38 munutes to a movie that is grossly over padded to begin with?!?Peter Jackson is a hack director that has no idea how to tell a story efficiently.Remind me to skip his next 15 3 hour long epics
One of the worst zombie flicks ever. I'm addicted to bad movies. Really bad movies. Ones that make you laugh at its pure inadequacy and the ones that are so cheesy that you can't help but be entertained. Then there are ones that are so bad you would have to be a masochist to sit throughout the entire duration of it. Ed Wood's "Bride of the Monster," "Burial Ground," and "Manos: Hands of Fate," are three classic horrible movies that I have had the dishonor of seeing and will never forget the pain and boredom that I felt while suffering through the viewing of them. "Hell of the Living Dead" is definitely one terrible zombie flick that certainly and positively belongs among the worst movies ever made. First of all, it basically covers all of the zombie cliches ever created throughout the history of zombie movies. Jungle savages, mad scientists, a little gore, a little blood, extremely fake looking special effects, a random soldier dancing in a green tutu, top hat, and cane, and really really bad zombie make up makes this movie well worth watching. Also, I can't understand why this movie is on the video nasties list. "I Spit on your Grave" and "The Last House on the Left" are much more disturbing than this movie. In any case, you should check this movie out if you want something to make you fall asleep quickly or if you are a true masochist and desire great amounts of suffering and pain
Does not live up to billing. I'm a filmmaker, university film instructor, and author/writer of film topics. I was excited to hear about this DVD because, to quote it's own blurb "this fascinating program lets you in on the secrets..." of film editing I had presumed. I expected an educational presentation that would dissect the cuts and the tricks, and show the development of a scene from the multiple takes and camera angles, and how an editor selects, massages, and makes it come together visually and aurally. There is a little of that... maybe 10%. The rest of it is talking heads about the "secrets" and the pontificating by directors and editors about how amazing they both are. Good Grief! Save me the self-aggrandizement. I think you've heard the adage: "Don't tell me, show me." There is far too much talking head about what is done, but there are no examples of scenes "in process" but only the final cut. The examples are only referential. Very disappointing. And Tarantino's gushing and hugging his editor has nothing to do with how editing works. This is a blatant ACE promotional piece masking as a documentary. Especially disappointing was the Sharon Stone crotch shots from Basic Instinct that destroys the DVD for high schools and makes it inappropriate for most other audiences. Even the director admits that the inclusion of these shots was NOT at the editor's discretion, but was his intent all along, no doubt to get at the audience's "basic instincts." The shots have everything to do with the story... but little to do with a secret of editing... more to do with the secrets and tricks of marketing. I had hoped to use this in my classes, but I cannot. I am returning the two I ordered. Can't use 'em.
Nice flying sequences - shame about the plot!. If you like watching F-86 Sabres pitching, yawing, rolling, shooting, and crashing then this film might be for you. There is plently of this as it was made in cooperation with the USAF.Be warned however:- This film contains an idiotic romantic subplot.- Robert Wagner's "cool" character appears to be from another film.- Chinese soldiers are portrayed as gibbering idiots.Watch "The Bridges at Toko-Ri" if you want to see a decent Korean War/USAF film.
Burr did not answer straight. Unfortunately I had already ordered these DVD's before I logged onto the bar method website, on the site there are news clips posted from old interviews etc. I read one interview where she was being interviewed at her studio and the reporter was being givin a lesson via a tv segment all about her method. when asked if this was all Burr did to keep in shape, she replied " pretty much" sounded like a vague answer to me, the interviewer asked again later in the segment, so, this is all you need to stay in shape,, once again she answered pretty much, seems to me if you were excited to share your program and sell it, you would say,Im in great shape and this is all I do! I have tired it once and you definately feel it the next day, so we will see. Yvonne
Why?  What's the point?. There are enough reviews of the main movie story so I don't need to add anything in that regard.  But, what on earth does a lesbian sub-story (in both regards) have to do with the story as a whole?  Nothing.  So, we have another movie that would be great to introduce the whole family to blue-grass music and the Appalachian way of life that, instead, heads for the trash bin
Pathetic. Stupefying and moronic is the most apt description of this waste of celluloid. Though made during the Cold War, its portrayal of Russian people is unfairly mean-spirited and in a review I read elsewhere, it was described as xenophopic. I would go so far as to say it is propagandistic. Its the kind of film which will appeal to today's dumbed-down American who thinks he's a little more special than everyone else in the world and that he has the right to blow up foreign villages and otherwise disregard laws and civil behavior. The idiotic characters justly deserved the punishment they received in this pathetic film
Not so good, unfortunately. I was a fan of the campy "Batman" of the 60's. I loved Bruce Timm's vision in "Batman: The Animated Series"; although the original episodes borrowed their look heavily from Tim Burton's movie, the characters were well-developed (consider the time spent introducing Two-Face or Mr. Freeze), and the series evolved over time to create an excellent atmosphere with great story-telling.Unfortunately, none of this is present in "The Batman". This series is mediocre in many regards - Bruce Wayne comes across as a weak, forgettable character, and the villains are nothing to write home about (although I did like the fact that they re-designed many of them, they just don't seem to work in any regard). The dialogue is inane as well.Not a strong offering..
Wow, surprise. Im really astounded by how well this movie has been rated. I love Depp and I thought it was terrible. I think he wanted to do something a bit different and dark but this movie is just sort of pointless. It's about the English restoration and the rebirth of the theatre during a time when sex and murder and general taboo subjects were unacceptable but rampant. It takes the nature of the period to the extreme and was overall terrible. It acted like it was very profound but conveyed very little. It had potential to be an incredible movie but if you're looking for a Depp fix- just pick up something else.
Quite horrible. This is the most horrible documentary I've ever watched. The narrator's tone is dreadful (sounds as if the DVD were made for children) and the re-enactments are torturous. There are some high points, snips of interviews from Johnny and others, but there is very little performance, beyond what I assume would be "fair use." Further, this DVD really doesn't add anything, nor does it shed any new light on Johnny Cash. The A&E Biography DVD is far more enriching.Edit: I feel I really need to protect people from this product. First, many of the interviews are found on other products. Second, the packaging is painfully misleading. It suggests it has never-released concert footage of the Nixon concert. I couldn't find it apart from a few seconds of footage. Third, it's just plain boring. I've read the biographies, I'm not looking for a feel-good documentary, but I'm also not looking for a get-bored documentary. If you're just going to repeat what others have said, what's the point. If I could give it zero stars, I would
Anti - American. While I've been a big fan of Ghost In The Shell, these stories are the worst yet. (I've watched the first three episodes on Cartoon Network as the DVD is not out yet).In "Make Up", the story is flawed in that Paz would have never been allowed to roam "free" while an exact copy cat of himself is on the lose killing people.In "Poker Face" the "Emperial" America is such and Anti-American statement especially when the Amercian UN Forces have the American flag sewed on their uniforms backwards! This may have been an error but I doubt it.In PAT. the tachikoma's voices are so annoying and so much information is thrown at you that it's hard to follow. Most if is a rehash on previous episodes. With their childest voices, they shouldn't be used as a main plot of the story
Wait!. By all means, do as others here have suggested.  Wait until the Criterion Collection version coming January 10, 2006.  For the hard-of-hearing:  WAIT FOR THE CRITERION COLLECTION VERSION!Thanks for listening
This movie is NOT  for kids. This movie was nothing and I repeat nothing to the tv show Scooby Doo from Hanna-Barbera.This scooby Doo movie had alot of cruse humor and clips not suitable for kids.For example,1. The part when Scooby and Shaggy have a belching and pharting contest.2. The very ending when Scrappy Doo was trying to take Scooby's, his uncle, soul.3. Also before Scooby got kick out of the van, he marked his terrotry by peeing on Daphne.4. When Scrappy was in the helicopter, he was cursing.I recommend that you DON'T buy this movie or the second one.Now it's the time when you are going to put negative feedbacks to me.I don't care, it doesn't bother me one bit if you like or absolutly adore this movie. No, I should put it in this way if you worship this movie, that's fine by me.Thanks for your timeThis movie hater
THAT ONE STAR REALLY MEANS NEGATIVE 1. JESUS HELP ME! THIS MOVIE WAS SO CORNY, I SHOULD FIND THE DIRECTOR AND PUT HIM IN JAIL! WHAT MAKES THIS MOVIE SO EWW, THEY DIDN'T EVEN FILM THE MOVIE IN NEW YORK! ALL THEY DID WAS SHOW A LITTLE BIT OF FOOTAGE OF A EVERYDAY NEW YORK STREET, THEN IT WILL CUT OFF QUICKLY OF THE NEW YORK STREET AND HAVE THE CHARACTERS STANDING IN BUILDINGS! WHEN THEY DID SHOW THE VOLCANO ERUPTING IT SHOWED PEOPLE RUNNING AROUND IN A CITY THAT LOOKED LIKE BOSTON OR PHILLY! PLUS WHEN THEY SHOWED THE CHARACTERS STANDING OUT SIDE OF THIS NOT NEW YORK STREETS THEY HAD POLICE SIRENS GOING OFF IN THE BACK GROUND THE WHOLE TIME! TAKE IT FROM ME PEOPLE I LIVE IN BROOKLYN, YOU DON'T HEAR SIRENS LIKE THAT ALL DAY! PLEASE DO NOT BUY OR RENT THIS GARBAGE
Poor at Best. I have this little (very little) section in my dvd bookcase that houses bad dvd buys.  Currently "The Yards" and "Ghost World" are the only two dvds that are housed on that shelf.  I don't know what to say, except the preview at best buy drove me to buy it on the spot and I was extremely disappointed that night when I watched it.  Slow story, not enough character development.  All I can say is don't let it be a dust collector in your dvd collection, like mine is
what a sad world we live in. They say that art reflects society and it is no wonder that Bush is president and the whole world has gone mad killing each other over religion when movies like Two Days are made.  The film is the worst i have ever seen by far, a motiveless paul rudd who gives a terrible performance tries to convince us that he wants to kill himself cause he cant get work as an actor in sunny LA and afford a BMW, this in itself is a flawed idea but trust me when i tell you it sinks lower than dolly partons [...] as the story, or lack there off, unfolds.  No real characters, just cliche's, absolutely no direction whatsoever, nothing is achieved visually just a bunch of talking heads that fail to convince us of anything else except what fools we were for watching this film.  By the end of it i wanted to kill myself in couldnt wait two days!!! Who made this film????
Such a disgusting anime. When I 1st watched Requiem From The Darkness I had high hopes for an anime show I heard that could actually by scary. To my dissappointment this show was not scary at all but a mockery of anything that is anime. This show has good animation is some spots with some deformed shapes of people. The strengths of the show however primarily rely on its soundtrack which is above average but nothing amazing. Also the last straw with this show was the horrible depictions of people being graphically murdered. This show is disgusting because of these potrayals a brothers murdering each/husband killing wife after wife/a man who enjoys murder/and very very intense sexual situations of insects and once again family members murdering each other. I recommend this show to no one and I believe Geneon has made a mistake licensing it. If you don't heed my review then you have wasted your money on a DVD not worth a penny (I wouldn't take it for free)
superficial historic fiction with great music. This movie has tolerable acting by Harris and Kruger, but why mispronounce Beethoven's name? Van instead of von? At least the German born Kruger could have gotten them to correct that fluke.If you took away the music this wouldn't be worth watching, and I for one would not recommend its purchase. Buy an album of the Concert Gebouw's recording instead
Deplorable... Let me just start off by saying I am a rabid fan of all genres of zombie films, but the 80's Italian genre is particularly unique to me.I read the bad reviews, but expected to enjoy the film anyway (this is coming from someone who loved Hell of the living dead, Zombie 3, and City of the living dead, 3 technically awful films)Sadly Zombie Lake is completely devoid of any entertainment value or redemption of any sort.  This is more like a porn movie with zombies thrown in than a flat out zombie movie.  That does indeed sound entertaining but the charm wear's off real quick.The gore- lame.  When a zombie takes a bite of someone, you don't see tearing flesh, you only (occasionally at that) see blood.The acting- as usual, it is awful (complete with dubbed american voices) but can, like most Italian zombie films, be overlooked.Picture- it's nice.  Good photography but it doesn't pull this one out of the garbage.Plot- I've wondered often where it is, but then I realized there isn't one.Overall, this is horrible, and I wouldn't even recommend it to fans of truly bad zombie movies.  However, it is certainly a step above such trash picks as Todd Sheets' "Zombie Bloodbath" and "Zombie Rampage" and pretty much all other shot-on-video zombie movies...but just barel
Not happy. The Movie is great, but the used DVD is garbage. The DVD skips and stutters. I feel like I got taken to he cleaners
predictable. This is my number one most overrated movie of all time.  We saw it at a pretensious artsy theater, along with an assortment of ex-hippies and wooly haired intellectuals.  They all cheered, of course, when the young girl beats the boys at finding the prize in the water, then becomes the chief.  The truth is that every single scene is utterly predictable, given the politically correct theme.  The truth is that old people are not bad just because they love their culture.  The truth is that tradition is not inherently evil.  The truth is that girls are no better or worse than boys.  Basically, if you hate men, this is the flick for you.  But it is not good.  It is not creative.  There are no surprises.  There is just nothing there.  As I edit this, it's no surprise to find so few people liked this review.  There are still plenty of hippies and politically correct so-and-so's out there
2/3 of a good film. What ever happened to Edward Norton? He used to make great and daring films like Fight Club, Primal Fear, and American History X. I think he tried to get back to great and daring films with THE ILLUSIONIST, but unfortunately the director failed him. .It's winter 2006 theatrical release was brief thus I never got a chance to see the film in theaters and eagerly bought it when it come out on DVD. And the reviews were right, it was a great film--until the third act.Those that said The Prestige (which I loved) dragged on won't like this film much better. The first 2/3 of the film move along at an interesting and quick pace, but the entire third act of the film drags and meanders to an obvious and rather weak payoff. And this is coming form a guy who loves twist endings. I never saw the Sixth Sense's ending coming for a moment, but the wonderful "twist ending" people rave about is completely obvious at worst and utterly lame at best. The films horrible third act pacing and execution coupled with Norton and Jessica Biel's utter lack of onscreen chemistry bring this film down to 2 stars for me.
Corny. I think this DVD was corny.  I've been getting DVDs and VHS for years, as I would rather exercise at home then spend time getting to a from the gym.  I've seen some with poor cueing, and others I do long enough that it's time to move on to something new.  I'm not sure how to pinpoint or put words to my impression of this, but Karen seemed very unreal, and I want something more down to earth.  I like seeing strong women that I would like to be more like, and while the guy and gal in the back were fine, Karen was just too annoying up front
Insert pun with word "con" here... "Con Express" has lots of action in it, which is great because this hides the poor writing and uninteresting characters. Unfortunately, the action isn't enough, and in between stunt pieces and shoot-outs, the audience is tempted to doze off. City Heat Productions isn't really known for producing films of the highest quality, so usually I go easy on them. If this were a big-budget company producing this, I'd be inclined to pan it entirely. But I wasn't expecting much and got a little more than I bargained for. The action is, for the most part, pretty good but nothing competitive with your usual dumb action movie. Flanery and Vosloo are perfectly casted, but everyone else seems to stiff to add any more flow to the movie. Vosloo especially appears to be enjoying himself as an over-the-top bad guy hijacking a train containing deadly chemicals. The film moves fast and contains shades of better movies like Under Siege 2, Con Air, Spy Game, and Speed. If you liked those, you probably won't mind this one too much. Just go easy on it
(*&^^$. unfortunatlly i got a dvd that dosnt work.... he lagnguge is not english and when i tried changing and choosing english lang. it dosnt repond... so am stuck with i
Wickedly BAD. A recently widowed mother of two moves with her daughters to a remote mountain home she finds a deed for among her late husband's belongings. The home is located near an old mine, where nearly a century ago an accident occured that cost the lives of many children who were working in the mine. This is the extent of the story you will get when you watch this lackluster film. I approach every film I see and every book I read wanting to enjoy the story. I love to be entertained. This is why it is so disappointing when a bad one gets through.Basically, Wicked Little Things is like a made for Sci-fi Channel movie with slightly better effects but huge story gaps. At night, the ghosts of the children killed in the mine haunt the woods, killing anything straying into their path. But when they kill their victim, they proceed to eat the remains. I guess this means they are zombie ghosts. Another flaw is people die and no one comes around looking for them. There is supposed to be a town nearby but you never see it. Most of these films at least have a sheriff but I guess there wasn't enough in the budget. The locals seem to consist of a crazy old hermit (played by Ben Cross) who knows the local yore, a local handyman (Geoffrey Lewis), a trans-am filled with teenagers, and the clerk at the local store (who I couldn't figure out if he was supposed to be semi-retarded or a closet child molester due to the creepy way he seemed to dwell on the youngest daughter).The make-up effects for the zombie kids was pretty good but special effects do not make a movie (unless its directed by Michael Bay). The most frightening thing about the film is the fact the DVD is an Unrated Director's Cut. This usually means things were added to the film since the theatrical release. I can't believe the movie I watched actually had added footage. All I can say is I feel worse for the people who saw this film in the theaters. Then again, maybe not. At least their version was shorter.
Disappointing Transfer. As it was stated by another reviewer, the Criterion transfer of "Les Dames du Bois de Boulogne" is quite disappointing. The film seems loose in the gate and therefore the picture is very instable; it's jumping a lot, which is very irritating. Also, there is some noise present in the background.So although Criterion did clean up the print quite much, this effort is in vain due to the imperfect transfer. I wonder why nobody has noticed this at Criterion? And its a problem which could have been corrected quite easily....Considering the high price Criterion asks for this title: don't buy it
Stick with Willy Wonka. I could barely get through the...um...er...reimagination...of the childern's classic - while the set design and special FX are state of the art, as usual for a Tim Burton film, the actual movie is hard to watch. Why? Depp's "performance" is chock full of ticks and mannerisms, off-putting, flat, self-absorbed, and finally, one-note. Rather than the quirky fun of the original 1972 Gene Wilder version, Burton's film is more horror than fantasy, often casually cruel and sadistic to the point of being far from family fare.  While deliberate on Burton's part, that doesn't make the final product any more watchable. It's one grim, dismal, downward spiral slog. Not much holidday fun, huh? As with most of Burton's other big, expensive failures, he knows how to CREATE a convincing world, but has no clue how to POPULATE it with characters and situations we identify with and/or could care less about.  The final result is a film that's like a fragile, hermetically sealed curio on the shelf - nice to look at from afar, but hard to get attached to, much less involved with. What a waste of millions of studio $$$
Definitive portrayal of generation X (for what that's worth). Many reviewers and critics said it best...what do you do when the "hero" of the film (Ethan Hawke) is a complete a---hole, Winona Ryder is a horrid documentarian that would give Ed Wood, Jr. a run for his money, and Stiller, who is supposed to be the bad guy, actually isn't that bad of a human being?  And Winona's friends are the smarmy, arrogant, Generation X punks who think they know everything (when the reality is (forgive the pun) they don't know jack).  Past generations would quote Tolstoy and Shakespeare, Generation X quotes TV commercials, Scooby Doo cartoons, Star Wars, and bad sitcoms.  Generation X is probably the most insincere generation ever, detaching themselves and calling themselves "ironic", when all they really do is indulge in pretentious pseudo-intellectualism.   Is this film an accurate portrayal of them?  Yes, in some ways.  Is the film worth watching?  Yeah, at least once.  Stiller gives a decent performance, it's nicely shot, and Garofalo actually almost gives her slacker character depth.  This is probably due to the fact that Garofalo actually has some substance herself, as opposed to the character she plays.Check it out more as an artifact of its time more than a cool film.
The Usual Suspects. opened the sealed DVD case and Get Shorty was inside and not the Usual Suspects.   I sent it back requesting a replacement and did not get a replacement.  I got a credit, I think.  Not sure.  I would rather just have the correct movie
Not the best in the library... Nothing ground-breaking in this soft-core title from the usually reliable folks at Full Moon. The DVD contains some funny behind the scenes material, but that's about it. This is supposed to be the special Director's Cut, so, I hate to see the chopped up version. Lose this one and pop in Castle Freak one more time
never realy takes off. It's not clear to me what some of the other reviewers saw in this movie, or whether we even saw the same movie. A contrived story of revenge with a convoluted storyline, sex scenes with actors that must have been cheap at the time, and (admittedly a lot) of poorly shot violence make a poor mix. It looks really dated and just doesn't come together. Its music score seems to come straight from a 'Shaft' film, but 'Sex and Fury' is not half as funny. With so many excellent Japanese movies to chose from there is need to go there. Two stars is generous
I wish I could go lower than this. This is horrendous movie. I will never claim it as the movie of my generation. It's one of the many reasons why I absolutely hate the "80's". The others are:Breakdancing, The Yuppie lifestyle,Power hungry businessmen/women, Women with manly handshakes, New Wave Music, and junk movies like this. I know that the main character is nothing less than a manipulator who is only concerned about himself, and what he can get out of life. He ridicules his friend because he's sick, and doesn't feel like driving Ferris around...especially in a Ferrari that mysteriously gets lost in the parking garage, so what am I left to believe I have to wonder if this is where Ice Cube got the inspiration for "It Was A Good Day". I don't care what decade it was, or what was cool back then, or now manipulating your friends is "NOT" I repeat"NOT" cool. I know with John and Johnette Q. Public this is something of a sexual relase. I could picture private parts of men and women everywhere getting soaking wet from this movie, and I find it so repulsive that everyone out there finds this funny.
Trash. This movie is typical Hollywood anti-war, anti-military, anti-American trash.  The "show biz" liberals, aided and abetted by their ideological cousins, the left-wing TV news moguls, have always sought to portray American soldiers in Viet Nam as baby-killing, drug-crazed monsters.  This movie is typical of that ilk. If you want a more balanced view of the men who fought in that terrible war, buy the DVD of "We Were Soldiers."--a much better, and far more honest, film
stick with batman and superman the animated series. this HAS got to be the worst show ever animated I do not like the way the producers treat superman and batman in the comics and graphic novels superman is a role model and a mentor for the rest of the league batman was more of a i do things my own way type. why do they always change things around. they could have done a show with just superman and batman but whatever. the avengers movie that marvel put out is BY FAR much better then this trash
Really dumb Disney flick!. They chosen Robin Williams to be in a Disney movie and this movie turned out to be very corny. Special effects are dull though. If I were a kid I would probably like this movie but now that I'm 15 I think it's stupid. I think I saw it in theater when I was 8 and I don't remember much of it but I think it's not in stores anymore out to buy because people don't really care much about this movie anymore. I don't care about it either. I'm glad this movie is out of stock and it should be. It is very boring!
I GIVE IT ONE STAR ONLY BECAUSE RALPH FIENNES IS IN IT. This movie has been terribly hyped-up, for reasons unbeknownst to me, perhaps politically, I presume, in the usual Hollywood fashion.  It has got to be one of the most slow-moving, boring, uninteresting movies I have had the pain of having to waste my time on ~ while attempting to sit through it.  However, the one and only good thing about it is that Ralph Fiennes is in it ~ but that is all.  Don't waste your money and time on this dud, as I'm sorry I did
Garbage. "Chamber" was always the worst entry in the Harry Potter series, but this film adaptation manages to take what was already a crappy story and make it even worse. Choppy editing, horrible humor personified by the untalented Rupert Grint, smug acting by the equally untalented Emma Watson, poor screenwriting by that hack Steve Kloves and incompetent direction by the other hack Chris Columbus makes this a very unpleasant experience.Skip it if you can.
no teeth to this one. Maybe I was just expecting something like Jaws but I didn't think this movie that great. I watched it twice now only because I kept falling asleep the first time. The script is very weak and thus so is the story, the  acting is flat. Most of the shark sequences are in my opinion taken from  existing documentaries (I have seen photographs of at least one scene), you  can tell that they are cut into the movie and the parts that where done for  the movie are very poorly done. Don't waste your money, if you want to  watch it, rent it, don't buy it
Almost. It is usually a bad sign when there is a guide included to explain the movie makers reasons for making the movie and to explain the lesson they want to teach.  The movie does give you a conclusion for the anime.  There is little to laugh at in this movie, the directors are to focused on making their point.  They have decided to make the anime and movie more "real" than the manga and as such have lost the light hearted humor and in their attempts to be "realistic" have created inconsistancies that can not be explained.The music and animation are excellent.  But I would recommend buying the soundtrack and renting the movie
It's 10 o'clock.  Do you know why your children are cackling insanely?. "Reefer Madness" (originally "Tell Your Children") was created to teach parents that it's never too early to scare the holy crap out of your kids.  Through this film we learn that the soul-destroying effects of Marihuana (Mike Nelson explains in the commentary that this film was made before the invention of the letter J) far surpass those of cocaine or heroin.  We see firsthand that even teens who can quote Shakespeare like nobody's business cannot escape its evils.Here are some of the symptoms of casual Marihuana use:- laughing maniacally while running people down in the street- playing the piano too fast- having sexual relations with people you don't really like that much- accidentally shooting people you do like pretty well- having no recollection of being framed for murderIf your child has experienced any of these symptoms, he or she is a Marihuana addict.  The solution is simple:  force them to watch "Reefer Madness" because if we don't heed its warning, "Reefer Madness 2" will be coming to a theater near you or you... OR YOU
HIghly polished waste of time. Beckham is one of the great soccer players of today and I was really looking forward to his hints on how to do things, especially since this is a 2 DVD package.I was most interested in the "banana kick" which is how most people call the kick that bends the ball around say an opposing "wall."  Not here.  Almost nothing is here except a lot of special effects, and "extras" like some shots of the face of the Great One looking worried as he gets ready to do a penalty kick.  There is a little 20 minutes or so of a game of the Great One vs a bunch of young kids but nothing to learn there.The only saving grace of this is the points on "first touch" which are pretty good.There are a very few pointers for beginners on how to get past an opponent but nothing any 9 year old can't figure out for him/herself.So much sizzle, so little steak
2nd rule of fight club dont buy fight club (WArning Spoiler). this movie is flat out doa. great filming great acting. BAD Screenplay!during this year that fight club came out every movie ended with a skitzo type thing, and if you really want to see a good Edward Norton movie see primal fear. this should be on the top 100 dumbest movies of all time list. even if the ending was different that movie would still suck!
It's alright. I like that you can customize your workout or use a pre programed one. There is the option of only having music and no talking which is nice. The cardio segments are about 13 minutes each and the toning segments are about 5. There is a total toning segment and it is about 10 minutes. The cardio didn't get my heart beat elevated like some other dvds I have. The toning segments had good exercises, but my muscles didn't feel tired after doing them. I think this dvd is geared more towards beginners
tedious "in which we serve. Highly recommended,but,to many scenes of men bobbing aroundin a life boat. Little action scenes and those that were seenwere not believable
Disappointing. Wasted Potential. I love Indy films and try to support them whenever I can.  I heard about this film after it showed at an Indy fest in New York.  The reviews I read were good, so when it was released on DVD I bought it.  Now, I am selling it.  This film was very disappointing as it raised provocative issues, but basically glossed over them.  The racial issues in the restaurant weren't thoroughly explored.  Also, the character development of the workers was lacking. Interesting characters were introduced but never fully developed. The director and writer seemed to be going for the sappy, PC slant and that ruined what could have been a thought provoking, honest view of the complexity of racial issues in modern society.  Another thing worth noting is that several scenes and lines of dialogue were edited out [deleted] from the DVD version of this film.  The extras include deleted scenes but not the specific scenes of which I am speaking.  One of the main reasons I purchased the DVD was because of the scene between Chris [Brody] and Leslie [Hill], but several lines of that scene were deleted.  The director's commentary even states that they wanted to make the theme more human and less black and white or racial.  It is obvious that this was their intent and it ruined the film.  The final scene is just plain lame.  The director stated that ending a film is the hardest thing to do and he proved it!  There were some scenes/lines, but too few to recommend this film
What a mess. Disney blew it this time.  No real fencing scenes, tried to hard to be funny.  Zero humor.As a child I read this Tale with great joy, and I was whisked away to a time and place which provides the setting for this adventure.  Then there were the movies which were made well before my time, but reflected some very good renditions of the book.  Somehow I do not believe the producers of this movie had any idea about how to reproduce such an adventure.Pity, once upon a time Disney was the king of Fairy Tales, and Adventure.  What has happened to that Disney movie making magic?The magic is no longer there, and the actors, well I really wish there had been some effort put forth by the actors.  The acting was drab to say the least.The costumes were the star of the movie, at least they seemed to have gotten that part right.  The film's settings and landscape were a pretty good dipiction as well.  This was something of a dark tale, and far too much of this movie took place in the daytime.Disney needs help, any takers?
Sacrilegious, Offensive, And Generally Atrocious!. I only gave this movie one star because it is against Amazon's rules to give it no stars. After hearing that this was a Christian movie, I could not wait to watch it. However, this movie has nothing in common with Christianity, quite the contrary, this is the most anti-Christian movie that I have ever seen; it promotes murder and other unsurpassable evil.The movie started out horribly and just continued to get worse. For instance, the beginning of the movie was shockingly pornographic. In a supposedly "Christian" movie I did not expect to be bombarded with this. After seeing this I did not expect that the movie could possibly get worse. However, I was greatly mistaken. Later in the movie the main character, who was remarkably unsympathetic, met several of her Christian co-workers who were talking about something they called "the pearl dream." Intrigued, the main character asked them what this dream was. Of course, they were unable to answer because it is complete nonsense. None the less, the main character continues to review what her co-workers have told her about Christianity over the years. As the movie plods along, generally confusing and boring the viewer, she comes to the decision to give up her sinful lifestyle and turn to God. When this event transpired I assumed, wrongly, that from this point forward the film would redeem its beginning and maybe even say something good about Christianity. This, however, is where the movie went form being merely bad to astoundingly  sacrilegious.Then, the main character and her young daughter set out for the desert. Due to a vague dream, they believed that this was God's will and that He would appear in the desert and take them to heaven, in other words "rapture" them. How they came to this assumption I was never quite sure. The movie often made ludicrous statements  which never made the slightest amount of sense. I became extremely weary trying to deduce what was happening. Nothing that took place in this movie was remotely Biblical nor was it well explained.As time passed our characters continued to sit in the desert, boring the viewer to tears. They begin to suspect that God was not coming to gather them to heaven and they started to despair. This is where the movie became intolerably anti-Christian; the mother took her daughter up to a mountain and asked her to kneel. She then forced her daughter to pray. After the prayer was concluded she took a gun from her dress and shot her crying daughter, supposedly to send her to heaven. She "believes" that she is doing God's will. Obviously, she was such an idiot that she failed to read that the Bible that strictly forbids murder. Afterwards, she is sent to prison, where we hope to see her suffer for her cruel, viscous, and insurmountably stupid act. As she is sitting in her cell, blaming God for the murder of her daughter, that she willingly committed (If she had half a brain cell she would have realized that she was doing Satan's will, not God's), she hears trumpets and the cell walls start to fall in. A few scenes pass, in which the ghost of her daughter returns and tries to redeem her faith. She, however, refuses. Then, she is taken to a dark room, that the viewer is supposed to believe is some supernatural place where judgment takes place, and asks if she loves God. She replies no, because she blames Him for her insanity. The film concludes with her standing stupidly in a dark room, that failed to represent eternity.Most of the aspects included in the film were never explained. Such as the significance of "the pearl dream." Nor was it explained why they believed that they needed to wait in the desert. How did they contrive this ridiculous idea from a vague, ambiguous, and utterly vapid dream anyway? None of these questions were ever answered. This caused the film to feel incomplete. The stories between scenes shifted so drastically that I suspected I had missed several important scenes. After checking my DVD I realized that I had not accidentally skipped crucial scenes, because their were none. This film was deliberately ambiguous and vapid.Also, the special effects, cinematography, and acting were about as good as a preschool play. None of the actors put any emotion into their roles. They recited their lines like drugged zombies; I suppose even they realized it was complete rubbish and decided not to put much effort into it.To state the obvious, this film is a disgrace! Obviously, it is not Biblically based. It does NOT represent Christian philosophy which is to love others, not to wander around aimlessly in the desert acting like a fool. Nor do Christians promote murder, as this film implied. This movie has as much religious value as Night of the Blind Nazi Zombies. I am ashamed to see that such a complete travesty is labeled a Christian film. This film is extremely anti-Christian; its main objective is to give the world the false impression that fundamentalist Christians are brainwashed and are incapable of sane thoughts. This is not true, and yes, I can prove it. All the proof that you need is contained in the Bible. If you stop hardening your heart and truly listen with an open mind then you cannot help but to see Jesus loving message for the world. He does not desire to bring misery to the world, but happiness and love. The reason that there is misery in the world is because people, like those who made this film, disobey God. If we followed His loving rules then we would not suffer. I do not write this rather long review out of hatred, as I am sure many will accuse me of. I write this to warn people what this movie is really about. It is not a true Christian movie like the Left Behind's and The Passion of the Christ.  And, yes I am aware that I will be bombarded by a slough of negative votes. However, I do not even faintly care. My beliefs, as a fundamentalist Christian and my love of God  is more important to me than a  number on a page.Also, I was shocked to read the other reviews on this forum, especially the one from the Wiccan woman who said that she wished to see Christians thrown to the lions as they were in the time of the Romans. I have seen a lot of hatred in my life but her review was by far the worst I have ever see. Christians love the world and those in it, we do not tell non-Christians about Christ to imply that we are "holier than thou" because we are not. All are equal under God's eyes. We are all sinners and the only way to attain redemption is to accept God's undeserved grace. We tell other people about God's undeserved love because we want to save them and see them living in eternal joy in Heaven. We do not rejoice to see people unsaved, we tell them about their condition because we want to see them saved. In other words, we tell people because we love them. Also, for those of you who accuse Christians of having a hatred of the world, why do you spew hatred in everything you say toward Christians? Aren't you displaying the hatred that you claim you abhor?In conclusion, this is the worst movie ever made. It is anti-Christian, immensely sacrilegious, poorly acted, poorly written, vapid, mind numbingly dull, disjointed, tortuously long, etc. In short, this film is an abomination. It is massively offensive to Christians and is a massive misrepresentation of Christian values. Also, the acting is abysmal and the story line hopelessly confusing. If you wish to watch a film that accurately portrays Christian values then I recommend watch "The Passion of the Christ" or the Left Behind movies.  I hope that this review will help you; it was written with love and concern. I shall keep you in my prayers. Have a wonderful new year.In Christ,RavenovaAlso recommended:  The Left Behind and the Ravenloft book Series
John Belushi was great, BUT ..... I can't make myself buy this DVD. I was going to purchase it, but then I read where O.J. Simpson is in one of the skits. Can't do it now. Maybe there will be a "Best of Belushi Part 2" that doesn't have an O.J. Simpson appearance.Peace and long live the "classic" SNL!
You Have To Be Kidding!. How anyone could rate this movie 4-5 stars is beyond belief. This was such a contrived movie that had a simple plot that went nowhere. As I watched this movie I could not figure out if it was meant to be a comedy or a drama. It was never very funny and both lead actors, playing one white and one adopted black brother, had scenes in the movie that were terrible. Romany Malco has a scene where he is running around in his underwear for no apparent reason accept to show off his body. He jumps out of bed when his cell phone rings, runs down the stairs and then outside and back in just to gather everyone in the house and scold them, in his drawers? He is talentless and idiotic as a &quot;brother&quot; in France that no one can relate to. Paul Rudd is likable but his shining scene is when he comes back to the chateau drunk and &quot;grossly&quot; tells off everyone - people he has known for less than a week! The servants are the best actors in the movie and play their parts well...but can't make up for the dismal rest. Ludicrous - a bad movie that probably could have been funny if they had went for laughs instead of drama. This is another example of a rental that you think is going to be good but then disappoints
Snooze Alert. Subtitled guy's mom is sick. The guy is also depressed. Meets a ex-hustler on beach. They kiss, fight, make-up, over and over.(most of the movie) They break up. Boy meets hustler's ex and they play with dog on beach. The End
Don't Buy This Read The Manuel Instead. Cheesey video, bad interface, offers little instruction, tests are too easy to be useful. Save the money and go take a driving lesson from a licensed instructor instead. We purchased this to help with parallel parking.  The topic is mentioned on the video but there is virtually no instruction.  And so it goes with most of the other topics....
Not the complete "The Continental". This is a poorly put together piece that fails to even include the best skits Christopher Walken did on SNL. Where are ALL the Continental skits?  Enough said. This is a poor showing, and the makers should be embarassed
Misleading. I thought this video was a Cesar Milan Dog Whisperer video.  I was linked to it by the Amazon suggestions on the Cesar Milan book page.  Very disappointing
Fatally Flawed. Sure, this movie is a classic. But is it any good? Frankly, I found it to be tedious in the extreme.It's certainly pleasant to look at. The sets are quite amazing, and the cinematography is absolutely beautiful.The story (as described in detail in many other reviews here) has potential as both a thriller and a thought-provoking essay (ultimately it is neither).The acting is top notch, as are all of the special effects. Those of us who cut our teeth using teletype machines always get a kick out of seeing them in all their anachronistic glory. In fact, all of the computer stuff is believable for the era and pleasantly nostalgic.But the whole thing never rises to its premise. Its "thriller" aspect is artificial and not tied to the central plot line, and entirely predictable from the moment our friend is handed THE ONLY KEY THAT CAN STOP THE NUKE! The resolution is an afterthought (a quick fix in the extreme), and barely even mentioned in about two lines of dialogue after the artificial danger is (narrowly, whew!) averted. The characters are thin at best, and stock at worst.This movie is really a slow survey of what people in the early 70s thought technology would be like in the mid 70s. Yawn. (I must laugh at the whole bell/paper bit. It means nothing to the plot, and is the ultimate contrivance.)If a deadly virus actually came back from space, there would certainly be action on many fronts, with plenty of interesting conflict to go around. Some people would try to understand it, others would want only to kill it. There's some potentially interesting tension right there. Some people would argue to keep the danger hidden from the public, others would want to warn them. Again, that could have been a good source of tension. Someone would surely have suspected that the military wanted to harness it as a biological weapon (mentioned in passing, but never developed), while others would try very hard to prevent that. More tension.I'm just saying that this movie is littered with missed opportunities for something more than the collection of boring experiments and pointlessly slow-moving scenes which it actually contains. This movie is the poster child for boring science fiction, and it would not have had to be that way.I haven't read the book, but I bet it's a lot better. At its core, this movie is a boring dud.
BOOORIIIIIING!!!!!. I WANT THE TWO HOURS OF MY LIFE BACK!After all the talk about what a cult classic this film is! What a waste of time! Maybe this movie was a novelty to American moviegoers in 1973. That time is past (even then, the "robots attack people" concept was hardly new). Now this is just a boring B movie with bad acting and anticlimactic action. This film is only good for academic or nostalgic purposes. Unless you are doing a research paper on American Sci-fi cinema, or you are in your 40s and enjoyed this movie as a kid, or you just like boring anticlimactic B movies, AVOID THIS DULL PIECE OF DRIVEL.I FEEL CHEATED!
Why Can't Hollywood leave the book alone??. Despite the fact that this movie is fairly entertaining and far better than previous attempts to capture King Solomon's Mines on film, it lacks the sense of atmosphere, drama and period of the original book.  In fact, it is so different from the book, that had the names been changed, no one would have recognized that it was adapted from Haggard's novel.Instead of an engaging adventure story of (bachelor) gentlemen  treasure seekers in Africa, a lost tribe, evil tribesmen, a little magic, narrow escapes and lots of suspense, we get a sappy story of a young woman looking for her father who has been disappeared in Africa, and by the way, there might be a treasure.  She is, by the way, beautiful and blond, and her Great Lash Mascara never runs.Hollywood has thrown in some evil Russians searching for the "Stone of the Ancestors" on a mission from the Russian Czar and has, of course, made Quartermain fall madly in love with the blond.  Gagool, the most evil of ancient women witch doctors (in the book) has been dumbed down to a gentle white faced and benevolent Geisha-like fairy godmother who saves the elderly father from death.  King Solomon's Mines are conveniently located in downtown Kukuanaland and the lovely Gagool hands over the key, and takes them to the door.True to the genre, the moment they grab the stone of the ancestors the door comes down and they are trapped in the mine!  We are terrified by the suspense for at least 15 seconds, and then they find the way out, the walls come crashing down, they tumble to the ground laughing and decide to get married.  The End.
Roger Ebert loved it... ...should've been my first clue, any movie he likes I hate. Without doubt easily in the top 5 of the worst movies I've ever seen. Now I am a Jason Statham fan, and I loved the first film which was the best action film in years...and we haven't much action films for a while and what little there is has been garbage. Unfortunately The Transporter 2 is the absolute worst...ever. This film is totally different from the original, whereas the original was a great action flick for our modern age, this one takes the franchise and Statham's main character and turns it into some mixture of James Bond, Fast & the Furious, and Looney Tunes...that's right, Looney Tunes. This is the most unbelievably retarded movie I've ever seen, I'm not going to give away anything, in fact I kind of recommened it so people can see for themselves just how terrible it really is and how not to make a movie...but just to illustrate how beyond idiotic this movie is, where do I begin? Ok, the guy keeps a bunch of freshly pressed and plastic sealed suits in the trunk of his magical car, a car which half the time is flying in the air jumping from the tops of skyscraper to skyscraper fleeing the Miami Police Force as well as machine gun toting hermaphrodites. Anyone that lives in the South Florida area like myself will surely find some of the scenes hysterical where one moment there's a car chase in the streets of Miami, the chase goes down another road and the scenery magically transforms to West Palm Beach...about 90 miles and 2 hours away...those are some really fast cars there!
Not to be confused with 'Slacker'. Sophomoric hijinx that fail to score many points in the way of comedy.  It was a disappointment to see Jason Schwartzman reduced to playing a gross parody of his 'Rushmore' role in this pathetic film, which barely lifts itself above bathroom humor, and then falls flat on its face once more.  The object of desire in this peurile flick is Jamie King, who finds herself caught between a pscyhopathic nerd (Schwartzman) and a two-bit con artist (Sawa).  You decide whose worse, but since this film is told entirely from the POV of the two-bit con artist you can guess who wins in the end.  While it provides fodder for the overstretched Comedy Network, it is hardly worth buying on DVD
The Usual Suspects. opened the sealed DVD case and Get Shorty was inside and not the Usual Suspects.   I sent it back requesting a replacement and did not get a replacement.  I got a credit, I think.  Not sure.  I would rather just have the correct movie
Much as I love comedies. Running out of comedies to watch, I finally rented this one. I might as well not have. Martin Lawrence is like Eddy Murphy, only without the talent and the good looks. And the rest of the movie is thereafter.
Greed touches everything!. Review? Review?! Quality and really caring about providing a product the customer will actually be happy and proud to own is being replaced with making a fast buck. I dare to say that many Anime fans are also science fiction fans. My best example is what 'they' did to Star Trek. Just milk the fan for their money. Do the least 'they' need to do as the fans are already hooked.So, the Australian version of this has an English dub option? Why isn't it on the USA - Canadian release? Doh!If anyone buys this half-product they are feeding the greed and careless attitudes of those in charge of delivering this type of rubbish. The only one's who may have a reason to own this release is the true collector. Even then it's a rip-off not to have an English dub available.What a shame..
Boring to watch. The actors spend too much time just staring at each other without speaking. The story is too unbelievable too. It was a waste of my money to buy it.
Too kid-friendly. I think the only strong points of "The Phantom Menace" is Darth Maul and the lightsaber duals, which I thought were well done, and the visual effects and scenery.  But other than that, "The Phantom Menace" was just an unfortunate mistake.I think the problem is that Lucas broke one of the unofficial science fiction filmmaking rules: You've-got-to-keep-children-out-of-science fiction-stories.  Or at least show them as little as possible.  How can we take a space dogfight scene seriously when you have a little kid who doesn't know how to pilot a fighter, buzzing all around the battle and saying things like "this is intense?"  I never understood why they felt they had to go that far back into Anakin's life anyway.  Why not just begin the story with Anakin in his twenties and already under the tutelage of Obi-wan?  That's when all the important events began.  And Jar Jar, well, we know the consensus on him.Well, at least things got more serious again in "Attack of the Clones," and would continue to improve with "Revenge of the Sith.
this could have been one of the best films of the 80's. This could have been one of the best films of the 80's. All of the components are there. Ford gives the best acting of his career. The production is elegant and holds up as often breathtaking even by today's standards. Two things however really bring this movie down.The major negative here I believe is Polanski's insistence on starring Emmanuelle Seigner. This is one of the sexiest women I have ever seen grace a film, but it is the understatement of the year to say that she can't act at all. In fact, I think that she might have just about turned in the worst acting performance I have ever seen in this film and it totally destroys Ford's performance. When the film was over I thought about it and came to the conclusion that there is really two halves here. The first half is dynamite; the second with Seigner is a totally different beast, your average stupid kid thriller. Watch this film and dare contradict my statement here. Get beyond her obvious good looks and tell me she just was not meant for this part. It's so bad that  Ford fades into the background in any scene that she was also in.OK, the second negative in this film are these two agents that keep popping up. There is no explanation ever given as to how they knew where Ford and Seigner would be time and time again. It really ruins what could have been a very nicely done and subtle plot. They were never needed and muddle an otherwise great story.I am really kind of mad with Polanski here. He destroyed what could have been one of the better films he has made. And this statement comes from one who worships the ground Polanski walks on.
Soo primitive. The movie is a about a guy, who does a lot of work and no fun and then feels sorry about that. That's pretty much the whole story. Well, the idea is quite powerful but not new, the characters are done in the "comics" style and very primitive, the jokes are quite boring.Actually what is really amazing, that it could've been ok to watch as a family movie, but a few really tasteless jokes made it PG13 rated without adding any fun, so the movie about family values is not appropriate for kids.Too boring for adults, not appropriate for kids, too much moral for young crowd - I can't really think who might like it
Corny, clunky, a deserved turkey of the early 90s. The Rocketeer is the cinematic version of all the faux-Deco buildings that have been erected in recent years around Los Angeles, particularly the Miracle Mile area. It's wafer-thin nostalgia masks a chintzy story that can't stand on its own two feet.The plotting of The Rocketeer is sound enough for adolescent fare. Unfortunately, the characters are totally uninspired and the dialogue atrocious. Worse still is the execution of the material. Every actor is miscast and thoroughly lacking in charisma. Bill Campbell -- ever hear of him anymore? He overacts every single scene. Timothy Dalton? Hammy. Jennifer Connelly is the only one to come out unscathed.The direction is beyond weak. When The Rocketeer appears at the nightclub it is so poorly staged, so cloyingly "goofy" that it extinguishes the promise of anything remotely thrilling from happening. Add to this foul mixture a horrendous James Horner score... you get the idea. Still, some nice set design and an effective animated film-within-a-film make for a couple high points.
Eh. Not really. Texas Chainsaw Massacre: The Beginning (Jonathan Liebesman, 2006)In the documentary that serves as one of the DVD extras for Texas Chainsaw Massacre: The Beginning, a number of the movie's connections talk repeatedly about how their goal for this movie was to push the envelope with the gore. One even says that the people who went to see Hostel and The Hills Have Eyes (2006) will go to see this movie and expect the violence to be kicked up a notch. Well, folks, I just saw the unrated version of your movie, and I've only seen the rated version of Hostel. And I hate to break it to you but, well, even cut by the censors, Hostel blew you out of the water.For those who have been living in a cave for the past thirty-two years, a quick plot summary: there's a very odd family living out in the middle of nowhere. When the main local business, a slaughterhouse, closed down, it took most of the population with it-- save this family. (The fact that the slaughterhouse is still in operation in the original film, and there are neighbors in some of the original canon films, seems to have completely escaped screenwriter Sheldon Turner [The Longest Yard].) As with any TCM movie, there must be a batch of clueless teenagers, here two guys-- Eric (Tru Calling's Matthew Bohmer), on his way back to Vietnam, and his brother Dean (Zerophilia's Taylor Handley), who's planning on ditching the war and heading for Mexico-- and their girlfriends, Bailey (Diora Baird, recently of Wedding Crashers) and Chrissie (The Fast and the Furious' Jordana Brewster), respectively. There will also be a lot of revving chainsaws.Now, I readily admit I'm one of the people who didn't recognize the brilliance of Tobe Hooper's original vision for a lot of years after I first saw the original film (close to twenty, in fact)-- thank you, DVD commentary, for pointing out so many things I'd missed my first few times around. I'm still not sure it deserves the classic status it has come up with since, but it's a good, solid piece of work, groundbreaking for its time. There hasn't been a single film, canonical or no, following it that's lived up, but the straight remake Marcus Nispel popped out with a couple of years ago has been the best of a bad lot. Unfortunately, it looks as if the sequels to the remake will have the same relative quality as the sequels to the original-- worse. The acting is wooden, the direction pedestrian, the special effects pretty good but nothing special. But what these guys were after, they tell us, was something really over the top. They were striving not to make a good movie, but to make the mother of all splatter films. And, quite simply, even within the Hollywood machine, they were well upstaged by Hostel before they even started filming. *
So Boring, So Dumb. What was the point of this film? There is no lesson learned, no story to tell, no entertainment factor even associated with it. I guess it was an excuse for Jennifer Jason Leigh and Alan Cumming to try to prove that they have no imagination and get their Hollywood buddies together for 2 hours of nonsense.
O V E R L O N G. I continue to be astounded at how carelessly Amazon reviewers throw around their 5 star ratings.  This movie is overlong and not especially comedic or romantic.  The main character (or the actress who plays her anyway) is appealing, but her motivations to start a new life aren't convincing or justified.  Her "romance" with the waiter is ludicrous and the ending is contrived and predictable.  It actually took me 3 days to see the ending because I just didn't have the patience to view this from beginning to end in one sitting.  IF you are a patient, die-hard romantic with 2 hours to kill, I guess you might enjoy it.  I am not and I did not
you're better off reading the book. The book is amazing; this movie adaptation is quite poor. Although the actress who plays O is quite beautiful, and there are some fairly erotic scenes, this movie is deeply flawed, and I can't recommend it. The plotline gets totally garbled, especially toward the end, to the point where it runs entirely contrary to the book's intention on several key philosophical and psychological points. Second, the actor who plays Stephen is absolutely one of the worst casting choices I've ever seen; doesn't fit the role one bit. So please, read the book. If you've already read the book and love it, it is probably worth your while to eventually see this film, but expect to be disappointed.
Girl movie. Girls in this movie are portrayed as underdogs struggling against stupid boy bullies. It's a pretty way to boy-bash and promote sexist stereotypes that girls are good and boys are bad.
head to head. It looks  like the marketing boys that control the motogp organization  were looking for a way to make some extra money for the coming 2007 season and the start of 800cc premiere class by dreaming up this silly  excuse of a dvd, the racing footage was mediorce and the context of the rivalry insipid. Nice seeing the two-stroke 500cc bikes
all i can really say is "no". Ferrara is obviously a required taste and this film does nothing to prove against that point.not only is he a horrible actor, but he's also one of the worst directors with an undeserved cult following.  his camerawork is atrocious and wreaks of a bad home movie.the back of the DVD says that Abel was trying to make a film in the vein of The Texas Chainsaw Massacre but in the end wound up making a film more like that of Taxi Driver.  now, even before i watched the film, i knew this was an incredibly gross overstatement, but now i think the DVD company that made such a horrid claim should be forced to remove that from the synopsis.oh, and the band in the movie was terrible.  hell, everything about this movie was terrible.  Ferrara is a failure
Always Raunchy, Often Disgusting, Rarely Funny. And definitely not worth buying.  This movie dishes out nastiness that makes Friday the 13th seem quaint and lovable by comparison.  Jay and Silent Bob are rotten people, and you will feel rotten after watching this fitlth.  You might laugh a time or two, but you won't feel good about doing it.
Cruz Vehicle - Little Else. This film is pure formula - predictable and cliche filled - except for the camera loving Penelope Cruz's face it offers little. They put a partial quote from USA Today on the DVD container "Plenty of Steamy Sex". What? For a total of 10 seconds from the three scenes in the film. And where is the comedy? Classified as a romantic comedy, only a few scenes with a taxi driver are fun. The transsexual Monica (Cruz's best friend) is suppose to provide most of comedy (as Cruz has not yet shown that ability in any films that I have seen) but her role is all cliche and seldom funny. Cruz's face is gorgeous as always, but her walk down the street with a hundred guys trailing, all tantilized by her beauty - why? The cannot see her face; her ballerina background is evident with her very slender build and then add an ordinary walk.  On a positive side, they did a wonderful job presenting the music of Brazil - the soundtrack CD is worth examining if you love the film's music.Bottom Line: I watched this film because Penelope Cruz was the starring actress. But I feel I wasted my time, I could have done my laundry.
Self-Hype. This is a good GUY flic, nothing special, but fun for gamblers and football fans. The whole thing is kind of a self-hype, true story. The gambling predictor as ladies man and hero, puffed up and glamorized, but the fantasy is the thing for young men. Gambling, chicks, and swell clothes is what it's all about.  Shallow, no
Larry Clark craps again. This movie depicts the said goings on of rich kids with too much time on their hand. Once again Larry Clark delivers a film which is nothing more than for him to see a bunch of teen kids naked. It's Kids but with a murder plo
"Back in therapy". While visiting some family in Utah a few years ago we decided to rent a few movies to pass the unforgivably hot mid-summer weather.  We ended up renting "Analyze That" and boy, what a mistake that was!  We were expecting at least a mildly funny sequel to 1999's "Analyze This."  The potential was there, it's not as if writers (of course it's never a good sign to see numerous writers) Peter Tolan, Peter Steinfeld, and Harold Ramis didn't have decent material to work with; Robert DeNiro, Billy Crystal, Lisa Kudrow, and a funny and entertaining plotline regarding mobsters and therapy.  However, this being Hollywood and all, another sequel was botched.  It's because of movies like these that sequels have such a bad reputation.Despite a few genuine laughs in the first twenty minutes or so regarding DeNiro and some "fish out of water" situations, the movie seemed to go downhill soon after.  The jokes became few and between as the film laboriously plowed its way through an over-the-top heist setup and execution that felt about as inspired as "Crossroads."  Now either they ran out of jokes, they didn't have enough time to invest in an actual story, or the material itself has been played out in so many different ways already ("The Sopranos", "The Whole 9 Yards", "Mickey Blue Eyes", etc. etc.), that there was simply nothing left to write about
Did You Hear the Urban Legend About Those People Who Made a Crappy Movie?. The first movie was fresh and creative. This sucks. It takes the elements of the first film and dumbs them down to the point where you ask "Why?" and "Huh?" and scream "Noooooooo!" when you look back and see how much you've payed for the rental or purchase.The security guard from the first movie tells a film student the story about what happened to her involving the urban legend serial killer, so then obviously the film student decides to make a movie about a serial killer who murders people based on urban legends. Then...*GASP*- People start getting killed by someone replicating urban legends!!!!!!!!!!!There are numerous scenes and plotlines that make no sense like one character who makes a terrific movie gets killed, then his twin brother who nobody has ever seen EVER shows up (played by the same actor) to help solve the murders with our young heroine. The twist ending here is sooooo stupid and really makes you wonder why they couldn't actually come up with a twist that was worth your time spent watching this trash.If you're in the mood for a better albeit STILL UNORIGINAL sequel, go for the third movie 'Urban Legends: Bloody Mary' (which rips off 'Prom Night 2', but is better than that and this anyway)
Why Bother. This DVD Was Both A Waste Of Time (only 49 Minutes Long) And Money.If You Enjoy Pissing Away Your Cash And Wasting Time Waiting For Something To Be Funny This Is Your DVD. However If You Like To Laugh And Work Hard For Your Money And Spend It Wisely Steer Clear Of This. Sorry Gilbert, I Usually Enjoy Your Humor, But There Was None Of That Here. I Actually Feel Sorry For The People Who Were At The Taping Of This Disc Having To Sit Though This Wreck
A terrible spike lee joint. This is what spike lee created? This movie was horrible...graphic sexual content repetitive vulgar language (F words) and a terrible storyline too. It should have never been made this way and spike should have never directed this movie either. He didn't even focus on the son of sam which is the name of this movie. Avoid this movie unless you want to see A rare overrated vulgar soft porno movie. For a good spike lee joint see DO THE RIGHT THING atleast he created a better storyline in that movie than this highly overratted garbage
Misfire. I was really expecting to enjoy this movie. Alas, it starts out with what seems like a good premise but before you know it Russel Crowe is doing prat falls in an empty swimming pool. Ouch. Some of the plot is downright inexplicable. (The vintner is trying to convince Crowe NOT to sell the land by conspiring to make him think that the wine they make there is terrible? Huh?) At one point Crowe's love interest even acuses him of being, "Another one of those people who thinks I live in Provence because I have to!" Oooookay. Do a lot of folks look down on people who are FORCED to live in Provence? Is having people scoff at you for living in one of the most beautiful regions of France really a big issue for the locals? Throw in the obligatory uncouth American tourists, some nonsense about lavender and scorpians, and some silly fast-motion driving in circles and what you end up with is a jaw dropping disapointment. (Let's face it, when a director stoops to fast-motion footage of a car going in cirles it's time to raise the white flag.) I got the feeling that everyone just wanted to spend some time in Provence and churned this baby out so that they could expense it all. Oh, and the award for the most inappropriate and god-awful sound track goes to..
Cranky Old Comic Fan From The 70's. I'm going to take the con side of this debate.  Having not really read many comics in the past 20 years or so I really haven't followed any of the Ultimates stuff.  I have had it explained to me by a co-worker that's a big comic buff.  It seems to make sense to update some heros' origins.  After all Nick Fury and Dum Dum Dugan would be in their ninties these days.  I understand that they are also keeping the original origins in place which is fine.  Having said that, I don't know if this is an Ultimate storyline or not but I didn't care for it at all.Taken as a stand alone movie, if viewed by someone with no idea of who Iron Man is, this is really run of the mill.  Tony Stark wasn't a very cohesive character.  As far as alter-egos go this one is kind of a hypocritical milksap.  He makes a big deal out of not building weapons but has an entire room full of indestructible power armor.  If the suits are for research why the need for powerful lasers and missles?  The writer's seem to face the same dilemma most of Hollywood finds itself in these days.  It's politically incorrect to endorse violence but you still have to give the audience a good action packed fight scene.  As a result you get unrealistic portrayals of altruistic millionaire industrialists and pacifists with more weapons than Dirty Harry.  I may be reading a little too much into a cartoon but the level of some of the violence here (one person gets executed with a gunshot to the back of the head) suggests this is for a mature audience.  If this is the case the writers should have given the actions and motivations more depth.The biggest problem is the time it takes to actually get to Iron Man.  Once there the fight scenes are few and far between.  The film suffers from the same problem a lot of live action superhero movies suffer from, too much screen time for the alter-ego.  The action sequences are lacking visual impact.  I think that is partly due to the mediocre quality of the animation.  The CG doesn't mix too badly with the hand drawn but it's all just servicable at best.In the end the movie seemed overly long and convulted with the end being a less than satisfying resolution.  Even if I weren't aware of Iron Man before this I don't think I would recommend it as anything more than a rental
Movie is *not* animorphic widescreen. First off, I loved the movie after seeing it at the Anime Expo in California.  This review is not about the story, I agree with the other reviewers, but about the DVD format.  The movie is "letterboxed", not "animorphic/enhanced" so it won't display properly on a widescreen TV/Monitor.On a regular TV it looks fine but on a widescreen display you get a centerd image with the black bars on the top and bottom, rather than it "filling* the screen.This is just lazyness on the part of Viz since it would have cost them the same to have it produced either way.4* for the movie, 2* for the dvd production quality :
The bad editing in the recent U2 dvd's is getting tiresome. I work as an editor on high-end projects (mostly commercials and music video's with a couple of well regarded concert DVD's and award winning short film work to my credit) and I have to say that the editing on this disc (and the previous 2, to a lesser extent) demonstrates a real lack of sensitivity to the material.There is an epic quality to U2 in concert. Each song is its own experience... its own mini event; and instead of letting the power of that experience unfold naturally and organically... letting the music/performance tell its own story (and what a story it is!) the editing imposes itself on the music and the performance(s) and the effect is that you are taken out of (or at least not fully drawn into) the marvelous natural flow of power that is U2 live.All 3 of these DVD's are worth having simply because the band's brilliance in concert mostly transcends the poor editing but these discs COULD have been truly amazing documentations of almost religious experiences had the director/editor gotten out of their own way and really understood and felt into the event(s).What a shame
an all star cast in an empty post Trantino style movie. Andy Garcia (Twisted, The Unsaid) who has a few good moments in this movie, plays Jimmy The Saint who is assigned by a parapalegic Christopher Walken (Wedding Crashers, Envy) who's already played this character before only this time he has no feelings in his legs, you see and Walken, he tells Garcia to do a job and so Garcia assembles his crew of 4, William Forsythe (The Devil's Rejects, The Rock), Bill Nunn (Spider-man movies), Christopher Llyod (Back to the Future trilogy) and a crazy as hell Treat Williams (Deep Rising) but the problem is, of course, the job goes terribly wrong so Walken tells Garcia him and his boys have so many hours before his hitman, played by Steve Buscemi (Armageddon, Reservoir Dogs), who has the coolest name for a hitman, Mr. Shhh, comes and kills them all. Garcia then goes crazy, he also has falling in love with sexy Gabrielle Anwar (The Grave) and he doesnt want her in jepoardy and he also is trying to help out this girl who works the streets and so on and so for. Really empty drama thriller with an all star cast and the cast are the following: Jack Warden, Bill Cobbs (Air Bud), Fairuza Balk (The Water Boy), Glenn Plummer (Speed movies), Don Cheadle (Hotel Rwanda, Crash), Josh Charles (Four Brothers), Jenny McCarthy (BASEketball), Marshall Bell (Starship Troopers), Tommy Tiny Lister, Jr. (5th Element), Sarah Trigger (PCU) amd Don Stark (That 70's Show). All that in a so-so post Tarantino style movie
Very Mediocre. I wanted to watch this movie mainly because of Jennifer Ehle. Ms. Ehle played Elizabeth Bennett is the very lovely-made version of Pride and Prejudice. However, I did not like her character or her blonde hair. The story, mostly told in flashback, was poorly done and somewhat confusing. I was very glad when the film ended
The Death Of Jaws. Who wrote this movie? That is the first thing I had to ask myself after watching this movie a couple of months ago. Oddly enough, this movie was one of my favorite "scary" films to watch as a little boy...but, as an adult, WOW...this is just BAD. The original Jaws is a classic peice of film history and the second, although not as deep or well paced, is still a great film with a fairly well written plotline. This movie, on the other hand, is like being tortured by a psychopathic shark-lover...at sea world! Who would ever think to incorporate SEA WORLD into the Jaws franchise??? Seriously, It was just a horrible idea! The whole, "Mother Shark lost her baby shark" scenario is just weird...I don't even think that Shark's raise there "pups" once they are born...they just swim away. Not that this is that much different than the plot in Jaws 2, where a "relative" shark of the first Jaws decides to go after Cheif Brody and his kids...cheesy, but still, more fun and overall a better storyline. This movie trods along at a slow pace and the 3-D graphics add a overly grainy, aged look to the film. The acting is horrendous. Dennis Quaid is OK, but everyone else is just plain awful. Also, who has ever heard of a shark that could break underwater glass? Who OK'd a glass type in an underwater seaworld structure that could be broken by a shark's nose hitting it 3 times??? That's not too safe in my opinion. This is just a bad, bad movie. There isn't much that I can say is GOOD about it...but, I will give it 2 stars because it entertained me when i was a little boy and for that i am thankful
Horrible work out. This is the worst work out tape i've ever purchased...its a waste of money...there is nothing latin about this tape..and her moves are so repetitive...u won't even work up a sweatHowever the viva latin rhythm work out was excellent...highly recomende
pointless and trite. Several aspects of the movie go nowhere and it seems odd that they are included at all.  The tie-in with Cambodia and the sappy folk music themes make you think you're watching a (very dated) student film project.  It tries to make a statement, but the points don't converge.The scene at the bathroom sink after the husband learns of the the affair is sure strange.  I guess it conveys that he is taking her back and punishing her at the same time. Really a crude clip.Rather than expanding on the conflict and showing attempts to work through it, the film simply goes off on other tangents.When a movie ends and I say to myself "is that it?" I have to think I've wasted my time
Tawdry choices for the Brat Pack... I was excited to see this until I found out which movies would be included. Weird Science? Come on. It should have been the Breakfast Club, Pretty in Pink and St. Elmo's Fire
Amazon will send you the wrong DVD. Not really sure if this is a good workout or not.  Be carefull when buying this DVD.  I bought this DVD twice from Amazon and both times instead of sending me Sculpt & Tone, which I ordered and in which my invoice specifically stated, they sent me Step & Tone.  I have now placed my order for Sculpt & Tone from Gilad's official website.  I paid a little bit more, but I am sure they will get the order right.  I usually have good service with Amazon but with buying this DVD the service has been poor.  I am still hopeful though that this will be a great workout.  I know the other DVD's I have of his, Step Aerobics, The New Best of Bodies In Motion, and Step & Tone are all awesome!  D
Van Damnes worst. Im a big fan of Van Damne,but when i saw this movie i was really disapointed,the setting is dull,the story is dull and the guy he fights dull.I love Van Damnes other movie,but this is the only one that sux
Brazil Boom Boom. The quality and content was not worth the money spent. A couple of guys with a regular CAMCORDER driving around Rio and shooting video of the local attaraction without real professional input.Will not buy anything from these guys again
Totally Unconscionable. MASH is my all time favourite show. As such, I am one of those that bought each season as it came out. I bought mine at a store though and each of mine cost $35 so that's $350 invested so far. When I went looking for season 11, this is what I saw and I still can't believe the absolute disregard Fox must feel for its customers. This is seriously one of the most inconsiderate things I've ever seen a media company do. Those of us buying the seasons as they come out provide the MASH franchise with a revenue stream. To be this unappreciative of that revenue for the past several years is unfathomable to me.What makes it worse is that there was a very simple solution. All Fox had to do was put a voucher in the regular season 11 box. Send $14.95 and a proof of purchase and receive the bonus features. Simple and plain.So Fox, if you're paying attention, why should I buy other Fox shows as they are released? By doing this, you have completely eroded my interest in buying Simpsons and other shows since I'm obviously going to be stuck with several shelf-space stealers and no reasonable way to obtain the difference between those and the grand finale box set. Make amends and all will be forgiven, ignore us loyal customers and find there are fewer of us than you would like.PS. And, no, this isn't whining. This is a vocal objection to being swindled
Forsaking Substance for Entertainment. Equilibrium is a curate's egg - its best parts are not good throughout, and its worst aspects make erratic appearances. The acting is really the least of its problems; the cardinal failure was a script that could not decide what kind of movie it wanted to be when it grew up.Equilibrium, however poorly, aspires to be a dystopian film, and there exists a dystopian formula at work in fiction and film alike. Such a formula was employed magnificently in Michael Radford's adaptation of George Orwell's 1984. Contrarily, films imperil themselves in discarding the formula as evidenced by Alfonso Cuaron's junky adaptation of P.D. James' The Children of Men. There are essentially three parts to this formula. First, there must be a depiction of a believable society, and plausible justifications for its existence. The author or script writer must paint vividly, yet remain nuanced, since at this stage his purpose is to show the reader or viewer, without yet telling him the philosophy underlying it. Second, two-thirds of the way through there must be a conversation between protagonist and antagonist, which formally unveils the ethical dilemma. Here, the protagonist offers his alternative, usually an acknowledgement of the humane. Third, the dystopian resolution lies in the protagonist's choice: he must surrender to the system, rebel against it, or be conquered by it. The ending, if it is not tragic in the classical sense, must be ambiguous; if it is ended happily, it is no longer a matter for the reader or viewers' thoughts: the problem has been resolved, and he may retire from it and become forgetful of it.Libria, the society depicted in Equilibrium, is a post-apocalyptic society wherein feeling has been criminalized under the pretext that human feelings, and the actions carried out on their behalf, represent the fons et origio of man's inhumanity to man. The objective of outlawing sentiments is the preservation of peace. Is this believable? Ultimately, it is not because the viewer is given no other reason for this society to exist, no justification for its brutality except that it is by this method alone that peace may be preserved. However, a desire for peace is predicated on an aversion to war, and aversion is something we principally feel. A more believable premise would have been the prohibition of certain feelings, but it is also unbelievable because it is inconsistent. The protagonist (John Preston, a member of the Grammaton Cleric, an elite government agency for enforcing laws against so-called `sense-crimes') marries, begets children, hesitates in killing his partner - what point would there be in any of this in a society that had eliminated feeling? And, if we are being generous, and suppose that this was done intentionally so as to say, "You can never entirely eliminate feeling," it fails still; because if the denizens of Libria weren't completely devoid of feeling, they couldn't be as cowed as they are depicted. Instead, countless times throughout the film characters make comments, statements, enquiries that can only have as their possible source or response an emotion. To have had characters who were truly apathetic, or for whom the fictitious drug Prozium was effective, they would have had more in common with Star Trek's Borg. The backdrop for this dystopia, then, lacks subtlety or nuance. From the first fifteen seconds of film, the viewer ethically objects - it remains tediously Manichean throughout. The viewer is given a straw man and immediately begins tearing it down and the only suspense is literally in waiting for what we know will happen.In Brave New World, it is Mustapha Mond's conversation with John the Savage. In 1984, it is O'Brien's talk with Winston Smith. In The Children of Men, it is a debate between Theo and the Xan. In Equilibrium, the formal unveiling of the ethical dilemma happens in a haphazard way throughout, culminating in a fight scene that lacks the awe inspired by the Matrix three years before. Here was the moment for the "talky" bit of the film, the sophisticated counter-punch, the moral awakening, the vindication of the human; instead, the viewer is given another low-brow, Hollywood denouement. John Preston does nothing to justify his alternative to the totalitarian status quo - there is no bit of dialogue with Father where lines are spoken which conveys the notion that "Feelings are essential to thought," or that "peace has been obtained at a terrible price." All the loose ends, littered liberally throughout the film, are never addressed: Why have art in Libria? Why does Father intonate, and raise the pitch of his voice to manipulate the masses in a scene reminiscent of a Leni Riefenstahl propaganda film? A better film would have acknowledged these scenes, and defended their inclusion in a climatic dialogue between John Preston and Father (or DuPont as it turns out).The conclusion of Equilibrium can be summarized as follows: "Good guy kills bad guys, sixty-second revolution ensues, people can feel again, hero smiles, time to go to bed." There wasn't ever a genuine ethical dilemma anyway: what was wrong was obviously wrong, and what was right was intuitively right. The viewer never believed the reasons Libria came to be, or at least they never found them plausible in the way they found Huxley's, Orwell's, James', Zamyatin's, or Koestler's explanations. In Equilibrium it was all simply the soft groundwork prepared for the banal, unoriginal action movie to follow. The plot, then, was in some respects as shallow as the tendentious storylines in soft-core porn films: they needn't be sensical because no one is interested in the story, but rather for the titillation, arousal, and amusement. Many viewers of Equilibrium are fans of flashy action sequences (a majority of whom were not disappointed as their reviews attest); but for those seeking a fuller cinematic experience, Equilibrium is an unfortunate disappointment. During the film a woman asks Preston, "Why are you alive?" Preston responds with the bureaucratically sterile answer, "I'm alive to safeguard the continuity of this great society. To serve Libria." "It's circular. You exist to continue your existence. What's the point?" she asks. And, what's the point is exactly the point about this film.
You  Gasp! You Scream! You hit the Chapter/Skip Button!. I may not be the quintessential purveyor of Euro-Horror, but I have seen enough to know that I have seen one of of the worst in "Erotic Nights of the Living Dead!" That is not to say that this film is entirely uninteresting.If money is no object, or you can pick this DVD up for a song, then the combination of eye candy, bad special effects and hysterical dubbing (anybody remember SCTV's "Rome, Italian Style" spoof from years ago? Dubbing wise, this is the real thing!)make this zombie movie fun to watch...for awhile. Cinema this bad can only last so long until you grab your DVD remote and speed up the process, or go to the main menu for the special features.You have two men and a woman head out to "Cat Island," where zombies are purported to live. These folks don't believe the folktales, meet up with the only two inhabitants of the grave-riddled island (an elderly man with a boil on his forehead and his sultry granddaughter, played by Euro-Siren Laura Gemser), who warn the visitors to leave and... well, y'know.What I found most shocking about the film was that the restored hardcore sex scenes advertised on the package were actually hardcore sex scenes, available in shops that refuse to sell XXX action. Now--- if this is the part you're curious about, it's only one hardcore scene, and probably tame compared to the other XXX you've seen. You get lots of soft-core, lots of beautiful women romping naked, but nothing worth shelling out hard cash for.As for the Euro-Horror zombie flesh-chomping scenes, they are far and few between, and amongst the worst you will ever see!The special features? The alternate scenes and the Laura Gemser gallery is so lame, you would swear the folks producing this DVD wanted to outdo the mediocrity of the film itself. The one good special feature is the trailers for other Euro-Horror films
Total disappointment!!. Blech!  I really like all the young actors that were in this movie and expected it to be really funny and cute.  WRONG!  It was a bizarre combination of shock tactics trying to show how edgey they all were.  The only redeeming actor was Justin Long.  The rest of the movie was a waste of brain cells
Really deserves 0 stars, but that's not a choice!. this movie sucks it sucks donkey balls. If you enjoyed this movie you should be shot you should be shot in the head. DIE YOU EVIL FANS OF THIS HORRIBLE MOVIE. Who the hell would put the time, money and effort into such a peice of junk. I suggest that everyone who was involved in the making of this &quot;movie&quot; should be rounded up and sent to consentration camps. I think this is the major problems of this world. This movie is the reason war exists. This movie is the reason people hate each other. please read this review and never watch that peice of crap
These Were Real People, People. I waited over 30 years to see this film, and now that I have -- I'm glad I waited that long.  Its glaring defects might not have been so obvious to me 30 years ago.Nicholas, Alexandra, their daughters, their son, the people surrounding them -- not only are they not fictional, but thanks to the era in which they lived, they were photographed, we know what they actually looked like.  So who on earth did the casting?!  It was impossible to tell one Grand Duchess from another, and as for Alexandra -- in the first few scenes, I had trouble distinguishing the actress from someone in drag.  Janet Suzman was the worst casting flub of all, unless you count the stilted manner in which Michael Jayston delivered his lines.  What a stiff and boring character he makes Nicholas to be.  Yet there are photos extant of Nicholas smiling as he played with his children.  Nicholas was also portrayed as obsessed with holding on to his power as Tsar.  But in the Robert Massie book after which the movie was purportedly modeled, it was very clear that Nicholas was acutely aware of his responsibilities to the Russian people, as well as to his family, and above all his son, the future Tsar.  There was nothing exceptional about his behavior; most of Europe at the time was ruled by kings and queens, and to all of them, the thought of losing their thrones was simply unthinkable.Yet this film falls into the trap most of us do, of judging history not on the basis of its own terms, but with our usual spectacularly accurate 20/20 hindsight.  Having been fed Soviet propaganda for 75 years, we have it entrenched in our minds that Nicholas was an extremely poor ruler.  That's the stunning success of the Massie book, that someone who had absolutely no connection to Russians, and no connection to royalty save for the one coincidence of both their sons having hemophilia, was able to overcome the general (and erroneous) "knowledge" of his time and write the kind of sympathetic biography of this family that was long lacking.  The movie, on the other hand, makes Nicholas look petty, and Alexandra slightly over the edge.One petty anachronism was the scene that showed the royal family praying just prior to Nicholas's sending off his troops into World War I.  It was badly researched, to the point of ludicrousness.  The Tsars of Russia were all Orthodox Christians.  Orthodox Christianity has its own very distinctive music; in fact, Russian Orthodox chant is very different from Greek Orthodox chant.  So what kind of background music did the director choose?  Gregorian, of course!  Can we at least *strive* for a little authenticity?!Apparently not.  Massie wrote in considerable detail about the attitude of the Romanovs towards their captors, how their guards had to be changed every three or so months because they kept winning over the Bolsheviks:  "You aren't anything like what we thought," was the most frequently quoted comment on the subject.  The movie showed nothing of that.  Well -- in the end, it was this exact trait of graciousness and consideration towards their captors that ended up getting the Romanov family canonized in the Russian Orthodox Church.  That movement was well underway by 1971; I wonder, if the directors and producers had done a little more thorough research, if the film would have been a tad more sympathetic to these five people caught between two worlds and two cultures.All in all, purchasing the movie was a waste of money.  Maybe the Bolsheviks over at the University's Russian Department will appreciate my donating it -- that way, others can get to see it without wasting their money
really flat. Jodie Foster Is one of the Greatest Actress's Ever period,but this clunky film is so boring&Predictable that it just never gets off the ground&put me to sleep. a film full of Cliches&dime a dozen story lines that never goes anywhere
I'm rating the actual DVD not the movie. I LOVE this movie I've seen it probably more than 100 times! So imagine how excited I was to see it for like 5 bucks at Wal-Mart.... this particular copy is sitting next to me right now and all can say is I was really mad when I sat and watched it, the editing is horrible there are times when the camera zooms on people it shouldn't, lines are cut out and sometimes there are voices but no one's lips are moving.  Buy the authorized version not this one this one sucks
Great DVD. My three year old loves this DVD and has discovered the joys of Goofy, BUT... Why can you just set the DVD to play all? The Mickey collection you can just set it and forget it. This collection you must keep selecting the next cartoon (it does not even default to the next cartoon). POOR SHOW DISNEY
So what?. This may be "how Mexico really is," but its not a good movie. After reading all the great reviews I was expecting much more. But like 21 Grams, it is just a movie about people you don't really care about because you don't get to know them well enough. You feel like a voyeur on other people's miserable lives and you never get inside their heads enough to really care. Its like watching a sit com, just splashed all over a big screen. There is too much violence without a point. The acting is good but the stories are blah, especially the middle one, and the themes are not developed very well. Its too much "film-making" without anough story. The style doesn't hook into the story and there is very little emotion generated. I simply didn't care, and I would never want to see it again.Y tu mama tambien is much, much better.
Don't Waste Your Money. There is NOTHING in this DVD that wasn't in the book.  In fact, Stan and John basically read the book to you as they show you the pictures from the book.  I was hoping to actually SEE the artists do the drawings, but there is maybe 60 seconds total of footage of actual drawing.  The rest of the video is just John Buscema tracing over all the images that are already in the book.  If you really want to learn to draw comics, this isn't for you.  If you just want a basic overview of the process, this dvd might not be TOO disappointing.  But if you already own the book, DEFINITELY don't waste your money.  It would be cheaper just to have your mom read the book to you
Yawn.... This movie has too much talking and absolutely zero action, and a misusage of Christina Ricci's talent. The whole movie is Woody Allen making a tribute to himself. Allen plays one of the main characters and the rest of the actors are obviously too much in awe, or is it fear, of him to improvise on lines that would have fit if Woody Allen was saying them, but really didn't fit their characters. Much of the plot plainly doesn't make coherent sense, and all that whining is tiring and cliche. Eeeegads! The movie would have been better if Woody Allen wasn't in it, and if Ricci wasn't used to add depth to an undeniably stupid shallow character. (Rose McGowan would have played a better Amanda, incidentally.) There needs to be much more action and storytelling in this movie, than the much too much neurotic talking. What a waste of talent and time
Land of Oprahisms. Having avoided seeing this film, I found that the mistake of sending my partner to the rental store on his on, brought "Tuesday..."unbiden into our home.My aversion to Oprah and her ilk, does not cloud my dislike of this film. A bad film is a bad film.Devoid of any real plot and hampered by some very poor acting on the part of all concerned, and directionless directing, this film should not be seen by anyone who values the aforementioned,To me a reasonable premise should move a story forward. Something should occur, my interest should be engaged. This film takes reams of pre-packaged aphorisms and greeting card verses, and attempts to build the plot from words alone. It is as if someone picked up the telephone book and said, "Hey,this book is full of words, lets make a movie."In a way a movie about the different lives of those listed in the telephone book would be more interesting.To be honest, Jack Lemmon was not very good in this film. He played the same character he always did. Just older. Hank Azaria was just awful. He talked as if his mouth was filled with stones, and was wooden and expressionless. Maybe he was too embarrased to be there. As to the other actor's; well they filled up the space nicely.The look of the film was cheap and of the movie of the week quality. The sprayed on snow in a winter scene looked as fake as it was. They even covered the green leaves on the trees. Some better acting, some good R rated dialogue, and maybe some nudity would have spiced up this film. As it stands,however, it will only be of interest to fans of Oprah and Dr.Phil, etc. The purveyors of our national state of pity and feeling soory for ourselves.It is seldom that we find car keys under our chairs, but films such as this perpetuate the myth that a few nice phrases, a good cry, and a genial talk-show presenter will somehow make it all better.I,for one, think that a nice cuppa is more beneficial. Then pull the finger out, and just get on with it.(To the grammar and form police: I did have this in paragraphs, but the editing process scrunched it all together. Sorry
Where is my product ?. Until this date i did not receive this prooduct?What is happening?I alredy wrote to you about this problem an d i am waiting for  a solutionRegardsMario Assa
Be afraid, be very afraid.... I have never written a review before (and probably won't again) but I was so appalled by this waste of a perfectly good camcorder, that I had to warn others who might be sucked in by the sacrilegious "testimonial" on the box comparing this to Romero's flicks. As a zombie-phile, I'll sit through almost any zombie flick....within reason. However, I tried to sit through dog several times but never made it past the first hour. This trash smacks of being written by a couple of twelve year olds who got into their parents liquor cabinet. The "actors" appear to have been involved in dinner theater....as waiters, and the dialogue is more hackneyed than a Michael Bolton love song. The only horror here is that you'll never get back the 90 minutes of your life that you wasted watching this. The social commentary on the media is as subtle as a Doc Maarten to the groin. If you have sinned greatly and need to do penance, watch this film or if you have really sinned greatly, do what I unfortunately did and buy this film.
What happened??. Horrible, boring film from one of my top 10 favorite directors.  The only thing worth seeing is the amazing &quot;tiara&quot; of candles that Goya (supposedly?) uses to paint at night.  BORING!
Oversell. Wasn't perticularly thrilled. Was expecting more classical tap dancing. I wish the product details had specified that it was more 'New age'. At least I would have known what to expect
Best movie with no conclusion I've ever seen. OK, I'm a SciFi fan.  I read the SciFi reviews and thought this was really a movie for me, and it really was good right up to the end.  Just one problem, they forgot to write the end.  What happened?  Did they run out of money?  Did the writer write himself into a corner?  There was no climax, conclusion, or resolution.  You can argue till you are blue in the face about "pan & scan."  I prefer movies with an ending.  If you are looking for a great unfinished story, this one is for you
no draft dodger here!. John Wayne was no draft dodger as one of the previous reviewer(moron) stated:As Wikipedia states:Wayne was 34 when the U.S. entered the war and was raising four children, and when he requested deferment he was granted a 3-A deferment for family reasons. Later in the war his deferment was changed to a 2-A deferment with the explanation that having him serve was not in the national interest. Despite not serving, Wayne did support the military through participation in USO shows for U.S. servicemen.I guess it would have been better if we had let the government take care of his children if he would have perished in WWII?  My grandfather also didn't server in WWII because he had three children to raise including my father.
Why the fuss?. This film is definitely not a masterpiece. I found it incredibly dry and incomprehensibly over-rated. Yes, the film was bleak but inexplicably bleak. To make matters worse, the main character seems to resolve her numbness almost out of nowhere. Perhaps I missed something gigantic because I was trying not to fall asleep while watching this drag on but I would not attempt to see it again. However, there were a couple of memorable scenes.I would strongly advise renting it before purchase. Some people do love the film but I don't understand why
Lame, sanctimonious screed from a perenially overrated hack. I am both a veteran and an indie film-maker (though I have not yet worked with a budget like this one had).  These are two facets that do have a bearing on my perspective, but they do not make me any less capable of recognizing virtue or merit - at least no less than others who write reviews.Unlike many of the clearly strident and biased reviews writtenhave indicated, I feel that comedy and horror are visceral in nature, and that one's political and philosophical inclinations are separate factors which intrudes rather than enhances the nature of the sensations, though it is often hard for some to separate them.Doing my best to review Homecoming objectively, I have to say it really wasn't a good film or story.  It wasn't scary or clever or entertaining or even very interesting.  It was mainly just a one-dimensional political rant where a horror film should have been, a dark comedy/satire which wasn't all that funny (granted, I am not an easy laugh), and campy B-movie propaganda where a clever story could have been told and presented.One thing that does bother me is the hypocrisy that Dante and the other partisan screechers ultimately flaunt: they don't really care anything about those who serve this nation generally, or in a time of war specifically.  Neither he nor or other liberal "cultural elitists" who are so proud of themselves respect or appreciate what those who serve this country (let alone in wartime) go through and could not understand nor care less about their reasons for service.  Like many of their ilk (including the fatuous Matt Damon), they think those in the military do so because of a lack of options/money/education/etc.  To then presume to speak on the behalf of those who gave their life is not only disingenuous, but shameless.  I spent much of my career serving under a President (Clinton) whose attitude towards the military and its members was one of indifference at best and disdain the rest of the time.What actually bothers me the most about this is Joe Dante being considered "a Master of Horror".  If any of those who raved about the "message" of this film had could put down your protest signs and Greenday posters and stop patting yourself on the back for a moment to examine the question honestly, you would have to admit to yourself that Joe Dante really didn't belong in a list of horror icon directors (besides The Howling, he just doesn't have the resume').  I realize that many of the stories and directors in this series have a political axe to grind, but at least John Carpenter and Dario Argento have earned their place among the Horror genre's esteemed (and I thought the vignette Cigarette Burns was really good, though I was a huge fan of In The Mouth of Madness, which it reminded me of).Truth be told, you don't have to be a conservative or Republican to dislike this film.  And being a strident, ham-fisted propagandist doesn't make Joe Dante a good horror film-maker, let alone a legend in the Horror film genre.
Sloppy presentation detracts from classical comedy. The six short subjects on this double dvd set represent, I am led to believe, the total short subject output of the great W.C. Fields. I did not expect a crystal clear video image, as these items are about 70 yrs old, although overall the quality is not that bad. Similarly, the audio track, while a bit &quot;crackly&quot; at times, was quite acceptable. What did make me threaten the life span of the TV, player and disc however, was the lack of sinc between the video and audio tracks. It is rather off putting to find a second or so difference between what you see &quot;being said&quot;, and what you actually hear. You feel you are watching a poorly dubbed foreign film. The comedy is still very appealing, but this attention to fine detail on the part of the makers of the set leaves a bad taste in my mouth
Dissapointing. The only 2 REAL ultimate fights on this is from Blade, and The legend of Drunken Master. I mean Scarface? Gladiator? SNATCH?! They are good movies, but those scenes DO NOT belong on an Ultimate Fights Dvd. Hopefully they can do a Vol.2 with Blade 2, Jet Li, Matrix, stuff like that FIGHTS! I don't want a dvd of brawls or a long crappy shootout
Is it the hypocrisy that so many could relate to?. Five Osars??? This movie got FIVE Oscars? How sad is that? This is the culture we are exporting. This is why they hate us. Okay, I can see that some people like the idea of the poor, put upon patriarch finally standing up to his unappreciative family. Lots of deep, dark, disturbing images - we in America seem to like that sort of thing for some reason. What is it that makes it OK to celebrate old men seducing little girls? Okay, so he doesn't follow through - when she tells him she is actually a virgin. Would it have been okay if she had not been? Does that make it okay that he gets killed? That the only decent relationships the man seems to have is with children? And we're supposed to have COMPASSION for the character?Kevin Spacey has taken some risks with his career, most of which I have great respect for. I have to say this one makes no sense. Sexy naked teenaged girls and images of Annette Bening with her legs in the air may make a lot of money, but there's plenty of that on the Internet.The violence, the homophobia juxtaposed with homosexual imagery that only contributes to the phoniness of what passes for "family values" - perhaps it is the hypocrisy above all that so many could relate to.I'm glad I saw this movie just so I can say I saw it, given that it seems to be such a cultural icon. Now I can discuss it if I have to. But it's a sad day when a movie likes this says something this important about who we are as a culture. A sad day indeed
rent don't buy. I attempted to watch this film a few different times. I could just never quite get to the end. It's not because it's a particularly bad movie in fact it's just a modern day version of James Bond... its just that it never really excited me. The one redeeming factor is the car - it really becomes a character of its own
God Awful. I'm stunned.Every once and a while a movie comes along that is so deeply in love with itself AND so deeply flawed that you are left sitting there in slack jawed disbelief.  This is one of those movies.  Pretentious and "look-at-me-I'm-so-quirky" yet so remarkably inane and trite.To be fair, the movie is not technically bad, and in more capable hands could have been something really special and "meaningful".  Instead, however, the incessant self-absorption, the cliches that pass for "wit", and the smugness all just combined to make me (right around the ten minute mark) root for tragedy to strike:  "Oh, large truck in the background, please, please drive into the foreground, swerve, and hit a character...any character."  And don't even get me started on the first year film student level dialog that ends up squeezing every ounce of well-intentioned meaning out of this lemon so that there's none actually there.This is a vanity project and it shows.   Miranda July wrote, directed and starred in this - so we pretty much know who to blame.  And to read that Miranda July is a performance artist - well, that pretty much explains everything right there
Worse than Bad. This movie is silly at best, racist at worse. I can't believe Ice Cube actually wrote the script for this mess. My opinion of Ice Cube has been drastically lowered. It's the old black jiving and shucking all over again. This movie has all the classic black stereotypes. It even has a scene where Smokey gets so high that he ends up in the chicken coop thinking he's a chicken. Remember the old minstrel shows?: "nobody in here but us chickens." There's no  plot to speak of, just a bunch of insults, getting high, stealing money, potty jokes, black people knocking each other upside the head. Some character get punched out, and Smokey (Chris Tucker) goes over and yells in his face, "Dude, you been knocked out!" That's a typical "joke" from this movie. How about a dogcatcher getting bit on his behind by a dog? Hilarious---Not. After watching this dvd with my family, we tried to think of one funny or worthwhile scene, and we couldn't think of a single one.
Starts well, comes crashing down. In the early going, I thought the choice was between four and five stars.  As the movie progressed, my rating dropped to somewhere between three and four, so clearly the first half of the movie is better than the second.  The ending was so disappointing that I had to drop my rating to two stars.It is about a Polish man in France who marries a French girl but is divorced by her because he is unable to make love to her.He returns to Poland without her, manages to get rich, and comes up with a plot to get revenge on his beloved Dominique.  The problem with this writing is that he loves her, so why is he plotting revenge against her?  It is senseless.The ending is utterly surreal.  She should hate him for what he has done to her, but she is smiling to him.  He is looking at her and crying.  He has betrayed her in a cruel way.  He doesn't have the right to be crying for her.  That is like Hitler crying for the Jews.  He is still in a position to help her out, but he won't.  It's really pretty sickening.The story becomes unclear enough as it is, without adding some fantasy scenes or memories about a wedding and a kiss.  It left me angrily saying "What the hell is going on?"  I really hate it when a director becomes unclear and plays with the audience.  I don't find that cute at all.  Tell the damn story and tell it clearly.  Besides, the ending sucks
Music Kills It. The picture is perfect.  Why can't the Laurel and Hardy series be so good, especially their silents, which look just hideous, even in the Hallmark releases.  BUT, the music for the General is SO BAD I can't get through it.  I don't know what kind of organ or synthesizer they use, but the new-age sound certainly does NOT suit the 1920s.  The music just plods along without humour, and very little contrast.  I have seen these films with live accompaniment, and with great music, the comedy just comes alive; but with anything less than great, the film falls flat and seems at best droll, at worst just kind of stupid.  Very, VERY BAD.  But one thing this proves, movies even back to the middle 1920s are clean, clear, and sharp.  Never accept less than that in your collection!  And send companies letters demanding it
One of the worst movies ever. this movie was horrible I just watched it and it felt like forever. the comedy in the movie sucked there were ONLY 3 scenes that were actually funny and they were with Lee Evans, Jackie was just not his old self in this movie he is either getting old or not in shape, and Claire forlani's acting was horrible big time the movie could have been way better with out her.I also did not like that most of jackie's stunts were done with wires. the story line was ok but it needed some real comedy, i was bored through most of the movie and I hope jackie's talent doesn't go to waste and he starts acting in better movies.
Hicks Without Hype. Years ago I watched a young comedian I hadn't viewed before on a TV special from the Montreal Comedy Festival.He was a wow, with a devastatingly and savagely funny piece on the Gulf War which had just ended.Sadly having switched on part way through the piece I never found out who the comic was.I ached to be able to get hold of the piece on video and searched in vain for years looking for it.The comic was Bill Hicks and now,as then, his take on America and its place in the world has never been more relevant.This DVD contains some of that early footage,along with a great deal of his subsequent material.You don't always have to be totally in sympathy with views (his stance as a militant smoker for example) to find him seeringly funny.A man who makes you laugh whilst challenging a great many widely held assumptions.Watch Bill and you realise how trivial a great deal of contemporary comedy has become.We need more comics like him.
Get the HBO Special Instead!. This DVD is almost the exact same routine that Katt did on his HBO special Pimp Chronicles, Part I.  The biggest difference is the overall production quality of this show.  The film is dark and is filmed at awkward distances that often make it difficult to even see him or get close-ups of his facial expressions, which are a big part of his comedy.  The jokes are almost identical to the ones he did on his HBO special.  I would recommend buying the HBO special for your collection and filing this one on your "don't buy" list
Stick with the original. When Hollywood decided that the classic Christmas cartoon How the Grinch Stole Christmas needed updating, I experienced a quaver of fear. How, I wondered, could anyone bring the classic Dr. Seuss tale and its gnarly green villain to life as vividly as the 1966 animation?I can give a mixed report. Jim Carrey, in the title role, does a marvelous job recreating the nasty antithesis of Yuletide joy. His actions and facial contortions are near-perfect (although his voice, I must admit, pales in comparison to the cartoon version's Boris Karloff). He dominates the entire film with energy and antics only slightly overshadowed by his prodigious makeup and costume. Anthony Hopkins also did good work as the narrator.But director Ron Howard didn't do the Seuss story complete justice. Instead of reimagining the original through a new lens, he gave us a completely different story. The Whos of Who-ville are the primary victims here -- where once they were beatific inhabitants of a remote and pastoral village, they've become greedy, materialistic, hard-partying gluttons in a town based solely on marketing and capitalism.Cindy Lou Who, the innocent tot who discovers the Grinch at his nefarious thievery, is now an older child (Taylor Momsen) bent on redeeming the famous hermit, who boldly braves his mountain fastness to spread her version of holiday cheer. Even the Grinch's pseudo-Santa sleigh has been reinvented, now boasting rocket boosters. And the new back-story, which attempts to explain the Grinch's Christmas loathing, doesn't make a lot of sense. While the cartoon gave us a villain who was evil, rotten to his core and filled with inexplicable rage at the world, this Grinch is simply misunderstood and overly mischievous. Also, should the Grinch's big redemption scene really involve so much heart-thumping pain?I feel sorry for the children who will grow up associating this movie with Dr. Seuss' marvelous story, rather than the animated feature which still holds up so well after 35 years. A favorite Christmas tradition has been replaced with typical Hollywood glitz and glitter, and the season is poorer for it. Please, if you have children (or a childlike fascination for Christmas), stick with the original.by Tom Knapp, Rambles edito
There is no war on Islam. America are allied with suadi arabia, The most fundementalist and extremist Islam nation in the world. They don't care about Islam Extremists, this DVD is totally irrelevant propeganda
Waste of time. Hmm. Curious. Unlike most of the positive reviewers here, I was not abused as a child, so perhaps this explains why I thought the movie was an overrated pile of dung. The acting and direction were of uniformly high quality; I have no complaints there. It's the story that had all the problems: (1) No character is sympathetic; (2) There are plot holes you can drive a Hummer through; (3) It's implausible that Klaus's nurse was one of his victims -- he's simply too young -- so the whole cycle-of-violence subtext makes no sense; (4) The murders are imaginative but meaningless and nowhere near as gory or intense as their reputation would suggest.Frankly, having heard for years that IN A GLASS CAGE is among the most disturbing movies ever made, I'm left confused and more than a little disappointed. How can anyone be disturbed by violence directed towards characters they cannot possibly identify with? Was I supposed to empathize with the sadistic Nazi? With the wife of the sadistic Nazi? With the sadistic Nazi's protege? It would take more craft than these filmmakers are capable of to produce in me that kind of emotion, and frankly I'm not sure why anyone would want to bother trying.I'm sad to report that the movie is not chilling, disturbing, or even particularly entertaining. It left me bored and wondering why the heck I had spent so much time trying to track it down in the first place
Cinema is NOT television. Munch has long been one of my favorite painters, if not my favorite, since I was seventeen years old.  I love films (Angelopoulos, Tarkovsky, Fellini, Antonioni, Bergman, you name it.). Therefore, it was not a hard decision for me to forgo a particularly beautiful afternoon in the outdoors for being locked up for three hours in the AC atmosphere of a movie theater. What a mistake, and what a disappointment! Where was the editor (sorry, it was Watkins) for this film? I am amazed that director/editor Peter Watkins should so obviously confuse the television medium for cinema. The film is about one hour too long. It is repetitive, grossly uneven in its presentation of the painter's life (half-life, would be a more appropriate term). It seems that Watkins went on and on, repeating himself, and suddenly, looking at his watch, realized he had to rush through the remainder of Munch's life to finish the film.  He rushed and still did not make it past 1909.  Why ignore Munch, the man and his work, after 1909?  But I guess this is the director's prerogative, to show what he wants of Munch's life.In general, the cinematography is good, with delicate colors.  The representation of the period was well researched and comes across as authentic.  The hand-held camera works well most of the time, with beautiful close-ups.  In some scenes, such as the socio-political discussions in the cafes, its unsteadiness underlines the chaos of the expounded philosophy.  There are even moments of greatness, such as when Munch is painting "Death in the Sickroom."  Unfortunately, more often than not, the camera is shaky for no apparent reason.  But there are far too many cuts, so many it makes one dizzy at times just watching, and they interfere with the narrative thread of the story.  Worse, the contrivance of the cuts is astonishingly predictable -- after a while, I knew that the instant any character's eyes looked directly into the camera, the scene was going to quickly cut to something else.  Geir Westby's performance, whose likeness to Munch is remarkable, is not convincing: one does not get any insight regarding Munch's internal demons, or any real sense of the artist's passion, jealousy, and repression.  The dreadful environment, familial, social and political, seems practically divorced from Munch's life, as the artist appears to stand apart from it all, an outside observer.  His very critical relationship with his father is hardly touched upon, except for a (too often) repeated short scene at the dining table, when Munch was still young.  Munch's complex and ambiguous feelings about women in general, which shaped so much of his work, are not even touched upon, except for his particular relationship with Mrs. Heiberg (Gro Fraas).  Waltkins' decision to present Munch's biography more like a docu-drama could have been rewarding, except for the fact that he was not able to integrate the historical document with the subject matter.It all boils down to the editing, which is just AWFUL.  Believe me, I say this not because the film is three-hours long (Angelopoulos' and Tarkovsky's films do not exactly produce short subjects), but because when a director has nothing new to say, and keeps repeating himself, it quickly becomes tedious and boring.  Most likely, the original television production was shown in three one-hour installments.  Therefore, many of the numerous flashbacks were justified, not only to somehow refresh the memories of the viewers who might have seen one or two previous episodes in the preceding weeks, but also to "bring aboard" new viewers.  But in the continuum of the film, these same flashbacks become useless, even counter-productive, unnecessarily weighing down the viewer with back-story.Please note that I did not follow many of my fellow spectators who left the theatre early.  I suffered through to the ending credits.
Very disappointed. I ordered this video with a great deal of excitement beacause it promised a lot and had a lovely woman on the cover.  When I played it for the first time I was very disappointed for three reasons:1)  Nearly all of the moves require a specific type of chair.  If you do not own this type of chair in your home, you are out of luck.  Even if you had the right type of chair, I doubt these techniques would be comfortable anyhow.2)  The narration is very poor.  They try to get you into a relaxed state, but their voices (man and woman) are more annoying than soothing or relaxing.  In addition, the guy is a hippie with a ponytail.  If he was on the cover, I would have not bought the video.3)  The man and the woman are both somewhat flabby (the woman is still very attractive though).  Most instructors on these types of DVD's are nicely toned and pleasing to look at for inspiration.Overall, the biggest disappointment was knowing that I needed a special chair to do these movements with.  If I would have known that, the DVD I bought would still be in the Amazon.com warehouse.Good luck to those of you that still decide to order this video after reading what I wrote.  You're going to need it! :)BB&
a sad goodbye to the "king of cool". this was steve mcqueen's last film and that is sad as this is not even able to be called an action movie or a comedy. this mess is "based on the true story" of bounty hunter ralph "papa" thorson and it just never gels into and kind of film at all. not the way to say goodbye to the great steve mcqueen, get bulliet or the sand pebbles instea
Men vs. Woman, again! Boring!. I would definitely say this is Survivors worst season.  The problem lies in premise of men vs. woman, which had just been done in Amazon, and I was hoping would never be done again since it was boring the first time.  In Vanuatu it was even worse, since woman, in my opinion, seem to play survivor as a battle of the sexes anyways.  There is no reason to encourage it by starting the game that way.  Add to that, 2 of the woman are lesbians who dont want any part of the men anyways, and you have a recipe for boredom,  which is exactly what this season cooked up.The "exotic" location seemed dull and boring, with the exception of the eruption/ earthquake that was cool.  Another problem is just in the players themselves, most were annoying, and all the likeable characters were soon eliminated.  The one shining star, in my opinion was Rory(sp) who started of annoying and then let lose and captured the game for several episodes.  Unfortunately, due to the position he was in he was doomed, and was soon voted out. Sorry about the spoiler but you should not waste your time with this season anyways.I did think this season had one of the better final challenges.  But once again I am disappointed by the lack of extras that could be included in any survivor dvd set, I would like to see more interviews, more cut scenes and tribe life.Oh well, where is Thailand and Amazon?
Emphasis On The "Stop". Young Nicole has decided to run away from her Texas home with her equally young boyfriend, Jess.  Their plan?  Drive to Hollywood and seek gainful employment as Famous Movie Stars.  This one fact explains much that is wrong about the film.  Not only does it immediately make the characters hard to care about, but it also foreshadows one of their biggest and most boring flaws: mind-blowing stupidity.Nicole, at one point, hears the call of nature, and the two ill-fated young lovers stop at (dum da dum!) the Rest Stop.  After Nicole uses perhaps the most nauseating toilet in southwest America, she comes outside to find that her boyfriend and his car have disappeared.  Before long, she is tormented by a sadistic man in a yellow truck, an odd-ball family of fundamentalist God-thumpers, and her own crippling idiocy.  To save herself, Nicole drinks an ancient bottle of liquor, watches a little T.V., cries morosely, and spends about 18 hours in the Bathroom-o'-Ba'al.  Jaimie Alexander's Nicole does nothing that could be called intriguing or understandable, and (double whammy) she is horribly, horribly acted.Penned and directed by John Shiban, "Rest Stop" has literally nothing going for it.  Considering that Shiban is a veteran "X-files" scribe, the incomprehensible plot is forgiveable (I'll grant, while I'm on the subject, that various scenes given during the credits and on the disc's special features help "clear up" the ludicrous story, but I'll also say that if you have to employ extras in order to give your movie clarity, then there's something wrong).  But everything else -- the disbelieving cop, the mysterious video, the school bus -- well, it's all about as interesting and creative as the scribbles on your typical public toilet stall
Embarrassing. Why did they even bother transferring this movie to DVD?  Seriously?  The [...] child of a masterpiece, "The Vanishing" sports some of the most half-hearted performances and sometimes downright hilarious performances of the 90's.This isn't a matter of comparison.  This movie, all by itself, just sucks. If I hadn't seen the original I'd just think, "what a brilliant plot, too bad they decided to bury it (no pun intended) with everything else in the movie". Jeff Bridges manages an unintentional bust a gut type performance as the sociopathic professor; his accent is so forced and ridiculous that one wonders occasionally if this a parody of that great, gut wrenchingly disturbing, Hitchcockian 1988 movie.  Sandra Bullock and Kiefer Sutherland are themselves, which add nothing to the movie.And the ending.  Oh, the ending.  We've been cheated.  Totally cheated.  All the power that this clunker might have had is torn away in a fervor of "It has to be upbeat!" Hollywood cornball syndrome.  Sandra Bullock is RESCUED, the villain is hit with a shovel, and everything is A-OK!  Even though Kiefer Sutherland's original girlfriend has been buried alive and suffocated.  This is [...]of a great movie.
Misses the point. While some critics can argue with Dan Brown's research and reasoning on certain historical points, one thing these Da Vinci "debunking" presentations will never be able to refute is this: the downplaying of the feminine role in western civilization and Christianity, primarily by the Catholic Church, and the fact that the Church still considered Mary Magdalene a common prostitute until just a few short years ago: 1969. Nor is it possible to refute the recent polymorphously perverse scandals that have rocked the Church after centuries of suppression and may have everything to do with the doctrinal distortions that Dan Brown has brought out in the open for serious review. This institution is in trouble because it is seriously out of balance with itself and has cut off its spiritual nose to despite its face by downplaying or denigrating the role of women as sacred beings and bearers of the Light, when their healthy presence is needed more than ever as a corrective to some of these abuses and scandals. Dan Brown has done the world a great service by showing how the feminine role in the divine was written out 2000 years ago, with help from Peter whose misogynistic views of women are plainly evident in the scriptures even today and are still, quite frankly, shocking and debasing. Sorry, but upon this "Rock" of male dominancy was built the Church.Thank you again, Dan Brown, by bringing these matters into the light of day so people can know more of their authentic history or at least do their own research to make up their own minds about which spiritual path is best for them and which ones were built on two millenniums worth of manipulations, obscurations and lies. These obscurations and lies happened through the efforts of a group of petty, insecure and misguided men down through the centuries to ensure their dominance and control over the masses, and they found a way to dominate not only the minds of the masses but their vast material resources, worth trillions, through guilt, control and other hidden but consistent abuses of power. And those of orthodox faith who continue to blindly support such hypocritical institutions have a lot more to answer for than any twenty Dan Browns put together. People are angry and they are angry at the failure of religion to live up to its own standards of behavior and for distorting what may have been Jesus' actual relationship with the women in his life--or were the disciples just supposed to be members of a exclusive Men's Club with Jesus as head and women as a species relegated to second class citizenship? To answer these questions, some of you will finally have to turn to your own heart and mind for a change instead of some literal interpretation of the truth, because not everything of the light is found in scriptures or on the printed page, especially after the scriptures have been selectively riddled with scissors for reasons of self-interest or from spiritual corruption. The next thing people should ask for is to have the vaults of the Vatican thrown open for public view. Lord only knows what plunder they contain
So disapointed !. Je viens de recevoir le DVD et  ma grande surprise, ce n'est que le pilote ! Bad information...there's nothing in the purchase of the DVD that says its only the pilot ! What about the six episodes ! The pilot is good but i want more !
Amazon unbox poor quality. I purchased this movie with Amazon unbox.  I downloaded it to my high def series 3 Tivo.  It was very disappointing.  The picture was little on my high def screen.  It is a letter boxed standard def program which looks very very small on a high def screen.  I even tried changing the aspect on my television.  No improvement.  Come on Amazon, you know what type of Tivo I have, Tivo knows what type of television I have, let's produce something that is at least watchable on every setup
Please tell your children the history is different. I realize historical accuracy was not the intent of the filmmakers here, but as a history teacher, I feel the need to beg you to tell your children that this is not the way Jamestown really went down. An unreal number of students enter high school believing that this film is a historical documentary, and the first step to teaching Jamestown is to convince the students otherwise.Perhaps good can come from this film, in that it can teach young people to be critical of secondary sources
Hey, Where is "Flower Drum Song?". This collection has a serious handicap in the omission of "Flower Drum Song." This gem is not available at all on DVD. What a loss to all
Can remakes be unmade?. No-talent actors and director destroying an otherwise heartwarming story.  Typical example of comtemporay Hollywood ego's assuming more importance than the story itself.The original plot has been so mutilated, that halfway through the movie the purpose of the angel's visit is made pointless.Do yourself a favor, spend your valuable time watching the original classic instead of this colossal waste of celluloid
Too bad to be good. Gyllenhaal and Spader both provide strong performances, but nonetheless the film is slow, tedious, and only occasionally interesting
Re-packaging the same old product. I liked this workout the first time I bought it as her fatburning workout.  The second time I bought it re-packaged I thought it was a fluke. This time I bought this since it sounded more like weight training and less like circuit training, so it must be different.  Nope.  I have 5 Kathy Smith videos, all three with different titles and covers only three different contents. I feel this is highly unethical and contacted her company.  One month later and I have yet to receive a response.
I love the SHOW, the DVD's are another story!. HelloI won't sell you on the show-it's one of my favorites, and you can read other's opinions there.  What I will say is that we are having a horrible time finding copies that play without scattering immages, or freezing up the player.  So far we've had to return episode one 2 times (one time it came with 2 identical discs (i.e one disc one, two discs two, and one disc 4), we've had to return season 2 and 3 for reasons that they're not playable.  It will play fine on one disc, then the next disc it crashes, pixilates, or won't load at all.  We don't have this problem with ANY other movies.  SO, beware, watch ALL the episodes before you put it on your shelf, and be prepared (and if you are a true fan, you will do this) to keep on trying until all the discs WORK.  All that I can figure is that they weren't sure they'd sell (big mistake) and made them CHEAP.  What a shame.GOOD LUCK
A terrible movie. If this director was trying to see how many ugly stereotypes he could cram into 111 minutes I think he succeeded. If you want to see a golf movie see any of the Bobby Jones flicks or better yet get some clubs and learn this wonderful game. You'll meet great folks whether its public or club golf.
Not for DVD aficionados. I'm rather upset with the technical quality of this DVD.  Grindhouse rereleased this disc exactly as it was in 2000, without so much as a 16x9 animorphic upgrade.  This is certainly not worth the $20+ dollar price tag Amazon.com has right now
Lucas Strikes!. NOTE: This review is not about the trilogy (which is great). This review is about the many DVD releases.The worst thing that ever happened to George Lucas is when Peter Jackson released the Extended Version of LOTR. Jackson showed fans we could demand, expect, and receive more from Hollywood. The impact of Peter Jackson sent shock waves among fans, who released a four-disc edition of one of the greatest movies of all time. Even old Hollywood guards, like Ridley Scott and James Cameron (no surprise they are not Americans) took notice and improved their DVD releases. This change has been powerful, except in the case of Lucas and to some degree his pal Steven Spielberg, who continues to stick to their old habits by being dinosaurs when it comes to business and satisfying the consumers.The many re-releases shows greediness, stubbornness, and lack of respect for fans. No one is upset with him for cleaning up the original version, but please allow fans to have the 1977 version and the updated version with better picture and sound quality. In addition, please stop using the "Limited Edition" you like to use to get fans to buy new copies of Star Wars; it is both false and tiring. Release these films in Anamorphic Widescreen with 5.1 Surround Sound and allow the 1977 version of the movie be release.Lucas's creditability has gone downhill to some degree because he is only known for his Star War movies. Unfortunately, his latest releases have only damaged him further because the quality of the prequels has been less than stellar. His shady practice of video/DVD releases of his past glory has resulted in some fans losing respect for him.One must wonder what went through Lucas mind when Peter Jackson won an Academy Award for Best Director and not him. Maybe if he focus on making quality films (like he once did) and not playing the DVD re-re-re-release game, then he could win one.
Stick with Willy Wonka. I could barely get through the...um...er...reimagination...of the childern's classic - while the set design and special FX are state of the art, as usual for a Tim Burton film, the actual movie is hard to watch. Why? Depp's "performance" is chock full of ticks and mannerisms, off-putting, flat, self-absorbed, and finally, one-note. Rather than the quirky fun of the original 1972 Gene Wilder version, Burton's film is more horror than fantasy, often casually cruel and sadistic to the point of being far from family fare.  While deliberate on Burton's part, that doesn't make the final product any more watchable. It's one grim, dismal, downward spiral slog. Not much holidday fun, huh? As with most of Burton's other big, expensive failures, he knows how to CREATE a convincing world, but has no clue how to POPULATE it with characters and situations we identify with and/or could care less about.  The final result is a film that's like a fragile, hermetically sealed curio on the shelf - nice to look at from afar, but hard to get attached to, much less involved with. What a waste of millions of studio $$$
TEN STEPS BELOW ZERO! A REAL BOMB!. This is one of the worst movies I have ever seen. Julia Roberts and Richard Gere should have given every cent they received on this movie for charity! Horrible acting and plot. Julia and Richard, I hope you get to read this one day.
Waste of time. I got this film because I'm from Detroit where this takes place. It's a pretty typical revenge flick. Four brothers want to find their adoptive mother's killer. Usual smartass remarks, guys talking BS, fights, shootouts, blah, blah, blah. I guess these kind of movies will always be made and when made well they can be fun to watch. This script was mediocre at best. Give me a Clint Eastwood or Bruce Willis film any day over this tripe.
i am the arm- the review for fans of the series. rent it but by all means don't buy it.  you won't watch it more than once.  this movie is not for those who have invested 25+ hours into the tv show.  although you will better understand what's going on if you have seen the show, none of this will really seem new or interesting to you.  you learn some new facts about Bob and The Man from Another Place, but nothing important.  for the most part it just tells the story as we have already pieced together from the show, adding only pointless and unrealistic new occurances (Bobby kills someone, Donna is replaced by an new actor, Coop forsees all the future comings of Laura's murder, etc).  all of the twin peaks charm that you have come to love is gone and the movie really suffers from that.  you can't only give Coop 10 meaningless lines and expect the show to succeed.  i think Lynch's efforts would have been more successful and greatly appreciated if he had made a sequel to the second series, focusing on the complications of Coop being in the Black Lodge, Harry having an emotional attachment to Coop but being forced to bring him down, etc.i guess if you have never seen the series this may be more interesting, but i dont really think so.  overall, the look and the feel was very foreign and uncomfortable and it moved very slow.  it is somewhat of a letdown coming from a monster writer/director like Lynch.  i'm glad i've seen it, but hell, i'd rather watch dune again before this
yawn.... only for conspiracy-theory types. Not worth it - only for anti-Christians interested in conspiracy theory looniness. Thoroughly one sided, but that would be OK if it weren't riddled with inaccuracies - e.g. that Paul knew nothing of Jesus' ministry, and never quotes anything Jesus said. Any New Testament scholar sees Paul's view of Jesus as fitting hand in glove with what is in the Gospels (and Acts), though Paul has his own emphases, language, and theological framework. This joker... I mean, film-maker, thinks that Paul literally never believed that Jesus was a real human, living on earth. Geez. He could at least read the books Paul wrote! The film-maker manages to assemble a few crank PhDs, largely from fields outside of biblical studies, who think that the Gospels and Acts were either meant as fiction from the beginning, or else simply ridiculously innaccurate attempts at telling the truth. Oh, and there's the guy from the fringe, notorious "Jesus Seminar". Do you find the following sorts of arguments convincing? "The Jesus story has elements X, Y, and Z. So does the story of Hercules. But no one takes the Hercules story to be true! And elements A...N of the Jesus story can each *individually or in pairs* be found in various of these 26 legends. So... " If you don't spot any fallacious reasoning in the preceding, this is the documentary for you! The production values are pretty good (cheapie old Jesus-film footage aside), though intellectually, the whole thing feels like a sort of college film class project made by a "village atheist" type, who revels in cheap shots, scare-mongering (about those fundies who are no doubt going to sieze power any day now), a gotcha-question interview, and objections born of misunderstanding (e.g. thinking that evangelicals want an ancient-Israel style theocracy, with death penalty for gays - oh, yeah, that's on the agenda!) A favorite cheap shot - attributing these words to Jesus - "But those enemies of mine who did not want me to be king over them--bring them here and kill them in front of me" - words spoken by a character in a parable Jesus tells in Luke 17. Honestly, knowing something about the subject, it was hard to sit all the way through this stinker. And you won't have to know much to smell a rat. Sadly, the theologically and biblically illiterate crowd - e.g. who thought that Dogma or the Da Vinci code were remotely accurate - will find this kind of propaganda-like presentation impressive. It comes as no surprise at all, two-thirds of the way through, when we learn that the director is a bitter ex-fundie himself. In a way, it's like a certain kind of religious film, in that it never even tries to rise above preaching to the choir
Gilmore Girls - The Complete Second Season. HAS I COMPLETED THE 1ST SEASON OF GILMORE GIRLS I HAVE ORDER THE 2ND SEASON BUT SO FAR IAM STILL WAIT TO SEE BECAUSE I HAVEN'T RECEIVED MY PARCEL SO FAR SO LET SEE HOW MORE TIME IT WILL TAK
Copycat movie of the Australian movie "The Adventures Of Pricilla, Queen Of The Desert". This movie is nothing but a copy of the Australian movie "The Adventures Of Pricilla, Queen Of The Desert".  Typical!!! Just like the original English BBC series of "The Office" which was copied and remade in the USA.Stop stealing ideas from other countries
DON'T BOTHER WATCHING THIS ONE!. This is possibly one of the worst films I have ever seen. The writing and acting, as far as I am concerned, are no better than that of a middle school live performance. The only reason I didn't turn it off was that I was hoping SOMETHING in the movie might help me justify spending $10 to buy it used. That something never came. I would never waste my time on this movie when there are others on this topic that so richly deserve my viewing time investment, such as &quot;Schindler's List&quot; &amp; &quot;The Pianist&quot;. Trust me, PASS IT UP just as fast as you can
Another over rated movie. Please do not compare this with Clock Work Orange. It's shame. This movie is shame on director. Cutting many heads or killing more bodies does not prove movie is good. This movie is like B grade stuff.Plot is good, but not the direction or screen play
Inbred-video-night special, Look Jim bo, its only 9.99!. Did you notice that most of the people reviewing this and giving it a good review are hicks? Maybe if you live in a one horse town and this is the only movie to rent, then you might see it as a 5 star jem like some of these other alcoholics did. I don't get it. I think the acting was terrible. A bunch of hillbillies that could not act. The writing is absolutely atrocious. Let me elaborate: many, MANY times in the movie you will find your self saying "Why didn't she do `this' or do `that" or "Oh come on, no one would do that." Its just to unrealistic, to the point its ridiculous. Here is the girl getting the crap beat out of her, and she has several opportunities to bash husband, and turn the tables on him. She has so many opportunities to get back at him, and to even lock him away in jail. So we have the "Im just a victim, beat the crap out of me" main character. The story gets more ridiculous as the girl start to form a relation ship with a man she is physically repulsed by, instead of the guy she originally had the hots for. Finally, it was boring! It's a half hour movie at best dragged out into a full length movie. SO, all you `billy bobs' out there, feel free to grab a copy of this garbage and take your shots of JD and enjoy. To everyone else, if your looking for a half way decent domestic violence movie, I would stay with movies like `Enough' and `Sleeping with the enemy' or just go rent some old Fara Foset movies. She always liked getting the crap kicked out of her. I gave it an extra star, because, there is actually worse movies
Review. "Capote", directed by Bennett Miller with a conscious sensation of subtlety and a slow pace, was widely acclaimed by critics after its release in 2005. It is based on Gerald Clarke's 1988 non-fiction book "Capote: A Biography". The film starts by Capote's (Philip Seymour Hoffman) interest in the Kansas crime merely as a reader and ends with him becoming the most famous writer on the crime. His knowledge of the criminals, especially Perry Smith (Clifton Collins Jr.), which started from the newspapers elevated to an intimate yet undefined relationship. The writer is sympathetic and sees in Smith a strong resemblance with himself, yet he uncaringly and mendaciously uses him to get to his aim. Capote was looking for something to write and indeed he found it. "In Cold Blood" was his most famous novel; the one that established him as a legendary writer. He was left overwhelmed, confused and unsatisfied, however. The movie is quite ambiguous, though. Characters are marginally defined and the dialogue wavers between witty to irrelevant or inexpressive. At many instances it is hard to grasp the causes and consequences of specific situations and conversations. For instance, people are always laughing heartily at what Capote has to say, although he never actually says something funny or worth a great deal of laughter. The setting and the music were both barely significant. Although Philip Seymour Hoffman's performance is highly remarkable, the actor's resemblance of Capote is questionable. Hoffman is 5'10" and more stout than the slender, barely 5'2" Truman Capote.
Reflects the attitude in the 1990's perfectly.... I saw this in a theatre, and I was the only one who wasn't laughing hysterically.  There were a few chuckles here and there, but this film is actually quite boring.  There are long, dull stretches here between the gross out jokes, and the drama (for lack of a better word) is really tedious.  Of course, the attitude towards sex is extraordinarily childish (which is the point), and the film is extremely stupid.  In many ways, this film exemplifies what kind of films were popular in the 1990's; gross out films with idiotic characters and really stupid behaviour and situations.  I never found this film to be actually funny.  The Naked Gun type films can be quite dumb at times, yet they're funny.  This film has a few mild laughs, but mostly it's painfully unfunny.  On a plus, this film doesn't have the smugness a lot of 90's films had, but that doesn't make it much better.  So, if you're in the mood for stupid, stupid, and stupid, this film will do it for ya.  If not, stay away.
More Pseudo Feminism. Follows Logic only people on Bizarro world would understand. Enough takes the formulaic made-for TV battered woman story and actually makes a big screen movie sillier than its cheesy small screen counterparts. Another entry into pseudo-feminist category, Enough is a hypocritical movie that preaches empowerment but constantly shows its heroine being objectified and degraded. I hope by reading this review you'll avoid this horrible movie.Enough follows Slim, a waitress working at a Seattle Diner. (Strange she won't identify herself with her real name but objectifies herself by calling herself a shape) We never learn about Slim or her goals in life, she's just a beautiful woman in need of rescuing from her dead-end job. At work She meets up with a Mitch, a handsome rich customer. He woos her; after only minutes of screen time they're in love. Her unassuming "Nice Guy(tm)" boss warns her that Mitch bet him that he could get her into bed. He has the hots for her, too but Mr. Insecure doesn't say anything outside of that passive-aggressive(tm) warning. Despite OBVIOUS WARNING SIGNS about Mitch's CHARACTER Slim continues dating him. Golddigger is just happy to have a rich man sweep her off her feet and save her.So Slim marries Mitch Charming and he decides to buy some guy's house just because he can. Oooh. POWER ISSUES. They have a child, but he won't let her hold her after giving BIRTH to her. Oooh. CONTROL ISSUES. Slim, distracted by Mitch's money can't see BIG RED FLAGS in front of her. It's not until five years later when she gets a call from another woman that she learns he's cheating on her. Instead of quietly taking money out of the joint account, and filing the divorce papers THEN, she confronts him. This leads to Mitch becoming abusive although he's never displayed this behavior previously. Psychology books say batterers have a PATTERN of behavior with women they date, but this movie follows Bizarro logic. He beats Slim down and slaps the kid around for good measure so we can hate him.Slim goes to the cops with a huge bruise on her face but decides to NOT have him arrested or take out a restraining order, fearing he'll take her daughter. She actually believes the malarkey a desk sergeant tells her about the legal system instead of consulting an attorney. Scared, she makes a run for it in the night. But Mitch thwarts her escape plans. After another beatdown, he menaces her adoptive Dad and friend with a gun saying they're trespassing. When she tries another run for it, he freezes her financial assets. So with borrowed money, Slim takes her daughter to a motel. There, Mitch makes a threatening call saying he's everywhere. You'd think after being beaten TWICE she'd keep a tape recorder on hand to record moments like this for EVIDENCE. Making TERRORISTIC THREATS over the phone is a FELONY. Mitch breaks open the hotel door and Slim has to escape. They head up to Seattle where her "Nice Guy(tm)" friend lets them stay with him and puts his passive(tm) moves on her. Cop friends of Mitch pose as FBI. They rough him up, knock down stuff and cut up a sofa. Stupid Mitch doesn't know that "Nice Guy(tm)" would be a WITNESS and these cops would be facing charges from IAB and FBI because Mitch's pockets aren't fat enough to protect them from FEDERAL CIVIL RIGHTS CHARGES. Yes, Mitch here was STUPID enough to cross STATE LINES to commit his crimes. But Slim never keeps a RECORD of these incidents for EVIDENCE. She goes to real dad in San Fran for help, but gets none. You'd THINK she'd go to a library and study those wonderful Federal and state laws on the books and would be preparing her case with prosecutors.Not wanting to endanger her friends, Slim heads to another city. Detroit, Orlando, they all somehow look Like San Francisco in this movie. Turns out Mitch has friends even in THIS city to help him do his dirty work. Mitch may be a rich, real estate guy, but I don't think anyone is THIS well connected. He coincidentally knows cops in EVERY city Slim goes to? Come on. The cop he enlists to help him is aware that he's committing a crime, but follows orders. Mitch makes more terroristic threats over the phone that Slim isn't smart enough to record for EVIDENCE. This leads to a silly car chase where Slim is SMART ENOUGH TO EVADE HIM ON ROADS SHE KNOWS BUT NOT SMART ENOUGH TO CALL 911 DURING THE CHASE. Terrified, Slim heads back to San Francisco. Dad now decides to help out with his money and connections.Under Daddy's protection, Slim decides to FINALLY get legal advice from an attorney. She also decides to become "empowered" by training to kick Mitch's butt. I'd rather see her train to kick his butt in court with all the evidence shown throughout the movie, but she decides two wrongs will make right. Committing First-degree murder is far more satisfying to her than seeing Mitch and his colleagues go to prison.Final act, Slim breaks into Mitch's house. She plants signal jammers and shuts out the lights. "Empowered" in her belly baring cleavage-exposing black spandex outfit she prepares to confront him. She throws down with Mitch in one of the stupidest fight scenes ever filmed. It's never smart for a woman to take a man on in a fistfight because: A MAN IS EIGHT TIMES STRONGER IN HIS UPPER BODY THAN A WOMAN. He could have KILLED Slim with ONE PUNCH. It happens all the time in real life. Seriously. But following the Bizarro logic of this movie, Slim not only beats the crap out of the s Mitch, she KILLS him. After committing murder, (a handwriting expert would have easily figured out her letters were forgeries during the investigation), Slim goes on to live happily ever after with her "Nice Guy(tm)" diner owner friend, not knowing that he's just like man she just murdered. (Read my review of The Last American Virgin to learn why "Nice Guys(tm)" are dangerous.)Like its contemporaries The Rich Man's Wife, Gang of Roses, and Catwoman in the Pseudo Feminist genre, Enough makes a mockery of feminism with its sexist message of "empowerment." The wrongheaded ideas in this movie tell women to overcome domestic violence with violence, not seek counseling to deal with the emotional trauma or plan a legal strategy. It's interesting to note like in those other mentioned movies, the more "empowered" Slim becomes, the less clothing she wears. We never get to see Slim's face during the movie, only her body parts. This segmenting of her body takes away from her humanity and prevents us from connecting with her emotionally.Production values on this movie are not "Enough" considering the talent. The poorly written screenplay has dialogue that comes from the first draft of a Learning Annex student. Scenes don't transition into each other smoothly leading to a disjointed uneven story.Plain and simple, the acting is downright wretched in this movie. Jennifer Lopez is horrible in the role of Slim. She plays her character with no emotion in most scenes and is over the top in others. Billy Campbell is ridiculous to watch as the batterer. He is a cartoon character who gets more over the top with each scene.Don't get "Enough" at all. Pick up the far superior Sleeping with the Enemy.
Candyman 3:  The Day of the Dead  (1999). Director:  Turi MeyerCast:  Tony Todd, Donna D'Errico, Alexia Robinson, Jsu Garcia, Mark Adair-Rios, Lupe Ontiveros, Elizabeth Guber, Rena Riffel, Ernie Hudson Jr.Running Time:  93 minutesRated R for bloody violence and gore, sexuality and language.The third in the series derived from a concept by Clive Barker, "Day of the Dead" (they can't even come up with their own subtitle) staggers down the well-trodden path already navigated by the "Halloween" and "Nightmare on Elm Street" movies: that is, taking a decent concept and flushing it down the toilet. The original movie was a near horror masterpiece and relied on atmosphere rather than gore, while the first sequel was bearable if completely routine. This one is just a load of rubbish.  Donna D'Errico, from Baywatch (what a spectacle of credibility), stars as Caroline McKeever, the great great granddaughter of the feared Candyman (Tony Todd once again), once a normal man but now an apparition who appears to slaughter everyone around you if you dare to say his name five times in front of a mirror.  Caroline says his name five times in front of a mirror and up he pops to murder her nearest and dearest. As the Candyman hacks his way through various bad actors, Caroline teams up with new pal David (Nick Corri) to find a collection of paintings knocked up by the Candyman while he was still alive, which may hold the key to stopping him.There's not a single thing here that isn't scavenged from the first "Candyman" film and every other ropy horror movie produced since caveman days. The screenplay is so lazy it can't even be bothered to connect half the characters to the plot, the photography is bright and glossy, which is at odds with what's supposed to be a dark story, while nothing in the direction adds any atmosphere at all. Anyone could have directed this movie, so little effort has been put in to make it scary, while the ending is an outrageous cop out. No thought has gone in to developing themes or structuring the plot because no one here is talented enough to give this movie any depth beyond having D'Errico running around in a variety of tight vests.  The rest of the performances are poor too, although none are quite as bad as D'Errico's pathetic attempts at screaming and breathing erratically.  Surely more can be done with characters like the Candyman than the constant repetition of scenes where he appears to stick his hook through someone's stomach.  The fact that the makers of this movie think Candyman is so terrifying that the very sight of him just standing there will strike fear into our hearts is a sign that they just can't be bothered even to try something a bit different.  Clive Barker may not be the master of horror as every at first claimed him to be, but he's right about one thing: the sequels to his movies are garbage
Very Poor Presentation. This could have been a very good documentary, but the video editing style made it unwatchable for me.  The camera never stays on any subject for more than 5 seconds, film is sped up and slowed down for no apparent reason, and bright flashes of light with loud sound effects highlight the transition from scene to scene.  The events surrounding 9/11 are fully capable of engaging my attention without this in-your-face style of presentation, which ironically dilutes the overall impact of the film
cannot view. The encoder system is wrong for our recorder and I do not know what to do. Can you help please
Only for Foodies. If you've seen Tortilla Soup, there is no need to watch this movie.  This is just the Chinese version of the said movie.  The similarities of these 2 movies are so prominent that it would actually be a waste of time and money to buy both - same characters, same plot only in a different setting.I got to enjoy the scenes with food, though...
Can you fix me that coffee of yours?. This is definitely the worst movie I have ever seen. The acting by everyone in this movie sucks, and they all looked pathetic! The aircraft is hijacked and landed into the small town's non-commercial airport, the hijackers have just dropped dead bodies from the plane and asking for fuel or else they will kill more people, and the chief officer of sheriff dept. reacts by asking the old lady at the ATC tower "Can you fix me that coffee of yours?" ?? I mean the direction in this movie is best example of how bad a direction can be. As rightly pointed by one of the reviewers (P. Sullivan) here, another stupid example is that old lady passenger doing woo-hoo after the plane was landed with dead people everywhere. Again, don't expect anything on any front of direction, acting, scripts, storyline, and dialogues.If you like movies based on aircrafts/actions, then watch Executive Decision, a lot better than this. I bought this DVD when it was available for $14.99, and I always felt that I wasted those few bucks. A waste of time and money!
Crappy. There are 4 mostly-static(as in &quot;not moving&quot;), distant, poorly lit angles on the women, and unless you are really fascinated by ten minutes of the same boring exercise, its just not worth it. There are far better ways to spend money on DVDs of naked women. A good idea, but horribly low budget and unfulfilling
Didn't like the soft pornography in this so called remake. Didn't care for it. Contained soft pornography. The wheelchair bound adolescent kid looking thru a rather obvious hole in a wall, peering at his aunt in the next room having sex with her customers. Didn't have anything to do with anything. I was counting on a more original remake, I guess. I should have known better. I didn't pay attention to the rating. My fault. They put pornography in just about everything nowadays. Cars are cars, and pornography is pornography. I wanted to watch a JD car flick
THE MIRACLE OF ... WHAT?. This is my first time in this forumI've seen the film of the 2nd disc and I found the copy...NOT ONLY BAD BUT UNNOTICEABLEAS A MIRACLE the last three fellows have seen the copy in good conditions. It is possible that FOX HOME VIDEO have changed and made new copies of the 2nd disc. If this is not true it is possible that they have discovered a fantastic ophtalmologist.I choose the first option.Are you so kind  -via Fox- to inform us how to change the bad copies in order to have all the collection in good conditions ?YoursR
Nothing to see here....nothing to see here.... This film is a slick, contrived, hollow exercise in style.  It is a typical "Miramax" foreign film.  The director has a snazzy, Robert Rodriguez style (the director actually studied under Rodriguez at Austin Film School).  Fast cuts, funky graphics, cardboard characters, no depth, cliches, everyone flashing their guns every 10 seconds, shouting off Tarantino like obscenities (including a few American pop culture references).  It's basically an American film, except it was filmed in the streets of Caracas.  Miramax (who distributed this) always takes on these type of films.  They're technically foreign, but they're done with an eye towards the mainstream, so they are not "too out there", so to speak.  Miramax would never touch a real auteur filmmaker like Alexander Sokurov or Bela Tarr.  Their work is very distinctive, and it's what art cinema is supposed to be.  The film isn't horrible, but it's nothing special.  You'll forget about it immediately after seeing it.
not what I was looking for. This movie concentrates on Cobb as a bitter old drunk desperately trying to get his life story told from his point of view.  I expected to see more scenes from when he was playing ball, but sadly there is really only one scene that showed his legendary hitting and baserunning....and that scene is very short and quite poor.  If you are interested in what Cobb was like as an old angry man, go for it.  If you are interested in Cobb as the greatest offensive ballplayer ever.....skip this one in a hurry.  Other than that, I thought the movie - on its own merits as a movie - was pretty lousy.  I regret buying it
SO SAD!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. I LOVE TO DANCE .........SO I WAS EXCITED TO GET THIS!! WHAT A BORING DVD!! DID NOT SWEAT!! HATED HER COMPLICATED MOVES!!!!! SHE IS PRETTY BUT NOT MOTIVATING.......MY KIDS AND I JUST SAT ON THE COUCH AND WATCHED IT THINKING ANY MINUTE IT WOULD PICK UP THE BEAT!  I THOUGHT IT WOULD HAVE REAL SPANISH LATIN AND REGGAE SONGS AND DANCING!!!!!!!!!!!! NO WAY IT WAS JUST SOME BEAT AND THESE GIRLS ALL DOING STEP TO SIDE THEN TO FRONT HANDS UP NOW TO THE SIDE......BLA BLA BLA.........WE EXPECTED UPBEAT MOTIVATING SONGS WITH LOTS OF DANCING AND FUN....I CANCELLED MY ORDER FOR ALL MY OTHER PREVENTION DVD'S ON THE WAY FOR FEAR THEY WOULD ALL BE LIKE THIS!!!! INCIDENTALLY I TRIED "PICK YOUR SPOT PILATES" FROM SOME OTHER GIRL AND IT WAS NOT ALOT OF MUSIC OR DANCE MOSTLY FLOOR EXCERCISE BUT IT WORKED AND HAD ME WANTING MORE .....SO I BLEW MY MONEY ON THIS THINKING IT WOULD BE MOTIVATING AND GIVE ME SOME CARDIO TO GO ALONG WITH THE FLOOR WORKOUT "PICK YOUR SPOT".....YOU ARE BETTER OFF TURNING ON THE RADIO AND JUMPING
1 star is too much - way too much. The release of films such as these by Fox can do nothing but bury L and H. All of their 40s films are awful and it's a shame that that this wonderful duo will be judged by films like these.To see why these classic comics were so loved you must just hope that their silent 2 reelers will someday be rereleased. Only then will you be able to really enjoy these two geniuses and see see why L and H are ranked up there with Chaplin, Lloyd and Keaton.These two warm and wonderful men don't deserve this -  and neither do you.
Least favorite movie. by this duo. I just didn't like it. All the actors were great. I love Sidney Poitier. But I just couldn't like the movie. I hated the speech in the end. I felt like he was lechuring me
A minus B movie. This movie really didn't show me anything exciting in Salsa dance...the only exciting thing was seeing singers performers Willie Colon and Celia Cruz.
Imagine Justin Timberlake as SHAFT. The "Wild Wild West" was a five-star TV show. It was so good that you would have thought that the powers that be in Hollywood would be unable to make a one-star mess out of it. But you would be wrong.Casting the African-American Will Smith as Secret Service Agent James West in the place of the German-American Robert Conrad makes about as much sense as casting Justin Timberlake in Richard Roundtree's place as Shaft. Conrad played James West as the perfect combination of a man's man and a ladies man - much like James Bond, except a bit less refined and quite a bit more macho.  Will Smith plays a wimpy, wiseguy, thinks-he's-cool-but-isn't James West. Before the film is half over, he'll have you cheering for the villain.And speaking of the villain, in another piece of PC casting, the Hispanic dwarf, Dr. Miguelito Loveless, of the TV show is transformed here into Dr. Arliss Loveless, a double-amputee, Confederate flag-waving, Southern White. NO MINORITY VILLAINS ALLOWED!Combine the poor casting with an especially inane script, and it all makes for one of the worst films of 1999. Despite all of the explosions and special effects, it still manages to be boring.
Bogus Reviews. All the five-star reviews for this video come from reviewers who have ONLY reviewed this company's products.  These are likely "astroturf" (i.e., phony) reviews, so I'm posting this one to raise the issue
REALITY OF A BIMBO TOUR. I cannot understand why people would buy anything by this brainless ,talentless bimbo. She cant sing a song without stupid vocal gymnastics,she cant say anything intelligent and she has a perpetual spaced out expression on her uncharasmatic face.Im sick of switching on the tv and seeing her and that equally boring and talentless "husband" of hers.Please avoid this tripe and support people who actually made it because of talent and not a slick marketing team
It's a PERFECT example of today's horror movies. Which isn't a good thing. If you've seen any recent horror flicks within the past 10 years(Taking Lives, Wrong Turn, I Still Know What you Did Last Summer, Scream), then you know it's filled with the dummest imaginable good guys, cheesy plot and almost un-killable bad guys. And scenes that are supposed to thrill you and you just wonder when this is going to end. I almost fell asleep in a few of those movies, that's how lame, tiring and boring they are. Fortunately, for this film, it has Jessica Alba and Seth Green, who are two fantastic actors/actresses and are always delightful to see. Seth Green is hilarious as the main characters buddy, and Jessica Alba is more then sexy. However, the movie is beyond cheesy(like a hand jumping out a microwave through the window, smashing the glass in the mean time and landing in the bush, but it can't escape the microwave. Or, when the lady(played by Vivica A. Fox(Kill Bill)) is hit by a car, which is backing up, and then is sent 50 feet. Uh huh, that's realistic. Ends sarcasm.) Then there is tones of un-necessary gore and silly scenes like the guy losing his head. And how exactly did his buddies get back? They don't explain anything and assume everything is magical. It delivers the comedy pretty well, thanks to Seth Green for that, but is just too silly, far too cheesy and extremely lame(a hand that is possessed? Please, give me a break.
I was expecting a good story... The premise grabbed me; it is about a gay man sent to the concentration camps during WWII. I was expecting some really good things from it; "gay entertainment," as well as having the Nazi attrocities against gays highlighted for starters.To say I was disappointed would be an understatement; it's a bad sign when I wished the SS would just shoot the main character and make it a movie about his boyfriend instead! I despised the main character...he was everything I could possibly dislike about a person all rolled up into one.He's a multi-time cheater on the same person, a coke-head, a jerk, very promiscuous, makes (unwelcome) decisions for other people...throw in some domestic abuse and you've just about covered it.He's someone I'd be ashamed to know...needless to say, it was impossible to sympathize with his wretched character. And I can't say I'm happy with the clear stereotypes of "gay life" being portrayed from the very beginning
Not for the average dog owner. Sorry - But this video is not for the average dog owner! If you identify with the punk rock scene and are looking for an alternative to the standard dog training video then this might work for you.  This video shows basic training techniques, but the narrator's "voice over" distracts from the actual training process going on. The korny doggy-do and doggy-don't skits attempt to show the viewer correct training techniques and obvious training mistakes,but are a waste of time.Maybe worth $8 but definitely not the $22.95 price tag. I would return it if not for amazon's return policy against returning opened videos
not much for laughs and even less for plot. Wedding Crashers is the kinda film alot of people will love because it is stupid but alot of others like myself, won't enjoy. two womanizers fall in love, one because he finds out that his gf is not actually a virgin, like first off, what does virginity have to do with love? & second, who would actually believe that she was telling the truth when she said that she was a virgin? & then Owen Wilson's character fall in love with Rachel's McAdams character and well, that's the usual predictable romance plot. the problem with this film is it's not that funny. it seems to think it's better then it is. I don't think I hardly laughed during this film. the part about the "supposive" gay guy like people think he is gay so therefore of course, because it's this kind of film, he ends up being gay and of course, he tries to hit on Vince Vaughn's character in a scene that is beyond creepy. lets just say that "gay" guy is prob one of the worst actors I've seen. & then we get a cameo from Will Ferrell, alot of people I know find this guy "so" funny. but I don't get it. it just wasn't funny to me. u know, I loved the classic, "American Pie" that was just stupid for its own good but it delivered the goods to make it a great comedy! this film wasn't so much funny as stupid. & for the most part, I'm not going to remember this film in 5 years from now because it's just an average film
One of the worst movies ever made. The Hole revolves around four prep school students who spend a weekend in an abandoned bomb shelter. One of the students is traumatized and makes it out alive. The others are dead.Well, this has got to be one of the worst movies ever made.Flaws:* The acting. Thora Birch's pseudo English accent is extremely annoying. Most of the time, it doesn't sound real. Keira Knightly's character is way over the top. And with all of the characters, moments that are meant to be emotional are simply over the top.* The plot is extremely convoluted. SPOILERS COMING!!Do you really think Thora Birch would lock herself in a bomb shelter and risk her life and the lives of others for love?!!!!The ending: STUPID. Thora Birch gets away with it, after telling a detective her story. When the detective tells Thora to make an official statement, she refuses. When confronted by other detectives, Thora lies. Okay...the extreme flaw with this scenario: the detective who has been informed of the real truth -- all she has to do is tell her superiors. At the very least, they would investigate her claim. In the movie however, all is tidily wrapped in Thora's lies. Who do you think detectives would believe? A member of their own force or a murder suspect?There are far too many flaws with this movie to go on and on. Definitely not worth even a rental
Great show, crummy DVD. $15 just doesn't cut it for 2 episodes of this show and ZERO extra features.  I'm not sure who they are marketing this set for, but I can think of no reason why anyone would buy this. It offers nothing that you can't see in repeats on Cartoon Network
Orientalism on demand. the movie directors in the ME, particularly Iranians, are responding to demands by the West for certain type of movies. They produce what is demanded from them; in turn, they receive awards. cultural industry empowers these demands; they are the ones who will ensure that such movies will be received the Western audiences and they are the ones who decide who is awarded. There is no single ME movie which depict the story of Western imperialism in the ME and then awarded for doing so. ME movies must show that ME women are in need of emancipation; ME cultures are presented as in need of getting civilized. civilization itself is presented in vertical sense; there is a civilization somewhere out there all MEasterners are expected to reach; yet, it was that same civilization that threw doll bombs on them. (no reference to who threw them doll bombs or who mined their country; who deprived them of education and knowledge. the West is represented by beautiful, blonde nurses, a nice American guy who just pretend to be a doctor and help them with his "everyday Western knowledge of medicine" in the midst of total ignorance, and the helicopters that threw on them fake legs. such a nice way to civilize!)the story of Afghanistan is real. however, the movie does not render a fair job in reflecting the background of it. rather, it does an excellent job in meeting the cultural demand; in producing a product that can sell well.the situation is miserable; but what caused such misery in Afghanistan? your answer after seeing the movie will be that it is Islam; it is that Islamic culture; that backward culture of those people with wonderful eyes. such a conclusion is strongly demanded in the absence of other factors. there is no single implying in the movie, a smallest reference, that Afghanistan has suffered centuries old imperialism at the hands of the British and then the Russian and now Americans who played their Great Game on the chessboard of Eurasia. There is a passage in the movie to the effect that somebody will come to liberate them. those imperialists came in the name of civilization; French did to Algeria, the British did to India; all in the name of bringing them civilization. It was White Man's Burden to do so. Yet Makhmalbaf needs more awards. he has to compete in the cultural circus and perform well for the pleasure of Western audiences, in order to continue to be in demand. you did a nice job, applauses; go on.(anyone who is interested in cultural imperialism should read Foucault's works and Edward Said's Orientalism.
Not a Sellers market. Peter Sellers is rightly hailed as one of the screen's great comic geniuses. Unfortunately, even a genius falters, and Sellers had more than his share of misfires. In fact, when a Peter Sellers movie is bad, it goes far beyond the usual definition of the term. This 1970 sex farce is one of his worst, which means it's unmitigated garbage.Sellers plays a middle-aged lothario who meets his match in a free-spirited young kook (Goldie Hawn, in her second starring film role), and before long, they're off on a series of wacky romantic adventures. Nothing seems more dated than this sort of '70s "mod" comedy, and nothing seems more wasteful than an actor of Sellers' stature wallowing in material clearly beneath him. Sellers and Hawn never click as a screen couple; he comes across too smarmy and she comes across too flighty to even be a likable pair
Really deserves 0 stars, but that's not a choice!. this movie sucks it sucks donkey balls. If you enjoyed this movie you should be shot you should be shot in the head. DIE YOU EVIL FANS OF THIS HORRIBLE MOVIE. Who the hell would put the time, money and effort into such a peice of junk. I suggest that everyone who was involved in the making of this &quot;movie&quot; should be rounded up and sent to consentration camps. I think this is the major problems of this world. This movie is the reason war exists. This movie is the reason people hate each other. please read this review and never watch that peice of crap
Unremarkable 50's western. Some nice location shooting is wasted in a standard western. The female characters are particularly irritating and one-dimensional. This is definitely the worst Anthony Mann/James Stewart pairing
silly!!!!!! Pointless,  most "ABSURD" thing on TV. This is just angry people venting with vulgarity.This isn't poetry! If this is im the next James Joyce
US Marhsals. I loved this movie, if only for Tommy Lee Jones and Tom Wood (don't know who that is? Don't worry, I'm the only one) and because it was a sequal to my most favourite of movies.But if you're not considering this movie because of your fantatical devotion to a single actor or series, then take your time deciding. The director was a first-timer, the plot is almost completely identical to the Fugitive (except...Tommy Lee Jones and Wesley Snipes aren't as cool together as Tommy and Harrison) and there are a fair number of awkwardly done 'funny bits'. I would rate it as an average cop drama, and a fairly underwhelming sequel.However, I loved it, but I suspect that my motives are a little different than most peoples'.
This video is not good and its a waste of money!. Ok, first off, who needs a video to help them skate better. That is the stpidest thing i ever heard. Just go out to your local skatepark and ask people. They arent going to be mean to you. Plus it will save you MONEY!!!
Appalling. This is the worst remake i have ever seen hands down. Woefully miscast with none of the creepy atmosphere and classiness of the original, this film belongs in the scrap heap
Why do they always have to make a sequel????. You know, I actually enjoyed the first Mummy. It was funny, the idea, not often seen in modern films, was good, and the characters were each, in their own way, entertaining to watch.Why, God, why did they have to go and make a sequel? I don't understand. Was it for the money???I'm not sure when exactly I began to hate this; maybe it was somewhere in between the horrible and almost nonexistent plotline and the stupidity of the main characters making the same mistake AGAIN. Really, you'd think after the first time they accidentally woke a mummy from it's thousand-year rest they'd learn their lesson. But oh, no; the first time wasn't enough.And, also, the whole having a kid thing, didn't seem to work. The relationship between the characters wasn't the same anymore. I hate it when they do that in movies: make sequels and give the once-cool, main characters children. Nothing against it, just felt wrong for this movie.Throughout most of this movie, I felt stupid, and I don't like for things to make me feel that way. I also felt embarrassed to have actually paid for my tickets at the theater. Maybe it's just me; I just didn't like it.Question of the day for American Cinema: What's the deal with being obsessed with sequels????? Come on, the first was good enough.You know what the worst thing is?-I was actually looking forward to seeing this
Is The A*teens Music Video "Heartbreak Lullaby" On The DVD???. I just wanted to find out and please let me know dat is the A*Teens music video "Heartbreak Lullaby" which is part of the soundtrack for the movie on the Princess Diaries DVD ..lyke as in the Bonus Features or something?? ive been trying find out but i cant so plzz lemme know cuz I just wanna get the DVD for the music video!!
One of the stupidest movies I've ever seen. Adam Sandler plays a painfully shy man who has extreme fits of violent anger and has to deal with 7 sisters constantly interferring with his life. He calls a phone sex line one evening and is then hounded by the man running the service. This takes place the same time he meets a woman who likes him despite his oddities.The sad thing is I think there is probably a sweet, poignant love story in this film but it's buried in a morass of pointless scenes and a discordant soundtrack that is sometimes so loud it nearly drowns out the dialog. There is no reason shown why Emily Watson would fall in love with Sandler. It's really just one strange scene after another that in the end is dull and left me wishing I'd rented another movie.
Terrible Film. I agree with the problems related to all the technical issues cited by other reviewers, but found the movie problematic at its core. First, military personnel are not EVER in the chain of diplomatic authority in a United States Embassy. So the entire premise of this movie is an impossibility because the character JCVD portrays would never be "Second in Command." Sure, there is a willing suspension of disbelief when watching a movie, but there is just SO MUCH WRONG in this movie, that verisimilitude is impossible. A Navy Commander (O-5) outranks a Marine captain (O-3) and would ALWAYS have command precedent in a military situation, whether a message was sent to higher authority or not. Marines simply do not dress nor act like those depicted in this film. The uniforms were wrong. The "Gunny" had a soul patch and chin whiskers! NEVER! And the Marine captain tells a Marine to "seal this room, soldier." ARRGGGH! No Marine, under any circumstances, would refer to another as a "soldier." How about the Marine Expeditionary Unit helicopters, hovering over the Embassy, announcing, "This is the U. S. Army..."? Oh, and what Marine Embassy Security Unit, defending their post from attack during the hours of darkness, would have the building bathed in light
Could be the dumbest movie ever... This could be the dumbest movie ever made (and that's a bold statement to make when one considers that "Underworld" also exists).  Sadly, unlike "Underworld" there is no leather clad Kate Beckinsale to drool over. Instead, we are treated to a movie that could easily be confused for a map of the human DNA (but a human with an extra chromosome).Jason Statham, so likable in "Snatch", "Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels" and "The Italian Job" is thoroughly wasted in this flick.  When he's not busy escaping from his tricked out house, driving fast whilst looking cool and beating up on clichd Euro trash delivers lines such as "Rule #1. Never change the deal" and is expected to act with a straight face when he's the recipient of this type of drivel - "You're always complaining, except when we make love. Then you say nothing.".  Thankfully, the one thing Stetham is great at is keeping a straight face. But you won't.  Not if you have a brain, that is
Was Michael Moore involved in this??. It is a far stretch to call this a "documentary".  A comedy would be more appropriate.  I think there was more scientific fact in "the day after tomorrow
Worst season ever. This season crearly shows that J.J. Abrams is commited to something else (Lost?). That zombie thing in the final chapters must be a bad joke. The killer robot helicopter chapter was nonsense.I'm very disappointed with the whole season
Completey inconsequential!. I LOOOOVE the recent batch of French films that have made it "big" over here: "The Taste of Others," "Un Air de Famille" and ESPECIALLY "The Dinner Game." But this? An utter bore that just doesn't do anything or go anywhere. Pass on this and instead definitely see the other three mentioned above
Extremely Disappointing. I love Eddie Murphy, and I loved Dr. Doolittle!  The previews of Dr. D II looked so funny, I couldn't wait to see it.  Well, I just saw it, and my mind has still not recovered.Dr. Doolittle 2 is one of the worst films I have ever seen.  The story and dialouge are so mind-numbing, even the animated Murphy and Raven Symone, who plays his teenage daughter, couldn't salvage it.  The story revolves around Dr. Doolittle trying to save the patch of forest behind his house from a land-hungry developer.  To do this, Doolittle must rehab a tame bear and make him wild, because this bear is an endangered species, and if he lives in the forest, the developer can't touch it.  Sounds kind of cute . . . it's not.The bear acts and sounds like a washed up Vegas lounge singer.  His whiny voice (Steve Zahn) is so annoying that even I, a passionate animal lover, could not summon a shred of sympathy for this bear.  And talk about long.  This whole thin storyline is dragged out for ninety minutes until I writhed in pain.  And the other animals!  A sad, alcoholic French monkey, a chamelon with a horrible Mexican accent, and an abusive bear and his passive female bear.  When the bear is not whining, a dog is narrating the whole film in another nasal, bland voice with HORRIBLE dialouge.A subplot involves his daughter rebelling and liking a boyfriend who is a complete idiot, is dropped off by a pizza delivery car and asks to stay two nights.  Murphy actually acquieses.  What an intelligent, lovely girl like Raven would see in this sorry homie is completely unbelievable.It is hard to believe people (and animals) are going hungry when millions were wasted on this fart of a film.  It seemed like the voice actors were embarrased to be saying such stupid dialouge, and that the animal actors were embarrased to be acting such stupid roles - and I don't blame them
0 stars. This is the biggest pile of stinky cheese from the eighties ever it is just horribledon't waste your time or moneyinstead go to mac D and geta double cheeseburger
Not a family movie. This unfunny sexual romp is badly written.  I love Charisma Carpenter, but she and the other actors in this film seem to be struggling through it.  It's not fun to watch; it's sad, dismal, and distasteful.  Don't waste your money and don't make the mistake of thinking it's a family film
Van Damme fans only... I struggle with this movie. I'm a die-hard fan of Jean-Claude Van Damme, so part of me really likes this movie. But the other part knows that this is a very subpar direct-to-video with a slow script, uninteresting characters, and horrendously bad acting (save for JCVD himself). Having said this, I can honestly reccomend it to fans of Van Damme. They will certainly have a good time watching the muscles from Brussles kick the tar out of some low-life hicks while drinking with his Indian buddy and pickin' up chicks. If this appeals to you, there shouldn't be any reason why you wouldn't like "Desert Heat." If even one of this doesn't sound good, stay far away
Disappointing Spinoff. This "movie", which was obviously meant to be a pilot but was aired as a stand-alone feature, lacks nearly everything that made Babylon 5 a great show. It's set in the same universe and contains the same races and ships, but the plotting feels like, well, a failed pilot.G'Kar's scenes in "Rangers" are an embarassment to the character. After a spectacular sendoff on the original B5 series, he re-enters the universe apparently having regressed two or three seasons' worth of character development. There is no reason for him to be present except to spout off some gratuitous quotes from Babylon 5 and remind us that we are watching a B5 show.Overall, this show would be without much value if it stood alone. As an episode of the B5 mythos, it is worth even less
Sour Note. No wonder they didn't produce any other live action productions of Dr. Seuss books until after his death.  This film gave me a headache.  The direction and pacing of the film is flat, the musical numbers were unmemorable and boring(inexplicably nominated for an Oscar!), the acting was wooden, the sets were garish and ugly.  At least this film is not the cynical merchandising vehicle that the two most recent screen adaptations of Dr. Seuss works were.  I think Dr. Seuss works best in small doses like the short animated TV shows that were made some thirty-odd years ago.  Do check out the "Gerald McBoing-Boing" cartoon thats included on the disc.  It contains more wit and imagination in a few minutes than "Dr. T" does in ninety minutes
Frosty--5 stars, Frosty Returns-0 stars. Frosty is a perfect classic as always.  Great story and characters.  But, boy Frosty Returns makes this one you should probably skip.  First, the story and songs are weak. Second, Christmas isn't even mentioned. The directors have fallen for the left wing anti-Christmas agenda, resulting in the kids school having a "Winter Carnival" instead. Pathetic. The real Frosty would melt with anger.
Film: 4 stars, DVD: 1. I preface all of my DVD reviews with the following note: There are more than enough film reviews on Amazon.com and, quite frankly, it's a bit ridiculous. A person can scroll through scores/pages of reviews without reading a single sentence about the quality of the DVD. If you want to review or discuss a film, go to IMDB. If you're reviewing the DVD, speak to the qualities (or lack thereof) of the audio and video; mention your opinions of the plot, acting, etc. but please don't write an essay!Now, on to my review of The Ghost and the Darkness on DVD.I remember wanting to see this movie when I was younger (when it was first released), but it wasn't until my sophomore year of college that I bought the DVD in order to write a term paper comparing the film to actual history. In terms of Hollywood, it's fairly accurate. The film itself, as entertainment, is great (it seems some people are analyzing it as if it were a documentary???). I'm a fan of both Douglas and Kilmer; they're fine here, but they've definitely done better work elsewhere. The plot moves along nicely and creates some definite tension and suspense. Additionally, the photography is beautiful and the soundtrack is great, too.Now the bad news: the DVD sucks. Period. And I'm not even complaining about the lack of extras here. The transfer is absolutely criminal, and those responsible for it should never work on another DVD project ever again. The print is clear and solid, but the aspect ratio is not correct AT ALL. I was mortified when I popped it into my player, only to be rewarded with a distorted image. Absolutely shameful...This film deserves a new anamorphic transfer in its original aspect ratio.VIDEO: C-AUDIO: AFILM:  B
Sick to the bone!. This is not a review of the Criterion edition. I have seen several of their productions, and they are the best! This is about this movie.  This film is sick. Very sick. I am not a prude. I am a grown up gay man with rather radical views.  Still this film made me throw up when I saw it while preparing to write an essay on the director for a gay, cultural magazine. I am aware of Pasolinis intentions of describing the real inner life and dephts of fascism, and I hate anything that even comes near to fascist views, even ordinary right wing views.  And still: This is the most evil film I have ever seen. To think up this film, even with the literary source of it as a background, Pasolini had to use his own imagination. And I am glad I never knew a person with such an imagination (at least I hope I don't know any such person). And worst of all: The young kids in the movie had to go through these scenes, to act out this sick story. To do those things! I do really hope they have been taken good care of ever since! I do not understand how it can be high art, except for being very professionally acted and photographed.  For the rest of it: I will never watch as much as a minute of this film again! After viewing it I had to watch The Sound of Music three times. In a row! That was the best thing I could think of, just to get the images of this film away. But they are still there. Two years later. Do not watch this! You can't ever really escape its images, and you do not want to carry them around with you. There are other ways to find out what fascism is. This is only pollution
This movie......stinks. I am really wondering about the people who have reviewed this and gave it such good ratings.Ive been looking at their other reviews trying to understand what it is they like. Because this movie STINKS!Im a huge Reese Witherspoon fan and I like Paul Rudd so I rented this movie and thought it would be good. Oh boy I was wrong. The charachters are over the top and the story is just cheesy. Im all for a good fun, romantic comedy. I like "Win a date with Tad Hamilton" but this is just awful.Reese plays a stripper (somehow it just doesnt work)who helps the dorky hopeless Rudd dump then win back his girlfriend. All the time there is a package to stop hence the name "Overnight Delivery".The story could have worked but it just doesnt. The premise is good and there are parts that are somewhat ammusing but overall it sucks.I would reccomend this movie to anyone who liked the Sarah Michelle Gellar movie "Simply Irresistable". If you happened to like that movie with the magical little crab. If you disliked it as I did then stay away.
Disappointing. It starts out well but half-way through, it loses its direction and suffers an identity crisis. Avoidable
Assess your own taste before buying. I am one of the many reviewers who purchased this DVD because everyone favorably compared it with "Seinfeld," and (not being an HBO subscriber) I had never seen it. Personally, I found this show boring, repetitive, and often grating. Well, that's just me. You might be among the many people who enjoy this genre of comedy. Deciding if this DVD is for you will require an informed assessment of you own taste.  Buy this DVD if you tend to laugh at protracted bickering among the characters (as in "Married with Children" or Vicki Lawrence's show "Mama").  This is NOT the kind of gut-splittingly funny politically charged bickering that we once enjoyed in "All in the Family." As in "Seinfeld", you will see adults act in childish, selfish, irresponsible, uncaring ways. Depending on how this is done, it can be VERY funny, but "Curb" missed the mark for me. I find self-absorbed New Yorkers (as those portrayed in Seinfeld) to be funny, but self-absorbed Californians (as in "Curb") are just pathetic, not even laughable. You might feel differently. Neurosis and rudeness are backhandedly ridiculed in "Seinfeld", but almost celebrated in "Curb." The characters in "Seinfeld" are roughly half a generation younger than those in "Curb." The Seinfeld characters (who came of age in the "me" era of 1980s ) commit a variety of hilarious middle-age gaffes and mis-steps associated with a lack of direction in life.  The older characters in "Curb," on the other hand, offer us only a repetitive and uncreative barrage of antagonistic behavior that is characteristic of people who have given up on forging new directions in life. They merely exist. You might find this funny, but I found it depressing
two stars for the late donald pleasence , but no stars for this hopeless mess that trashes the good name of the "halloween". donald pleasence died not long after the filming of this movie and it is sad that the great actor left this mess as his last film.once again he is dr.lommis, the mad ahab, looking for the white whale of michael mayers,aka the boogyman, once more.the original concept has been streached about as far as it can and not break, so nothing new just your typcal slasher movie kills and some nonsence about the curse that makes our friend (or fiend if you like) kill. it's al to much to late to save this tired and really silly film. a sad fairwell to the great donald pleasence!
Sorry for the huge and famous cast. This movie comes from John Grisham's novel of the same title. Most of the actions taking place in the novel were also presented in this movie. The spotlight reviews goodly summarize the movie, even when I don't agree with their rankings.The first movie's problem is the character's personalities, less credible many times. One reviewer well said the FBI's personnel looks rather wimpy.  The merciless Coal Fletcher looks like a simple clerk while he is the real president in the novel. On the other hand, the novel's heroine (Darby Shaw) losses her strong personality but at the same time behaves in obnoxious ways. For example, in one scene, she asks her best female friend to spread a gossip in college but Darby does not care whatsoever for her friend's safety as in the novel; Darby even tells her that "it's not good for her (Darby) to stay there". Darby does all the opposite in the novel. Next, her friend does all what she says, this not credible.The second movie's error is the way the show the events. For example, as I said Fletcher is not portrayed as a tough way, there's even an scene where we see his seeing his family's picture at his desk, really charming; however he is still punished in the movie. Any honest person who does not let to be impressed by the reputations of the actors and director should admit that the movie is not always understandable. I watched this movie right when released in 1992 and I didn't understand it but the huge Julia Roberts' success was on its highest so I didn't think much, just considered it was sort of boring. Now, I read the novel, watched the movie again and understood the movie was flawed. In fact, all bad guys in the movie were only small fishes who chased Darby.I also complain that the movie shows some misbehaviour as good ones. For example, in one scene the president asks the FBI chief (Voyles) to stop a crime investigation. Voyles offers to do it in exchange of favours. This is plain corruption yet the movie made it look like a cocktail party! In another scene one character (Callahan) is about to start driving while drunk and Darby only plays a little bit to stop him just to finally let him get on his car.The movie added a few action scenes the novel doesn't have, yet it is quite boring. The novel has less action, yet it is more exciting
*Spoiler Warning*. Normally I try to find something good in every movie I see, whether I enjoy it or not.  Here's what I came up with for Bloodrayne.The acting is so poor, characters refrain from endearing themselves to the audience at all.  The only satisfaction I gained from the money spent on this film was in the last ten minutes, where everyone is viciously, gorily mowed down.  So, yay to violent and bloody death.P.S. Turn it off after she sits down in the chair and stares at the camera and it fades out.  If you keep watching, you'll be treated to a video catalogue of everyone she killed throughout the movie, before it returns to her face straight on with the camera again.  Um, what, Uwe, you had a time minimum to fill
Ouch.... rock bottom... Okay, I like Chris Rock... a little... well, maybe not. But reguardless, this movie is horrible. If Bill Muray all of a sudden turned black, and he landed the role, this movie would STILL be awful. Chris Rock is a horrible actor (Raul Julia is better, and one of his movie's landed in the TV show of movie shame, Mystery Science Theater 3,000) and in my opinion, he has a lot of stale, predictable humor. The movie plot is shallow, the acting horrible, the side romatic story couldn't be worse; let's face it, this movie is a slice of crap a la mode with bland tasting ice cream. I give this movie two starts because this will NEVER happen, it's a very far-fetched story, even for Hollywood (the only reason it doesn't get one star is because the chick in the movie is hot). If it ever does, I'm moving somewhere safer, like Cuba or North Korea. Alright, well, since no one will probably read this, I'm stopping. Just save yourself some time and money, do NOT watch this horrible excuse for a movie
Lousy acting: so-so singing. Bette Midler has oodles of talent,we just don't get much of it here! In this version of Gypsy,Ms. Midler is either doing the show because someone told her she should,or,she did it to give Ethel Merman a run for her money! Rest easy Ethel! I did not get the feeling that her heart was in this performance. If Ego were shoes,Bette wears a size 13 in this performance,but unfortunately,she only has size 7 1/2 feet to fill them. I would disagree with some of the other comments on this version as well. I have seen Ethel Merman on BROADWAY,Rosalind Russell w/Karl Malden and Bette.Ethel has the voice, Rosalind is the superb actress in the role,(and suprisingly talented with her rendition of the score),but Bette is neither. I suppose it's been a long,hard road since the days of "The Rose"!?If you're into the musical score primarily,get the CD with Ethel,(all the songs are there). If your into the best all round show,Get Rosalind Russell, Karl Malden and Natalie Wood,(who,by the way is the best Gypsy Rose Lee of any production),the only drawback to this show is the editing out of 'Together wherever we go'If you're into throwing away your money on a lack luster performance,but just have to have everything Bette's ever done,go ahead. P.S. One more further comment on casting; It seems Midler knew she wasn't up to the project so insisted that nobody had more talent than she. Either that,or the casting director threw darts on a list of available names and went for it! If Midler's performance was disappointing, the rest of the cast's were just downright forgettable.This proves an 'ism' on stage AND film; When the show features a headliner with a bunch of nobodys,it spells Ego Grandstanding, not quality.
Nickelodeon is still my favorite channel to watch. Where's the old stuff?. I do agree with everyone who gave this one star. I WANT THE OLD NICKELODEON SHOWS ON THIS DVD!!! I don't have this DVD but I want to review anyway. I watched this channel since I was little. I still watch it now. At least there's a channel called Nicktoons Network that I can watch. I wish they would make a network called Nickelodeon Oldies and Favorites. That would be awesome
picture good;quality bad. I gave myself a headache trying to watch this  d.v.dIt should have been a most enjoyable movie but the quality of the d.v.d was so bad it was unwatchable.(I  must say here that the fault was in the d.v.d not the d.v.d player as I have not had a problem watching d.v.d's before.  or since.I think something should be done to ensure quality of production when  running off d.v.d's
Boring. Its a beautifully rendered world.  I saved many screenshots.  But the game gets very boring after a few days.  This game has everything, horses, individual armors, unique weapons, etc.  But what it doesn't have is sustainable fun.  You can sneak around and steal the world blind, but 98% of the things to steal is cheese, apples and clay servingware.  Ok yes, that is what makes up 98% of the items in a RL house, but if Real Life was exciting we wouldn't be playing RPGs.  The little pocket hells that you have to enter are repetitive, and have very little good loot (what it has is heavy and undervalued considering the items come from demons).ESIII has poorer graphics (cuz its older duh!), but a better story and better NPCs.  The problem is, I don't have an alternative to suggest since Gothic 3 and NWN2 are also disappointing.  At least this still has the unrestricted travel
"Shameless" insufficient use of Jeremy Brett. I don't usually make a point to watch films this bad (predictable plot, laughable dialog, horrible music soundtrack, etc), but when I saw that my all-time favorite actor Jeremy Brett had a brief but memorable role in "Shameless" (originally titled "Mad Dogs and Englishmen"), I couldn't resist. It's a bizarre experience to witness an actor -- who so perfectly embodied the iconic Sherlock Holmes in the beloved Granada TV series -- appear in such an odd role of a drug-supplying sugar daddy. It's even odder to see a glimpse of him in a modern-day sexual scene with a young woman. Regardless, as usual, he stole the movie even if he was only barely in it. I only wished the director has used Brett to his fullest talents instead of as an aside eccentric.A young Elizabeth Hurley makes a mediocre attempt to portray a bored little rich girl with drug problems and C. Thomas Howell does his best to seem sexy in a grunge biker kind of way. But Brett's booming voice, subtle expressions and dynamic presence wakes you up for just long enough to pay attention to his character. Once he disappears from the screen, you realize all too soon that the rest of the film is worthless. It takes a great actor to lift up a role from the muck, and I'm sorry to see that this was Brett's only chance to do a modern-day storyline from his usual historic epics before he passed away.He briefly commented in an interview why he did the role, and soon realized the film was a disaster.On "Mad Dogs and Englishmen" (1995)-- "I was mad to do it, but I wanted to show the world that I was still alive and I could do other things apart from Sherlock Holmes. I hope they don't release it..."
Only watch it if you are a Brian Heidik fan!. He is the winnner of the latest Survivor & is in this movie.  It is barely watchable, only view it if you are a die hard fan
"Who would want to kill the sweetest ****** woman in the world?". I knew I was in trouble with FOUR BROTHERS when I saw that Josh Howard (of SPORTS NIGHT fame) was scowling hard, trying to be a tough Detroit cop. Not believable for a nanosecond. And then it got worse when Marky Mark said, "Why don't you two cops get some doughnuts and coffee?"The rest of the film veers along in that kind of lame and clichd rhythm. Almost every scene in this thing is a howler. And watching it, I remembered I hadn't forgiven Tyrese Gibson for the travesty that was 2 FAST 2 FURIOUS. Still, Tyrese is better than Garrett Hedlund, who looks like he's a refugee from THE OUTSIDERS.But the movie's not a total wash; after all, it's got a GREAT soundtrack
childish  fight. It is a bit strange to watch all this fight against Dan Brown's book. What is for? Millions people who like the Da Vinci Code book usually do not take it as a source of historical facts. The value of this book is not in the particular facts but in general (and serious) idea about danger of destroying male-female balance in society. Indeed, a human being consists of two parts. Males and females have very different views on this World so that these views should be well balanced. If one of the parts becomes heavily predominating, it may be truly dangerous for survival of our species. Dan Brown just takes our attention to the problem. He shows that the imbalance has a  long history and it might be a major source of many current problems in human society as well as the source of overall instability on the Earth. And the latter is not fiction.
Even more stupid acting and writing.... a second season of even more bad writing, cliches all over the place, Bell can not act, and Silver is a joke of a Tv and film producer.Just another example of bad marketing and the TV add guys having too much say in how a show is done
Disjointed Disaster. This movie is a disaster. There is not one single memorable performance by the cast of "stars". If you want to see a little boy happily running to school, get hit by a car, walk home injured and die, have at it.  There is a reason that this movie is deeply discounted by Amazon. Criterion is probably losing money on this release and they desire it. They should be is ashame
not so speedy. Really, the reason Speed 2: Cruise Control isn't a classic like the first one is because the speed storyline is not a bus, but a BOAT this time around.  Do you really think a boat can go as fast as a bus?  Even if a boat is fast, do you think that's more exciting than a bus avoiding danger in the city streets?  I don't.  What kind of amazing dangers can a boat avoid?  OTHER boats?  Ocean buoys?A bus with a bomb underneath it is more rewarding to watch.  Speed 2 feels more like a way to cash in on the original.  I watched the movie twice and wasn't satisfied either time.  It's an okay movie, though.  But don't expect "speed".
BAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAD. This is a really, really, really, really, bad movie. Don't watch it, don't buy , don't even think about this movie, you may get brain damage. Acting is horrible, plot line is ridiculous, and who...wrote this terrible script. Ghetto people don't even talk like that
Two great scenes... I will give this movie two stars, simply for the two memorable scenes in the movie that make it worth seeing - at least once. The demon coming out of the TV set scene is suprisingly well done, rivaling even what we would see years later in movies like The Ring. The second scene is where the demon kid is chasing a woman around the apartment, then he falls to the ground and an alien demon crawls out of his chest and continues to chase her around the place. There's pastel neon lights flashing in the background, and the whole scene is jam packed with 80's cliches. It's almost like a cross between The Omen, a Billy Idol video, Aliens, and Return of the Living Dead. It's so ridiculously absurd and campy, it makes me crack up every time I see it
Punk: Unexplained. When a documentary includes commentary from such key artists as Henry Rollins, Jello Biafra and Tommy Ramone, an interesting and rich story of punk music is to be expected. Punk: Attitude fails to deliver.Despite the fact that the material is organized chronologically, there is no story to help weave everything together. To make things worse, many of the performers featured are extremely obscure and have little, if any, significance to the core of punk music. There are several times during the film where a scenester commentator like Rollins says, "I wouldn't really say they were punk," when referring to a featured band.Nearly all of the featured bands border on pop; very little time is devoted to heavy or political bands. Additionally, the coverage ends very abruptly in the early 80's, makes quick mention of a few hardcore punk bands (Dead Kennedys, Exploited, and Agnostic Front), makes a very poor attempt at tieing rap to punk, and jumps to Nirvana--hardly punk by any standard. To give an example of how disjointed this film is, there is a punk-rap connection in the fact that the Beastie Boys, who are featured here, crossed-over; the documentary fails to even note that they began as a punk band!There are a few interesting tidbits featured in this documentary. For example, there is some information about the origin of the Rasta influence on punk and the British punk fashion scene that is responsible for the stereotypical punk image (bondage pants, high-end boots, safety-pinned ripped clothing, etc.). However, any positives are completely overshadowed by the extremely shallow ending in which the Rollins pays tribute to Michael Moore and makes a less-than-motivating plea for punks to become more involved in politics.If taken at face value, you'll leave this believing that punk began, flourished, and died between the late-`60's and early-`80's, consisted almost completely of pop-punkers like the Pretenders, Siouxsie and the Banshees, Blondie, and the Clash, and was resurrected in the early `90's by Nirvana. Pathetic
an exercise in film making; not a film; 2/10. Roman Polanski, whom I'm none too big a fan, is quoted as saying "People like Truffaut, Lelouch and Godard are like little kids playing at being revolutionaries."  And I think that quote sums up Shoot the Piano Player fairly well, it's an exercise in film, using new ideas & concepts, such as the scene where we don't follow Charlie but instead follow the woman leaving the apartment room, but in the end is a vapid, hollow piece of art; like a Norman Rockwell painting, or the work of Andy Warhol.Upon initial release the film was torn apart by the general public & critics alike, but now some 50 years later it's considered a landmark film, one of the most, if not the, most important of the French new wave, a movement cited as being the biggest influence on the American cinema of the late 60's and early 70's.  But, simply because it was influential doesn't necessarily stamp it's place as flawless.Everything about the film is fantastic; the acting, the music, the cinematography, and yes, the radical ideas Truffaut used are inspiring, but it's not enough to save a film that is utterly meaningless.The thing about the French New Wave's effect of American cinema is that American film makers took their ideas & added a layer of depth to them; they were more than just "oh, let's try this weird shot, it'll  be experimental"The movement, on numerous occasions, has been compared to jazz, which I can understand but don't agree with; with jazz, yes there's a free flowing improvisation, but there's something there than just pretty pictures & ideas that would be considered absurd by the standard audience's mind.A fantastic example of a scenario where the influence was greater than the original is John Cassavettes, whose Killing of a Chinese Bookie has the feel of a French New Wave film, but is also a fantastic work of art
Mild Profanity and Non-Family Values. I bought this movie based on the rave customer reviews.  This definitely isn't a family-friendly or moral story.  The lead actress is from New York and is proposed to move in with her long time boyfriend.  The only reason she doesn't like the idea is because she wants a greater commitment (marriage) but not because she feels moving in is wrong.  Also a friend encourages her to lie non-chalantly at one point when she feels out of place in Wyoming.  We bought the movie on the pretense that there were no cuss words but H*** and D*** were sprinkled throughout the movie and only took away from what could've been a decent film.  Even outside of the non-family values and cursing it was slow moving
Hindsight is 20/20. Believe it or not, I actually wanted to watch this movie.  I've seen almost everything else Adrian Lyne has done and respect his shallow talent enough to be interested in his early efforts.(I watched _Jacob's Ladder_ because I remembered an intriguing preview on a VHS cassette I watched as a kid and learning that it was a significant influence on _Silent Hill_ sealed the deal; My girlfriend owns a copy of Lyne's version of _Lolita_; _Fatal Attraction_ was a girlfriend induced rental; I watched the TV version of _Indecent Proposal_; I haven't seen _9 1/2 Weeks_ but I read the book.)Flashdance is also one of those pieces of pop culture that are so influential that you recognize references even if you've never seen it.  And I always wanted to hear the song "Maniac" in its original context, so when I found it on an acquaintances shelf I popped it in.So, how was it?Not too bad.  Not great by any means, or even really that good (_Lolita_ and _Jacob's Ladder_ are both quite good) but interesting enough to keep me awake after a long day of work.  The plot is a by-the-book "believe in your dreams" story with really lame dialog, but its development is intercut with extended dancing sequences that are so long and frequent that at times it felt like I was watching an abstract silent film.  I don't know squat about dancing, but the choreography seemed innovative, at least for its time.I can't even remember the names of the characters, but all in all, I have to admit that it was kind of neat.Also, if you watch it with the subsequent 20+ years of movies in mind, _Flashdance_ can be seen as sort of an omen of all bad things to come from Hollywood:  It's a movie by a director whose only previous experience was in music videos and commercials, one whose screenplay was an early effort by hack Joe Esterhasz and was produced by Jerry Bruckheimer!  Taken collectively these elements are probably responsible for about 60% of all crap movies made since
really flat. Jodie Foster Is one of the Greatest Actress's Ever period,but this clunky film is so boring&Predictable that it just never gets off the ground&put me to sleep. a film full of Cliches&dime a dozen story lines that never goes anywhere
This DvD Should Have a Warning Label. This is a good example that some DvD's should have parental warning labels.  This one should read: WARNING!  THIS DVD IS NOT FUNNYSomeone got this for me as a present because I like Lewis Black.  He's funny, but this is nothing like his stand up routine or any of his recent work.  All the jokes [sic] are sexual.  It's a couple of sketches filled with recycled offensive sexual humor.  Usually when one uses an old joke, one endeavors to tell it in a funnier manner than it was previously used.  Not so in this DvD.A three year old says, "poo poo," and laughs and laughs as if it's the funniest thing in the world.  The humor in this DvD is little different
Subtitles cut off. If you speak french this dvd is probably fine - but for me there are better dvd's that focus on a dancer's life in a ballet company. The subtitles were cut off at the bottom and on the sides so you either looked at the dvd without knowing what was being said or you struggled to figure out the subtitles since they were only partially shown.
Only if your a Prince Fan. In the early 1990's this movie was definitely made for that era. Just look at the clothing and hair. High top fades etc. Graffiti Bridge was definitely unique. It should have been released on cable t.v. instead of the theater. It was more of a musical then a actual movie. Prince somehow has his own ways of doing things in his own world. And he may not care about record sales or what people think of what he puts out, but it makes even the most loyal fans question what he is doing. The talent he has is amazing but he's become just a mediocur artist. This lack luster film may be remembered a hundred years from now. But as of now it's just what you call a get up and walk out film. I'm a prince fanatic, a die hard fan, but man the potential this guy has to be a mega star of our time he fails to meet. You haft to make people believe in you and really reach them and relate. If only Prince could relate to what people are feeling now and what they want. Prince somehow fell behind because the youth of this generation moved on while he stayed stagnet. I think he shut the world out and it just went on turning. Record sales may not matter to him, but fans you must keep loyal. Graffiti bridge is a film in my collection and I just look at it as my collection but nothing more. It's a film that makes you think. It's spiritual and there are some warm moments. Now Purple Rain is something not to be missed. I recommend that one. Enjoy
Good Picture Quality But Not Funny. I have to say the quality of the movie as far as picture and sound is just about perfect. I however didnt laugh at all during the whole movie. It is predictable and full of stupid characters. I guess its for fans only
He's Going Downhill. I've been a huge fan of Vam Damme since I saw him in No Retreat, No Surrender then even more after I had seen Lionheart. The problem is after Universal Soldier: The Return his movies have lost alot of the intensity, and dare I say it integrity that the previous ones had and that I've always enjoyed. I mean I give him credit for The Order, Derailed, and Desert Heat, those were pretty good but nothing like what he used to make. I do realize that he is trying new things, maybe even trying to get away from just doing Martial Arts flicks but if I were him I'd stick to what I'd know would do well.To tell you the truth this one was so bad I couldn't even bear to finish watching it.What happened to you big guy
Because I can't give it "0" stars. Here's a film where all the actors and actresses know they're funny, but somehow it doesn't traslate into a funny movie. This film is far more irritating than enjoyable. Frantic disjointed and sloppy, this cinematic bomb could fall into the worst movie of all time catagory. Too many shots of actors looking smug and hamming it up after saying their lines.A pity, because all that talent is wasted.My 11 year old son found this film to be tiresome after 20 minutes.People who claim this movie is funny are probably not well
Great DVD of a Poor Movie. CONCERNING THE DVD:Yet another MGM quickie, containing the film in its correct 1.66:1 aspect ratio with some nicely restored video elements.  The footage from other films that was edited in looks poor. The 2.0 Mono soundtrack is in good shape. There are basic subtitles in French and Spanish, scene selections as well as a beat-up trailer.CONCERNING THE FILM: (from my website, www.angelfire.com/film/eurowar)The always-overrated David McCallum is one of the few good things in this low-budget World War II adventure piece, yet another quickie from Oakmont Films.Sometime prior to D-Day - probably early '44 or '43 - a Mosquito Squadron is sent to bomb a V-1 rocket installation in France, when Squadron Leader Scott (David Buck) is shot down and presumed dead. His second-in-command, Quint Munroe (who just happens to be like a life-long brother to him) has to return to England and tell his beautiful blonde wife (Suzanne Neve) the sad news. As one would expect, Munroe and Mrs. Scott slowly fall in love. But when Munroe is chosen to lead a mission to bomb a new V-3 development center, things will chance quite a bit - because Scott is a prisoner held at the target fortress!From start to finish, "Mosquito Squadron" is a total hack-job - literally. The story is filled with enough contrivances and clichs to drive any mildly serious critic mad. Let us take a brief look at a 1964 film entitled "633 Squadron". In said film, a squadron commander has a best friend shot down over Norway, and falls in love with his sister. Later on, he is assigned to bomb the fortress where his friend is being held. Sound familiar? And that's not all our title film steals! Virtually all of the aerial battle footage is directly lifted from "633 Squadron", while the new footage is comprised almost entirely of horrible-looking miniatures hanging from far-too-visible wires.The writers have also directly copied another classic war film, "The Dam Busters". The feasibility of Munroe's mission revolves around a bouncing bomb, which will skip along the ground and roll into an open tunnel leading to the V-3 rockets. (I won't even mention how convenient it was to leave a big open tunnel to drop a bomb into). The real bouncing bomb (made famous in 1954's "The Dam Busters") was designed to skip on water to destroy Nazi dams - not the ground as is seen here! The idea of dropping a bouncing bomb on the ground is, simply, ludicrous and impossible. Introduction of this concept kills the storyline immediately.The low budget shows up in every action sequence: the French resistance force is comprised of a half-dozen men in berets carrying Sten guns, and only a handful of German guards enforce security at the "fortress". The forests are obviously cheaply furnished soundstages, and a face-off with an imitation German "tank" is ludicrously shot. We never really see much of the German-held Chateau, and when we do it never looks as though we're inside some high-tech development center a la "Operation Crossbow". The scenes set in England fare somewhat better, with some excellent scenes set at airfields and a rather rowdy officer's club.David McCallum and the cast of little-known English actors do a fair job, even though the no-frills script doesn't give them much to do. McCallum is a fair actor, nowhere near as great as his fans hail him to be, though. He was better suited for television than cinema, and that comes out in every scene. He often looks uncomfortable and awkward, but delivers his often banal dialog convincingly and with conviction. His scenes with Neve are often touching, even though audiences have seen this dozens of times before. There aren't any other actors worth mention among the ensemble, besides perhaps Charles Gray who would go on to play Blofeld in the James Bond film "Diamonds are Forever" a few years later.Oakmont Productions financed a number of cheap British war films in the late 1960s and early 1970s: "Attack on the Iron Coast", "Hell Boats", "The Last Escape" and "The One Thousand Plane Raid" among them. These quickies were best suited for TV viewing instead of theatrical release, but United Artists picked them all up and put them on the big screen. Anyone expecting a classic here - or in any of the aforementioned pieces for that matter - is in for a big disappointment. Check out "633 Squadron" instead.
This boom is a total bust. Diane Keaton is a successful management consultant in NYC who "inherits" a baby from recently deceased relatives. She doesn't want it, doesn't know what to do with it--but can't give it up either. So she takes it, quits her job, and moves to a farm in Vermont. She begins making baby food which sells like hotcakes, and meets Sam Shepard, a local vetinarian and down-to-earth guy. Given a chance to return to NYC with her baby food, she decides to stay on the farm. Totally unbelievable from the git-go, and Keaton is at her obnoxious worst
Bad beyond belief. This movie is being promoted in its trailer and on its website as having something to do with the BDSM and consensual Master/slave relationships practiced by some in this community. In fact it is a piece of total BS that is about kidnapping women, selling them, killing them and selling their body parts. The plot makes no sense. All the details about such relationships are wrong. The presentation of "training" and its results are laughable. If you want to watch a couple of naked women running around and being treated like dogs for part of the movie, then it may be worthwhile, but unlike the opinion of some others here, this movie has nothing to do with anything that happens in the real world. And the acting, editing, etc. are not even B movie quality
This is just weird. Am I the only one here who's weirded out by disney's new in-betweener stories?  Also I agree with a reviewer below that this isn't a real sequel.  It's just about baby Tod and Copper all over.  Yawn....  Please, save your money.  Buy the classic movies or a real disney sequel instead
What a disappointment... In the haphazardly-produced "Jesus Is Magic," Sarah Silverman sort of meanders along from one unrelated "edgy" joke to another, interspersed with painfully boring musical numbers and skits.  There were definitely a few highlights that at least induced me to crack a smile, but overall the experience wasn't a great one.  When contemporary comedians like Dane Cook and Carlos Mencia are constantly proclaimed to be unfunny and overrated, I can't help but wonder how Silverman slipped by the very same flack.I love intelligent, observational humor, myself... it doesn't matter if it's tame or "offensive."  Honestly, though - I had to force myself through this DVD.  I even watched it in 2 halves because, simply put, it failed to hold my attention.  Having never seen Silverman's television show, I may be just experiencing a limited scope of the comedienne.  Her signature deadpan delivery of outrageously bigoted statements and taboo subjects is okay enough for those who understand the irony and sarcasm.  But is that really all she's got?  It's hard to pinpoint what's ineffective about "Jesus Is Magic," though.  The nature of the jokes didn't faze, but the banal content and sketchy timing lead to one awfully bored viewer..
Disappointing. When Fantasia came out in 1938, it bombed.  Many years later, the movie received the acclaim it deserved.  Fantasia has enchanted me since I was a child, and I eagerly awaited Fantasia 2000.  The possibilities!  I was sure Disney would come up with something to rival the original.What I saw was a humorless, boring mish-mash with only a few bright spots.  The opening segment of whales flying through space was embarrassingly bad.  Silly flamingos also fell flat.  Donald Duck as Noah was terrific.  The Gershwin piece was ok, but not for Fantasia.  And what should have been the crowning achievement, a forest nymph battling to save her beloved forest, was predictable and stale.This film was almost a complete waste of my time and money.  I heartily, heartily, endorse the orginal Fantasia as a timeless classic for all ages
too much story missing in film. We need the Peter Jackson, of Lord of the Rings Trilogy fame, to do this book justice.  The Book MISTS OF AVALON was WONDERFUL - this film was chopped up and missing so much that it wasn't really worth watching, in my humble opinion.  A waste of wonderful actors, terrible job on screen play.  GET PETER JACKSON and his production company busy on this
PLEASE MAKE IT END!!!. There are no words to describe how AWFUL (!!!) this "movie" was from beginning to end, but let me try anyway so as to give people a fair chance to avoid it and thus try and prevent their day/evening from being ruined: the film supposedly deals with a woman who has an accident and is "touched" by a sex angel only to discover she is a sex addict and the twelfth sex apostle... Need I say more?The plot, the "humor," the dialogues, and the music are way beyond "below average."There is next to no nudity and there are no, I mean 0 as in ZERO beautiful girls, in this film!As for the acting-oh my- the acting is beyond words...School plays (and pre-school for that matter) have better actors!  It is truly sad...Rent or buy (ha ha ha) at your own risk.  You have been warned!
Pythons can't dance, especially Terry Jones!. In one second season ep Terry Jones (what a common last name!) does a totally lousy, unfunny job doing a strip tease job. He can't talk well either. He really isn't that talented a performer in these senses.
Kentucky Fried Movie. I remember this movie back in the 70's as being much, much funnier. I bought it. I saw it and I will never watch it again. It is in the give away pil
"I'm the guy in the frozen food section dialling 911.  I swear.". Peter Segal's "Anger Management" is a film with nothing going for it.  It is best described as boring, annoying, and devoid of laughs.Mild-mannered Dave Buznik (Adam Sandler) is sent to anger management counseling after an unfortunate misunderstanding.  He immediately develops a problematic relationship with Buddy Rydell (Jack Nicholson), the self-help expert leading the sessions.  As the two men spend more and more time together, Buznik starts to wonder if his counselor is the one who should be undergoing counseling."Anger Management" just does not get as much mileage out of its premise as it would like.  It is essentially a one-joke film that wears out its welcome very quickly.  Sandler and Nicholson are saddled with a script that fails to produce even a snicker.  Furthermore, the parade of cameos throughout the film add nothing to the story and just feel like a lame attempt to squeeze in as many recognizable faces as possible into the proceedings.  Truth be told, "Anger Management" is one of those projects that was green-lighted because of the talent involved and not because of its quality.
What a stinker!!!. I wasn't expecting high art when I bought this movie but I was at least expecting good acting considering the cast.  This movie was so bad it was funny.  I watched with a friend and we ended up making comments similar to those on Mystery Science Theater just to stay mildly entertained.  The story was lame (to be expected) but the acting was lousy with the exception of Oliver Reed who was pretty good as the bad guy.  All this on top of a truly hokey sound track.  I have seen other movies in this genre, but YIKES this one takes the cake as the worst by far
FOCUS, PLEASE!!!. I haven't seen work of this quality since high school AV class. Friends of Ram Dass will skip this embarrassing mess like first period biology. Too bad this story wasn't entrusted to a more competent documentarian.
This is really misguided. I have seldom seen such a bad movie with so much talent.  (David Arquette, Stephen Baldwin, Mickey Rourke, etc.) One wonders what they saw in potential for this script or why they made choices to be involved.This horribly misguided film centers around a juvenile prank gone awry that ends up involving two bank-robbers who freak and there is enough gratuitous violence and mindless killing (and torture) to last me for the rest of my life.  The film starts out terribly boring and gets more mindless and boring as it concludes, perhaps expecting the violence to make up for the total lack of story.This is a disaster not worth enduring.  Save the actors and film-makers the embarrassment of seeing this film and see something else.
Gave it a Chance but... I really did give this a chance but I can't say I like the show. It focuses more on the "police" aspect and less on the science, which differentiates the CSI series from most of the other garbage out there. I know David Caruso has his fans but I just can't appreciate him in this vehicle...
"2" STARS FOR THE "DVD" AND NOT THE MOVIE... I just purchased the 2 disc, special edition of this movie, and here's my problem(s):First off, I don't speak Italian, so my only options are to watch the film with the English dub, or with the Italian dub with the English subtitles, but here's the problem; the English dub is out of sync with the film, sometimes being only slightly so, but other times being very noticeable and distracting (i.e. during loud sound effects, such as a chair being knocked over, or someone knocking loudly on a door).And so my other option is the Italian bud with the English subs, but here's the problem with this, the English subs are missing during the scene where Peggy is reading the diary (about 30+ minutes into the movie).Now, I had noticed missing subs during the first part of the film, but these where usually during background conversations, or occasionally a line would be missing from someone's speech, but could usually be figured out, and these where only slightly annoying, but the missing subs for the diary entry is inexcusable (and is also missing from the other subs as well) as this is an important bit of info to the plot of the story.Also, when you set up the audio option, from the main menu, there's no problem, but I found that if you use the audio button on your DVD remote, the Italian option gives you the French soundtrack and the French gives you the Italian one. It's nothing serious, but it's an annoyance all the same.So, does anyone else notice these problems, or did I just end up with a bum disc
Not as funny as the first film. This film was a little disappointing.  There was less humor and more attempts at simple shock value that seemed to mostly entertain the people making the film.  Please don't make a third film
Not So Super. In an era of Batman Begins, Sin City, Spiderman, and 300, it's easy to forget that there was a time when a movie based on a comic book wasn't a sure thing.  For an example of a spectacular misfire, Spawn comes to mind; the movie was so obsessed with making the film look like a comic book that it actually FELT like you were watching a comic book, complete with isolated panels, minimal movement, and jarring transitions between scenes.  One moment Spawn's threatening some guy and the next he's standing on some building with his really fabulous cloak whipping in the wind.Similarly, Superman is a visually beautiful movie that has nowhere to go.  The iconic scenes of Superman basking in the sun's rays, or hovering about the Earth listening for crime, or when he's actually doing something heroic (which happens far too infrequently) fail to cover up the complete lack of a coherent plot.  For example:Superman's been gone for years...one assumes that whatever he discovered on his long journey would have something to do with the plot.  Nope.Lex Luthor has discovered Superman's Fortress of Solitude and plans to create an entire continent out of a hybridized Kryptonite.  Surely that means Superman won't even be able to get NEAR the place, right?  Nope.Once said "continent" shows up, it's clear that the whole thing is patently uninhabitable.  This is Lex's big plan, to create a rock formation and play cards while he waits for...people to call him and offer him money or something?  Surely he must have more up his sleeve? Nope.Heck, the world's changed a lot since Superman's been gone, right?  Wouldn't it make sense to really pound home how different Earth is, with it's global warming, crazy politics, and pop starlets?  Nope.  Instead, the crazy new world is supposed to be summed up with a kid taking a picture of Superman with his cell phone--that's right, the kid scooped the Daily Planet with just his camera phone! ISN'T THAT WACKY?Superman Returns is very much a movie in love with the original and, while visually faithful, it's a very poor imitation.  Yes, Brandon Routh looks like a spitting image of Christopher Reeves, but he has no real acting chops to display since he barely speaks.  Kate Bosworth is far too young and whiny as Lois Lane, Jimmy Olsen (Sam Huntington) still wears a bowtie for some reason, and the rest of the cast is too caught up in being iconic comic book characters to be memorable.  Even the amazing Kevin Spacey can only be a marginally cartoonish Lex Luthor, jarringly transforming into a murderous thug at the movie's climax.The pacing is all wrong.  Superman saving Lois from a plane crash is great.  Superman fighting criminals with belt-fed chain guns is excellent.  Superman drowning, Superman moping, Superman frustrated over Lois Lane, Superman convalescing in a friggin' hospital?  NOT GREAT.Superman Returns has its moments, and if you squint your eyes it almost feels like the magic from the first movie has been captured.  But then it's gone and the movie drags, and drags, and drags.  Superman has been co-opted to be a Christ-like father-son parable and on the way Bryan Singer forgot what made the first Superman movie so great: it was FUN!I could have made a better movie with my camera phone.
Very dissapoiting...NOT what I expected. After loving Halloween 2, and it's creepy hospital setting, I was very excited to hear that there were two other hospital-slashers in the early 80's; this and &quot;Hospital Massacre&quot;. I hadn't been able to find these two movies until I went to this video store out of town that is known for having a HUGE selection, as well as a lot of hard-to-find movies. I was very pleased to not only find &quot;Visiting Hours&quot; and &quot;Hospital Massacre&quot;, but a whole other bunch of scary movies I wanted to see. I got &quot;Sleepaway Camp 2&quot;, and then decided to get only one hospital movie; I chose &quot;Visiting Hours&quot; due to the supieror cover art. Well, it's no Halloween 2. In fact, it's not even a slasher movie!; it's purely a drama, laced with thriller/suspense elements. And it's boring, boring, boring...One other problem is that alot of the movie foucuses on the killers personal life. We see him talk and act in his &quot;normal&quot; life. This not only made it more boring, but it made it so the guy wasn't even so scary anymore! The hospital setting is not that creepy even, and the parts in the hospital that are soppoused to be suspensful and scary don't happen till towards the end. Other Notes: &quot;Visiting Hours&quot; was actually based off a book, which is now out of print. And most horror films based off books aren't always all that exciting. This isn't...Lastly, this is a very &quot;mature&quot; kind of horror film; it isn't something you'd watch on Halloween with a group of freinds, and doesn't have the thrills and chills of &quot;Halloween 2&quot; or the fun of the &quot;Friday the 13th&quot; series. And don't be fooled by the cool box art
BORRRRIINNNNG!!!!. I'm sorry but despite some brilliant acting performances from Hopkins and Thompson this has got to be one of the most BORING movies I've ever tried to sit through. Don't be fooled by artsy film snobs, this one is a snoozer. And oh by the way, the tenacious "loyalty, devotion and integrity" of Hopkins character that so many critics think is the cornerstone of the film, is in my opinion, distracting and ridiculous
No Form of Escape. With a pacing that only Tsai Ming-liang could love and deliberate scenery shots that you are forced to enjoy "House of Sand" steps into the genre best described as the Foreign Doldrums. Moving as fast as thick molasses never wins any points in my book and considering that that seems to be the main goal of this film we didn't get along too well. The entirety of the movie takes place in the Brazilian desert, a place that we movie fans rarely get to see. However, as you may have guessed, not a lot happens out there. There isn't even a weeping camel out there to keep us company. We watch as a crazy old guy moves his family out into the middle of nowhere (no explanation given) and then dies, stranding everybody else there for three generations. I know, how can I criticize a plot for not having any developments (other than the startling revelation that somewhere out yonder sells salt!) when in reality nothing would ever happen to these characters. And to that I would say that this was not the best yarn to commit to film.Pretty much everything goes as would be expected. People walk around bored, some of them die off, there are some minor romances, and everything looks beautiful. About ten years in a group of soldiers shows up and Aurea, the crazy man's wife, desperate for anything that moves, strikes up a love affair with one of them. He promises to take her out of the desert, but unforeseen problems prevent that from happening. Throughout more soldiers will arrive, and the females will always view them as tickets out of town, there to be seduced and exploited. Do I believe that these fellow travelers are the only way these women could escape their destiny? Maybe, maybe not. In the end the point is made that living in the Brazilian desert is just about the same as living on the moon, to which I would have to think that moving your family into the middle of the desert and then croaking might to be too smart.Another minor complaint I would like to air is the usage of the same actors to play different roles. It would be fine, in a "Three Times" kind of way, had they bothered to label the passage of time. Instead I was left playing catch up thinking that somehow the grandma had risen from the grave. There is a fairly graphic sex scene somewhere in the middle that might shock you out of your slumber, but really the only use it has is spicing up this overtly bland stew. You have to be in a certain kind of mood to watch a movie like this, and even then it is nearly impossible for the director to pull off. "Rain" and "Elephant" leap to mind as masterpieces of this technique. These characters really may have been marooned out in no man's land, but unfortunately for the filmmakers the exit of the theater is just a few short steps away. I wasn't lucky enough to have seen this in theaters, but I would have been mighty interested to see how many people took a walk. Awe-inspiring cinematography does not make a movie. . .and here is my proof. **1/4
A Celebration of Hopelessness. I give this film one star for the acting, which is often very good. However, the plot and message of this film revel in hopelessness, and debase every aspect of lower income, urban people. In all honesty, I've seen more joy in an African famine. I sat through this film, against my better judgement. Still, if you're truly interested in investigating the dark underbelly of urban American misery and frailty, then I recommend "A Streetcar Named Desire", "KIDS", "Last Exit to Brooklyn", and "Traffic".
Did I miss something here?. I am a great fan of Bernstein's "Candide".  I saw the 1974 production twice.   My wife saw it three times -- she took a friend once.This DVD should have been an excellent performance.  Lupone and Chenowith after all, but the DVD copy I have has such abysmal sound that any enjoyment of the performance is near impossible.   Muddy, echoing, not really even a clear visual image.I assumed it was a really bad recording job.   Is it just that I have a bad DVD copy?
"The Fat Nothing". Horrible movie, only worth watching if you are a Jayne Mansfield or Phyllis Diller fan. Movie looks like it was cheaply filmed and only uses about 4 scenes in entire movie. However, if you like cartoons, than you might like this movie. The singer Laurie Berger is the funniest when she sings and dances her solo. Save your money for a fast food burger.
A moving picture which does not move. Consider the following facts: the entire plot of "Death in Venice" can be quickly summarized as follows:  Famed German novelist Gustav von Aschenbach travels to Venice, sees a beautiful Polish boy named Tadzio, and then dies of a broken heart without ever speaking a word to Tadzio.Now, I will admit that for many years, "Death in Venice" was among my cultural icons -- until I read some stunning thoughts by A. L. Rowse, which suggested that the story itself (not the movie) was completely and utterly stupid.You see a good-looking boy and then DIE?Well, I'm glad that THAT particular proposition is not true, because I have seen millions of good-looking boys and am not dead yet!  :-)Well, let us think over Rowse's thought -- that the story itself is simply stuff and nonsense, overwrought German romanticism carried to absurdity -- and then look at the movie.NOTHING HAPPENS.  I have already told you the plot.  It's not complicated.  So the first 30 minutes (!) are devoted to Gustav von Aschenbach's arrival in Venice!  (Is your heart pounding yet?)The movie is, admittedly, gorgeous.  And, now that GvA has actually managed to reach his hotel (45 minutes?) we get many scenes featuring Ladies With Grotesquely Huge Hats.And then...Tadzio enters!  Wow!  He's cute!  GvA almost has a heart attack on the spot!  (As if there were no cute boys in Germany, or Austria...)Even worse, for those who are fans of good-looking boys: in one early scene, a gang of carousing teenagers swarms into the elevator after Our Great Novelist Gustav and Our Beautiful Boy Tadzio.  But the sub-casting director made a huge mistake, because one of the boys in that gang is much, much more attractive than The Eternal Female, Tadzio.Of course, since Tadzio is essentially female, he only flirts with Gustav, and never speaks to him.So Gustav dies!Is this idiotic, or what
Game 6: The $500,000 movie - Four strikes, you are out. OUT!. Upon the brief trailers and DVD cover that gave me the visuals of this show, I thought I would really enjoy it. It was set 20 years ago during the famous world series made infamous by a single error that ended up keeping the curse alive and putting into motion (later in the series) the Mets (Led by such greats as Lenny Dykstra and Daryl Strawberry) beating the Red Sox (Roger Clemens, Wade Boggs, to name a few) in that world series. The error goes down as one of the most famous in all of sports.  That, however, is in the foreground, much like the Yankee's world series was (led by Reggie Jackson's heroic and never ending home run hits) in the movie "Son of Sam" serial killing spree of Sam Berkowitz in NYC in the 1970's.At first glance, I thought there was going to be a series of dramatic events that lead up to a climatic conclusion, all the way down to the end when Bill Buckner misses the easy grounder to first base. What we end up getting is one of those movies that tries to execute a series of characters and events in their lives, tie it all together, and have some meaning come out of it. The result is what I should have expected from a movie whose budget is a tenth of what some players make nowadays: Dull, Boring, spinning wheels that get stuck, continue to spin, and lead nowhere. There is nothing poignant, profound, or purposeful with the script of this movie, and if there is, I guess I was to wrapped up in watching the Red Sox let another one slip away.  First off, we have a decent cast to say the least: Michael Keaton, Robert Downey Jr., and Catherine O'hara (Home Alone fame) are all actors who have shined in the past and though aren't so much of household names anymore, can still carry their craft to the greatest of limits.The problem is not them. The problem is the script! Michael Keaton is a man about to go through a divorce. His daughter is busier turning the volume up on her walkman (remember, this is 1986, not 2006) and he's seeing a lot of things unravel before his eyes. It doesn't seem to bother him much though, as the character Keaton plays (Nicky Rogan) is a famous playwright in the Big Apple who seems more interested visiting with multiple cab drivers in a day than anything else. The camera is always showing the cabbies ID cards on the dash to make sure we know that they are from the Middle East. STRIKE ONE: This little display doesn't seem to get anything across that has any purpose or direction with the film, and seems not only unnecessary, but also ultimately ANNOYING after about the fourth cab ride. Rogan is about to have a personal drama performed and he's not sure how it's going to be perceived by the masses. STRIKE TWO: Despite all the things outside Rogan saying he's supposed to be worried, scared, or bothered, he doesn't really come across that way. If anything this character acts more like a fake puppet than a man with any emotion, feeling, or personality.  He is supposed to be nervous because critic David Schwimmer (Downey Jr.) is going to be the major reviewer of his new play. Schwimmer himself received a bad review or something and is now some sort of Syd Barret (see: Pink Floyd founder/drugs/gone crazy supposedly/left band/becomes artistic recluse) in his apartment and seems to spend most of his time just staring at walls and acting like he's had a lobotomy with a drill that has a low battery. STRIKE THREE: This entire subplot never takes off and despite bringing this character into the foreground, including a standoff with Rogan in Schwimmer's apartment with Rogan's teen daughter half naked on the couch, it just doesn't fly. By this time in the movie I'm saying I don't really care.I'm going to give them one more chance at bat...STRIKE FOUR!: At one point in the movie, Rogan is told he should carry a gun for safety. Okay I'm thinking there will be some Bernard Goetz (see: Bernard Goetz/weird engineer/NY resident/4 would be robbers on subway/Goetz shoots them/becomes cult icon/hero/crazy dude for self defense and gun ownership) type situation brewing. The gun is fired off in Schwimmer's apartment a few times but nobody gets hurt (thankfully, I mean I didn't REALLY want anyone to get hurt). After that (I'll call a BALL ONE! here) Schwimmer and Rogan sit down and start talking because they realize they have something in common that is a stronger bond than most realize: They both are Boston natives, and HUGE Red Sox fans.  Rogan's mistress, who happens to be funding his new play, and Rogan's father, who is in ailing health and Rogan visits now and again, make Guest appearances. There are a few bright spots in the movie when things like the already mentioned Red Sox bond come into play, but ultimately this thing is over by the fourth inning. Sure, the fat lady isn't singing yet, but like they said in the special features part of the DVD; The world series wasn't technically over for the Sox in that game, as the loss forced it to game seven in which the Mets ultimately won, but it didn't matter. Every fan knew it was a done deal, despite the hope.In the end Rogan skips his plays debut and ends up offering the cab driver that happens to have her grandson with her (nope, this time its actually someone not from the middle east) to go to a bar and watch the game. The actual footage of the game was fun to watch for this sports fan, though I still feel bad for Buckner, and all the BOSOX fans, when that ball went through his glove and the Mets scored the winning run as a result.Special Features: In trying to be objective to my own criticism of this film, I learned that there were basically two ideas (1986 world series & Playwright vs. Critic showdown) that were eventually melded into one. Although its not a total loss considering the movie did surprisingly only cost half a million dollars to film, its not a gain at all because the script in regard to the playwright vs. critic storyline is way to loose. It never really comes across strong and again, with the exception of the BOSOX tie between the two men, the journey to get there is filled with eccentric drivel and boring dialogue that don't hold up well at all. I understand its an "unconventional film" but that does not excuse it from having a weak script and scenes that are made epic but ultimately deliver nothing of substance in the film.  In the end, this sports fan was pleased with the different people involved with the film telling where they were and how they felt when Buckner missed that ball. It's to bad that kind of passion was not put into a stronger script that helped tie the themes and overall storyline together better.Oh yeah, I gave it an extra "strike", and its still here. Sorry, you are outta here! Game OVER! See you on the "Field of Dreams" someday in rerun land.
Anyone/anything would have been better. Ok- so I can see there are some die-hard Julia Roberts fans out there.  Too bad.  Just raving about her will never improve her acting skills (an oxymoron). Actually, the poor quality of this movie is astounding, considering its director, the cast (excepting our girl Julia) and the book upon which it was based. Though he's done some much better work, when Pakula threw this film together he was clearly thinking of only one thing:  "Hmm, 'Presumed Innocent' was a winner. Let's follow that same formula and do another one. It'll sell." Unfortunately, by the time the story from the book by John Grisham got to the screen, it lacked any of its original punch.  As for Denzel, he should be ashamed of himself. He's about as enthusiastic in this as a turtle heading for the beach. I guess he probably needed the cash for another house.  Then again, he's opposite Julia. No further comment needed  -other than, save your money
SAMUEL JACKSON, A PHARMACOLOGICAL GENIUS. YEAH! SURE!. TALKING ABOUT A MISSCAST. SAMUEL JACKSON CAN PORTRAY A HITMAN, A PIMP OR A THIEF, BUT A PHARMACOLOGICAL GENIUS, YEAH, RIGHT
Davy Crockett TV   vs. Davy Crockett Movies. I was very gung ho when I found out that Disney was finally releasing the Davy Crockett TV show on DVD.  I grew up watching the two Davy Crockett movies.  HOwever upon actually seeing these DVDs I was very disappointed.  It is exactly the same as those two movies it is just split into five seperate episodes.  The Episodes: Davy Crockett, Indian Fighter; Davy Crockett Goes to Congress; and Davy Crockett at the Alamo are all the parts included in the movie Davy Crockett King of the Wild Frontier.  The episodes Davy Crockett's Keelboat Race; Davy Crockett and the River Pirates; were what made up the movie Davy Crockett and the River Pirates.  I for one am planning on buying the newer version that came out in 2004 that is just the two movies on one disc.  The only difference between this set and the new set is that there are couple of features on this set and that there are introductions to the episodes buy Leonard Maltin and it has two discs in a tin collector's box.  The biggest difference of all is that this set runs from between $37-$100 whereas you can buy the two movies on DVD for $14-$16.  I myself will go for the cheaper movie set rather than have to watch each episode sperately.
Read the book. Don't bother wasting your time with this movie, instead read the book.  The book was one of the best I have ever read, the movie left me wanting.  I rented the movie after reading the book and never made it all the way through.  So maybe I am being unfair since I did not watch the whole movie, but honestly I couldn't, it just didn't do the story justice
Plays like a non-union industrial corporate video. There is a wonderful movie made about the life of the Buddha.  This is not it.  Oddly enough, it is Little Buddha.  I always said someone should do a movie of Siddhartha.  And someone still should.  This is not it.  The utter lack of conflict or dramatic tension, the monotone acting and flat lifeless script remind me of watching corporate training videos.  There are wonderful movies out there about similar themes, I should have listened to the other reviews.  Luckily it was only one netflix rental I'm out.
Pitewww I spit on them too! They deserved it!. A novelist goes on a vacation to write a book,she gets raped by some town hicks..then it's on!I will admit this was a guilty pleasure. The acting was bad especially the autistic dude (Matthew)with the receding hairline comb-over do...I just wanted to slapp him silly!I first saw this as a kid in the 80s by accident..just now figured out after all these years that they captured this woman for the Autistic dude! He was too scared,So they figure "Can't let it go to waste" and then "Choo-Choo.." it was time to run that "Train".This movie is unnecessarily long,there isn't really THAT much dialogue, The Tripod never moves. there are scenes that don't contribute much. It's very dated in the visuals as well. Even though it is digitally remastered for DVD it still looks washed out and could've done another filter through for better quality.The Raping scene..my god! is one to remember though!Very graphic..the screaming too..very disturbing.The 2nd dude with the suspenders that raped her wasOVERACTING big time with that scene...it was VERY laughable..in fact I had to rewind it and kept laughing at the scene.I still can't believe that the gas station guy REALLY thought she came back for HIM...in lust. Gosh what an idiot!!!He deserved what he got, they all did. I spit on them too.
Caveat emptor:  Buyer beware!!. I bought the Girls of Techno, Orig DVD, and I liked it.  Then I went to buy Girls of Techno Rave, adn Girls of Techno Hot Nights.I was sorely disappointed, because both all 3 of them are same, with different covers.  I am planning to contact the Consumer Protection in Seattle and inform them of potential fraud by this company.  Great video, but to take advantage of customers is unbelievable!![...
Typical Wackness. how in the World that Dave Chappelle blew up in the first place is a real mystery?? so now that he choked a 50 Million Dollar pay day away he got smart&knows He doesn't deserve half the attention he has gotten in the first place. this is a Insult to Wattstaxx. that documentary from 1973 was important this is just a mess.  the music Acts on here are lame as well. you want the Big Acts  of today not no Milk carton, Has-beens or non-hit having acts.  the only thing funny about this film is that it got made&was released. glad his corny show is no more. good riddence. this movie is equally bad as well.
Meh. The meta-story of this film was potentially interesting, but only before the gathering of the bad actors of the roundtable.One star each for Cross and Black, whose genuine talent are the only reasons to bother glancing at this movie. Unless you are the type to grow an emotional bond with unlikeable characters, whose masturbatory storytelling is untinteresting and unbelievable, I would recommend you spend ninety minutes of your life doing anything other than watching Melvin Goes to Dinner
Doesn't hold a candle to the original. This is a remake of An Affair to Remember with Cary Grant and Deborah and it does not work. Some movies just should not be remade. The ONLY thing good about this movie is Katharine Hepburn's appearance. Get the original
Not as Bad as I Was Hoping For. To be perfectly honest, I bought this movie because I expected it to be horrifically bad. You know, bad acting, bad dialog, bad plot? The whole works. For the most part it succeeded in all of these areas, but it's missing something from making it the camp classic it could be. I watched it once, laughed hysterically when Anna Nicole started screaming about making babies or something, but barely chuckled through the rest of it. I'll probably watch it again while having a six pack or something just to see if I missed anything, but so far the camp value is minimal at best. Maybe this is a B rate B movie?
Disappointed. For such a great actor, I expected to see his best films-not a collection of his so-so films. The movies are good, but it's a huge diappointment to true De Niro fans
biggest disappointment EVER. If you are looking for something shocking, don't bother with this movie.rape scene:  why doesn't she run???? why doesn't she fight??? how come there's all this blood on her all of a sudden??? where did that come from???? stupid.                                                            revenge scenes:  first of all, i wasn't upset enough to thirst for revenge.  second of all, the murder scenes were even weaker than the rape scene.what you've basically got here is a movie hollywood could remake, scene for scene, including every gratuitous moment. and it would get made.  it would show in theaters.  and lots of annoying people would think it was horrifying.  go rent "irreversible" it's much better at this sort of thing.
Ring Two-Electric Boogaloo. Where do I start? This movie is a follow up to "the Ring" which was an Americanized adaptation of the Japanese book "ringu" which was an extremely scary book. The first "ring" was awful, the story which was changed from the book, didn't make a lot of sense and the actress Naomi Watts and the kid who played her son David Dorfman could not carry off the acting needed for this type of story. The Ring Two, picks up where the first one kinda leaves off, is Samara up to her old tricks? Are people still watching VHS nowadays for real? Can the "black and white" footage from the first movie be used again and again to create the mood? The Son, Aidan, played by Dorfman, was meant to be the "possessed tortured child" but actually came off as "annoying, flat, and useless" are we supposed to care about him? I wanted Samara to take control of him and go out on the beach get some color, and have a great life. Naomi watts has absolutely NO CHEMISTRY with this child, no motherly instinct, I think she cared more about her leather jacket!! A sequel wasn't needed at all; nothing was "uncovered" except for sissy spacek looking terrible in a wig and nightdress. The scene where the deer go all nutso, made my face cringe, once again over use of CGI effects, so that the "animals" don't look like the real thing at all, instead they look like bambi on steroids. Skip this sequel, skip the first movie, go and read "Ringu" you wont be disappointed
Is the human mind capable of enjoying an unresolved story?. After watching the film, I "studied" the interview with the director.I can see what he tried to say and what kinds of films he wanted to make,but I'm just curious to what extent the human mind is capable of handling the obscurity (i.e., not knowing who actually made the videos and delivered them to the couple). I do not think that the audience will be as cognitively active (i.e., being eager to engage in some abstract moral speculation about the protagonist's guilt over his memory or dreams) as the director wants to think. The more the audience want some closure, the worse their reactions will be to this film.
Five Star Movie, No Star DVD. This is a review of the 1997 DVD release- thus far, as of September 2006, the only release I know of.Of all of the DVDs in my collection this has to be one of the most disappointing. Without going into minute detail of what makes the film brilliant- the classic score,  the hilarious comedy and Burton's twisted but brilliant vision- the quality of the film transfer to DVD is almost criminal. It probably wouldn't be noticed on television screens smaller than 27 inches, but on larger screens the picture becomes soft and grainy, devoid of detail and utterly perplexing, given that the movie was shot in the late 80's. The first thought that sprang to my mind when watching it was that it almost immediately reminded me of my time in elementary school before we switched to video tape- the transfer is reminiscent of an old, battered 8mm film reel. I own a S-VHS vcr, and I have seen better film transfers on video tape. Additionally, the extras... well, what extras? There are several paragraphs of "production notes" which are basically brief overviews of Danny Elfman and Tim Burton, but nothing you couldn't gleam from Wikipedia in three minutes.All that aside, I did pay $9 for it at Sam's Club, so the old axiom of getting what you pay for is truer than ever- but I expected so much more. If you're a Beetlejuice fan, wait for the inevitable Criterion Collection or Special Edition remaster.
"B" Movie; "D" Transfer to DVD. I bought this because I liked George Montgomery in a western, 'Cripple Creek,' shown on cable TV.  According to an online biography, he was a successful western and B-movie actor, went on to produce and direct some of his own films, including 'The Steel Claw,' and was Dinah Shore's original long-time husband.This action-adventure has a passable B-movie plot about a disabled marine on a one-man mission to rescue an officer in the early days of the Japanese invasion of the Phillipines, complete with several love interests and decent supporting character development.  While the low-budget production values are hard to overlook, the biggest problem is the poor quality of the transfer to DVD.  It looks as bad as many home movies.If you like this actor, marine corps or WWII stories, or just like to watch a character who never says die, then you could indulge in this bargain-priced DVD.  Just don't expect a classic
2 Stars For Poor Quality DVD. Great Movie. I have read in another review that the "John Wayne Collection" edition of this DVD is of poor picture quality. I have the "Collector's Eddition", and the picture quality is terrible on this one as well.This is a great movie, a classic. It was filmed beautifully in Ireland and deserves better then this. I hope the studio will one day give this outstanding movie the treatment it deserves
(*&^^$. unfortunatlly i got a dvd that dosnt work.... he lagnguge is not english and when i tried changing and choosing english lang. it dosnt repond... so am stuck with i
These DVDS are just the three Urban Legends - Just Put Together. It's just three Urban Legend Movies put together, so it's typicaly the same thing, and the same bonus features.URBAN LEGEND is a movie about those terrifying tales turning true as a college has a serial killer with those motives. 2/5URBAN LEGENDS: FINAL CUT is the movie that is the worst -- and I mean it, it really does suck. At a film school, a movie called Urban Legends is being made, and another serial killer comes slicing the crew members. 1/5URBAN LEGENDS: BLOODY MARY is different from the first two. It is a slasher flick, but with a ghost killing teenagers. 2/5So it's the same old thing. Three DVDS just put together. And I suggest you buy Urban Legends 1 and Urban Legends 3.
Throw out the zanies. The Hidden Fortress is classic Kurosawa, in every way--except for the wild overacting, inane characterizations and lamefooted humor of the peasant pair who form a central element of the film.  Had the peasants been just as grubby but more subdued, or given comic material with more edge, skewering the upper classes as well as themselves, or been less in the focus and operated far in the background, this wouldn't have been a problem.  But instead we're offered a sort of Dumb & Dumber, Beavis & Butthead of Japan, 50 years ago.  (And yes, I know that is anachronistic, but it's all too true.)  "Stupidity is funny" wears thin after a short while, and the comic antics are both repetitive and all too easy to forecast.  Oh, here comes a rocky upwards incline: let's watch the pair pull one another down with grotesque facial expressions as they try to scramble up, etc.Which is all too bad, because while the rest of the film has its overblown heroics, its far from bad.  The interactions between cast members has both tension and grit, while the outdoor settings mark a difference from the usual run of Japanese period films (though Kurosawa addicts like myself will well recall what he could do in Roshomon).  Mifune is over the top but splendid, and the direction has energy and focus.I've seen this film twice in 25 years; most recently, just last night, again.  Unfortunately, my initial impressions were only confirmed--and I wish they weren't
Not Pleased. I purchased the DVD based on reviews here.  I love Bluegrass music, but this movie was terrible.  It could have been made as a high scholl project.  Consists mostly of interviews with 3 or 4 musicians, very little complete music.  A good portion of the movie is Bill Monroe walking through an old house looking at nails in the wall, doors falling off the hinges and other such nonsense.  I can't understand why it received such good reviews
Did not work for me... I wasn't spiritually filled with this film like other Jesus' films have done for me.Started out ok but at the end it seemed that the director wanted to finish this movie as soon as possible.I think maybe this movie was made more with human reasoning than "spiritual" reasoning. I don't like the way Jesus was portrayed here, uncombed hair and sort of ripped old dress. I believe Jesus was poor but He had more "presence" when He came to this world in the flesh as being the Son of God.John the Baptist's character looks too old for the role, bearing in mind he was only months older than Jesus.Ok, I could let those details pass, but then, what is Mary Magdalene doing with the Apostles?...in the last supper?... She was one of Jesus' disciples but that doesn't mean she was following Jesus with the 12 Apostles.The Gospel of John doesn't mention if Magdalene was there with the Apostles during the last supper; however, Matthew (26:20) and Mark (14:17) DOES mention that; Jesus was there with 12 Apostles *only* so I don't see the *need* to include her at that private moment. This bothered me because this can make the assuming to some people that Magdalene could have been something "more" to Jesus which obviously she wasn't. Anyway, to me, she wasn't there as simple as that.Other than that, a good Jesus film if you focus on His teachings only but not the best film for me.Better films are Jesus of Nazareth, Greatest Story Ever Told, Passion of the Christ, The King of Kings.
Stick with Suspiria. I already knew before buying this movie that I wouldnt like it, atleast it comes with Phenomena wich is alot better IMO. Inferno is not one of Argento's best at all and doesent even deserve to be known as a sequel to Suspiria. I like all of his films espesially the gallio ones but this just doesent hold up to his other work. It does have all his imagination but not his style. Pick it up with Phenomena and maybe youll like it but I doubt it
Not an great adaptation. Although the film was entertaining, it was in no way an accurate adaptation of Alvarez's novel.  I'm very disappointed
Barbi Doll. I don't really like video collections.  Live music is so much more interesting.  The only exception I can think of to that rule is the video collection by Tom Petty, because he put out the most imaginative and well produced videos.I'd much rather see Shania actually singing and relating to an audience than lipping it to these recorded songs.  The only songs on this vid that are live are the last two, and one of them is the boring Rock This Country, one of her weakest songs, a sort of takeoff on Donnie and Marie's I'm A Little Bit Country, A Little Bit Rock and Roll.It's mostly all glitz and glitter.  It's mostly just seeing the latest outfit and makeup Shania is wearing.  That is superficial.  Let's have a real person instead.  I don't care about the outfits and the makeup.  Seeing her pretend to sing just doesn't cut it.  I've heard these exact versions of the songs plenty of times.  Come On Over is a fantastic album.She looks great, particularly in her Hawaiian look during the romantic You've Got A Way.  I love that song and I love her Hawaiian look. It's all so romantic.  I'm not wild about her look when she's wearing slacks or sweat pants.  It makes the bottom half of her look so ordinary and boring.  She looks so much better in something feminine.  Sporty Spice is not a turn on and is not romantic.If you want to turn it up a notch in your music videos, pick up somebody's live performance.  It's a whole different feeling.  Granted, some of them aren't the greatest, but when they are good, they are a lot better than this.  You actually see a real person on stage.  Not just Barbi Doll in her newest outfit and makeup
Sorry. This movie is so freakin stupid. Yes its funny...but so very dumb. Not good dumb; bad dumb. Terribly, painfully stupid. Funny at times. Best avoided or taken in small doses
Utterly predictable. This movie is cliche-ridden from start to finish. A young man from the shipyards gets into Annapolis at the last minute, is miserably ill-prepared, overcomes all obstacles, and pulls off a feat no plebe could ever hope to accomplish. All the stock characters are here--cold father; abusive commander; sympathetic, pretty junior officer; the guy who doesn't make it; the guy who tries to commit suicide when he fails; the bad plebe turned good guy. Plus, you see every twist and turn of the plot coming from a mile away. I thought it was a waste of time
Going through the motions. Jack is obviously not well. Ginger's kit sounds like an 80's pop band and Eric should just throw away that awful sounding Strat.Ok we can't have a replica I know.Eric's choice of notes is just not as good as it used to be. He was way more adventurous back in the day.No more of the lyrical phrasing, the calm excitement and melodies under extreme pressure. All gone and replaced with just going through the motions.I hope Jack and Ginger make a buck out of it. They certainly deserve it.The music died the day Clapton picked up a Stratocaster. He never really bonded with it.Anyway it looks like a lounge band playing covers. Very polite and laidback and nothing new to say
Inexplicably bad. What happened??. This movie is bad and it's the kind of bad that makes movie fans ask, "What in the world went wrong?"  You start with a Michael Crichton novel, add Barry Levinson, a cast featuring Sam Jackson, Sharon Stone, Peter Coyote and, yes, Dustin Hoffman...and you end up with an inexplicably bad product. The special effect look expensive...and bad.  The plot starts off ok, if somewhat formulaic and then just falls apart. Dustin Hoffman's performance, even, is laughable...something that just is never said of Dustin Hoffman. There just HAS to be a fascinating backstory to what went wrong and if someone would film the backstory, THAT would be a good movie, I'd bet
Ugly Movie. People who claim they "loved" this gratuitous violence and debauchery-filled movie need to get a life and learn what a great movie is.  There is nothing redeeming or "important" about this movie.  It's just ugly.
A Softcore Porn Children's Film?!. I admit it.  I only bought this movie for one reason: the lovely Phoebe Cates is topless in much of the movie.  (Okay, so make that two reasons.)  On this point, I was not disappointed.That said, I made the mistake of trying to watch this turkey of a movie from beginning to end.  I believe the makers of this movie were confused about who their target audience is.On one hand, the film contains a lot of nudity and sex.  On the other, the film features dumbed-down, bad dialogue and patently groan-worthy attempts at humor, the kind of humor that only 5 year old children would find amusing.  Really, the scenes with the monkeys were as childish as they were totally out-of-place in a softcore porn flick
Poor Little Rich Girl. I remember finding this film fascinating upon its first viewing by me, years ago in New York.  I was much younger then, and at that age, ones early demise always seems so glamorous. Now that I am older and wiser, I found this film, upon a recent re-viewing, only depressing and tragic. Though it is a supposed fictional tale about a former star of the &quot;in-crowd&quot;, it is for all purposes a docu-bio of its star, Edie Sedgwick. Edie was , for 15 minutes, Andy Warhol's brightest star. He was enamored of her beauty, patrician family roots, and moneyed glamour, she of his very name, and his offer to turn her into an instant superstar. Their collaboration was brief, and she burned out. Though she grew up in the most privileged of families, there was a horrid hidden life of incest, suicides, and betrayals. Her drug use became one long suicide attempt, until the inevitible event finally occured in 1971. This film is an almost obscene documentation of her demise. Though presented in a fictional setting, it's not very hard to see where Edie's character of &quot;Susan&quot; ends, and the real identity of Edie herself begins. Indeed, the flashback scenes are actual clips of Edie herself, mostly in her Warhol years. But as the film progresses, we see the real Edie  has turned into a monster, she literally seems to be mutating,, and it is sad to observe. Though beautiful, death is painted on her face, and her hesitent and incoherent ramblings are too real. Ultimately, one is very aware of the feeling of exploitation of a very troubled, damaged human being. That she died not long after its filming will surprise no one.  This film, though not a Warhol production, is filmed in the grainy style of his notorious underground films, resplendently amateurish. Though hauntingly presented and scored, it is ultimately a tragic record of wasted life, and very depressing. The creative energy spent by certain parties since her death was an attempt to take a short-cut to the legendary status of a Marilyn Monroe, but this has not happened. Edie has become just a sad footnote to a bygone time, and her handfull of movies, most of which have never and will never be seen by the mainstream, they were not worth the price she paid, though she was arguably doomed long before their making. I would recommend this film only as a fascinating one time view for those who are interested in that crazy time and The Warhol crowd, but anyone other than that will only be bored, perplexed, or saddened  by this tale of poor, lost Edie
The Most Biased Movie I've Watched in  Long Long Time. Whatever ills are in the world, it's all the fault of the corporations. That's the basic premise of this terribly misguided one-sided and totally non-objective movie. For example, instead of saying how terrible it is for companies paying people in the developing world peanuts for their work, they forget that these people's alternatives ARE EVEN WORSE and that's why they took that job in the first place!  These jobs provide them with one of the few options they have and, if they chose that job freely, it must be their BEST option, no matter how crazy it seems to us. As people's skills rise, as opportunities increase over time (by having MORE corporations and not less, to create more competition for these people's labor), and as the country becomes wealthier, these people's wages will rise automaticaly and in fact, the wages of the whole country on the average.  There are no shortcuts to his.  A famous story comes from Nepal where anti-child labor laws, at the urging of the UN, turned thousands of kids overnight into prostitutes as those jobs, as sad as it may be, were their best options to avoid starvation and feed their families.  It's a slow process, but all the industrialized nations went through that process.  Government-mandated "shortcuts" usually produce results which are even worse.  However, the results speak for themselves: in VERY short period of time, for example, HUNDRDS OF MILLIONS of people were lifted out of poverty in China, India and around the world thanks for the "evil" capalism & its corporations.  No other system has ever done it so quickly as in the past 15 years in China and India alone.  Also, cost of living is very low there, so these pennies really can go a long way, don't measure it to the cost of living in the West.  What is the filmmakers alternative they offer for these people? I guess to let people starve to death, then the makers of this movie don't have have anyting to complain about!?  Other examples of stupidity include showing that a company is like a person who's a psychopath.  A corpoartion is a legal entity yes, and may act like a separate "being" as far the law in concerned, but does a corporation have a nose, feet, stomach? Can it eat apples or sneeze or have arthritis? Of course, not, than how can you attach a human idea like a psychopath to it??  Several of the main "spokepersons" in the movie, Chomsky, Michael Moore, Rifkin and others are renowned for their off-the-wall comments which frequently have NO basis in any kind of economics or reality.  To correct the inaccuracies in the statements made by these and other people in the movie, you'd have to stop it every 5 minutes and explain to the audience how profoundly wrong the statements are.  Throughout the whole movie, you're basically bombarded by one-sided arguments with VERY little of the other side presented, despite the director's claim of the opposite 9they claim 1/2 & 1/2, it's more like 80%-20%).  Just look at Chomsky's comments about how the consumers are so stupid, they don't realize that all the things they buy they don't really need. I mean we don't need fashionable clothes (hey, let's all dress as boring as Chomsky!), DVD players, or any new gadgets that make life easier or more fun.  Who is the judge of what you REALLY need?  Chomsky, of course. He is the final arbiter of what you really need or what you don't. You're too stupid to know what you want, according to him. He says that you should do "more important things", like...perhaps studying lingistics (which he teaches but which very few care about).  The movie DOES make some correct and good observations, especially regarding polution, however, I'd say that 80% of the movie is factually and logically flawed. It's also FULL of economic fallacies. It's worth watching I guess, just to see how many errors one can make in just 1 movie.  Despite all the ranting in the movie, it fails to mention THE biggest reason of most of the problems it brings up - too much governement interference is every facet of life.  For examples, how could a Government of Brazil forbit the people of collecting rain water! How could the U.S. government do so many things for private companies with public funds?  Just forbid the governments from playing favorites with companies, forbid government corporate welfare of ANY kind, forbid subsidies to companies, cut the suffocating red tape and regulation (esp. in developing countries but in the West too), cut corporate taxes to 5 or 10% (and see unemployment rate go to almost nothing, give people all around the world a better life, increase competition, etc.)  If these and other governments (and not corporations') problems were eliminated, the vast majority of ALL the problems which the movie brings up will simply go away.  An interesing film for anyone to see how the truth can be twisted by mindless people with an agenda to go back to 15th century rural lifestile (spoken about with much admiration), people with NO understanding about economics, how the world really works and how to REALLY raise the billions out of poverty who this movie does the biggest disservice for.
Worst game ever!!!!. I wanted to start this off with a "do NOT buy this game". It is extremely boring and it looks like someone just designed it on their computer and just made a thousand copies of it to sell. Very bad production. This was a complete waste of my $12.99. I wouldn't even have purchased it if it was $1. That's how bad it is. There are different categories like wedding, Christmas, etc. And each category had about 8 different games in it. There's hardly any music and the multiple choice questions flash by on the screen. The questions are uninteresting. If you want an exciting game, try the Shout About Movies DVD games. I really like all the Shout About DVD game series.
Wrong Idea, Man.... needs to be like one joint man, not two. Ey, Chico.Like, Ummm... Cheech & Chong is da bomb, ok, essay.. but like a DVD will hold 4 hours of good quality sheet, bro.... so like, instead of them releasing it as like a double thing in a box set wiff 2 DVD's... they should like put the bong down long enough to like put both movies in the one disc, man.Like Up In Smoke does have like bonus stuff and a audio commentary, but it's cool man, both movies the like fit nicely, and the bonus would too, you know.. so like, ummm... I think it's cheaper to like buy them both seperate anyway, but like, if you dont have them both already, then like this might be like a 5 star buy, you know.Man, they need to put some thought into what there doing man, whatever they smokin' at Paramount is bad sheet, man... maybe I could like drop by and see them and explain why they should put both movies on one disc, or even a flip disc or something, then introduce them to my cousin who like can set them up with some good sheet, man. Then maybe they start doing something productive instead of re-issuing da left overs, man.Gotta go chase some fi-fi now, adios amigos, toke to you later, man.
I wanted to cry - not good tears. This was a HORRIBLE, annoying, obnoxious movie.  I will give Mandy Moore props for being a good actress but, Dianne Keaton's character got on my last nerve.  I kept thinking oh MY God can she be any less appealing.  If that were my mother I would throw my shoe at her.  I have never disliked a 'chic flick' until yesterday.  I went in thinking this would kind of be like Monster In Law but, I actually liked that movie.  I am just grateful that I only paid 4 bucks to see it during a matinee but, sorry that I lost 2 hours of my life.
What a shame. . . Standard disclaimer: I LOVE Dream Theater.However, this DVD is almost unbearable to watch due to all of the video effects that obscure the live performance. Didn't I buy a DVD of Dream Theater live so that I could see them play?? At times, several minutes pass without showing the musicians as they're playing.Video effects such as swirling colors, images of the artists upside down (?!?), and black and white re-enactments make the whole affair feel like someone was trying to create their first music video for MTV in 1984. Or maybe trying to induce an epileptic seizure in the viewer??Dream Theater would get a rating of 1000, but I'd give this DVD a 0 if I could. Just goes to show what poor editing gets you
Just sickening. Sure all the movies on there are great, and wow what a chance to get them all, but come on, this is absolutely sickening. The ultimate gift for the movie buff? With the list price of 4 grand, and the Amazon price at a grand and a half, it'd be cheaper to slap the movie buff who puts this on his xmas list. Seriously, there's no way anyone who buys this can say the economy's bad if they've got 1.5 thousand dollars to blow on something so meaningless. I'm for splitting that package up into about 4 or 5 sets, lower the price and viola! You're not a glutton for buying one of them at a time. Perhaps I'm the only one in this consumer day and age who doesn't find this to be a deal of the century, but rather one of the sickest displays of commercialism I've seen
Garbage. I cannot believe the black actor in this film is so sterotypical of the ghetto or uneducated image we've seen in films like "baby boy". Almost every line he had included a cuss word or n word. He didn't add a thing to the film except to be an annoyance. I don't know what this film was about. There are parts where there is a long silence with no talking. The whole movie was shot in the house with the exception of the maid when she finally leaves the house.There are a few scenes where the characters are running around  without any obvious aim. The film attempts to make the audience interested only to leave us saying, "what was all that excitement about?"
exit the freeway... This movie was loaned to Me, (Thank God I did'nt rent it) and is the biggest waste of a few hours of My life ever! The acting is so horrible it made Me cringe,and the cuts in the movie were done to where it seemed like it had been edited for tv.This is supposed to be a black comedy? It's NOT funny, and the so called violence in it made Me yawn, seriously, I've seen more gore on the Simpsons. There are so many things in the movie that are AMAZINGLY unbelievable, K. Sutherland walks for miles to a hospital with a bullet through His neck, head,and two in the back.R. Witherspoon overpowers Sutherland (For the second time) and strangles Him, pretty good for a 90 pound teenage girl huh?  But, I do think Everybody should watch this movie once so You can see what a movie should NOT be.(Besides, misery loves company
Draco would not approve of this. I am not someone who hates sequals. I absolutly hate the first Dragonheart it is a masterpiece. Great effects, great story, sad ending. It is a five star movie all the way. This is horible. First of all the effects are awful. Many dragon films form the 1960s looked better. Drake looks like a cartoon. The plot is worse then the effects. It involves finding a dragon egg. Where did he come from. The first said draco was the last one. Now this movie said he wasn't. THIS RUINS THE FIRST MOVIE. The acting stinks. I can't believe anyone over the age of 5 would like this... Watch the first Dragonheart
Boring. The music is good, but the movie is just boring.  Not much story either
and the point is???????. I just didn't get it. The movie was painfully boring. The only remotely redeeming aspect was some interesting cinematography.
Unpleasant Surprise. This guy is normally very funny.  I think I laughed maybe 3 times
Quiller Got Lost on the Way Home. The Quiller Memorandum takes place back during the cold war. It represented a time and place in history that was true at that time. It accurately depicts an era that is now gone, that some of us lived through.The movie, by today's standards, is a little disjointed and incomplete.It jumps to a conclusion but lacks story development how it got there. Some scenes must have been edited on the cutting room floor back in the 60's or 70's in order to get a G or GP rating. As a result of those incomplete or cut scenes, part of the movie makes no sense.  The movie would have been better served if it were produced closer to the author's original book.The most memorable part of the movie is the haunting score, including Matt Monroe's "Wednesday's Child".  I was disappointed in viewing this movie again some 20 or 30 years later. Perhaps Wolfe was right when he said that we can never go home again. Quiller must have gotten lost on his way home!
One step above truly hideous. I am a Jane Austen fan. I love Pride and Prejudice and there are three very good to marvelous adaptations of that great novel. However, Mansfield Park is Jane Austen's most complex and serious novel, and on the whole it is my favorite. Fanny Price is the most difficult of the Jane Austen heroines, not the wittiest or most beautiful, but the one who knows the difference between right and wrong. She is mentored by her uncle, the righteous and honorable [and I don't use the terms loosely] Sir Thomas Bertram. Somehow, the adaptation of this great novel has twisted Sir Thomas into a sadistic, sexual pervert. Moreover, Fanny is constantly babbling to us in Jane Austen quips that are not part of this novel. They simply missed the point of the book.The acting is okay. The settings are okay. The directing is sad. But the sense of disappointment and betrayal by perverting the essential theme of the book has left a very sour taste
The Sad Truth. It should be noted by any who would be willing to buy a DVD like this that George Alexander has no affiliation with Heiho Niten Ichi Ryu (the the fighting style of Miyamoto Musashi). I honestly cannot challenge the effectiveness of anything Alexander attempts to teach the viewer of this DVD, but I can challenge it's authenticity in regards to being the fighting style of Miyamoto Musashi
NO George........NO!. I rented the "original" Star Wars first, just to see if it was as bad as everyone says.  Good GOD!  It's horrible!  It looks only slightly better than video tape.  I read a lot of reviews stating that "this is what fans have ask for"...honestly, I didn't ask for this.  Nobody did.  Sure we all want the choice between the original Star Wars and the Special Edition, but I think George is doing nothing but slapping us fans in the face with this release. I despertly wanted the original movies in their original form, but not like this.  I think George is basically trying to get us to admit that his special edition is better....it's not.  The way it was presented on DVD is far superior, but in my opinion, George is taking away part of our childhood with the new stuff.  for example, they remastered Gone with the Wind and Casablanca, but did they ad new characters?  Change the songs to something more "current"?  Digitally enhance Atlanta burning? No....but they did do those transfer justice.  They look great, they sound great, and that makes for fun viewing.  This slop that George is handing us is NOT what we asked for....so George, I say to you...NO!  BAD!  If I had a rolled up newspaper, I smack you in the head with it and rub your nose this pile of....DVD's...to make sure you know better next time.  When these films get remastered again for HI-DEF, I'll buy...IF he gives us what WE want
Horrible. Unless you like watching a girl clean for two hours... then don't see this movie. Other than the beautiful scenery, nothing was explained, there was hardly any dialogue, there was barely a plot, so if you didn't read the book then forget about understanding the movie. It is a complete bore!! I usually don't give movies bad ratings, but this is THE worst movie I ever saw! However,the book was amazing. Read the book. DO NOT WATCH THE MOVIE.
For Die-Hard Jet Li fans only. AKA Shaolin Temple 3, this movie is a decent display of Jet Li's kung fu prowess. If the version being offered is by Telefilms International / Beverly Wilshire Filmworks - buyer beware!  The film is NOT widescreen (as it says it is), and the subtitles are cut off by the formatting.  If you are a Jet Li fan like me, you will enjoy the action sequences, though they are sparse.  Creative stances and good moves from Jet save them.  I recommend this film to die-hard Jet fans ONLY - kung fu purists will be very disappointed.  Jet Li picks up his role as the orphan raised by Shaolin, his sifu from the previous two films returns as well.  If you like Jet, and like the series, go for it.  Not Jet's best, not his worst, either.  Picture and sound quality is poor.  Directed by Lau Ka-leung
Guadalcanal Diary. This firm was advertized on Amazon as being in "color." A black and white version was delivered to me, even though I had inquired of Amazon if the film was actually "color" and Amazon had assured me that it was definitely color.  I knew the film was originally in black and white, but was swayed to buy the film in the belief, as marketed, that it had been colorized, which is what I was looking for.
Yawn,. Not being a Christian, I looked upon this documentary to give me some insight into what goes on behind closed doors. But what I received, especially in the first 5 minutes, was uproar and babble about what nerve the Christians had to be involved in politics.Give me a break. I am not an idiot. It is one thing to dislike religious fanatics, but it is another to insult my intelligence and tell me that they should not vote, nor get involved in politics in any way.I don't care if they are "at war" with our culture. America requires balance - two sides battling it out in the political area. America requires an army of ideas. Let the Christians come to the arena. Let the atheists come. Let both debate, even if they are radical kool-aid drinkers.The makers of this "film" are trying to guilt one side into shutting up, claiming they will be more "Jesus-like." For someone who hates Jesus, they sure know a lot about him.I can't tell you much about Jesus, but I can tell you that love does not require of you to bend over and surrender all that you value.This is a propaganda film, first and foremost
Boooooo. I not only say this honestly but literally; my 5 year old child used Nero and made a more interactive DVD
Gives peplum a bad name. Think of all the stereotypes one could conjure up about these Italian sword-and-sandal pictures, a good primer would be the Saturday Night Live sketch featuring Bill Murray as a chubby Hercules.  Awful dubbing, sets  draped in gaudy colors, and sluggish action sequences.  DAVID &amp; GOLIATH   has all these in spades, in the parlance of our time.  I could just see  the marquee now: &quot;A film so bad, it needed TWO directors!&quot;  Keep  in mind though that I'm actually a fan of the genre.  But this film is  utterly charmless and completely lacking in any energy and exuberance.   Sadly, Orson Welles personifies many of these traits in his somnabulent  performance as King Saul.  He spends what little screen time he has  shuffling around with a goblet of wine in hand and mumbles most of his  lines.  I know that he was doing this for the money so I just try to focus  my mind on all the great films he directed.  Ivo Payer plays a bland and  athletic-looking David, Kronos is an equally poor Goliath, slow and  ungainly.  Massimo Serato, who has a long list of villainous roles, plays  Saul's scheming advisor Abner with ease.  Not bad, but not too special  either.  Worse yet, this production wavers between solemn Biblical tale and  two-bit comic book action, and fails in both departments.  The original  story is dumbed down and robbed of much its complexity.  But I don't object  to that.  I'm not a stickler for faithful literary adaptations.  But DAVID  &amp; GOLIATH'S aforementioned lethargy accounts for its failure even as a  simple adventure flick.  Truly, this film was a David &amp; Goliath  struggle to get through
Okay. I agree with David Thomson when he says few audiences in the West would be content to view an American epic composed solely of battles and their contexts. Kurosawa was a keen businessman and his reputation in the West was entrenched with "Kagemusha" and "Ran", he knew what (American) audiences think of as heroic and mystical about "historical" Japan: Kurosawa's art takes a great deal on its impetus from what Americans (or Westerners) imagine about Japan. He was not popular in Japan (where they thought his stuff was particularly hokey and outmoded, hence the suicide attempt). I am not saying that the work is rubbish - there is no "ugly" shot in either "Ran" or "Kag" - merely that there are more "authentically Japanese" films out there to choose from.
Deceptive title. Two hours wasted when I could have had a root canal. The title of this movie is a tad deceptive- it and the soundtrack are the only thing disco related to this soap opera of a movie that carries a script worthy of a "Sex and the City" episode. There are some, albeit very few, interesting plot twists. But basically this movie is mostly worthy of a late night movie made by and for Cinemax. Pity too. I'm a huge Chloe Sevigny fan (and not for "Brown Bunny" reasons), but her talent is minimally utilized, as is that of her co-stars. I realize this movie is largely about recent college grads and their pretentious entrance into the real world, with the disco night life as a back drop. But their trials and tribulations have little to do with the disco life itself. "The Club," the flick's disco night life place to be, is merely what Central Perk was to the TV show friends- a gathering place to gossip about relatively juvenile adventures in love (or reasonable facsimiles of), and their recent and up to now short durations in the working world. The minimal glances into "The Club" itself is archetypal. Were it not for an admittedly clever twist that explains a lot of the behavior of that disco's employees earlier in the movie, the dialogue would be largely mundane, uninspired and testing of the viewers patience. The pay off isn't rewarding enough to rescue one from that experience. Kate Beckinsdale's character is the stereotyical pain in the [...], nose in her friends' business nuisance, and she plays that well. But an annoying character does not a good movie make. And for a movie of this title, the dance scenes are minimal in quantity and display. Were it not for a friend letting me borrow his copy, I wouldn't have even dropped a single dollar to rent this flick. To be fair, the soundtrack is outstanding and solely keeps one following the movie's events. But that's hardly a reason to waste a couple hours watching this film's paint dry. You could probably buy the soundtrack and have a more entertaining experience
Don't waste your money. Unless your almost dead this DVD is just too easy and is not really Yoga. I have an old Rodney Yee VHS 20 minute tape that was great for a quickie and thought this was the same in DVD. It is not
Pretty crappy movie. This movie felt long.  The special effects and filmwork were pretty bad.  The acting was even worse.  The voice-over actors were bad and the subtitles were generally too fast to read those and watch in Japanese.I'm a fan of this genre of movie usually and I thought this would be a good one - but this is one to pass on, especially considering how much it costs
Confused. I was very much disappointed with this album.I really didn't need to hear of all their problems in life.I did not purchase this album to hear them talk about themselves, I wanted to hear their music, which on this album there is very little. I am sending this album back to Amazon. Stay away if you are looking for music.
Great CD, but DVD is mix of bootleg & MTV Jackass. REALLY enjoyed their music, but godalmighty, the DVD stinks on ice.  2 disks - a DVD & a CD.  The DVD: A mix of MTV Jackass stunts by your favorite band members (vomit onna window, bottle rocket out of the mouth, etc.) mixed with Handicam footage shot from the back of the room.  CD is excellent, including the videos, but for what you get, WAY overpriced
Nothing Here for Adults. The best animated comedies are funny on two levels;  funny on the surface, for children, and funny at a deeper layer, for adults. "Shrek", for example,  was hilarious on both levels; fully for the littles, and hilarious even for us grownups.Alas, "Robots" has nothing for anyone over the age of, oh, eight. (Not having a young child handy, mine being away at college, I am unable to say how funny it might be for the littles.)DO NOT purchase this video expecting to be entertained yourself;  if you must, purchase this video and a book.  Your child can watch the movie, and you can read.
Good, but overrated. There are better Cary Grant movies out there to watch. This one is just about ok. The movie DVD is released by various companies. I had the BFC edition, and was not very thrilled by the print
Great Acting but unbelievable story line. This movie has such wonderful reviews from both professional critics and Amazon customers that I was expecting great things. While I agree the acting (especially the girls playing Christy and Ariel) is excellent the story is just too implausible and I got that impression from the minute we see the family crossing from Canada to the US (yes they are Irish but for some reason they have to sneak in to the US from Canada). Anyway why on earth would an apparently intelligent couple enter the US with their two kids illegally, without jobs or much money to settle in the most expensive city in the country?  I know the dad is an actor but couldn't he have settled the family in one of the less expensive boroughs and taken the subway in to Manhattan? The mom is a teacher but can't find a job but no wonder if they are in the country illegally. Yet there is money for private school, fixing up the dump of an apartment, an expensive camcorder, betting the rent money on an ET doll etc.  I can't imagine any parents moving in to an apartment building known as the "drug house" with two young girls and then letting the girls wander about as they please.  Mind you the parents are a couple supposedly almost crippled by the guilt they feel over a third child - a son - that has recently died.  I kept expecting someone to call Social Services.   And the medical situations with both Frankie and the mom and new baby are not well thought out or researched. The symbolism between Mateo, the new baby and Frankie is very heavy handed. Though the film is told through the oldest daughter's eyes  because of several scenes and elements the movie is not suited at all to children.  And there are also several scenes that are really not connected with the oldest daughter at all.   Maybe if I had taken it more as a fable I would have "gotten" this movie more but I was expecting a straight forward drama and was disappointed.
Weak Action..... As a fan of both Brigette Lin and Yuen Baio I jumped at the chance to buy this film.  I eagerly put it in.  The beginning was excellent, manic pacing and nice explosions.  A good sign, but I was dissapointed to find that the intro to the film is the best part of it.  The fighting scenes are directed very poorly, it's often hard to tell exactly what is going on.  You'll see two people jump in the air and some close ups, then one of the bodies will drop without a clue as to what happened.  The humor in the film works more often that not.  A few running gags made me chuckle (the Master who is always late, and Yuen always thinking women with hats are men) and the scene with Yuen getting piggy-backed works well.  The characters are a mixed bag.  Some are appropriately evil, yet some left me confused.  I was confused about the Fire Master, in some scenes he was a caring, merciful master to his pupils, yet in others he was as ruthless as the rest of the villains.  All in all, the film was dissapointing, the action is horrible.  Worth a rental, but do not make the mistake of purchase like I did
Disappointing - Would Love to See a Good Remake. This movie took most of the great songs from the stage play and dumped them.  For a theater lover this is heartbreaking.  What a disappointing story.  If a movie can be faithful to the theater version then this one is a class-A adulterer.  Even the ending was changed and not for the better.  The dubbing for the two leading ladies was also disappointing.  A pretty face is not enough
very bad and pretentious movie. the screenplay was so bad that almost drove me crazy. like watching a badly directed drama on the stage, that guy kept talking to himself, tried to convey those no-big-deal thoughts. those monologues should never put into a movie but on a theatre's stage. monroe was specially pretentious under the guidance of billy wilder who, at that time was very good, but now all of his works are so difficult to be absorbed as good movies. almost every scene looked like a scene grabbed from a broadway show, so pretentious and so shallow. if this was a musical i might be able to stand it better
Disappointed. For such a great actor, I expected to see his best films-not a collection of his so-so films. The movies are good, but it's a huge diappointment to true De Niro fans
Clearly no where near as good as "Suspiria"!!. Like many of you Argento fans, I had heard a lot about "Deep Red" and some people even considered it to be Argento's best work.  So, I just had to buy it.  However, after viewing the movie, I respectfully disagree with the opinion about "Deep Red" being Argento's best work.  While it is true that "Deep Red" is a bit more coherent with regard to plot development, the movie's atmosphere is no where near as effective as Argento's superior work in his true masterpiece named "Suspiria"."Deep Red" is about a pianist who observes part of a murder and becomes obsessed with figuring out the identity of the murder and the mystery behind the killings.  Unfortunately, the movie drags on and on, way too long to keep one's interest consistently with respect to a typical plot development with a beginning/introduction, rising action, climax and falling action.In "Deep Red", you have a murder in the beginning that is fairly impressive, but the subsequent murders, mystery and investigation by Marc Daly are not equally as impressive.  Unlike "Suspiria", the score and music that is utilized to create a chilling atmosphere and horror movie like theme is rather ineffective and I would argue that the movie that is played during the kills is more akin to the kind of music that is played during a trash pornographic film rather than a horror movie...the effect is damaging to the movie's ability to inspire a horror like theme within a sophisticated horror movie audience.There is a great deal of "much ado about nothing" in the body of this movie called "Deep Red".  For that reason, the movie is largely ineffective as a horror movie.  There are parts of the movie that are good and there is a kind of horror like atmosphere at times, but overall, the movie works more like a mystery and suspense thriller without the thrills necessary to make it work as such.Overall, the kills aren't that impressive (notwithstanding the first murder) really and as the movie drags on, the viewer becomes disinterested and frustrated at times.  The identity of the killer, while somewhat unexpected, is really a downer when one considers the prowess or lack thereof associated with this villain.  I agree with a previous reviewer that "Deep Red" is too long and drawn out...there are periods of time when nothing really happens and the result is a fairly dull movie.  While there are times when a horror movie like atmosphere could be argued to be present in this movie, it is nowhere near as effective as the horrifying atmosphere present in Argento's stylish "Suspiria".In short, I highly recommend the classic "Suspiria" as Argento's true horror masterpiece over that of the dull and often insipid "Deep Red".  To be honest, TWO STARS might be a bit generous for "Deep Red" as with regard to its merits as a horror movie.
A Poor Excuse For A DVD. Don't get me wrong. I LOVE the story. I've seen it in the cinema in the 80's and I still love it. But the issue why I gave low ratings is because of the DVD. This is the first time I've seen a DVD where the makers of it, puts watermark images of the company in various scene in the movie. Talk about advertising!Second, on the cover, it was written that the movie has undergone digital transfer. The only thing that I think, where the movie got it "digital transfer" is from a poor quality VHS tape to DVD. This is absurd! Even the soundtracks bear the quality of a bad tape recording.I've watch other Sonny Chiba's movies from the 80's in DVD format like Ninja Wars and GI Samurai aka Time Slip and both quality is what a DVD should be. This one is clearly an attempt to make a quick money at the fans of the man.The first 2 reviews, refers to other movies and not the one in question. To Amazon, please remove this item from your listing.
planet of the apes bluray. why ? because it has good sound dts hd 5.1 master lossless audio the picture quality will not blow you away it just seams flat and washed out and this just isnt a good movie i like tim burton and mark wahlberg but this movie was done wright the first tim
Too overrated. Now I'd actually give this movie 3.5 stars. But since so many people talk about being one of the greatest movies ever made I'm giving it a 1. The story was quite good in how it dealt with the American Dream and how a dysfunctional a family can be behind a seemingly perfect house. Kevin Spacey gave an excellent comedic performance as Lester Burnham, the one with the midlife crisis. Annette Benning's character Carolyne is Lester's obsessive-compulsive perfectionist wife who's role tells us the consequences of giving more importance to material things over family. But there were parts in the film which didn't make much sense. What's with Janie showing her breasts through the window at Ricky? How come Ricky stood naked in front of her during a conversation? There was no need for that. A girl her age especially would freak if a guy stood naked in front of her like that. But she seemed perfectly fine with it. Also Ricky's point about the plastic bag he filmed having beauty in how it freely danced in the wind is just another pathetic attempt at being artistic. This is apparently just another arthouse film that critics praise, making it seem better than it really is. Frankly it was also very dull and depressing.
What was the point?. I remember seeing this film as a kid and thinking to myself, maybe when I'm older I'll understand the signifigance of this movie. But 29 years later I'm even more confused as to why this film was made."King of Marvin Gardens" took me a record-breaking four sittings to watch because I kept falling asleep. Don't get me wrong. I appreciate a thoughtful, well-written, well-acted human interest story--but where was the human interest in this flick?? Why am I supposed to be interested in these characters?? Interesting characters don't have to be nice and heroic, but they certainly have to be compelling!I think after the tremendous success of "Five Easy Pieces" (deservedly so), that genre of anti-story must have been all the vogue in cinema during the mid-1970s. With the exception of the last 10 minutes you have an absolutely flatliner of a film here.  Movies of that period, like "Fat City" and "Scarecrow" do a much more effective job of conveying the dire banality of real life.Although the packaging and  presentation for the "King of Marvin Garden" DVD was flawless
2 1/2 stars - I'm sure it was more exciting in the early 70's. I guess I missed the point. I can see how this film could be considered a horror "classic". I'm sure the violence was ground breaking in 1972... in fact, one of the comments in the "making of" on this dvd was that teenagers were actually throwing up in the theatres. I don't think it's a well done film overall... it's lacking in story, music, direction, and suspense. The acting is not too bad, but could have been more intense and believable in some scenes. If I was craving some good 1970's horror, I'd rather watch "I Spit on Your Grave" or "The Texas Chainsaw Massacre"
I won't buy it... Someone just today told me I should see this film.What a disappointment to see these warnings of poor quality DVDs being produced by Fox Lorber.Oh well
Please, save your money!. This could possibly be the cheesiest movie I have ever seen (and I have seen a lot of movies!)  Do not waste your money on this low-budget, low-acting-ability, low-camera-experience movie.  I enjoy a good "gay movie" every now and then and this was not it.  Sorry to disappoint
Very Poor Quality DVD. Love the movie, but the quality of the DVD put out by Alpha Video was so bad it was very difficult to watch. The sound was scratchy and muffled and the picture looked as if the brightness was turned all the way up. If you don't want to be disappointed and feel like you've been ripped off, wait for the remastered cut before you buy this one
I knew there had to be something wrong with this DVD!. I received this DVD from my brother who is possibly a bigger Kevin Smith fan than I am. I thought the fact that he was  giving away his copy was pretty odd at the time until I watched the DVD myself.The Degrassi episodes are amazingly boring and Jay and Silent Bob's toned-down appearances don't help much. I really liked the original Degrassi series so I was disappointed by this DVD.There are some funny moments in the "Extras" section of the DVD but I would still only recommend this as a "rent" or something to buy used if you are a diehard fan.
dv that doesnt work. the dvd didn't work and returning it couldn't be more awkward so just cut my losses not happy in the slightes
Dissapointing. I love movies from the 70's. The Conversation, All the Presidents Men, The Parralax View to name just a few. I had not seen this movie and looked forward to watching it. Too bad it was not very good. The acting was o.k. (Travolta was very good) but the story had so many holes in it I had stopped caring what was happening halfway through. With the exception of John Travoltas character nobody else stuck out as being interesting at all. A few things that might have helped. A decent soundtrack. The music was terrible and did not make you feel the least bit of tension. It sounded almost out of place within the movie. Travolta driving like a madman through a parade without any regard for the people he almost killed and never gets in trouble, even jumping out of the ambulance. The movie ends and you never even know who was responsible for the murder to begin with
Typical Wackness. how in the World that Dave Chappelle blew up in the first place is a real mystery?? so now that he choked a 50 Million Dollar pay day away he got smart&knows He doesn't deserve half the attention he has gotten in the first place. this is a Insult to Wattstaxx. that documentary from 1973 was important this is just a mess.  the music Acts on here are lame as well. you want the Big Acts  of today not no Milk carton, Has-beens or non-hit having acts.  the only thing funny about this film is that it got made&was released. glad his corny show is no more. good riddence. this movie is equally bad as well.
A Horrible Waste of Money. This is the worst exercise DVD I've ever owned.  Not only are the moves incredibly difficult to follow as well as being useless in terms of physical benefits but the instructors do a piss poor job of communicating with the viewer.  They'll often change moves with little or no warning and make little effort to demonstrate the proper way to do said moves.  Unless you are a dancer and a mind reader this DVD is a complete waste of time.  I'm sorry I wasted my money
Mick Garris' "Chocolate" left a sour taste in my mouth. John Carpenter, Tobe Hooper, Dario Argento, Joe Dante, Don Coscarelli, Takashi Miike. These are but some of the powerhouse names in horror that were enlisted to direct episodes of "Masters of Horror", a 13-episode series that debuted last fall on the Showtime network. Comparisons to other TV horror anthologies such as Tales from the Crypt, Twilight Zone and Friday the 13th were inevitably made but "Masters" decidedly differs from those in several aspects as there is no host, no commercials and little trace of humor/camp. No, Masters of Horror is a no-holds barred hardcore horror anthology that gives full creative freedom to its directors, many of them names that have been known to not pull any punches whatsoever.What I particularly like about the show is that there is no guiding voice, or TV producer, telling the director how things should be. Each episode has the director's own personal stamp on it, to give us the feeling that "This is not a masters of horror episode, it's a Dario Argento movie, or a Takashi Miike movie, etc." The result of this creative freedom and unique concept is an anthology where every episode feels uniquely distinct from one another."Chocolate" is directed by the series creator himself, Mick Garris.  Garris said he got the idea to make this show at a horror-director's luncheon where he approached the directors with the idea and the rest, as we all know, is history.  Garris has made a name for himself within made-for-TV horror, in particular through his numerous Stephen King adaptations such as "Sleepwalkers", "The Stand", "The Shining (TV)", "Riding the Bullet" and more recently, "Desperation".Story:  A Chicago man (played by Henry Thomas) who creates artificial flavors for the food industry begins to experience the sensations of a female unknown to him through sight, sound, smell, touch.  Pretty soon he becomes obsessed with this female stranger who he's never met and goes to Vancouver to attempt to track her down.How ironic that the series creator's entry would be perhaps the most mediocre of the series.  First off, this doesn't feel like horror but more like a mediocre episode of The Outer Limits.  Not a terrible one, just a mediocre one.  It's presented to us as a weird character study yet I felt little emotional attachment to the character even as he stumbles through painfully awkward moments to watch such as when he spazzes out in bed next to a girl he brought home for the night and when his ex-wife and son stumble onto them.  Moments like this make this episode thoroughly unpleasant to watch (and I don't mean this in a good way, horror fans of the world).Worst of all, the story and its denouements make NO sense whatsoever.  What led to all this?  If it's somehow meant to be due to a workplace incident involving the chemicals he works with then how come his co-worker didn't catch it too?  Then we find out that the girl feels the same things he does, even though they're total strangers who live hundreds of miles apart and who've never met, now somehow psychically linked together?   Argh!!!  This story felt like it was written as a brainstorming experiment gone horribly wrong.So why bother watching "Chocolate"?  Well, there's plenty of hot chicks.  Who get semi-nude.  That's the only valid reason I can think of, from a male point of view.  Also, Masters of Horror completists such as myself will have to watch it, but that's it.  Everyone else should stay away.
Preview it before you show it. I bought this for my SciFi class.  We read Bram Stoker and the reward was supposed to be this film.  It was like giving kids liver for dinner then rewarding them with canned spinach.  Everyone was so disappointed.  I kept waiting for it to get better and it never did. The history of the film with the lawsuits is really interesting and the clips you've seen are wonderfully scary with brilliant make-up.  The problem is that there is a month's worth of boring between the good stuff.  Fast forward or the students who expect CGI will fall asleep if they stay in class that long.  Bela Lugosi is a much better bet.  For a silent, Metropolis is much more compelling even to those CG fans
Pearl Jams DVD collection (all 2 of them are a bore). Pearl Jam are more of a band of the 90s, and really they should of stayed their and done something else different because the last decent album they released was "Yield".Thats not to say "Binuaral" and  "Riot Act" are terrible albums its just the production on both of them is bad, Eddie Vedders singing is a bore and the songs just are'nt their, thats not to say you should not have them in your CD collection - hah!As for this laughable Pearl Jam at the garden DVD, well that just reinforced why Pearl Jam are a band of the 90s, and back then they were an energetic and proper enthusiastic live band.Since then it blatantly seems they have become slacker and boring, fatter and unexciting and older (which is no excuse) to be such a bore on the stage.You would never beleive how bad this band has disintergrated over the years.No passion whatsoever, they just look like they are their for the moeny - which of course is a huge shame
Slapstick & boring. Too slapstick, silly & boring.  I couldn't suffer through the first episode of this one
I wanted a different ending. When Hollywood finally chooses to make a movie about the struggles, it of course chooses to tell us that even though those nasty Prods have no problem killing our people in cold blood, obtaining the arms to fight back is wrong and must be stopped by Captain America aka Harrison Ford. Please spare me from this awful movie. Shades of Tom Clancy and the rest of the UK suck ups in Hollywood. How would they like it if Malibu was taken over by "gasp" republicans andresidency was limited to non-actors and they had to live in San Bernadino?
IT SUCKS, Part II. Sorry I couldn't come up with a better punchline, but this movie doesn't deserve any original thought or ideas.  Maybe its because there aren't any original ideas in this movie event.  National Lampoon used to mean funny, now its french for crapola.  Avoid this one at all costs!!!  Watch Caddyshack II, Airplane II, yes even Xanadu three times each before you pick this booger one
1 Star for the Flick, 5 for the Juggs. This movie was so low brow and low budget it was sad to watch.It was more of a movie about Asia's secret passions, take the first scene in the trailer, getting taken from behind by the black guy...gimme a break.The only thing and I mean the ONLY thing worth watching in this train wreck was the young woman toward the end with the HUGE breasts! I mean my mouth dropped at how sexy that woman was.For the rest of the film...I spit on the time I wasted fast forwarding to the nudity.Oops, I mean to the good parts.LUV MOMS
Terrible. I was expecting this to be a professional DVD like any normal band would put out, not a collection of bootlegs. Like everyone else, I agree, the DVD is terrible. The sound quality is horrible. The guys act like they're 12 years old. Its not worth buying unless you want a collection of miserable sounding bootlegs.
Pretty Bad Movie. Brokedown Palace is bad.  How bad is it?  It's pretty bad, man.Don't tell me I didn't warn you
Remix should be sold as such. Solar Flow is a fine dvd, but should not be marketed as something separate from Yoga Shakti.  There are no new sequences, just remixes of the Shakti sequences.  Since you can rearrange all the Shakti sequences on your own, Solar Flow is superfluous.  I don't feel a lot of shanti being swindled into purchasing the same thing twice.  A little disclosure please!-Rebecc
The Ten Bucks Back Coupon Is Expired! No Longer Being Offered! So It's Not Worth It!. The Mary Tyler Moore Show is a great classic sitcom but why buy this starter set that only has about four episodes from the first season when you can buy the complete first season DVD boxset and get these eipisodes and all the rest of the season one episodes? And don't give me any malarkey about it being worth it because you get 10 dollars back with the included coupon because that ten bucks back deal has long expired! Only people who like to waste money would buy this
Perhaps the Most Overrated Film Ever. I've seen this several times over the years and still can't make sense of why it's such a favorite. The acting is subpar, the drama cheesy and in my opinion as an active duty sailor, fails quite miserably to capture the true spirit of being in the Navy. To think that lunatic Tom Cruise practically built a career off of this garbage...sigh..
John Wayne, Walter Brennan, Ward Bond - how can it miss?. But it does.  Vera Ralson is part of the problem, she's pretty but bland in the role of Wayne's new bride who sweet-talks him in going to the title state so they can run a riverboat business, but the real weakness is the overall look of the film.  An overabundance of rear projection and rather obvious indoor/outdoor scenes gives this 'outer' a distint fake feeling.  Duke is amicable in the lead, Bond makes a sturdy villian, Brennan is fine doing his Gabby Hayes impersonation and the film has a rousing climax, but it never rises beyond it's B origin
Tedious, ham-fisted direction, groan-inducing dialog...simply awful. Antzcak's direction is inexplicable and the film is weighed down by a directionless, melodramatic script and technical shortcomings. The ADR (dialog overdubbing) is incompetent and terribly distracting, making the film sound like a radio drama recorded in a basement; all the more odd considering that in all other respects the project seems well-funded and professional -- great sets, superior costuming and impeccable lighting. The gorgeous cinematography is brutalized by a directorial style characterized by long, tedious dialog punctuated by frenetic, fast-cut flashback and dream sequences that contribute neither to our understanding of Chopin's character nor the events driving the plot forward. Non-sequiturs abound; Antzcak seems to have been attempting to create a mood piece to accompany the brilliant musical performances, rather than a sustained narrative. But the only moods sustained are bewilderment and boredom.Chopin comes off as a selfish boor of a prima dona; perhaps historically acurate, but hardly compelling on screen. What does it say about this movie that, in a crucial scene where a wagon carrying Chopin nearly topples over a precipice, you find yourself rooting for the precipice?Unlike the vastly superior Amedeus or the merely pedestrian Immortal Beloved, you learn nothing about the connection between the composer's life and his music. Antzack seems singularly uninterested in the historical signifigance of Chopin's acheivement, the nature of his talent's development, his freindship/rivalry with Liszt, or the musical environment of the day. Desire for Love actually has more in common with a film like Jules et Jim, in that it dwells on the inner dynamics of a doomed and disfunctional romance; unfortunately the characters aren't one tenth as compelling or sympathetic.Desire for Love ends with the composer's protracted death, like Amadeus and Immortal Beloved did with Mozart and Beethoven, respectively. But it fails to evoke the tragic mood of the latter two; the film itself seems infected by a consumptive, cinematic analog of the protagonist's malaise, eating itself from within and finally wheezing to a merciful termination
New directors!  Get to know 'em!. A collection of 3 short Japanese Horror films. Volume 1 DVD of a Region 1, 3-part series from Global Fright Cinema and Kadokawa Pictures.Meinichid. Tomoyuki Akashi40 min.A good-looking family of four approaches their new house and is met by a family friend (or maybe the real estate agent?). Everyone seems happy to be moving into the new house, which will be a welcome breathe of fresh air from the hectic Tokyo home they left. But the main reason seems to be for the benefit of one of the family's two daughter health. That daughter, Minako, had a complete breakdown after her boyfriend is killed, and seems to wonder through life in some sort of comatose, hazy daze. With a twisted grin. Her sister, Yukio (Asami Mizukawa; Dark Water, Shibuya Kaidan), begs her sister to go on with her life but the morose Minako is visited by the ghost of a young girl who used to live in that house. What stands out immediately, from the first images that appear, is the camerawork. Most of the shots are in frame, but the ones that aren't are badly out. The action and the actors are shot far too close also. That's not saying the video is poor, on the contrary, the definition is crystal clear; so much so that I felt as if I could reach right into the movie to grab a banister or push a door open. Those positive attributes aren't nearly enough to save this amateur escapade. I'll try not to mention that almost nothing is explained in this "episode" and only the most superficial motives are apparent. Combine that with lack-luster, cheesy special effects, and you have an almost entirely forgettable experience.Cruel Kidnappingd. Tomoyuki Akashi32 min.Laughably bad in every way. A dim-witted, bumbling, former big-shot money-man gets himself embroiled in a kidnapping plot that involves not only his own child, but the child of a well-to-do acquaintance. In order to get his baby back safely, he must come up with 30 million Yen (just over $250,000 US & $300,000 CAN). But his "brilliant", spur-of-the-moment strategy to find the funds puts him into a very bad position. The story is easy enough to follow, although it's barely worth doing so. A few comical scenes and takes from the Toshio character.Desire to Killd. Kenji Nakanishi33 minThe best of the three in this volume. It follows a middle-aged woman, Rei, who lives in a cramped apartment building. Her immediate next-door neighbor is constantly lording over the other tenants and poking her nose into their lives; seemingly waiting for the other tenants to do something "wrong" or hounding them inexplicably. One day, Rei refuses to throw out a bag of trash because her old, bitter neighbor is seen rifling through people trash. She wants to time the service pick-up just right so she can avoid the old lady's interest. Alone at home, (her husband is out of town on business), she grabs an umbrella and rushes into the stormy night to pitch her garbage and gets pushed back into the apartment by a dark stranger, no sooner had she opened the door. With just her sleeping son with her, she has to make it through a tense night with a young man who has killed once already that night. A fairly good "episode", all told, but suffers from the same level of tedium as the previous two "episodes". It's only redeeming element is the hint of a genuine story and a mild Twightlight Zone -ish ending.
Friday the 13th Part VII - The New Blood. Friday the 13th Part VII - The New Blood~ Terry Kiser is a terrible sequell in the seemingly endless friday the 13th franchise. The script is terrible and wastes the psychic spinn completely. The spinn with the psychic girl could have been done well but it is so shoddly executed that one wonders if this movie was done as a highschool project. The acting is downright awfull and the actors sound like they had like been to hollywood upstairs acting school. The music though is the worst schlock I have heard in a long time and is absolutely atrocious. I love the tacky and cheap looking 80's cloth, the even worst hair does and the cheap special effects that even looked cheap back when this movie was done. Then again this is the seventh movie in a series and to think that it would have a huge budet is delusional. Still it gets like 2 out of 5 stars. Recommended only for die hard friday the 13th fans otherwise avoid this less then stellar movie
Let 's sing....Getting Better... 1,2,3,...and I admit it's not gettin' better, it's not gettin' better, all the time (it can get more worse!)......if Sir Paul McCartney will keep Mark Haefeli to produce all his concert DVD, should be fired.I agree with all the bad reviews,the editing,the sound quality,it's really disappointing.Well,you can judge a book(DVD) on its cover this time! Means...-thumbs up is for Paul's concert performance. Very Good!-showing the back of Paul is for the DVD production.Whata shame!-and when you see the back cover...Paul seemingly would say..This DVD isn't totally OK....thing more,this dvd should be titled...Paul McCartney, bring Back (in the US) my Money!.. not a good one to have if you're a serious dvd concert collector.
Kevin Coughlan is spot on!. I'd write a review for this sewage, but Kevin did it so perfectly that I'd be wasting my time. The only decent one of these bunch of horrible adaptations was Silent Hill, and even that one lacked the greatness of the video game. And now, there's a Spyhunter movie coming out? WTF is next? Prince of Persia (...please don't do that one, I was only kidding!)?Get the video games for the real thing
One of the worst adaptations ever made. Sure there are other movies that have butchered their source material beyond recognition, but it's not even the butchering that's the problem. The problem comes when the director hits all the marks and completely misses the point of the book. Jan de Bont decided to take the atmospheric Haunting of Hill House and turn it into a carnival ride and give an easy explanation to the haunting. DePalma went and decided to tone down the racism in Bonfire of the Vanities. But those weird decisions to miss the point pale in comparison to Shlessinger's choice of turning a vicious novel into sentimental slop.From the opening sequence with the tinkling piano music to the ending with Faye sighing at Tod's stupid rose, this movie sets out to jerk tears and make the viewer feel bad. Even if there wasn't a great book to be killing, this would be a terrible movie. But with Day of the Locust as a source material, the awfulness of this movie borders on the criminal. One imagines the book done right by a Quentin Tarantino or a Todd Solondz.Where the book is fast, the movie is slow. Tod Hackett is supposed to be a fat cynical observer but Shlessinger decided to cast an anonymous pretty boy in his role. The casting choice is decidedly better with Donald Sutherland as Homer Simpson, but Sutherland is emoting way too much pain for the humor to come through. Every time you see him you want to kill yourself and his abuse at the hands of Faye goes on forever.The riot scene that ends the movie becomes a Night of the Living Dead ripoff and the whole thing just drags on. Furthermore, the key sequence of the book (Tod imitating the police sirens) gets lost and Tod just cries and gnashes his teeth or something.This is a terrible movie. The original book deserves much better
Unfortunate Edition. This particular DVD edition of Nosferatu is an excellent example of the importance of music in setting a film's mood.  I'm not sure when this "score" was "written", although it is far from effective in depicting the time period of the film.  Nor does it convey the proper mood in many points during the film.  With this edition's music, I got confused at times between what I saw and what I heard, and the whole thing became an unaffective joke after a while.  If you want an affective, edge-of-the-seat experience out of Nosferatu, I reccomend another edition.
So what?. This may be "how Mexico really is," but its not a good movie. After reading all the great reviews I was expecting much more. But like 21 Grams, it is just a movie about people you don't really care about because you don't get to know them well enough. You feel like a voyeur on other people's miserable lives and you never get inside their heads enough to really care. Its like watching a sit com, just splashed all over a big screen. There is too much violence without a point. The acting is good but the stories are blah, especially the middle one, and the themes are not developed very well. Its too much "film-making" without anough story. The style doesn't hook into the story and there is very little emotion generated. I simply didn't care, and I would never want to see it again.Y tu mama tambien is much, much better.
UNLESS YOU WANT BAD SERVICE AND THEN HARRASSMENT, DON'T BUY!. I bought a set of GGW videos a few months ago and I COMPLETELY regret it.  This is the worst purchasing experience I've ever had.  Many people have complained about the horrible customer service at GGW.  In my case, I paid extra on my order for speedy delivery.  The charge went against my credit card, so they got immediate payment from me.  My videos were supposed to have been delivered within a couple days, but it wound up taking a couple MONTHS instead!  And only after I complained did they finally deliver them.  But they still didn't reimburse me for the extra expense I had paid for the speedy delivery that never happened.  And if that isn't bad enough, for the last month these jerks have been calling me every day, several times a day.  I get calls at home, I get calls at work.  They called me three times just today.  This is harrassment!  I'm right now researching what my legal options are because their incessant phone calls are making me crazy.  Can you imagine having to explain unsolicited calls you're receiving at work from GGW?  Unless you want to go through the hell I'm being put through, do yourself a favor and please avoid these sorry jerks
What a rediculous pile of poo. You're kidding, right? The only good film in the trilogy is the origonal. How dare you try to continue the story of something that cannot be continued. The orgional was good enough. Leave it there. Just because you want money, don't ruin such wonderfull entertainment.I didn't even stay awake through all of the movie, it was so bad! I'd rather watch Barney with my 2-year-old
Carousel great, DVD skips. Of course Carousel is a classic, and the music endures, however, I was excited to view this DVD of Carousel with my daughter so she could audition for an upcoming summer stock production.  I was disappointed that the DVD stalls and gets hung up regularly. It was so frustrating to watch that we gave up.  This is the second time since Christmas that this has happened when purchasing a DVD thru Amazon.... After ordering the Star Wars 6-pack, Star Wars II was not watchable.  Does Amazon have any quality control behind the scenes????  Repackaging and returning it doesn't seem worth the expense....
all about the benjamins gets all about nothing after awhile. yeah, ok, Ice Cube is a bounty hunter and Mike Epps is a criminal who ends up teaming up with him to defeat the badguys,am I right on that...right. the story is great but not that great. so many holes and so many stupid supporting characters doesnt make up for the seemingly endless movie with a taste in your mouth that sits there and then makes your mouth all icky, thats what it was like for me folks. god I almost fell asleep at that photo shootout and then the other one where at the end with the boat and superlame climax. put some thought into your head as you are about to watch this. for Cube and Epps and Eva Mendes fans only. and if you wanna see an old lady in a raincoat like coat with a thong bikini on it, then this is the film for you
Great Acting but unbelievable story line. This movie has such wonderful reviews from both professional critics and Amazon customers that I was expecting great things. While I agree the acting (especially the girls playing Christy and Ariel) is excellent the story is just too implausible and I got that impression from the minute we see the family crossing from Canada to the US (yes they are Irish but for some reason they have to sneak in to the US from Canada). Anyway why on earth would an apparently intelligent couple enter the US with their two kids illegally, without jobs or much money to settle in the most expensive city in the country?  I know the dad is an actor but couldn't he have settled the family in one of the less expensive boroughs and taken the subway in to Manhattan? The mom is a teacher but can't find a job but no wonder if they are in the country illegally. Yet there is money for private school, fixing up the dump of an apartment, an expensive camcorder, betting the rent money on an ET doll etc.  I can't imagine any parents moving in to an apartment building known as the "drug house" with two young girls and then letting the girls wander about as they please.  Mind you the parents are a couple supposedly almost crippled by the guilt they feel over a third child - a son - that has recently died.  I kept expecting someone to call Social Services.   And the medical situations with both Frankie and the mom and new baby are not well thought out or researched. The symbolism between Mateo, the new baby and Frankie is very heavy handed. Though the film is told through the oldest daughter's eyes  because of several scenes and elements the movie is not suited at all to children.  And there are also several scenes that are really not connected with the oldest daughter at all.   Maybe if I had taken it more as a fable I would have "gotten" this movie more but I was expecting a straight forward drama and was disappointed.
Where is the old hunter Buldeo?. The best of Rudyard Kipling's Jungle Book stories took place in the man village because that's where Mowgli meets a superstitious old hunter named Buldeo.   Buldeo claims that the tiger Shere Khan is supernatural,  the ghost of a wicked old money lender.  When Mowgli says that Shere Khan is only a very disagreeable tiger Buldeo threatens to spank our young hero.When Buldeo learns that Mowgli has a vendetta with the tiger and a black panther as his personal body guard the old man tells the other villagers that Mowgli is a demon child who is able to turn himself from a boy to a wolf, and back to a boy at will.  This is great story telling.  But where is Buldeo?  He isn't in the movie at all!  It's like leaving the Wicked Witch out of the movie version of "The Wizard of Oz".On a side note, in the Kipling stories the black panther Bagheera has a secret so shameful he can tell no one but Mowgli.   Bagheera was born in a zoo, chained and keep in a cage for the amusement of men.  But rather than blame Mowgli for the cruelty he suffered in captivity Bagheera sees the boy as a kindred spirit.  They were both separated from their own kind at an early age.  Once we have that bit of information the relationship between the boy and the panther makes sense.   We are able to understand Bagheera's total devotion to the Mowgli.  But the movie never explains that.  I realize that the movie shouldn't follow the book completely.   But since the book was so much richer the movie seemed like a let down
Cold characters and bland plot make for a bad movie. I gave this movie an extra pity star only because I adore Woody Allen's work.  Otherwise this movie would have recieved only one star.  The problem with Another Woman is that the main character, Marion, is a shallow and boring person.  Her life is so dull that she has to listen in on sessions with a psychoanalyst and his analysands.  In the process, she learns that she is not as superior as she thinks she is, and has hurt people and pushed those that love her away.  In the process she learns that she is lonely and has been depressed for a while.  The plot is overly simple and the script at times is forced and trite.  The acting is often corny and pretentious.  Gene Hackman, a brilliant actor, does co-star in this movie but only has brief and often irrelevant scenes of dialog.I do not suggest you purchase or even rent this movie unless you want to be bored silly.  This movie is not in the same caliber as Interiors, which was brilliant and well acted.  In Interiors I actually cared about the characters and felt sorry for them and believed that they were having realistic life difficulties.  In Another woman I had almost no interest or pity for the selfish and mildly narcissistic main character.  The supporting cast often displayed selfish and childish behaviors too, therefore cheapening the already tedius and banal plot.  This is not typical of the usual highly intellectual Woody Allen movie, instead it is forced, rushed, and very simple.  I do not suggest you watch it.
The Star Wars Trilogy... NOT. These are not the original theatrical realeases. In addition to the changes made in the special edition versions of the films, American Cinematographer noted in their review of the DVD release that they had gone so far as to change the color-timing of the transfer so that the color scheme more closely resembled the more recent prequels. Though they are an impressive technical achievement, I'll be buying the academy award winning films that I saw when I was younger
Fellini's Rome --- A Commercial Collection of Stereotypes. There is a lot of traffic in Rome.Especially on the "raccordo annulare", where accidentsare also frequent.The traffic is noisy and dirty, especially when it rains.Romans swear when they drive and also when they don't.There are many American tourists in Rome,especially around the fountains in the piazzas,where they cluster and sing American songs.Italian men hit on women tourists, who resist their advances."Se vedi gente che lavora, allora non e` Roma".Romans do not work.No, some of them do, and, in fact, morning till night.But Rome is not what it used to be.Everybody knew each other and was polite,while now everybody is rushed and rude.Besides, the free love of today has substitutedthe brothels of yesterday.Yes, some of the brothels were chic, while others less so.Rome was bombed in the Second World War. In fact,bombing would sometimes interrupt a theatricalperformance. The public then proceeded to theshelter, where flirting and lovemaking would ensue.The Roman aristocracy is close to the Papal Court.They run parties together, even fashion shows.Cardinals complain that outsiders try to teach the Popehow to rule the Church.And, yes! Motoryclists can and do go around theColosseum, providing a tasteless final sequence.One leaves the cinema with a heavy sense of wasted time.Does Fellini really have nothing at all to sayabout the Eternal City? After all his years there?Nothing except thestandard collection of stereotypesabout Italians, stereotypes that occur in everyscurrilous joke, that are met on the pages of every trashy guide?It is true that there are a few nice sequences, especiallythe often mentioned one of the destruction of the frescoes.And then, the great Anna Magnani appears for about 10 seconds to tell Fellini she won't talk to him.That is perhaps also a scene worth watching.But the rest is commercial cinema."Vai a dormi', Federico".
Jennifer A. is a decent actress - but story line is sad. I would have given this film a slightly higher rating had it been filled with characters I admired or to whom I related. I mean, Aniston's character gets set up with a real jerk by one of her best friends (who knows this guy talks disrespectfully about women). Aniston, meanwhile, does a good job of playing a depressed, too-nice to people character who gets taken advantage of.Catherine Keener's marriage seems troubled because she is overly concerned with other people's feelings and her husband seems blase about them, including those of his wife's.It's sort of an okay character driven movie in terms of the acting, but the ending is not pieced together in a gratifying way...it sort of just leaves you there hanging with nothing concluded
Fatalism, responsibility, blame others, for one's own life... When I sit down in the theater to watch a film I start with a neutral rating of zero so that the movie itself can then take me up the star rating, or down.  I rate differently than most.  I do it, for my purposes, in a much better way.  Trust me.  You should try it. Start out neutral then be mutable.  Go up or down with your rating as the movie progresses.  At the end of the day you will come up with what is a personally more accurate composite rather than a final, less step-by-step derived method of judgment.  If only waiting until the end to state your case, much of your case cannot be stated. You will come up with a more accurate impression if the film is evaluated as you go. Very important also, is the type of rating.  Never limit yourself to the typical zero-to-five star confinement.  Always allow yourself a much more realistic range of from a minus ten stars, up to a plus ten stars, or at the very least, a negative five up ten to a plus five stars.  You will like it better, personally.  You know very well you have seen a movie where zero stars is simply not low enough.This movie:  I generally have a difficult time recovering up into the plus-star level on my movie score card rating, back into the positive rating category, when I consider the overall rating ultimately given, when in the first few minutes I am abused by a movie in the way this one burnt.  It is not a good sign, or indicator of good quality to come, when a deranged, icky creep in his underwear comes out of the bathroom in someone else's house, screeches, shoots the lead actor in the gut then commits suicide after blithering back into the bathroom.  It wasn't scary.  It wasn't a harbinger of great things to come.  It was just crude, offensive and a cheap way to get intellectually challenged viewers to want more. Right off the bat this is a gross, totally classless way to abuse a captive audience paying for, hopefully a well thought out storyline, artfully delivered.  The art of movie making was sacrificed in favor of a blood and guts in your face introduction.  Sitting with my wife I told her, within five minutes of the opening curtain, that B. Willis "was one of them."  She waited until near the end and asked me how I knew that so soon.  "Well, my first clue," I says, "was when he (Willis) was shot dead on his own bed by the underwear-guy with the concave chest during the offensive first scene, just before he splattered his own blood and brains all over the bathroom as far out into the bedroom as possible."  Think about it:  from that opening scene on Willis did not interact with anyone the way normal people interact, even if one stretches reality in order to conceive the acceptance. Subsequent interactions were not right and very obviously so.  Now, don't misunderstand.  I have seen many films that are filled with all kinds of gritty gore and head squashing.  This particular film was so low class in its attempt to shock the viewers that it was simply disgusting.Believe it or not, the classless opening is not the main reason upon which I rate this movie a minus nine stars.  The reason is this: The single most predominant cause of my disliking this film is philosophical in nature.  That is, I do not like any message that implies that we, ourselves, are not responsible for what affects our lives.  Everyone would love to get off easy for their own actions that have led to poor conditions within which they themselves find. Yielding the responsibility for our behavior, and course of our lives,  blaming our own individual predicaments on other forces, by us uncontrollable and subject to another force, or entity, is the biggest excuse for self produced bad circumstances that mankind has ever used, the most often used, that is.  Uneducated people, those that haven't been around, haven't traveled, are not well-read, do not see or hear or care to understand the world and their place in it, hoping to blame something else for their resultant condition, they eat this up.  It is too frightening for them to face their action's consequences so just love to excuse themselves from their own equation catalyzed by this type of tripe.  The completely erroneous idea that what will be will be or what will happen happens is rooted in certain, "Eastern Philosophies," based on the idea that man is inconsequential in his own environment and might just as well not try to improve his own conditions since what is gong to be will be no matter what.  The "Western Philosophy of Life", where what happens to us depends a great deal upon how hard we work at being and becoming what we want to be, is the main reason those cultures seeing the world and life and our place in it in that way, that are light years ahead of societies which have been around for thousands of years longer.  If water is not delivered by pipes directly into our homes then it was not meant to be, and why fight what is meant to be?  If sewage is not drained from our homes by pipes to be deposited in recycling plants then it is useless for us to change what is into what might be better since it is the way it is since what is, is. What results of this approach, if these views of life are taken as unalterable facts, is that no motivation exists to stop from lazily sitting and watching life go by being what it will be.  This film sends a message that other forces make puppets out of us, so our screw ups are not our blame. That's a bad way to approach life.     Bad.    Even if the premise of this film is accepted, the positive reasons for the sixth sense to exist at all were left on the cutting room floor.  The examples of the workings of the mechanism that might even slightly imply why things were OK to be the way the film portrayed were left out.  Go figure.  One could lie to himself with that assumption, albeit erroneous, if why what was the main theme of the movie had been even somewhat justified.
Silly disappointing kid movie. Colorado's San Juan Mountains from Durango to Silverton to Ouray is myfavorite place to vacation in the USA.  So when I saw the preview ofDurango Kids on another DVD, I decided to rent it on Netflix.  It isone of those movies where villains are cartoonish, and the kids, whilecute, outsmart all the stupid adults.  The first 30 minutes showed somenice locations in and around Durango, including the steam train (that'swhy I purchased a used copy) but then it goes into time travel to saveOuray from becoming a ghost town and the movie becomes a stupid bore,intended for young and undemanding children.  Don't bother unless youlove Durango as much as I do
All Show and No Go. Lovely expert dance choreography for the viewer to watch, but this video fails as an instructional tool. The styling tips in the introduction, such as how to ask and how to accept an invitation, are quite helpful. This is one of the few dance videos that I have viewed which addresses dancing etiquette. It is very annoying to have the man drag the woman into a closer dancing position when she has already set her distance for a social dance.The man's movements are shown with the male dancer facing the camera. Teresa Mason does a poor job of explaining the dance steps. The woman's movements are never broken down, and she supposedly simply does the opposite, but in watching the video, you can see that that is not true, especially for the turns.Running the video in slow motion does not help matters. Teresa Mason needs to give a clear step-by-step explanation; the male dancers should face away from the camera and slowly walk through the movements. Then the female dancer should walk through her part. The dancers should go through the steps together slowly once more, and then finally at normal speed.The video shows a variety of dancing styles, but trying to follow and learn even the most basic steps is an exercise in frustration.
Flat, Trite and Insipid Noir: Beware if You Like Ms. Garshon. SO, here again!  This is just another Columbia Tristar's straght-to-video film, which, if you know what I mean, a pretty bad sign.  However, if you see such names as Gena Gershon and Dwight Yoakam, you might hope this is something better than usual trashes.  Sorry, '3 Way' is as bad as you can imagine, utterly thrill-free modern noir, which has no sense of suspence.  And Gena Gershon's role is a very small one!The plot is based on one book of which title I forgot.  Anyway, it's about 'Lew' (Dominic Purcell), who happens to overhear the conversations about kidnap plans.  After identifying the would-be criminals, Lew thinks of intercepting all the money to himself.Then, we are told that Lew has a girlfriend named Rita (Joy Bryant), who may or may not be a reliable partner in their own crime.  This not-so-exciting story gets more complicated by one quiet-mannered man Herbert, who thinks of different plans of getting easy money from Lew, whose unfaithful wife, I almost forgot to tell you, was supposed dead, or killed, which was shown in the pre-credit scenes.Complicated, isn't it?  Or called it muddled if you like.  As this is a film noir, any complex plot can be excused as long as you get what you see in good noirs -- plots clever enough to be manipulating our (or the characters') minds, and convincing atomosphere.But you get none of them.  For the film is hopelessly flat.  When the character finds out the owner of a car by stumbling upon the same bumper sticker at a shop (really), you should start to worry.  When the 'good memories about the life with my wife' are expressed with flashbacks showing a man and a woman running on the beach, both smiling and hugging each other, you better push the fast-forward button.In addition to Purcell and Bryant, Ali Larter and Desmond Harrington appear, none of whom can save the mess.  And Ms. Gershon's role is so small that you might not notice that she is there.  And except Dwight Yoakam, who is a real professional and shows what a pro can do with cool, subdued performance, all the acting is what you can call blatantly mediocre, or simply bad.My advice: don't watch.  Don't even think about renting either
not received. I was charged for this item but never received it. I corrected my address but never got it. My other 2 movies came, though
Just shooting. Black Hawk Down hasn't got an interesting story on offer. When a bunch of marines is stranded in Mogadishu, Somalia all hell breaks loose as militants start attacking them. From there it is just angry men running and shooting. Although this is what you would expect from a war movie, Black Hawk Down remains way below average. I think this movie could have done better with some obvious main characters. Now you barely get a chance to start caring about what happens to the soldiers. Now you have so many qualified actors doing nothing but firing guns. As this movie was based on events that truly took place, probably Americans will appreciate Black Hawk Down a little more. (SARR)
Terrible!. I saw the MLP movie and then I got this and was shocked. The witches have the stupidest voices ever! The original voices were SO much better. Even I can do the voices from the REAL movie. Also, the animation has TOO MANY GLITCHES!!
Full Frontal Boring!. All you have to know about Avanti: 1972.  This is the old guard from the fifties trying to make a hip comedy about new sexual mores that looks less hip than the 1930's film, It happened One Night.  Billy Wilder and Jack Lemmon are of the forties and fifties sexual sensibilities.  This creates unintended grimacing from the actual sixties and seventies crowd.  "Hey, grandpa, that's frontal nudity." It's as embarrassing as spotting your parents in the shower.  Juliet Mills, cute, nice chest, but not exactly a role your father and younger sister would be proud of.Also, the jokes fall flat then and today.  It crawls to a pathetic conclusion.
IS THIS EVEN WORTH REVIEWING, OH YEAH, HALLE BERR'Y IN IT. There is 1 reason for you.  This is a movie about a guy who is a really crazy big-time bank robber who like to go out and hae gunfights in his snazzy car.Nothing works for me in this movie except hugh jackmon, and halle berry of course.  His character does have a lot of good backround elements about him.  But the way they use him and his family was just stupid, just like evrything else in the movie, except for halle berry.  I wish that this movie had it's finer points, well I guess there are 2 pretty good scenes with halle berry, one more pleasing than the other.  But the stunts were the stupidest thing.  You can tell what this movie was supposed to be about, halle berry,but besides that this is just a movie where a bus is being helicoptered all over the city.  I had heard about this when it came out and it didn't intrigue me at all, but then my friend told me that this is halle's berry best movie and I had to go see it.  So he wasn't lying, it is my favorite role that she has ever played, but the stunts and whole bank robbery thing was just retarded.I can't remember if I brought up halle berry in this review yet so I would like to take the oppurtunity right now to say I love you halle berry and just give me a call sometime
Simply unwatchable... Never could have guesse that this movie would be so bad. COuld not reach the end of it, a very rare occasion!! The dialogues are so ludicrous, characters and acting obnoxious, I can't, I repeat, I can't understand how Alyson Hannigan starred this piece of... Shame on me for being such a BUFFY fan and having the bad habit of renting / buying anything remotely related to the cast of BUFFY...
Very Disappointed. As an avid reader of Jane Austen, I was very dissappointed in the acting.  This film, however, was extremely accurate in sticking with the book.  But, I was so dissappointed with the casting and acting, that I could barely watch 20 minutes into the film.  I was very turned off by Lady Bertram's character.  In the book, she is portrayed as 'indolent' (lazy), but very sweet, but completely wrapped up in her own little world, of whatever will cost her any exertion, or interruption of her pointless habits (ugly needlework!).  In the film, however, the actress has her coming across as more insane than anything else!  Made me insane to watch it!! (I must say, however, that she would be a very hard character to play; but the actress who attempted it never even got close!).  The next bit of bad acting (or directing, probably), was Aunt Norris.  In the book, she is spiteful, harsh, and unfeeling in all of her dealings (words and actions) with Fanny.  However, in the movie, the actress smiles through every lecture with Fanny.  This totally does not portray the real harshness of Aunt Norris... they make her seem sweet but clueless in her dealings with Fanny.  Jane Austen never portrayed her as clueless with Fanny.  In other words, she is portrayed as way too nice in the movie... I think that takes out a lot of the punch of Jane Austen's story.  I also think that the casting for the Bertram girls was way off.  Maria, in the book, is portrayed as extremely pretty, even beautiful.  The Maria in the movie was plain enough to have easily played Julia, the younger and less pretty sister, or even to have played Fanny, who the book portrays as only attaining to average 'pretty' only once she is fully grown up. Don't bother watching this film... just read the book again, and wait for something better
Like to waste your time? Then you'll love this one. I saw this one in the theater after a friend of a friend convinced me to see it with him (he was seeing it for a second time.) After the first ten minutes, I wanted to leave. If you like formulaic and predictable movies that attempt to convince dumb American youth from small, hick towns that they actually have a future beyond their local Wal-Mart or becoming mince-meat in Iraq, then this movie is for you!  However, if you like movies that actually challenge you to think, don't waste your time with this one
Comic Fluff For The Kiddies. Films based on comic books are a bit of a mixed bag.  While never my favorite genre, the stakes have been raised in recent years.  With sophisticated outings such as "Batman Begins", "X-Men 2", and "Spiderman 2" and "Superman Returns", it seems that we've ushered in an age of comic book adaptations as art.  These films surprised me and entertained me (as any movie should), but also utilized real drama, intelligence and adult sensibilities--often with great performances and smart, logical scripts.  Even graphic novels have become a popular source for serious minded films.So "The Fantastic Four" is a throwback.  Far from sophisticated, it plays as a live action cartoon.  That might be OK, but the more pressing problem is that it's not particularly fun either.  I know a lot of people feel that "The Incredibles" borrowed heavily from "The Fantastic Four" concept, and maybe so.  But at least on film "The Incredibles" was rousing entertainment.  Maybe the film "Fantastic Four" should have taken that cue.I won't blame the actors.  I actually like many of them (in other roles).  It's a lackluster, sloppy script.  The filmmakers never really cared about this subject and it shows.  First and foremost, they wanted a commercial film to play to a mass audience--kiddies included.  And I can imagine small children getting a few chuckles from The Human Torch and The Thing.  Their interactions, after all, are the equivalent of junior high taunting.  But it's just not funny enough, the effects aren't original enough, and it sure lacks a brain.  Put the small kids in front of it--it's harmless enough, but you probably don't want to invest your time with "The Fantastic Four".
A B-movie with a little more substance. Michael Moriarity is my hero! He is just one of the coolest actors in my opinion. He has done such great B-movies as this, Q, and It's Alive 3: Island of the Alive. How awesome is he?? Anyways, I think that this movie was hilarious! I think a lot of people take this movie too seriously, thinking that it is going to be your typical movie. But you shouldn't because not only is this a B-movie, but IT IS supposed to be funny. My favorite part is when "the stuff" started bubbeling out of the ground and that old hick guy just starts eating it. Who would do that?? I just started laughing by butt off when that happened. So if you watch this movie, just sit back and enjoy it for what it's worth, don't be too critical on it.What I learned from The Stuff: Dairy products are evil! Especially if they come from with in the earth!If you like The Stuff, I recommend: Watching other B-movies, such as Island of the Alive 3, Zombi 3 and 4, etc
Wanna Sleep?  Watch Robot Monster  by Phil Tucker!. My wife complains about falling asleep mid-way throughmy favorite TV Series 'Voyage to the Bottom of the Sea'.Either it was carb overload from 4 hotdogs for dinner, butRobot Monster by Phil Tucker had me stumbling and writhing in more pain in my couch than my 2 herniated discsjust to stay awake and at least get my money's worthsince it was a NetFlix rental.Its all true; the dialog was corny and special effects as valuable as the U.S. dollar after depreciation since 2000.The highlights were 'Does Ro-Man want a date with Alice?' andthe camera focusing on how to solder a radio set to communicatewith the leader of Ro-Man.But don't take my word.  Be like me and see for yourself justhow really bad this movie is.  You wonder if this movie was madeby idiots trying to pass for amateurs
Sweet nonesense..... Perhaps the most absurd horror film, next to Cabin fever, I have ever had the misfortune of viewing. From a technical point of view this film was terrible and amateur at best. For example in many scenes the lighting was too dark and shadowy. The acting was futile and the script was clearly written by a person who couldn't sell a novel for free. This bad script was topped off with some really poor sound editing which certainly didn't contribute to this already lousy movie. The entire movie was abound with horror cliches which made the movie very dull and easy to figure out what would happen next. There is no suspense in this trashy movie other then the fact that the viewer is wondering how much worse this movie could get. Much more if you continue down this dead end road folks! The death scenes are not worth mentioning to be quite honest. The premise of this movie is entirely laughable and inexcusable .  This was not a scary movie at all and at times I questioned whether this movie belonged in the comedy section, or in a video store at all. Please do not bother with this movie because you will  have lost about an hour and a half of your time that could have been better spent doing something worth-while. The other reviewers who gave this movie such high ratings are either lying or have this movie confused with another
What a stupid movie. I really thought this was pretty lame movie, and in NO way a comparrison to Reservoir Dogs or Pulp Fiction the way one reviewer described.  The attempt is to tell a story about some kid, played by Stephen Dorff, who becomes a pop-culture icon because he was held hostage and apparently didn't care.  At least thats what I got out of it.  I think what turned me off the most about this movie was Dorff's character--an "uber-cool" rebel type who's mean to his apparently oppresive father and cry-baby of a mother, slam dances and tears up his room (I guess to prove to us how cool he is), and who can get in front of an audience of high school kids and proudly cuss for no other reason then he'll know it'll get laughs.  In real life someone like that would be considered a slacker or an (...), but for the case of this movie I guess he's cool.  Anyway, my problems with the character aside, this movie just wasn't that good to begin with.  A REALLY weak script, and I swear each of these leading actors could have, and have done, about ten times better since, so I wonder why the only put in half the effort for this one.  Maybe they knew it wasn't going anywhere and needed the paycheck.  As cool and revolutionary it tries to be, S.F.W. doesn't really do anything all that spectacular. The gun battle at the end with the terrorists, as well as the movie's protrayal of the media are the best (and really only good) things about this movie.  But, most of you kiddies out there will probably like it because it has people cussing and drinking beer.  But that's just my opinion, I could be wrong
Hang me from my neck until I'm dead... If I ever:a) subject myself to this movie ever againorb) subject anyone else (including animals) to this movieForm a mob and follow through with my wish in the title of this review.Just one question that still haunts me...How does Travolta's career survive this debacle and Pepper's hits the tank?
Melvin should have another serving of paste. Directors, actors, and all others associated with the film industry make a real effort to be cerebral.  It's understandable, as it's a worthy goal.  99.5% of them fail - perhaps it's a lack of education, maybe it's poor upbringing that has reinforced self-absorption, and it could be that the superficiality which makes them such a good fit in Hollywood directly leads to this end.  The only redeeming quality of the film is that it exposes human foibles (and this is not a new concept - it's typically an element of every movie).  It seems that movies these days fall on either end of two extremes: telling stories of people who unrealistically do the right thing, or blathering of shallow morons who are poor subjects of empathy.  This falls into the latter category.  I want that hour and a half of my life back for a more worthy endeavor such as playing target practice into a trash can with a staple gun.
It's alright. I like that you can customize your workout or use a pre programed one. There is the option of only having music and no talking which is nice. The cardio segments are about 13 minutes each and the toning segments are about 5. There is a total toning segment and it is about 10 minutes. The cardio didn't get my heart beat elevated like some other dvds I have. The toning segments had good exercises, but my muscles didn't feel tired after doing them. I think this dvd is geared more towards beginners
don't be &quot;con&quot; vinced into watching this. To be honest with you I thought the movie was really bad. the acting was ok but the only good part about the movie was that ricky (Rodney Eastman) was in the movie. (for about 5 mins) but i would not suggest renting this movie and waisting 4 dollars
Shame on the band for putting this out. Undoubtedly the worst 'Best Of' DVD ever made, even if someone gives this DVD as a gift you should punch that person in the face...after watching this DVD I felt like burning down the company that made this DVD . If you want to play a practical joke on someone then might as well give this DVD to him as a gift.There might be emotional reasons why there were some positive reviews of this horror, but it can't be for the actual DVD. There aren't words to describe how bad it looks and sounds. Shame on the band for putting this out. Obviously all them cares about is getting the money and run with a 'Best Of' on DVD.This item should be removed from the shelves for poor quality in picture. My taped videos on VHS from MTV and VH1 sound and look better than these ones, really. This essay in amatuerism may have some interest.For worse, is unforgivable is not including the whole video stuff from 90's to 2000. 'Love Is Blindness', 'Walk On', 'Elevation' and several alternative videos were edited out. Didn't they have another filmed version of 'Gone'?. Mexico City 1997 was just a below average performance. Shame on U2 for keep going with 'Gone' from that bad shaped Bono's rough night. I still dont understand why we must to keep watching the same footage for a particular song. Im talking about 'Until The End Of The World'. In case you dont know, THERES an actual video clip from that song. Rather, they just put the well known Sidney 1993 version here.Rumors say they're going to release a DVD Boxset by late this year. I really don't want 'remastered' versions of shows we've been watching for even 22 years. Rather, I'm fond of watching previously unreleased footage.Just in case, here's a list of several unreleased PRO-SHOT filmed concerts from early 80's to Pop Mart Tour (I didn't include Elevation because there're 2 DVD's out there from the same Tour). Cheers1- Belfast 23-01-1981 (AWESOME CONCERT!)2- Berlin 04-11-1981 (Great Goncert)3- New York 22-11-1981 (Good Concert)4- Hattem 14-05-1982 (AWESOME CONCERT!)5- Roskilde 02-07-1982 (AWESOME CONCERT!)6- Devore 03-05-1983 (Great Concert)7- St. Goarshausen 20-08-1983 (AWESOME CONCERT!)8- Dortmund 21-11-1984 (AWESOME CONCERT!)9- Montreal 27-03-1985 (Great Concert)10-Los Angeles 18-11-1987 (AWESOME CONCERT!)11-Dublin 31-12-1989 (AWESOME CONCERT!)12-Stockholm 11-06-1992 (AWESOME CONCERT!)13-Washington 16-08-1992 (Great Concert)14-Anaheim 14-11-1992 (AWESOME CONCERT!)15-Dublin 28-08-1993 (AWESOME CONCERT!)16-Adelaide 16-11-1993 (Great Concert)17-Rotterdam 18-07-1997 (AWESOME CONCERT!)18-Sao Baulo 31-01-1998 (Great Concert)19-Santiago 11-02-1998 (AWESOME CONCERT!)What the hell are U2 waiting for?
For Preverbal Babies?. As a counselor for families with young babies, I have had the opportunity to review a number of language programs (both sign and verbal) for preverbal babies and babies who are just beginning to verbalize.As with Baby Wordsworth the production quality of this DVD is excellent, however the words and signs presented are not appropriate for either preverbal babies who are trying to communicate basic wants and needs or toddlers who are beginning to speak. Instead of offering words and signs such as eat, drink, milk, more, mommy, daddy, baby etc. - this program presents bank, florist, bakery, etc.  Not only is the choice of words and signs questionable but the visual distinctions between scenes such as cafe, restaurant, and market is difficult for a baby to understand.The format is also geared towards older children.  Five words and signs are presented in rapid succession and then extended scenes for each word are shown.  Then the same five words and signs are offered again by a child of four years or older.  In addition, the signs themselves are difficult for young babies as most of the signs are combinations of more than one sign such as "ice cream" plus "store."There are no babies signing or speaking in this production and no tutorial for parents of hearing babies who are teaching their babies to use sign language.  I recommend the "My Baby Can Talk" series to teach either sign language or first spoken words to babies
This Collection STUNK!!!. I am more of a big Cow and Chicken fan and was horrified that it came with an episode where something bad happened to Chicken. I am even more horrified that there won't be anymore DVDs with Cow and Chicken. If you like Chicken from the show, DO NOT GET THIS DVD!
The legend reworked... To be fair, the legends of Herakles, as they were originally written, have little to do with this movie, but maybe that's for the best.  Having grown up on Superman, Batman and the Justice League, I have a hard time calling a person like Herakles a hero.  In the original legends, he was a warrior, but also a brute who eventually wound up killing his wife and children in a fit of rage.  He also wasn't, as far as I can tell, as strong as in this version.Therefore, interpretations of Herakles are, I think, to be judged not on whether or not they deviate from the legend, but on where and why.Disney has attempted to take Herakles (or Hercules, in the Roman) and make it a story about a true hero, and a perfect one at that.  There's nothing I like more than perfect heroes.  They inspire me.  Conceptually, I like the idea.Instead of Herakles being the illegitimate son of Zeus and a mortal woman, he's conceived in love by Zeus and Hera and turned mortal by a potion.  Not bad.  As changes go, it works better than most.Herc meets Meg at the beginning of his hero carreer and falls instantly in love with her and she with him (another deviation from the legend, and a very good improvement.)  Of course, because Hera is his mother in this version, she can't be Herc's enemy, so they make his opponent Hades; lord of the dead, which could be worse, as changes go.  I've never seen Hades as being all that bad of a guy, but that's how it goes.  Then there's the Hydra, which is, if anything, much larger and more powerful than it was originally, so that's good too.  Aside from this, however, I have to say I was disappointed with most of the changes.The titans, to start with, were underplayed considerably.  It might have been premature to mention that they were Zeus' predecessors, but they could at least have given them powers similar to what they actually had, and a roughly-similar appearance.  Oceanus, for example, lashing out with blasts of water from his hands like a fire hose, or Cronos reversing the movements of his olympian enemies would have made for an excellent action sequence, particularly since Hercules didn't beat the titans alone in the original stories, nor does it make sense that he should in this one (grabbing a whirlwind?  Come ON now.)I actually didn't mind Hades' used-car-salesman demeanor all that much, though I didn't see a reason why he should have flame-based powers when that's clearly Apollo's territory.  Further, I thought most of the Gods and Muses were given no credit at all in terms of their innately glorious nature.Why is this the case?  I think Disney made the mistake, in this film, of not just trying to make the legends clean, but FUN as well, and there's nothing fun about war.  I'm not saying they couldn't have made the concept work.  In fact, I'm saying they could have made it work if they'd toned down the comedy and given the characters a bit of respect (Justice League style.)Still, for what it's worth, this is one of the few movies left in the world that isn't afraid to dwell on the concept of a hero, and for that it's worth at least one viewing.  Rent it from your local video store, in my opinion, before you make your decision
The Master of Disguise experience... Can be easily captured without buying the DVD.Firstly, rip up $13.Then, beat yourself over the head with a hammer until your brains are coming out of your nose. Then, have Dana Carvey spit on you.Finally, shoot yourself in the stomach.This movie is not funny, entertaining. It does not even have a remotely interesting story. As some of the other reveiwers have said, this movie has the same terrible joke, repeated throughout the whole movie.Avoid this one like the plague
Large disappointment. Showgirl is mistakenly taken to Paris to perform for diplomatic relations, accompanied by Bolger. Wanna guess the ending? Everything from the songs to the plot are unconvincing and so very predictable. Not to be seen twice
A movie on Castellano, how boring. I love Chazz P. and I can see why he would want to give the other side of the Castellano epic, but man is this movie boring.  Castellano has to be one of the most uninvolved mobsters ever to take the reins of a crime family.  If you know the history of this guy, than you should agree, and if you don't, read some books about him.  As powerful as he was, he sure didn't know much about running a crime family as did his predecessors, which this film doesn't portray.  The film also has terrible actors portraying both Sammy the Bull and John Gotti.  An insult at that.  If you like mafia movies and don't care about the history of its real-life characters than by all means watch it.  If you do, skip it, you'd be better off reading a book
"Is That All There Is?". I generally admire Jennifer Aniston's work so I picked this up when the video store offered a second rental free with the purchase of two bags of popcorn.  Sadly, watching the popcorn pop was more interesting than the movie.  If you went to sleep after the first 10 minutes, you would't miss much since nothing really happens.  If it's a comedy, it isn't funny. If it's a slice of life, the lives are deadly dull.  The emotional level is so low-key you suspect the entire group is on valium.  Jenifer Aniston especially, seems to have phoned this one in.Real characters?  As it happens, I've known thousands of real people over the years and not a one bears the slightest resemblance to any of these sad-sack characters.  If they're actually representative of real Americans then we're in big trouble!  My wife & I had the same reaction at the end of this one ..... "THAT"S IT??!!"
What Happened to That Golden Eye?. When "Reflections in a Golden Eye" was first released theatrically, the film was color tinted or filtered so that virtually everything was a golden sepia tint, with the exception of objects that were red or pink, such as Liz Taylor's lips or a sash on her dress. Apparently that didn't sit well with audiences, because the film was later re-released in a regular color print (just as the Liz Taylor film by Joseph Losey, "Secret Ceremony," was ruined when they re-edited it with additional sequences and a narrative voice-over track for dim-witted viewers). None of the reviews or promotional material that I've read addresses this issue. The DVD release could have been an opportunity to present the film in both versions, the original sepia tint and the conventional Technicolor, but apparently no one felt it was worth it to observe the director's original intentions. A wasted opportunity
A slap in the face to any Jules Verne fan!. I have to be honest I only watched the first ten minutes of this hunk of junk.  I ussually will soldier through a movie if I have put my money into it, but I could not watch this.  It's the first movie I've ever seen that truly does blow harder than water shooting out of a whales blow hole
A Pleasant Scott Western That Could Have Been More. Any Western boasting the likes of Randolph Scott, Ernest Borgnine, and Lee Marvin should be an all-time great, but Stranger Wore A Gun proves that his films with Budd Boetticher were far superior to most of his films, and makes you wonder what Scott's Boetticher films would have been like if he'd had such great co-stars as he did in this film.Scott plays a former Confederate spy who joins with an old war colleague to stage a gold robbery in Arizona. Scott changes his mind, and tries to stop the robbery. George Macready, playing the bad guy, is his usual despicable self, and Marvin and Borgnine are solid as usual as two of Macready's gang.One of the problems with this film is that it was filmed for 3D, which is obnoxious and distracting, as objects and people point toward the screen for an effect which is no longer viable. The dialogue is also not as cleverly pointed as it was in Scott's better films.Stranger Wore A Gun is not a bad film, but not in Scott's top five best Westerns, and possibly not even his top ten
The cover looks familiar???. Even though the show is on a downfall, hoping to end soon, the cover looks vaguelly familiar. Oh, yes. It looks like Friends. Not only is one of the worst shows trying to look like one of the best shows, it doesn't help to copy artwork from the cover of a friends season DVD set
No thank you. I found Yi Yi to be a tedious film, at times the action and characters felt quite contrived and cliched. The subtitles were poorly highlighted and I often could not figure out who was speaking the line. The only refreshing thing in the movie was the final scene at the grandmother's funeral, but it was not worth a three hour wait to get to this poigant scene. Do yourself a favor, and skip this one
SEASON FOR THE ORIGINAL B&B FANS!!. I'm not a mainstream Beavis & Butthead fan...the fans that jumped on the bandwagon when they became popular.  I was there from the beginning.  Where the hell is FROG BASEBALL and BURGER WORLD.  I want to see BURGER WARS!!!!  There was a time when Beavis didn't even talk he just laughed (heh, heh, heh).  Fire....Fire!!!  I want Season 1,2,3.  Just release them as Seasons....let us be the judge of what is good and what sucks.  I want full episodes with videos included.  EVERY TV SHOW IS LIKE THIS ON DVD.  Why is this one different?!  DEMAND FULL EPISODES AND FULL SEASONS!!!
Phewww....Awful!. I see that Freeman & Hackman are executive producers on this stinker.Just reaffirms, I guess, that actors are not the best judges of goodmaterial for themselves. The truth in spades in this case.I think, as I'm sure millions do, that Freeman & Hackman are the verybest around, but I've never seen them work with such stiff, stiltedpathetically sensationalistic material. On top of which Hackman isterribly miscast & comes off shrill & artificial in a part that wouldhave been a natural for someone like Ben Kingsley.Why oh why didn't they just take the moolah they raised for this turkey& give it to Kenneth Branagh to direct them in a dream version ofOthello
Don't waste your time!. I ordered this dvd on the premise of viewing a great, seriously done, artistic, erotic film based on the reviews it had already. What I watched had to be the STUPIDEST movie I have ever seen! Not only was the story line not complete (You basically have to assume a lot because it doesn't talk about the origin of the beast at all [what the hell was that, a werewolf?], but it also delves into comedy sometimes, unintentionally [like the idiotic screeming and running around of the girl near the end]). And the guy dressed in the beast costume, well, I guess they weren't that into special effects back then except for the "gallons" of ejaculate they used in the rape scene. Totally stupid! If this was great euro-sex of the 70's, I'll stay away from anything else produced by this guy. The best sex in here was at the beginning with the horses and then the servant getting it from the daughter (who they SHOULD have used in more of the scenes), but then it's all down hill from there. Thank God I only spent $9.99 on this crap! I don't even want to give this one star, but I guess I have to to get this submitted so I have to put it down :
Buyer Beware - BLU-RAY. This is a BLU-RAY disc - it does NOT say that in the product description! I got taken in not once but twice and now I have to return both copies
Boring. I find this show very boring. Like another reviewer said, all they do is travel to the recording studio, watch T.V., do laundry and fight over food. You might as well just watch your parents fight, kids. I mean, at the end of the day, they fight over food and who's grabbing the remote, don't they? They fight over who should do the laundry, right? All that's left is the recording studio part, but that's not very entertaining to watch for us..
Okay, not a barn burner though. Interesting movie, little short on the story line, some of the actors were not as believable as they could have been (the native americans), the romantic scenes were over emphasized, ...I love the period in history, is the only reason I remotely like the movie
DON'T BUY THIS VIDEO!!!. Whatever you do, do NOT buy this film. This is not Drunken Master 1 or 2. As a matter of fact Jackie Chan isn't even the star.(he's only in about 5 minutes of the movie.And, that's a clip from another movie!)The only reason I gave it 2 stars was because the film has mediocore action
Walled up originality. Playing tug-o-war with the good and bad clichs of current film-noirs, "Brick" both coasts on, and is derailed in its gloriously deft, yet non-atmosphere building visual eye; its own desire for one-noted, sometimes funny, but usually straight-faced characters; and an overblown, yet still somewhat interesting plot. Moreover, this detective story --set in a high-society Californian high school--trails the tired paths led by every crime-solving film of its ilk, yet the film has a playful humor inside its stereotypical mechanics, even if this knowing wink-wink makes it only think it's smarter than its own deficiencies."Brick" starts out in its opening frames with the typical, yet still adamantly interesting film-noir technique of giving the audience a quick glimpse of a major plot point, to only then flashback into a linear narrative. The film, about mid- teenaged Brendan`s (Joseph Gordon-Levitt) search into an underworld to find the answers of his girlfriend's murder, is actuated with this somber first shot of Brendan standing next to her dead body, thus creating a palatable sense of dread in the first act in which she is shown still alive. This also gives Levitt's street-wise character his future vendetta. Yet, this characterization through this revenge plot point never develops outside a stereotype, or even beyond this sun-drenched, and alarmingly too mirthful looking Sherlock Holmes world of lies and deceit.The film lacks in the center of its heart, in the way that the Brendan character does not quite earn his credit as a jack-of-all trades, because of this non-existent and needed inner layer-- so that it becomes increasingly obvious, and especially irritating, that this puzzle-solving brainiac is used only to propel its over-the-top and purely cinematic plot along artificially. Since, interchanging the typical character's of film-noir with those in high school, seems no different than a child taking a painting, drawing on it with a sharpie,  turning around, and telling their parents they created an original piece of artwork. It is more novel to see the younger actors perform as well as they do, and have fun in the roles that are often played by ageing, burned out characters. Actually, the school setting is also more interesting, than necessary, in the way that it plays with conventions-- for instance, the school principal acts as the police chief this time around, while Brendan's only friend acts as a Dr. Watson sort-- yet still fails to hide that it is indeed aimed towards a younger audience, of which would rather see "Brick" acting like a chameleon in its shallowness, when more often than not, more knowledgeable viewers will notice that it only poses as something more complex than it really is.And overtly complex it is, as well: featuring about seven central characters, and an abundant amount of monologue when it comes to these twists and turns. Although it is apparent what essentially is going on, there is also a lot of heavy handed explanation with too much "he said/she said," and confusingly contrived character conclusions about one another in conjunction with the plot.  The narrative goes through the regular mechanics of its genre, featuring sexist characterizations; as in both the masculine, drug addled, and violent males, and the sexy, harlot, lying, or damsel-in-distress females. Although the cast still plays there character serious enough that it does not wallow into complete self-mockery, but at the same time, there is a sort of modern gimmickry here, that instead needed to gel into a full-bodied and three-dimensional portrait of the events with more insight into the popularity warfare of high school that it often makes reference to. Yet these characterizations are so perfect in their regularity that they still appeal to the viewer, sometimes quickly developing in intentional scenes of comedy, from the slight comedic tweaking of its stereotypes; such as: the drug dealer who still leaves with his mother, the muscle with a too hotheaded personality, so that you cannot take it seriously anymore, and another character nuance features a bitchy theatre girl with a literal lap dog.The conclusion here comes together a little simple, and as the rest of "Brick," the end is certainly not groundbreaking. Yet, many will find merits in the style by director/screenwriter Rian Johnson working with cinematographer Steve Yedlin, of which give the film the elegant look of a scenic painting, with some truly spectacular moments of directing, sight, and lighting; such as: an unlit chase through a drainage hole, the arrival of Brendan at the drug dealers' safe house, and a fist fight in darkness towards the end-- and it is in these little hints of something audacious that make it good enough to get one to wonder what lies in the future for these filmmakers. Yet, as far as "Brick" goes, viewers will agree that they wanted this one to make a louder sound when dropped onto the movie scene, as it rather falls quietly from grace.**  (Out of 5
The Previews Looked Amazing. I remember when Brotherhood Of The Wolf was being released and it looked so good and you know why? Because they show you just the fight scenes but they don't tell you the movie feels like three hours of talking and twenty minutes of action. You try so hard to stick with it but it's just too long and you start to get uninterested. The only person that was holding this film together was Mark Dacascos and they messed that up.I understand some people might love this movie and I might get bad votes for this review but I really wanted this movie to be good and how am I suppose to deny the fact that this movie goes from good and exciting to boring acting and talking. I saw another reviewer say the movie starts out exciting and then goes overboard and he was absolutely right and if you can sit through this without going to sleep then you have outstanding patience. You could put this movie on and go to the store and come back it the same scene would be on. The acting was ok and what's horrible is Mark Dacascos did the best job and he didn't talk at all.It's also true that the genre for the film goes all over the place, it's a love story then lust, action, horror, whatever they could think of they put in here and I think that's what mostly contributed to the length and made it boring. It's better to rent this and not buy it because you will be very disappointed
Warning: Avoid at all costs. This movie is horrible. There is not a saving grace about it. Lucio Fulci is the worst of the Italian sub-genre directors and that is not saying much seeing as how the vast majority of Italian horror filmmakers seem to know only one language, violence... extreme violence.The film opens up with a priest hanging himself in a town that I presume is in New England, and I live in New England, and trust me we do not all act the idiots in this film. Apparently the Italian image of New England is a bunch of inbred hicks.  Not back to the topic at hand. Apparently a hanged New England priest lets loose the last gate of Hell, how he does this is beyond me, but I am assured by the fifteen times that they say it.A couple, which consist a reporter and a police officer, go up to investigate the occurance after a young women is buried alive (dead, but the undead... get it?) and talks about the strange inbred New England town. What happens next is all a blur to me. Something about zombies followed by insipid dialouge and then some more talk about zombies, followed by even more stupid dialouge, then a guy gets a drill in the head. Curtains.While I am in the midst of trashing this movie I might as well bring up the zombies. These aren't your ordinary zombies, oh no, these are zombies that have the capabilites to transport from one place to another in a split second, whether or not this is intentional is beyond me. Another odd thing is, for some reason, they aren't interested in eating their victims. Rather, they enjoy pulling the backs of their heads off... you read that right, pulling the backs of their heads off. It is as weird as it sounds.I don't remember how it ends (and I watched it only a half hour ago) and nor do I care. You will not care either. Not even a graduated gorehound like myself can enjoy this garbage. Do NOT watch this film. Ever. Sticking your money in your fireplace is better use of it then giving Lucio Fulci's estate anymore money.
Mostly a Waste of Time. The movie starts off very slowly, gathers a bit of steam, and then takes a plot turn that is totally inconsistent with the personalities of the two main characters, uptight writer Sarah and free spirit Julie.I'd quote one of Sarah's lines as she "assists" Julie with a task that they undertake, but it would be too much of a spoiler... in any case, once that line was spoken, I lost all respect for the plot.Some of the scenery in the movie is pleasing to the eye. For that, I'll give the movie two stars, rather than the one star it would have otherwise deserved.In any case -- don't waste your time watching "Swimming Pool." You'll drown in the stupidity
Preaching disguised as a movie. After watching Spirited Away I was excited to watch other movies by the same director. Unfortunately every movie seems to be an excuse to preach his simplistic "it's bad to hate" message.What the creators of Princess Mononoke and others like them refuse to admit is that hate is a natural reaction and even healthy when directed towards the destructive, disgusting things of the world. Yes, hate can become overly consuming, just as any other emotion can overcome us, or we an hate the good things of the world making us the bad one's,(just as loving that which is evil wouldn't be a good thing)  but placed in its proper context at the proper time, at that which deserves hate helps us avoid dangers and deal with certain problems.And the people who claim that hate is all-evil themselves hate the "haters", which I find comical.The movie also has strong pro feminist/anti man messages.I wanted to like this film but I don't appreciate being duped into listening to people rant and rave about nonsense
Not moved. I'm going to assume the book "I Captured the Castle" is better than the movie.  The cinematography is excellent, and the acting is decent all around except for the lead character played by Romola Garai. In her most dramatic scene, a confrontation with her father, she played out her emotions in an over-slow, melodramatic manner like a bad, bad stage play.  I'll give her a break because this is one of her first films, but thank goodness Bill Nighy carried the rest of the scene. The funny thing is when you listen to Romola during her interview in the special features, you think "Why couldn't we get this part of you in the film"?  She's an intelligent and witty woman, but her performance as the lead character was just underwhelming. That's a horrible shame.  The lead always sets the tone for the film. This would explain why the movie seemed to drag.I found this film to be a bore despite the wonderful talent.
Chinatown DVD. I STILL have not received this DVD.  It was ordered on 12/8/06 and was supposed to ship on 12/12/06.  I am very upset that it did not arrive as it was a Christmas gift.  I cannot rate the product as I don't have it.  I sent an e-mail through Amazon to jrmovies several days ago and have not heard from them.  I would appreciate a response or a refund
"I must know everything.  I must penetrate the heart of his secret!  I must become Caligari!". Robert Wiene's "The Cabinet of Dr. Caligari" is a celebrated work of German Expressionism.  While there are several interesting facets to it, this grand experiment in filmmaking cannot be regarded as a complete success.Francis (Friedrich Feher) relays a strange story.  A man named Dr. Caligari (Werner Krauss) once came to his town seeking a permit to display an exhibit at a carnival.  The exhibit was a wooden cabinet that housed a somnambulist named Cesare (Conrad Veidt).  Strange happenings then ensued after Cesare predicted the death of one of Francis's friends.  Concerned for the safety of his beloved Jane (Lil Dagover), Francis took it upon himself to determine whether Caligari was the person responsible for the disturbing series of events.In a strange way, one can look upon "The Cabinet of Dr. Caligari" as a bizarre version of "The Wizard of Oz" (1939).  The framing sequences are similar and the surreal appearance of the town effectively creates an unfamiliar world that has its own unique and distinct visual identity.  Yet, despite the ample creativity on display and the intriguing ideas the film explores in regards to memory and interpretation, "The Cabinet of Dr. Caligari" is stiff and dreary.  The characters are not engaging and the story is just a generic murder mystery with a monster thrown in.  Give "The Cabinet of Dr. Caligari" points for trying to do something different and for influencing the look and feel of horror films that followed, but feel free to skip it if you are not a fan of the peculiar.
There is NO English audio track.  It is entirely in Swedish. This movie is entirely in Swedish with English subtitles.  It is incorrectly listed as havng an English audio track.
Very light. Just not enough "meat" here to make it worth recommending to others. This DVD attempts to cover far too many topics and doesn't really do any of them justice. (I just don't understand why a "Beginning" instructional DVD has to throw everything and the kitchen sink at you instead of focusing on a few key topics and doing them well.) Having recently converted to bass after being a long-time guitar player, I was looking for something more serious. Honestly, the only worthwhile take-away from the DVD are some of Abe Laboriel's riffs
old documentary!. Please think this DVD is recorded in 1986. More worse, this is recorded as a documentary. Sound quality is worst. After I bought this and DVD of &quot;Company&quot; (same, worst sound quality DOCUMENTARY), I suspect the word &quot;concert&quot; or &quot;soundtrack&quot; in DVD title
Hollywood costume epic, drama over substance. This is another Hollywood costume epic. They spared no expense with the set and costumes, hired talented big name actors Rex Harrison, Liz Taylor and Richard Burton. Despite the resources committed to this film sadly the film was more stylistic than substantive.Harrison was terrific as Gaius Julius Caesar but he is only in the first half of the movie and Richard Burton does not come across as a great Mark Antony. His character is weak willed and he is harassed and henpecked by Cleopatra, Antony was passionate and reckless but henpecked?Although the film is titled Cleopatra, it focuses more on the historic events.  The film also reduces Cleopatra to the woman depicted in Octavian's propaganda rather than portraying the real multi-dimensional woman who was intelligent, a gifted political strategist, expert linguist, dynamic personality and who ironically was not a beauty.  They don't give you sense of what was so compelling about Cleopatra.   She is depicted as a combative shrew with both Caesar and Antony. I doubt constant conflict would have gotten far with either man. If you took away her looks would either man have been attracted to the personality portrayed here?  I would think not especially considering both their backgrounds as Roman military leaders and the weak position of Egypt compared to Rome.Given the limitations of their vision of Cleopatra Liz Taylor was perfect choice to cast as the selfish, beautiful, seductive and glamorous temptress; she really breathes life into this character and gives a great performance.   Although a portrayal of the real person would have been much more interesting you can't deny Taylor's appeal and she does a great job considering the limits of the material.  Although Taylor shines sadly we never get to know Cleopatra her depth managed to get lost in this oversexed Hollywood costume drama.This movie was lush eye-candy without a whole lot of substance; in fairness to this project it fits in with similar epics of the 50's and sixties - the style reminds me of DeMille films like The Ten Commandments. It did capture the public imagination because it launched the relationship of Taylor and Burton and ultimately despite its issues and because of their star power it turned a profit.The research, writing and the Directors vision should have each contributed to creating a great film instead it produced this mediocre costume drama.  The real shame is that in the hands of someone with a vision and a passion for the subject matter it could have been great.
You Never Know Who They Really Are...But You Do... 'Clownhouse' is mainly associated with a sex scandal involving the director and the youngest boy actor. While hearing of Salva's conviction when 'Jeepers Creepers' came out, I never knew it had anything to do with this movie, nor had I ever heard of this in the first place. I actually stumbled upon this looking to see if there was a horror movie involving clowns besides 'It', and came across this weird little 'Halloween'-like suspense tale. While the sex scandal never once popped into my head (except when there was a pointless and gratuitous butt shot of the kid), I still didn't care for this too much, despite its pluses.Like 'Halloween', this film relies on suspense rather than gore to creep people out, but sadly, it didn't really get to me. If I was about 9 or so, this would've scared the hell out of me. I'm not saying I hated this; it was all right and had some geniune chills and some fantastic images, but because you see who the clowns are before they find the house and start terrorizing the children, it lost some effect for me. I would have liked it better if I had no idea what was going on, and it would've been a creepier experience.Horror movie fans should like this, even though I personally thought it would be better. The atmosphere is very, very creepy, and the clowns are actually pretty terrifying in their own way, but it just didn't do it for me. Rent it first
Zurian. Good Grief...I know this is supposed to be a classic and all but is this the best the producers could do? Maybe I'm missing the point but I've seen better "C" category movies...what's up with the one robot mass invasion? How did they get here? What shot down the military planes? I could even see the eyes of the person inside the tin foil outfit...the characters seem to stay neatly cleaned and pressed throughout, or maybe that's part of the fun...well ha ha...
Broadway's Lost Treasures. I can't write a review because I had to send both CD's back because they would not play.  I just ordered another one yesterday, and here's hoping that will be okay
waste of money!. i wonder if those people at SOny took a moment to watch the final product, before they put it out in the market! i am sure they didn't.the audio is one of the worst that i have ever experienced and what happened to subtitles, i guess it would cost a buck or two for the improve the quality for us funs.Heads up and BRAVO TO COLUMBIA producing the first two seasons.Sony watch out 'cause you are bringing cheap ... in the market and costumers are getting tired of it!wish i had kept my money and spend it something else!!!
A one hour idea stretched to almost three hours. I found this movie to be almost unwatchable.  If your idea of a good time is watching Henry Gibson trying to sing while the camera takes long pans over dull crowd scenes, then this movie is for you.  The three minutes of excitement near the end barely has anything to do with anything that preceeded it.  Altman can pull off such greats as "Mash" and  "Godsford Park" and then stink up the joint with this.  What's up with that
The downhill slide begins in earnest. If season four saw Homicide:LOTS lose its footing, season five was the one in which it slipped and began sliding downhill in a hurry. Everything that was so brilliant about the first few seasons gets tossed aside here.Gone are so many of the brilliant characters like Crosetti, Felton, Bolander, and Russert. The strongest characters who remain (Giardello, Pembleton, and Howard) are largely relegated to the background. In their places are the one-note Kellerman, the obnoxious Brody, and the grating Cox.Before this season, the show was largely about the interpersonal dynamics of the squad room and how that added up to a functional police unit; in season five, each character is isolated by ever-more contrived personal crises. The newer actors bring hystrionics and annoying acting tics to a show in which subtlety and wry nuance used to take center stage.Gone too this season are some of the best writers on the show, and their replacements show only the most superficial understanding of what make these characters tick. Bayliss, Lewis and Munch are caricatures of themselves in these episodes, and Giardello is pushed so far into the shadows it's suprising that Yaphet Kotto isn't just given a guest starring credit.Oh, and the original, brilliant opening credit montage--with it's overexposed, gritty urban scenes and unsettling percussion--is replaced with a CSI-esque montage of forensic gobbledegook and bleating sound effects. The original perfectly encapsulated the mood of the show; the new one completely misses the point.By all means, get the first four seasons. More perfect television has never been made. But only get season five if you can't sleep at night without knowing how Andre Braugher plays a person recovering from a stroke. Six and seven you can skip altogether
Can We Be Proud That We Are American's For Once. The film Why We Fight, I believe is nothing more than another movie that looks to criticize America. I felt that the movie, only told one side of the argument, and that side was clearly not pro-America. The film portrays the United States as a power hungry nation, which is looking to create an empire and extend its influence around the world. The film constantly criticizes the decisions of America leaders to engage into foreign combat. The film however, does not present an alternative solution. It fails to take into consideration that America may be acting out of self defense. The film constantly criticizes America for engaging in combat throughout the world. What I have to say to the director of this film is: Is it not alright to defend your nation, after terrorist drive planes into two buildings, killing 3,000 people? Is it not alright to defend your nation against religious zealots, who are looking to destroy your way of life? Is it wrong to attempt to bring freedom and peace to the Middle East, by toppling a murderous dictator? When I see these questions, I have to answer no to all of them. I feel that if America feels threatened, it should not have to seek permission to defend itself. President Bush put it properly I feel when he stated "After the chaos and carnage of September 11th, it is not enough to serve our enemies with legal papers," and "America will never seek a permission slip to defend the security of our people." This film can criticize America and label it as a bully nation, but these terrorist must be brought to justice. President Eisenhower once said, "Peace and justice are two sides of the same coin." As the most powerful nation in the world, it is our duty to spread freedom throughout the world. It is our duty to allow the people of other countries the privilege of enjoying the same rights that we as Americans, sometimes take for granted. Since when, has it become wrong to defend your nation. Why must America be criticized for engaging in conflict, when it feels threatened? Is it not the job of the President of the United States to defend the 300 million people he was elected to represent? Does anybody think for a second that these people would hesitate to attack America again, if they are given the chance? We can never let our guard down. Freedom does not come free. On September 11, 2001 we saw firsthand how evil, those who want to destroy us can be. You can not negotiate with these types of people. The only way to solve this problem and protect ourselves is to act decisively with force. On the morning of the September 11, 2001 attacks, President Bush stated that "Freedom itself was attacked this morning by a faceless coward, and freedom will be defended." Indeed freedom was and is being defended, and I see nothing wrong with that. Words are not enough to protect our nation. President Theodore Roosevelt said, "Great thoughts speak only to the thoughtful mind, but great actions speak to all mankind," and our great action, will be to defend this great nation. In the words of President Hoover, "Freedom is the open window through which pours the sunlight of the human spirit and human dignity," and it is America's job to ensure that the people of the world have the opportunity to live in freedom. Remember: "Words without actions are the assassins of idealism." Herbert Hoove
Biased propaganda buy. The Armenian Genocide is a biased piece of propaganda, if you want a truly impartial view of the events buy and view "The Armenian Revolt" by Martin Callaghan an independent US producer it is much more professional and impartial in it's production.What the Armenian Genocide does not tell you is that the Armenians started revolting and murdered over 500,000 thousand Turks to begin with.  Further, the statistics used in the program are bogus.  Even according to Armenian Sources there were not 2 million Armenians living in the Ottoman Empire during that period.  Further, at the end of World War 1 the Ottoman Empire ceased to exist and the British controlled the former Ottoman Capital of Istanbul.  They conducted a witch hunt, they arrested 144 Ottoman Officials of the leadership including the then eqivulant to the prime minister and conveyed them to their island colony of Malta.  After two and a half years of exhuastive inquiries they could not find any evidence whatsoever to charge any of them let alone convict.  All 144 Ottoman Officials were released and allowed to return home.  Further the investigator Lord Curzon (well known for his hatred of Turks) asked the US Government of the day to provide any evidence they may have had in their possession.  An answer came back that the US did not have any evidence with which to use against the Ottoman leadership.What the Armenian Diaspora could not achieve via armed conflict and legal means is now trying to achieve politically and by using propaganda like this particular documentary.  There is always two sides to every story and the Armenians will not allow the Turks to put theirs forward.[...
Ruined By Implausibility And Lack Of Answers. Unlike most people here, I very much enjoyed Season 3. It had a compelling story line and numerous villains who were played superbly. I don't understand all the season 3 hate, but apparently it's mostly to do with people being angry that Syd and Vaughan weren't together, and having to pay attention across multiple weeks.Season 3 ended with Syd finding a top secret file about her, dated 1976. Jack walks in to find a sobbing Syd, telling her that she was never meant to find that file. Reasonable people would assume that the file contains something momentous about Syd's life. Instead, Season 4 tells us that a top secret file about Sydnew Bristow, dated 1976, was instead about the very recent killing of Irina Derevko. Huh? Someone needs to teach the CIA how to properly title and date files. That is the first of numerous disappointments in season 4, and I suppose it's good that they get such a stinker out of the way early so that you don't get any more hopes up.The credibility of the series is ruined when the writers place super-villian Arvin Sloane in charge of a black-ops CIA unit. I mean seriously, when is the CIA just going to shoot this guy in the face and get it over with? Is this the 3rd of 4th time the U.S. government places Sloane in some great position of power after it's revealed that he's a terrorist of the highest order? I don't know, I've lost track.Worse than the sheer stupidity of the U.S. government placing Sloane in charge is the reaction of all the key characters of the show. Remember how Sloane blew up Dixon's wife? Well Dixon is all smiles as he willingly subjugates himself to his new boss Sloane. It's the same with all the characters, and in one fell swoop it destroys the entire credibility of the series.
A pale imitation of its predecessors. If you are interested n this type of story, buy To Sir With Love or Boys Town instead. Dangerous Minds is simply boring and predictable with nothing to make it memorable. There are a couple of decent performances from some of the minor characters but that's not enough to raise it above the sad script and cliche ridden dialogue.On the other hand, if you have no life experience, are very young or simply have watched very few movies in your life, you might get some enjoyment out of this. It's not really a bad movie, but it's certainly not a good one
God Awful. I'm stunned.Every once and a while a movie comes along that is so deeply in love with itself AND so deeply flawed that you are left sitting there in slack jawed disbelief.  This is one of those movies.  Pretentious and "look-at-me-I'm-so-quirky" yet so remarkably inane and trite.To be fair, the movie is not technically bad, and in more capable hands could have been something really special and "meaningful".  Instead, however, the incessant self-absorption, the cliches that pass for "wit", and the smugness all just combined to make me (right around the ten minute mark) root for tragedy to strike:  "Oh, large truck in the background, please, please drive into the foreground, swerve, and hit a character...any character."  And don't even get me started on the first year film student level dialog that ends up squeezing every ounce of well-intentioned meaning out of this lemon so that there's none actually there.This is a vanity project and it shows.   Miranda July wrote, directed and starred in this - so we pretty much know who to blame.  And to read that Miranda July is a performance artist - well, that pretty much explains everything right there
Obviously there is an audience for this product.... George A. Romero enters with yet another installment in his banal and grossly visual zombie flicks and hopefully this will be the last of them. Obviously there is an appreciative audience who enjoys watching partially decomposed bodies stomp around and grunt and eat body parts of the living because a lot of people write positively about this film.For this viewer the 'parody' eludes.  LAND OF THE DEAD is simply a dark, grotesque, poorly written, hastily thrown together bit of treacle to make money off the folks who like this genre.  But how fine actors like Simon Baker, John Leguizamo, Dennis Hopper, Asia Argento, and Robert Joy agree to the casting agent's invitation to star in this film is a conundrum.  Grady Harp, December 0
rating of this movie. This movie was not Bill Murray's  best. I would not recommend it to anyone
An Abomination. With great anticipation and relish i awaited this accumulation of the works of probably one of the greatest playwrites of the 20th century. Having seen a short promotional film of the project, my eagerness was picqued.But, alas, flash, star-worship and diminished expectations rule once again in this travesty. Having actually not even been able to sit through the Endgame of this set, and having also seen the foolish, punk-flash version of Breath, and the unsympathetic and misunderstood, braindead interpretation of Not I, i am so appalled i nearly whipped this weighty and overly expensive set, frisbee-like,out the window.It never ceases to amaze how so much star power can do so much damage. Remember the Broadway travesty of Godot a few years ago with Robin Williams?So, Engame is a beautiful performance. all the Gaelic colloquial nuance of Beckett's language,perfectly understood and delivered in a heightened naturalism that is a joy to behold. The only problem is, one can NOT behold it because of the hack direction. Done in obsessively Television Direction School multi-camera work, anytime a charecter speaks or moves he is held in extreme talking-head close-up. next actor speaks, close up for him, then back to the other actor and so on and so on until the stomach of the viewer churns from this sea-sick demntia of camera close-ups,reaction shots, two shots and flashing long shots. So you don't have a play, or a film, you end up with a Television show of utter convention and utter unwatchability. i suggest people stay away from this possibly well-intentioned but decadent and unwatchable and expensive lump of Beckett Meets Hollywood by way of London.
Funny Once. I remember these movies as being funny, but the quality of the transfer and the aspect ratio of the DVD's in this set is pretty awful. Hard to watch and enjoy the occasional bits of humor. Too bad
Good Live Footage but Not Much Insight into the Band... Ramones Raw is basically Marky Ramone with a handheld camera annoying Johnny, Joey, Dee Dee and C.J. while on tour. There is some great live footage of the band playing some classic songs. The DVD doesn't really tell a story but is more of a narrative of the Ramones life on the road. The inner relations of the band are not touched upon at all. In fact, by watching Ramones Raw you'd never know that Johnny and Joey hated each other with a passion. Most of the running time is lighthearted gags and inside jokes interspersed with concert footage. For a complete look at the inner workings of the band, as well as the making of most of their albums, pick up the End of the Century DVD it is a MUCH more comprehensive look at the band as a whole. Recommended for Ramones Diehards and completists only
The 10 Bucks Back Deal Is Over! It Is Expired!. The Pretender is an awesomely good TV show but why buy this starter set that only has one episodes from the first season when you can buy the complete first season DVD boxset and get this eipisode and all the rest of the season one episodes? And don't give me any garbage about it being worth it because you get 10 dollars back with the included coupon because that ten bucks back deal has long expired! Only people who like to waste money would buy this
Awful. The depression era introduction was the best part of this movie as another reviewer mentioned. From the moment they reached King Kong's island the movie quickly spiraled to a painful viewing experience. I felt no sympathy for the big stupid ape. How can anyone feel anything for King Kong? He keeps a village hostage to a tiny part of an island, forces them to provide him sacrificial women, and tortures the female star of the movie. It seems so ridiculous that she ends up liking King Kong. The villains of the movie were my heroes. I kept hoping they would succeed in killing him so the pain of this awful movie would end
Sorry Tom...... I'm giving this movie two stars because of the supporting actors, and, the book from which the movie is taken.  I believe those are what the rest of the reviews are truely applauding without realizing it.Tom Hanks is a wonderful actor, and, seems like a nice guy, but, he needs to figure out what movies he is 'right' for, and, which ones he should turn down.Tom, Tom .... that accent...ouch!  Sounds like you NEVER tried actually talking to someone from Alabama.  If you really did...well, honeychil', accents just aren't your thing - don't do no more of 'em!They should have asked an English actor - they do spot on southern accents.  Maybe, it's time for a re-make with Jude Law.  Forrest was not a handsome man in the book, but, apparently, that doesn't transfer to the screen, so, get a hottie who can do an accent.  Tom's just makes my ears ache!
The Hills have Eyes. I did not even received the DVD and how amI going to review the movie. Please tell me how to......
Boring, Empty. I rented this movie because Marguerite Moreau looked hot on the box.  But she didn't look nearly as good in the movie.  Her character was a smoking (gross), bed-hopping slob who looked like she harbored every STD known to man.  And she thinks she has to sleep with every guy she meets in order to find love (silly).  Really no focus in this movie, not enjoyable
It couldn't be worse. It couldn't be worse. I mean that literally. That's not to say there isn't humor to be found here. In fact, my point is that this is, in fact, an occasionally amusing title. With this cast (Atkinson, Richardson, Laurie, Fry, McInnerny & Robinson) it can't help but have SOME laughs. But it could have been so much more. It's obvious that by the time they came to slap together this little 'help save the Millenium Dome' project, writers Richard Curtis and Ben Elton had simply lost touch with the Blackadder of old. The characters don't quite ring true (even ones they had played before) and the situations seem very un-Blackadderish (to invent a word). We never have time to really get to know these incarnations of the Blackadder crew. If this were a stand alone film, I don't see how anyone could have found these jokes even remotely funny without a knowledge of Blackadder beforehand? One of the great things about the old Blackadders is that, even if you'd never seen one before, every episode was funny in its own right. You didn't need to know that Baldrick's pants were a constant source of humor to find the jokes amusing. But here everything is referring to running gags of the old shows, without a solid base to the jokes themselves. Nothing stands on its own. I don't think you could ring six good episodes out of these characters if you tried. There's nothing to them, they are just shadows of their predecessors. Just like this show
ORIGINAL IS BETTER~!. If you want UNCUT ORIGINAL version, ALWAYS look for ORIGINAL LICENSED Production. NOT US Release. Its a foreign film, it should not be US version to begin with~! HELLO!!!?? Why settle for LESS with US Version where they edit and cut so many excellent scenes especially with Jackie's Fighting Scenes. And US Release ruins the speed and sound as well. I have been collecting JET Li movies both HK and US Release Version for quite some time now. I found HK Version to be MUCH MORE in enjoyable, and HIGHER in Quality. American Market always like to "Americanize" and "Control". Regional Code Regulation thing is one of the example to CONTROL the Market. Why not let everyone enjoy the same HK Original Release move the same way REST OF THE WORLD enjoys it ?? No one makes Hollywood American movies to "French version" or "Chinese Version" ~! This what Americans are doing~! Well, enjoy the cheap "American version" then~! LO
having seen most shocking horror films. having seen the most shocking of horror films that relish in the grotesque and stay in our minds like a stain on our brain and enjoyed them i began to watch this film with a sceptical eye. having watched 10 minutes of the film i ejected the dvd that it had been burned onto and smashed it convinced that if the devil does exist then he exists purely in this film. do not watch this film. it exploits everything that is wrong with humanity and leaves a taste in your mouth that you can never rid yourself of. the only positive thing that i have to say about this film is that after watching it and finding myself sicked and deeply disturbed i know that in one way or another that i must be a good person. DO NOT WATCH THIS FILM!!
It's OK, but..... The problem is they put in a lot of footage that is NOT of the Third Reich; such as, of Japan, England, America, etc. etc....It was sort of like they did not have enough real footage, so they threw in a lot of off-topic stuff as filler.Its OK, but not truely what it pretends to be.  As for the on-topic footage it has, it was great
Becomes Old Very Fast!. The first five minutes of the dvd was interesting; however, after that I found that I was forcing myself to watch it without a great deal of enjoyment
Insufferable. I know, I know - Elaine Stritch is a "legend" - she makes sure you know it, believe me...  Maybe I'm the only one in the universe who felt like smacking her, but, I felt like smacking her.  She offers a few bon mots about Old Hollywood and Broadway, however the rest seems like a self-congratulatory vanity piece.  I got the feeling that she's been practicing these "naked" little soliloquies for her audience of one, in front of the mirror, for years. Maybe that is the point of the show, I don't know.  Perhaps some think she should be humored because she's 80, but crikey, I just found most of it insufferable.  Sorry Elaine..
This "movie" is truely awful. I'm a big fan of the role playing game called Dungeons and Dragons. However, this pile of dung masquerading as a movie bears no resemblance to the game. Do not waste your time watching this atrocity. This movie is just plain bad, bad, bad
too loud. When the background music completely overpowers the dialogue, you may as well turn it off.  The background music was piercing and I needed to have the remote in hand to keep adjusting the volume.  Not everyone has perfect hearing and shows with overwhelming background music are becoming the norm.  A shame because otherwise I could have enjoyed Crash
Wow...shockingly bad movie. I watched this movie and I don't review things very often but felt a need to save others from wasting two hours of their life watching this movie. This is one of the worst movies I have seen...painful...absolutely painful. Writing, acting, Directing all are some of the worst I have seen in a wide release movie.
An Abomination. With great anticipation and relish i awaited this accumulation of the works of probably one of the greatest playwrites of the 20th century. Having seen a short promotional film of the project, my eagerness was picqued.But, alas, flash, star-worship and diminished expectations rule once again in this travesty. Having actually not even been able to sit through the Endgame of this set, and having also seen the foolish, punk-flash version of Breath, and the unsympathetic and misunderstood, braindead interpretation of Not I, i am so appalled i nearly whipped this weighty and overly expensive set, frisbee-like,out the window.It never ceases to amaze how so much star power can do so much damage. Remember the Broadway travesty of Godot a few years ago with Robin Williams?So, Engame is a beautiful performance. all the Gaelic colloquial nuance of Beckett's language,perfectly understood and delivered in a heightened naturalism that is a joy to behold. The only problem is, one can NOT behold it because of the hack direction. Done in obsessively Television Direction School multi-camera work, anytime a charecter speaks or moves he is held in extreme talking-head close-up. next actor speaks, close up for him, then back to the other actor and so on and so on until the stomach of the viewer churns from this sea-sick demntia of camera close-ups,reaction shots, two shots and flashing long shots. So you don't have a play, or a film, you end up with a Television show of utter convention and utter unwatchability. i suggest people stay away from this possibly well-intentioned but decadent and unwatchable and expensive lump of Beckett Meets Hollywood by way of London.
hollow man 2 is indeed that-HOLLOW. there are many reasons to rip apart this movie, there are enough holes that even NEW YORK rats could go through.  however, what this movie lacks, it makes up for with a nice presentation, bonus features and really good special effects.  the story is slim-unstable serum.  there is govermental paranoia, rediculous chases, cheese nudity, a slight look of HALLOWEEN(from the persons POV)--sort of DARKMAN look and feel to the actors in their roles, several nice killings and the typical no brainer ending(SEQUEL) hmmn?, the movie company was lucky it was filming on a dark dreary rainy days!!-lol.  movie is not bad. its better than most if you want to be entertained.   just try not to get too involved.  RENT IT.
Diary of Ellen Rimbauer. I read the book before seeing the movie. The book was good. The movie was terrible. I did not like it at all. The movie did not follow the book. The movie had inaccurate accounts compared to the book and the Rose Red movie
wrong. Peter Fonda and Kurt Russell surfing a wave down a Los Angeles reservoir is not cool, does not make this movie worth a look, good God, that scene stinks. P-U. Campy. This movie is a mess. A horribly made sequel. So bad it actually tarnishes the reputation of the original
Would not recommend. This movie was awful.  I kept watching it because I thought eventually it was going to get better but it never did.  The plot:  two men abandon their wives and children to find themselves, but really all they are doing is chasing young women in the tropics. They carry on a &quot;three-some&quot; relationship with one woman.  One guy continues travelling, the other finally goes home to his family but in all his arrogance suggests to his wife she's lucky to have him home for as long as he stays. Do not waste your time - you will wish you had the two hours of your life back
Tsukamoto can do better.  Much better. I like Shinya Tsukamoto.  He's a great director (TOKYO FIST), a talented actor (ICHI THE KILLER) and an imaginative writer (TETSUO), but I didn't care for A SNAKE OF JUNE.  It starts out alright with a repressed wife being blackmailed to act out her own sexual fantasies - example: walking around in public in a miniskirt with an active sex toy inside her.  That part was interesting, but then it starts going on about her lame husband and I lost interest quick.Nowhere near sexy enough or surreal enough to recommend
Violent, old-style violent cartoon. I bought this movie for my son's 3rd birthday. How I wish I had watched it first! I gave it one star only because the elephants were actually cute and if they cut out the violent parts, it could have been a neat little movie. I was expecting the death scene of Babar's mother, but was unprepared for the horrible war/captive/slave whipping scenes of the rhino encampment. There is an awful chanting reminiscent of Lord of the Rings in Mordor - entirely too much of a medieval, dark, purgatorial atmosphere for young children to be watching. The rhinos whip the elephant slaves (Celeste cries out: "Babar, they're SLAVES!") Now, why does a child need to see elephant slaves being whipped and dropping -- presumably dead -- in their harnesses? And why do I want my child to hear the rhinos chanting hellishly: "Hail Rataxes!" with rage-distorted faces like some Gregorian klaxon sounding. The rhinos verbally abuse and taunt the elephants while beating and whipping them. What is that doing in a children's movie? The crocodile scene (crocs terrify Babar and Zephir in a lake, fiercely snapping w/ evil and angry eyes) reminded me of the type of characters and animation from the old, old Warner/Disney cartoons, angry, mean little characters who beat on one another -- the types of characters that are -- and rightly so -- very politically incorrect nowadays. It was so disappointing and just really sub-par and violent and so unnecessary in a world where we can choose Disney Pooh/Tigger/Roo or Sesame Street, Between the Lions, or Clifford or Caillou. Stick to what you know and don't expose your children to violence. You will see a marked difference in their behavior/aggression if you weed out all violence from their viewing habits. All day after viewing this, my son walked around screaming like the rhinos and throwing his toys to the floor to "punish" them yelling: "halt, who goes there?" with a  mean, angry countenance like I have never seen before. This, I don't need
Good start, terrible ending. Risen from the Dead of 1998 Direct to DVD hell the cast of Katie Holmes, Nick Stahl, Steve Railsback, Bruce Greenwood and William Sadler make an entrance here in this bit part movie that copies "The Faculty" without trying to be very different - drug themes, school themes, monster themes, bullies as football players, it is all the same. NO CGI or special effects, this is acting driven... but off the cliff, its sudden appearance in 1998 as a shelf space filler does not do it any more credit now. Watch another film with these fine actors in it, certainly the "The Faculty" instead, or even William Sadler in "Demon Knight"
Not the full film. The dvd is missing one of the best scenes from the video version of the same movie:  The scene where the woman is being walled up alive by Vincent Price.   I really wish the people who make dvd's would put the REAL and COMPLETE VERSION of the film on the dvd and stop cutting out various scenes, whatever their reasons may be.Still, this classic old film has some good acting and a good story line.   It scared me to death when I was a kid, and it still has a touch of the creepy crawlies now that I'm a much older adult
Watch Das Boot instead. I just finished watching Das Boot.  To even draw comparisons between these two movies is absolutely ridiculous.  Where Das Boot is a gripping human tale of the tragedy of war, U-571 is just more Hollywood tripe.If you just want 'splosions and escapism, I guess U-571 does the trick.If you want a realistic sub movie that will haunt you for many nights to come, go with Das Boot
Surprisingly bad. I bought this because it is made by Cannon Movie Tales and I love "Puss in Boots", which they also made.  Because "Puss in Boots" was so good, I thought this would be, too.  Alas, I was disappointed.  "Red Riding Hood" has almost no relation to the story we are all familiar with.  The plot in the actual fairytale is more of a parenthetical remark than the main story line in this movie.  Add to this that the acting was rather painful and the special effects were anything but special and you are left with 1 star.  The one thing it had going for it was that it was perfectly clean and not very scary for youngsters.  Since small children are easier to please in the cinematic area than adults, perhaps they would still enjoy this adaptation to "Little Red Riding Hood"
Vertically (and Creatively) Challenged. Chances are, if you're reading this review, you're not expecting Little Man to be anything special.  My guess is you're familiar with the Wayans brothers, or at least the Scary Movie series (if you're not, you've either strenuously avoided all forms of pop culture in the past 7 years, or you have some kind of memory disorder; either way, lucky you), so you have some idea of what to expect.Even if all you hear is the premise -- tiny jewel thief (Marlon Wayans, demolishing all the integrity he got from his powerful performance in "Requiem for a Dream") pretends to be a baby to sneak into a house and steal an obscenely huge diamond -- you can pretty much guess what you're going to get.  There are plenty of poo-poo jokes (Ha ha ha!  Baby made a surprise!), hilarious incestual misunderstandings (Is it possible for a woman to "accidentally" have sex with her baby and not even realize it?  Of course it is!), and let's not forget, given Little Man's stature, the bevy of groin pops, pulls, snaps, thwacks, wollops, punts, and headbutts that may be employed (some of them over and over!).Let's not sell the movie short (Ho ho!  Me so witty!).  It never proposes to offer more than Loony Toons-esque humor (with some decidedly adult twists).  But whereas a Bugs Bunny cartoon is rarely longer than ten minutes (apparantly part of the script was inspired by a Baby Bugs Bunny cartoon with a similar theme), this movie spends an hour and forty minutes using and reusing the same, tired jokes that almost anyone could think of.Delivery does stand for something, though.  The special effects are first rate (remarkable, actually), and -- in spite of myself -- there were at least three or four moments where I laughed out loud ("This cookie's got a bite to it") but I'm not entirely willing to discount that that might have been due to something I ate.Add in a bewildering cast -- Chazz Palminteri (this guy must really like playing mobsters), Molly Shannon (she spends her throw-away appearance half-heartedly playing a lame stereotype), Vanessa Edwards (who acts in every scene as if the director is pointing a gun at her and telling her to be really funny), and an uncredited Rob Schneider (who apparantly doesn't have anything better to do) -- and what you're left with is a silly mess of a movie, even by the Wayans standards.  There are a few chuckles to be had (for those of you who can appreciate The Three Stooges type humor), but the rest of the movie just falls sh...uh, well, you get the idea
Dumb movie, horrible 5.1 track. Avoid at all costs. See my IMDb review for more. And I don't give a dang if you say no. It's a movie you must turn off your brain to enjoy. My brain? It can't be shut off
13 reasons to turn it off... 13 - Monk should stick to Monk12 - The ghosts aren't scary11 - Matthew Lillard is annoying10 - The very first scene says it all (stupid)9 - There are no real jump scenes8 - The script is lame7 - Shannon Elizabeth keeps her top on6 - The cool house isn't really all that cool5 - The acting is atrocious4 - Did I mention that Lillard is annoying?3 - And so is that little kid2 - The premise is retarded1 - You'll regret it if you don't
THE COEN BROTHERS COLLECTION. The DVDs we received were not formatted to Zone 4 (Australia) se we've had to return the goods, unfortunately.  Therefore, no helpful comments
Out of Reach... out of ideas... out of patience...outta here... On the trail of stinky excrements such as The Foreigner and Out for a Kill, current reigning straight-to-video monarch Steven Seagal returns to again inflict upon his ever-dwindling fan base more of his patented scowls, unsubtle enviromental messages, and his ridiculous, past-prime brand of martial arts.Steven Seagal half-heartedly (and even that might be giving him too much credit) portrays William Lansing, a former special ops agent turned wildlife refuge environmentalist, who travels to Poland to look into why his 13-year-old orphaned buddy Irina Morawska has stopped corresponding (maybe she found out Seagal's 77 years old and is a slug). Lansing unearths a slimy but lucrative slavery ring and comes face to face with malignant main baddie Faisal. It now only remains to see how grisly a fate Faisal will have at the chubby but deadly hands of Lansing.Out of Reach is utter crapola. The amateurish production values, the corny, highly derivative script and the cringe-worthy acting "performances" cause this video release to plummet faster than an ugly prostitute's self-respect. Seagal's mumbled diction is at an all-time low. At certain points, a voice actor had to dub Seagal's voice because the Green Peace sensei couldn't be bothered to come back to the studio for post-production work (it's so obviously not him doing the voice-over, reading those letters to Irina). The action sequences are so preposterous and so clumsily-set up that even David Carradine is giggling.I was such a big fan of Seagal when he first exploded on the scene in Above the Law (1988). Back then, he was the epitomy of the film action hero, more down to earth than Van Damme and more realistic than Ah-nold. His first five features were awesome, stripped-down virtuoso cinemas of abrupt, lethal, down-and-dirty ass-kicking. In the 1990s,  the fact that he was a man of monosyllabic tendencies only contributed to his cultivated silent but deadly image. He was well on his way to becoming a martial arts icon. Then, sadly, pfffft...Obviously, Seagal found out that he could still make beaucoup money without putting in a 100 percent effort. Over the years, the man had just let himself go, and it's a damn shame. True, he never was much of an actor: he probably uses his Burger King cash card more often than his SAG card. But now, even the low-rent genre he toils in should be embarassed to have him as a member.Is it a surprise anymore when we find, in whatever film he's in, that his character has had special super-duper combat training in his past? First of all, if Steven Seagal were to now play a role other than that of an ex-military name-taker and ass-kicker, his Jabba the Hut-sized noggin would probably explode from the unexpected dramaturgical exertion, and all we'll have left of Seagal is the desolate remnants of a ponytail. His acting is now as strained and forced as his trousers belt must be. This is not the worst movie I've ever seen (I once walked out of a Dolph Lundgren flick; The Red Scorpion, I think it was) but it's pretty bad. For the record, Seagal has almost officially surpassed the unlamented Michael Dudikoff in terms of film careers rapidly circling into the toilet. One and a half stars. The rating would be lower but I'm sentimental.
Jungle Book 2 Did not Have To Be made Limited Issue Is 100 Times Better. Disney keeps goming out with sequels to the best DVD's ever made.The  Jungle Book Limited Issue Is the best movie ever made.My Grandson watches it all the time. Its made for  the child also the adult like me. I bought  Jungle Book 2 totally dissapointed in the dvd.  I did not like it at all I returned it.Its a horible movie for children:  Disney stop ruining our excellent dvds.I give this dvd A -
Give It Up, Charlie!. Let me first say that I enjoyed the original "Death Wish" a great deal.  While some would castigate its supposed political bent, I think its association with a "right-wing" mentality is inaccurate.  While we conservatives do have varying levels of dissatifaction with our criminal justice system, I never met one who TRULY wanted to go out and just start shooting people.  To suggest that a Paul Kersey resides in every conservative is utter nonsense.  And these social liberals made similar comments about Michael Douglas' character in the movie "Falling Down."  Of course, they have no qualms when liberalism is displayed prominently in a film or television show.The fact that these movies (at least the sequels) are a parody of supposed conservative values tells you that the makers are liberal.  No one could possibly take this movie seriously.  It would be like claiming the WWF is a sport and, as such, it is in dire need of "instant replay" cameras to ensure the 'integrity' of the wrestling matches.  Some ideas are just non-starters.Okay, enough political commentary from me and on to the review of the actual movie.Folks, the Golan-Globus stench reaches far and wide with yet another cheesy-looking, cheap-looking, terribly acted movie put forth by them for public consumption.  It is actually depressing to think that there is a city somewhere in America that actually has a section that looks that bad.  But there must be.  G&G are notoriously tight-fisted with the greenbacks during production--and there is absolutely no way they could have afforded to build such a wasteland.The storyline is the same...more death and destruction, with Kersey taking on the role of savior of the oppressed neighborhood in this version.  If Bronson keeps making these, we'll end up seeing something like "Death Wish 27:  Kersey vs. Micheal Meyers."  That's how bad they've become!  Bronson's character has evolved from a mild-mannered architect in the original film--a man you could sympathize with and even cheer on a bit without feeling like a fascist--to a thoroughly grizzled charicature who now uses light artillery to take out the bad guys.The acting is awful and the script is even worse.  The action scenes are laughable, conveying no sense of realism or intensity--despite all of the bang and boom.  And I'd really like to know where G&G hired their extras.  Those gang members riding in on motorcyles looked a little too seedy to be actors.  And they sure as heck didn't know how to act--the scene where they greet their brothers-in-arms is a hoot.This movie isn't just bad.  It's laughably bad.
Walt Must Be Twisting In His Grave!. This movie is very bad, and I mean HORRIBLE. Vin Diesel cannot act! What the heck was he thinking?! Walt Disney must be twisting in his grave!! I will never see this film ever again.The rest of the cast is disgusting, stupid, and terrible. They get dumber in every part of the movie, and a baby cries through a couple of parts of the film... and it gets very ANNOYING.If Walt Disney were alive, he'd yell at Vin Diesel, and all the actors in this movie. And the final thing, this is not "comedy" AT ALL.
Worst movie EVER!!. I purchased this movie based upon the reviews and recommendations from others on Amazon.com who ( I assumed ) had watched it and liked it.  Not knowing the titles or directors of good erotica, I based my decision on those comments.  I have to say, and I'm usually NOT one to go off griping about things that don't deliver on their "advertised" qualities, but this was by far and without a doubt the WORST movie of ANY category I have ever seen.  I considered selling it on e-bay just to recover some of the cost, but I refuse to subject any poor unsuspecting man (or woman) to this garbage.  If you're looking for something to set the --mood-- this movie will NOT do it
Poser Generation-X. This stuff here is trash, filthy, dirty, & an embarassment to the world. I'm so glad that I was taught right about the world & I wouldn't let my future children & grand children watch this, it's bad influence to people, overall, this is for posers
Hypercube. "Cube 2: Hypercube" is NOTHING compared to the original "Cube". I admit, the idea of parallel universes is intriguing, but, being a sequel of the original "Cube" movie, I'm not satisfied with it as the subject matter.This movie isn't really a sequel-it's pegged as a sequel, but it attempts to retell the same story that "Cube" told brilliantly at first, just in a different way. But not really.The first movie, "Cube," is excellent, though, and even though it just kind of...ends, as some might say, it still tells the story and conveys all the themes it needs to and, I suspect, was attempting to. This isn't really a sequel to "Cube"-it's a remake. And, personally, I prefer the original.The thing about "Cube" is that it doesn't step out of the reality that you and I are familiar with. Because of that it is all the more terrifying. That kind of terror, this movie, "Cube 2: Hypercube" lacked.For fans of the original "Cube," don't bother with this movie
go to he**. In the worlds time of crisis you have to show your true colors!!!!! Go to HELL!!!!!!!!!!!!!
My House in Umbria. DVD would not play. DVD stuck and would not go forward
Wow, really awful. While the ending of this film is a surprise and a little interesting, it is in no way worth sitting through the rest of the movie.  Truly stilted, awkward dialouge and some really unaturally bad acting makes this film painful to watch
Don't waste your time purchasing this product. I didn't like this video for several reasons.  The rubber band is a waste of time and hurts your hands.  I was looking for an aerobic video.  I have Gilad - Bodies in Motion which is great but was getting bored with it since I had it for four years. Let me just say I'm sticking with Gilad because Denise does nothing for me.  You don't even feel like you had a workout with her.  She's boring.  I would recommend Gilad for aerobics and Tamilee Webb for toning.  Tamilee is awesome.   I have many of her videos and I'm a true fan of hers
Jerry Lewis' Worst Movie. I admit I gave up on this movie after about 50 minutes.   But up to that point the whole "comedy" revolved around Dean Martin bullying and shouting at Jerry Lewis, for no obvious reason.   I am a life-long Jerry Lewis fan, I adore many of his movies, but not this one.   It is pointless tripe.   I never thought I'd give up on a Jerry Lewis movie, without watching it all the way through.   But after 50 minutes, I felt like shouting back at Dean Martin for his odious carry on in this film.   Whoever wrote the script doesn't know the first thing about humour.   What a tedious movie!!!
"You're not a loser, Eddie, you're a winner. Some men never get to feel that way about anything.". Robert Rossen's "The Hustler" is a film about relationships and self-destruction.  It is a tale about learning to triumph in life by recognizing the limitations of your dreams.Eddie Felson (Paul Newman) is a pool hustler who wants to prove that he is the best pool player around.  He seeks out a game with the legendary Minnesota Fats (Jackie Gleason) and is crushed when the game does not unfold as he envisioned.  Felson moves on and slowly starts to regain his confidence with the help of fellow lost soul Sarah Packard (Piper Laurie).  After hooking up with gambler Bert Gordon (George C. Scott), Felson sets out for Louisville with Packard in tow to compete in a big-money match.  After getting a hard lesson on the cruel realities of life, Felson seeks out a rematch with Minnesota Fats to prove that he has become a changed man."The Hustler" looks spectacular in glorious black and white and the pool matches crackle with energy.  However, the character arcs are not as well engaging as they should be.  Felson's transformation feels rushed and is lacking the emotional depth needed to round out his character.  Sarah Packard is similarly underdeveloped.  Her fate should have more of an impact on the viewer but it does not because not enough time has been spent to develop her beforehand.  Scott and Gleason fare better in their roles with the latter being a revelation in a dramatic role.  Also, Newman again proves why he is considered a legend of the silver screen with his strong performance.  Yet, "The Hustler" just does not have enough going for it in the end.
2.35 STARS:  could have been three stars, but too many flaws. This movie is somewhat difficult to rate in my opinion because there are some good things about "Clownhouse" and some bad things about it.  The movie starts out with a young boy named Casey who is for somereason very afraid of clowns...he wets his bed when he has nightmares about them.  It appears the boy is about 11 years old and he has two brothers named Geoffery and Randy, probably 13 and 16 respectively.  Geoffery is sympathetic towards Casey while Randy is a total jerk and seems determined to torment them both.Well, a carnival comes into town and Casey apprehensively goes along, but his fear of clowns is incredible.  In this movie, it turns out that his fear was well warranted.  At first, I thought this movie was going to be another "The Funhouse" but it was not.  That being said, "The Funhouse" is superior in every way to "Clownhouse".As "Clownhouse" moves along, the viewer notices three individuals who appear to be quite malevolent in nature.  Indeed, these three men kill three clowns and dress up in their clown costumes.  The killing scenes were below average and not very effective at all.  What takes place afterwards is a long and sometimes boring chase scene where the clowns follow Casey back to his home.  The chase scenes are quite ridiculous to be honest with you...there is no way that Casey could have outrun these grown men and there is also no way that Casey would not have heard them running behind him.  Ultimately, the scenes move to Casey's house where the horror in this film really takes place.Frankly, the clowns did not appear to be that scary to me at all...in fact, at times, they looked stupid!.  When one considers the great horror movie villains of the past, the clowns looked pretty weak as far as horror movie villains are concerned, and as a result, these clowns were not very effective in creating horror in and of themselves; but, that being said, Salva does a good job of putting the clowns in position in the house unbeknownst to the boys and that is where this movie is effective as horror movie and becomes quite creepy.  However, this is not enough to put this movie over the hump as a really good horror movie.  I thought the moving around and the boys' lack of knowledge of the clowns in the two story house was quite effective and at times, the movie was quite chilling in this respect, but this is really all the movie has to offer.Once the clowns were discovered however, the movie declined in the level of horror that it had created and this is a sign of an inferior horror movie in my opinion with respect to the classics at least.  Moreover, I thought the times when the clowns actually engaged the young boys in combat were pretty lame...the three men would have easily killed these boys, but I suppose it wouldn't work if that happened, but I think that the movie would have been more effective and credible if the three boys in this movie were older...say, 17, 18 and 19.  Then, one as a viewer, might be willing to "buy" how the young boys disposed of the clowns.Another flaw of the movie is the acting in this movie is clearly below average and there is little character development except for Casey.  The characters did not provide the movie with enough of a foundation by which the viewer can actually appreciate the movie as a whole and not just based on it's horror values...in other words, the movie just wasn't very well done or directed as a whole.  Indeed, I did not think that the choice of three brothers was very effective as far as characters are concerned, especially being as young as they were.  I thought it was a little much trying to mesh the personalities of the three brothers into such a short movie.  But, like I said, it is hard to rate "Clownhouse" as there really are some chilling moments when the clowns enter the house unbeknownst to the young boys, but that being said, this movie is not without major flaws and all and all, I can only reluctantly endorse this movie as a horror movie worth renting,but cannot really suggest that this movie is worth owning.  2.35 STARS for this flick which in my grading system is about average.  I hope this review is helpful for you in determining the pros and cons of this movie while also explaining the plot without giving away too much of the movie.
Heart not alive on my Xbox360. My HD-DVD also does not work on the 360 add on. I tried the press OK and everything else I could think of. This disk just freezes right after the production logo when it should be going to the menu. This is the only HD-DVD disk that I've had a problem with and I have about 10 of them. I didn't purchase the Chicago disk as I already have it and didn't think it was worth the HD purchase. I did purchase the Eagles HD-DVD and it is excellent. That one also has a trick to it. It defaults to a PCM stereo file so you have to triger it to the DTS ON mode and then it is amazing. I hope its true that microsoft is working on a patch for Heart. I saw them last year and they were fantastic. Not as good as the old days but neither am I. They still surprised me that they sounded sooo good.**** UPDATE**** Since Amazon doesn't have acceptible response.E-mail from distributor IMAGE ENTERTAINMENT received 2-13-07:Dear DaveThank you for you inquiry. We apologize for the inconvenience you are experiencing with our product, but the problem is not with the software. This issue is isolated to the Xbox add-on, as our product plays as intended on all stand-alone players. Our replicator initially found this problem and has been working directly with Microsoft and they are close to resolving this issue. We remain in communication with both the replicator and Microsoft and we believe that an announcement will be made as soon as a firmware upgrade is available, after which time, your disc will play as intended.Again, we apologize for this temporary inconvenience.Thank youDedra L DeanCustomer Service RepresentativeImage EntertainmentHope this helps you all. It made me happy!
Lovely, haunting story, marred by an unrealistic Jennifer Jones. I remember reading this story in junior high school - it's a wonderful, haunting tale of the love between a struggling artist and a mysterious girl who ages in fast forward.This was the first time I had ever seen the movie, and right off the bat, I was bothered by Jennifer Jones's appearance.   Jones's features immediately struck me as those of someone who had recently had plastic surgery.   I've seen enough of these to know the subtle signs.For this fantasy storyline to work, one has to accept Jennifer Jones as a sweet, innocent young girl who grows up into a twenty something woman.  And Jones's plastic appearance immediately put the kibosh on any possibility of being believable as sweet and innocentAt the time that this movie was made (filmed at various times from 1947 to 1948), Jennifer Jones was already 28-29 years old.  That's the age at which some fair skinned people start having the beginnings of wrinkles and sagging skin.  No doubt she needed some work to make her face as smooth as a young teenager again.  Unfortunately, whoever did her surgery didn't quite get it right (there are better plastic surgeons these days).The multitude of closeup shots in this movie only emphasize the dissonance in the appearance of Jones's face.   The skin on her cheeks and forehead are taught as a drum, and her cheekbones are emphasized while the cheeks are hollowed out.  In some closeup shots, there are still a few wrinkles in her eyelids, while in other shots the underside of her jaw bulges and sags slightly.  These are areas that a modern surgeon could have taken care of better.The biggest problem in her appearance is that her mouth is widened out unnaturally by this selective (and somewhat overdone) pulling of skin.  That's because the basic facelift involves pulling the skin from the side, and trimming off the excess in an incision right in front of the ears.   Do this to yourself in front of a mirror and you will see the effect - the cheeks get tightened and hollowed out, the cheekbones emphasized, and the mouth is widened laterally by this skin pulling.I couldn't help but focus on Jennifer Jones's odd looking facelift appearance as I watched this movie.  It sure ruined it.Ugh.....
YAWN... Not what I expected when renting this movie. As others have said Clarissa came off too pure and innocent.  Futhermore, I don't understand why such a viriginal woman would run off to be with one of the most horrid men in the world?  Everyone knows what Lovelace has done..there are numerous accounts. Yet she goes with him anyway?  Blah.  The acting was OK. The costumes were excellent(I love period movies) but the plot dragged and dragged and dragged.  And as another put it, I was very glad when Clarissa kicked the bucket.I read a lot of historical fiction, classic novels and love period movies, but there was no liking this one. It just couldnt be done
IS THERE A GOOD ACTRESS OUT THERE????. An intelligent script is done in by the overdone histrionics of Miss McEntire who it seems cannot act her way out of a paper bag.  Her performance is laughable.  It ruins a good story.
I REGRET EVER RENTING THIS STUPID-A** BULLSH*T. A COP GOES UNDERCOVER AT A LOCAL HIGH SCHOOL TO INVESTIGATE A MURDER AND TO BRING DOWN A VICIOUS GANG OF DRUG DEALERS. VERY CHEAP AND VERY SENSELESS. FOR A GANGSTA MOVIE, THIS SEEMS TO HAVE QUITE A BIT OF FIGHTS. JAMES CAHILL MUST THINK HE'S BRUCE LEE THE WAY HE BE FIGHTING HIS WAY THROUGH ALL THE GANGS. THIS DEFINITELY IS ONE GANGSTA MOVIE I'M ASHAMED TO SAY I'VE SEEN. FILLED WITH HILLARIOUSLY BAD ACTING AND VERY POINTLESS ACTION SCENES. THIS MOVIE SHOULD'VE NEVER EVER BEEN MADE IN THE FIRST PLACE
How Many Times Are They Going to Make This Doggy Movie?. You know, usually I am a big fan of older movies as they were typically made better and had better writing, etc. One strong exception that I just watched was "King Solomon's Mines" from 1950. What a doggy movie! It makes even the lamest Disney movie watchable. Basically, it is "Hey, look at that animal!" and then a cut to some stock footage, except in one case where a giant rubber spider creature creeped along like a relative of "The Tingler". Star Stewart Granger also seemed to understand every African language dialect except when it was really important. And, there was also an emphasis on how much ammunition was left, so the final bullets were used on certain natives to great effect. Once they got to the mine itself, it was still snoresville and basically a letdown. This was made before in 1937 and again in 1985 and in 2004 which seemingly the same results according to other reviews. Why do they keep making this same stupid movie???
A well acted snooze fest with juvenile politics. This is billed as a thriller but there are hardly any thrills.  It would have benefitted from some judicious cutting to make it a little leaner.  The shaky camera work detracts from some decent scenery.The politics of the film contain no subtlety or shades of gray; I can almost see a couple of college sophomores hitting the bong and sitting down to hash out the script:Bong-hitting liberal student who has no clue about the real world #1:  ...and then she discovers the evil corporation has been testing...BHLSWHNCATRW #2: (Interrupts)  "Evil Corporation"?  Why are you being redundant?The only plus for my wife and I was the acting, which was great.  Fiennes was especially good, underplaying his character in the early parts of the film, resulting in a character with depth and nuance.  I only wish the rest of the film was worthy of the performances contained within it
Not what I expected from other reviews... I don't know alot about old movies, especially not silent film, or anything before the 40's, so maybe my opinion is that of a dummy. Most of the shots were very long, repetitive, and boring. It was rare for a scene to have much editing at all, it was mostly a single shot showing frantic action that doesn't tell much of a story at all. The woman who reads the text screens is obnoxious. In my opinion, I'd rather read it myself than have it read to me. I don't like that voice there. As some of the other reviewers have said, some of the effects and costuming worked very well. Very impressive for the time. The direction, action, and pacing/storytelling just didn't seem to work well at all for me. Very slow. I fell asleep several times and had to rewind. If you want a good silent film, check out Steamboat Bill, Jr. Excellent
Hands down the worst of the series (that has to do with Michael). Yup, definately the worst Halloween movie. Come on, Michael on a reality show? Ha! What the f**k does that have to do with the series? Not only that, but the plot is completely pointless, the acting sucks, and Dr. Loomis and Jamie are nowhere to be found in the movie! Not only that, but the movie relies way too much on gore to be scary, and therefore comes off as pretentious. Don't get me wrong, I LOVE gore in movies, horror or not, but any knowledgable Halloween fan knows that the Halloween movies were always scary without the gore. Along with Halloween 3 (which actually had nothing to do with Michael), Halloween: Resurrection reigns as the worst movie of the series. There are a many more problems with the movie than the ones I listed, but I'm tired of typing, so I'll let other reviewers explain why it's so bad. Bottom line, watch ANY Halloween movie other than this or Halloween 3
THEY TRIED I GUESS. The saga of the candyman continues in this third installment of the hit series. I can remember the first time I watched the original created by Clive Barker, I luv'd it, the same can't be said for this film. Caroline is last living descendent of the candyman, and he wants to end it all by ending her. All who watch this film and the acting of Donna D' Errico will wish for the same thing. One would only think that she got the job to secure watchers of Baywatch for the film and for that reason only, or maybe it's because a little fragile thing like her can't take on candyman head on. Get a real actress like KATHY BATES in there and she'll kick his ass {MISERY is a classic}.As far as Tony Todd is concerned he does a good job in this film, but not as scary as he has been in the other films. He does a good job none the less, and serves as a co-producer. As far as the script goes it's a decent attempt at the franchise, Al Septien & director Turi Meyer do what they can. But that doesn't save the film from being less then average. Side performances from the art gallery owner, the two bad cops, and the gypsy women are great and save the film a little.There isn't much to the story, Caroline is his last descendent and he wants to stop his pain by taking her. People she knows gets killed so it looks like she did it, and she tries to stop him, that's it nothing more to it. Over all a more worthy sequel of its predecessors would be more enjoyable.
Uncle Buck with John Candy. This movie was not entertaining at all, bad script, etc
Okay. I agree with David Thomson when he says few audiences in the West would be content to view an American epic composed solely of battles and their contexts. Kurosawa was a keen businessman and his reputation in the West was entrenched with "Kagemusha" and "Ran", he knew what (American) audiences think of as heroic and mystical about "historical" Japan: Kurosawa's art takes a great deal on its impetus from what Americans (or Westerners) imagine about Japan. He was not popular in Japan (where they thought his stuff was particularly hokey and outmoded, hence the suicide attempt). I am not saying that the work is rubbish - there is no "ugly" shot in either "Ran" or "Kag" - merely that there are more "authentically Japanese" films out there to choose from.
TorpanInternational. This film is a piece of historical record,but thats as far as it went.Im sad that the screen writer want to concentrate on forification ,as much as did.More explaination of the object ---history would have brought it up to a higher standard.Sorry it didnt go to 3 star
Very Dissapointing Mr. Lynch. I should've known this was going to be bad when inside the DVD is an advertisement for David Lynch's own brand of coffee beans.  Can we say sell-out!?  I expected these short films to be awesome. Instead what we get are boring and dissapointing short films.  The first film feels amateurish, the 3rd one has David making a lamp for about a half hour that is boring as hell. During the Q&A he repeats the customers questions immediately after hearing the questions and it makes him look stupid and mentally challenged. I expected a lot more out of these along the lines of the "Short Films of David Lynch" but this is by far the worst thing Lynch has put out on DVD. FYI- I am a huge David Lynch fan so it does not please me to give this a negative review. There are a lot of Lynch snobs who feel everything he puts out is gold and this is simply not the case. This dvd was a waste of my time and money and I would never watch it again, neither should you
Vastly overrated. Having seen some animes and enjoyed them, I was casting around for some good animes to purchase. Stumbling across Ninja Scroll, I saw dozens of people declaring NS the best anime ever, an amazing anime, and a must-have. So I purchased it.This is far from the best anime ever. Is there a plot? Well, yes. But it's weak. Mostly there are just random fight scenes. Now, the fight scenes aren't bad, but there really needs to be more than fight scenes to make a good movie. And I don't understand why they decided to have blood spray from every wound as though someone had opened a fire hydrant.Ninja Scroll does have some cool parts, but it's mostly a weak plot full of mindless violence with some random sex thrown in. Far from the best anime ever
Wow, surprise. Im really astounded by how well this movie has been rated. I love Depp and I thought it was terrible. I think he wanted to do something a bit different and dark but this movie is just sort of pointless. It's about the English restoration and the rebirth of the theatre during a time when sex and murder and general taboo subjects were unacceptable but rampant. It takes the nature of the period to the extreme and was overall terrible. It acted like it was very profound but conveyed very little. It had potential to be an incredible movie but if you're looking for a Depp fix- just pick up something else.
Dean Cain vs. Giant Snake = So-So Movie. Another film in the never-ending series of "Giant Animated Snake Eats People" films that have been plaguing us for almost a decade.  The creators of a maximum-security prison in the Antarctic drill into a hollow rock formation and disturb the ten-million-plus slumber of 80-foot hungry reptile.There's nothing more to this film than that.  "Boa" (also known as "New Alcatraz") actually takes itself seriously instead of reveling in its silliness, which I don't think was a smart idea.  The technical team - photography, production design-set decoration, etc. - create a fairly effective, chilling atmosphere, but everything else about "Boa" is strictly routine.Dean Cain does a job I would describe as tolerable, although Elizabeth Lackey is just that - lacking - as his wife, and the supporting cast (Mark Sheppard, Grand L. Bush, Craig Wasson) is just a touch more professional.The film-makers actually make the wise move of mostly keeping the snake in the dark so we can't see just how fake it looks.I don't really recommend it unless you actually happen to enjoy this sort of thing to begin with; other, similar titles include "Python" 1 and 2, "Anaconda" (the original hokey animated killer snake movie of 1997) and "Anaconda: Search for the Blood Orchid", and the inevitable "Boa Vs. Python".The DVD includes a few trailers and filmographies for the director and principal actors.2/
Well meaning but dated and corny movie. Being a fan of obscure quality African American cinema I figured I would give Five on the Black hand Side a try.  After buying the title and attempting to sit through the movie 1.5 times, I found it rather dull and boring and overly corny. The movie lacks the energy and charisma that other African American classics like Cooley High have. Alot of the humor seems forced and invokes very little laughter.The movie definately presents African Americans in a positive light compaired to other 70's African American films. Unfortunately, the movie just has no entertainment value and its black consciouness does not help the movie above it's lethargic flow. I really wanted to support or like this movie on the merit of the issues presented but I simply could not. I am sure themes presented in the movie could possibly be done with a more entertaining result.Perhaps its because of a generation gap since the movie was done well before my birth?  Somebody that lived in the seventies era might enjoy it much more than myself.
another waste of a possible good movie. umm the title says pretty much how i feel about this movie soo much potential but it chokes. they are a few nice  scenes but  not enough to watch it again and  who really wants to see terry bradshaw's body  come on that was sick
Disappointed. The language in this movie was very inappropriate for family viewing and I would not recommend it to anyone.  I did not watch the entire movie because it never seemed to get any better
if considering this purchase, PLEASE READ!!!!. Interesting premise, great acting from an amazing cast. Maybe not as quite up there with abre les ojos, but still pretty good. Also and appearance or two from a very young and sexy Paz Vega.why the 1 star? I would give it zero If I could. THE QUALITY IS AWFUL!!!!!  this looks like a bootleg  from chinatown.well, this transfer was worse quality than that. If amazon would let me return it for a refund, I would be quite happy. There should be some sort of quality check before this stuff can be released legally
Definitely teaches the basics. My husand and I purchased this DVD to sharpen our dance skills.  It was extremely basic, so if that's what you are looking for then this is for you.  The DVD was NOT new.  The steps were extremely basic and they teach you without music.  It moved along very slow, so my husband lost interest and we quit practicing with it.  It was not all that we had hoped for
Back to the well, and this one was shallow to begin with... I hate to admit I actually own this thing on VHS.  And unless my mind is going more than usual, I have this cut of the movie too.Double (and more) dipping by the studios seems to be the way of DVD.  We get at least four issues of Terminator 2, but none of Robinson Crusoe on Mars.  I personally am sick of it.Director's Cuts, Unrated Editions, and other snaky ways of trying to separate my money from my wallet.  No wonder I've taken to borrowing nearly all my DVDs from the Public Library.No, you generally don't get them the day they come out.  But honestly, when was the last time you purchased a movie from Hollyweird that was worth keeping?  Don't do it
Disappointing. A really disappointing DVD.  I love John Lovitz.  Funniest guy they had, but this DVD only has a couple of his  best bits.  Way too much other garbage mixed in with the few good parts
Disappointing. The famous ballet scene was omitted. They made Margeurite a nun which she never was, and it just doesn't work. Worst of all, they altered the original ending which depicted forgiveness and salvation (visually and in words and music)into a visually ghastly, gruesome scene totally inconsistent with the celestial music. Such changes to a masterpiece, whether it be a famous opera, as here, or to a Rembrandt cannot be justified, whether under a banner of "creativity" or any other
Not good... Just rented this dvd and was quite surprised.  Normally, I'm a big George Clooney and Matt Damon fan.  However, in this film, their talents were underutilized and did not make up for the poor script, editing, and direction which made this film quite dull to watch.While the idea behind the movie is good, it could have been more entertaing, dramatic, or suspensful.  As another reviewer remarked, I was quite tempted to shut it off after 45 minutes and watch something else.  But, I did suffer through to the end, where the film just sort of ends and leaves viewers hanging..
Expected so much, got so little...left feeling disappointed. Saw this Movie at the actual Premier in NYC and met Sturla Gunnerson and I told him exactly how I felt. Gerard Butler needed a bigger horse. I expected so much more out of this film and felt empty handed leaving the theater. Sarah Polleys language was uncalled for in the film. They could have written better lines. The fade in, fade out was like a child filming with a video camera. The film was funny at times and mixed with gore. Like eating sweet and sour. Being a Gerard Butler fan I was distressed after watching this film. Why did he do this? Gerry Butler is an incredibly talented actor and made the most out of the poor lines and bad pony riding scenes. This unfortunately will not be one of his great films he has done in the past like The Jury, Please or The Phantom of The Opera. I expect Mr. Butler to be past these B films and know he does have much better stuff in the works...than goodness.All in all the film was terrible. The scenery was captivating and breathless. I at times found myself saying wow, but it was about the story of Beowulf & Grendel and it did not meet my expectations that I have read even in the easiest translations. All I can say is Mr. Butler your an incredible talent, becareful what you choose. Movies like this can paved the way to a downward spiral. I know Mr. Butler is indeed better than this.
Go-go Gadget Hearthrob....uggh. I grew up watching Inspector Gadget in the 1980's, and was always fascinated by Penny's computer book. Since I only had to make do with a now obsolete Commodore 64 computer system, I thought that one book was the coolest part of the show.Sure, living with an uncle who you were smarter than would occasionally challenge the nerves, but Gadget (whose first name was never revealed) also seemed like a genuinely nice guy who tried to do the right thing.Before she ruined Buffy, Michelle Trachtenberg defamed Penny. In this movie, she appears as a brunette who lacks a computer (book) or otherwise to help Uncle Gadget---and basically save the day. In fact, Trachtenberg is not doing much of anything during this screenplay.Matthew Broderick's Gadget in contrast, is a ladies man. He meets up with Dr. Brenda Bradford (Joely Fisher) who ultimately is Robo Brenda. Since this is a family film, nothing bad happens but the idea of Inspector Gadget attracting anybody is really hard to take. He's SUPPOSED to be a bumbler who does not get the woman, the anti-James Bond for kids.Chief Quimby's (Dabney Coleman) appearance also poses some problems. He is too old and too thin in this movie. Chief Quimby is supposed to be a rotund person with light brown hair.Finally, the crucial part of Dr. Claw's sinister persona is that the audience only sees his hand. Rupert Everett is not supposed to show his face or have an actual claw for a hand. The studios could have saved bundles of their precious money (and made this screen play more authentic) by hiring a literal nobody to sit behind a chair and speak into a voice distorter while an animatronic MAD cat was giggling in agreement. According to the cartoon, Dr. Claw actually had a metal gloved hand with a spiked gold bracelet.Since Andy Heyward oversaw production on both the earlier cartoon and then this movie, I am really shocked by the large discrepancies. If he cannot exercise product control over his own cartoon product, I really have no sympathy for this film's poor returns. The people who would have incentive to revive their franchise with a great live action film, blew it instead.
To be and to have DVD. Unfortunately the DVD I received was a region 1 DVD, and could not be played i Denmark, which I informed you about, and after som exchanges of mail you very kindly arranged a refund to my account of the purchase price and I have bought the same DVD from another source, although I probably could have bought a usable DVD from Amazon in the UK, but this information was never relayed to me. I only have to live with the cost of importing the DVD into Denmark, about the purchase value of the DVD, but every experience costs money, normally.So thank you for your service in this matter.Best regardsPeter Daugbjer
the squatter as hero. In terms of both format and style - and despite its superficially modernist tendencies - "Rent" has its roots firmly planted in the grand old operatic tradition.  Yet, it suffers from the weakness common to most modern musicals in which the characters sing virtually nonstop throughout the entire production - which is that it makes it hard for the audience to connect with the characters.  In more traditional musicals, the long stretches of spoken exposition between song-and-dance sequences serve as an opportunity for the audience to get to know the characters as recognizable, flesh-and-blood human beings.  This is less of a problem with a florid romantic fantasy like "Phantom of the Opera," which seems a natural for this type of approach, but with material like "Rent," which is small in scale and intimate in scope, the constant singing serves as a distancing device for the audience.  I know that this play (and, perhaps now, even the movie) has generated a passionately loyal fan base who considers "Rent" practically sacrosanct and therefore beyond criticism, but to someone, like myself, coming cold to the work, "Rent" adds up to much less than the sum of its parts.The story, a modern day update of "La Boheme" set in Greenwich Village, starts on Christmas Eve, 1989, and ends on Christmas Eve, 1990.  This was at the height of the AIDS epidemic, and, indeed, many of the film's characters - primarily gay men and former junkies - are struggling with the disease (AIDS being the modern equivalent of the consumption used in the original story).  There's also a wheezy subplot involving a real estate company that wants to evict the starving artists (one is tempted to call them "deadbeats") from a building in order to further their diabolical scheme of re-developing a city block."Rent" - with its noble "performance artists" doing battle against the Big Bad Corporate Bullies - feels less like a relic from the `80's than one from the `60's.  Though intended to be the heroes of the piece, the artists and bohemians often come across as nave, painfully self-absorbed, and annoyingly self-righteous, an attitude epitomized by one of the characters rigging a local ATM machine so that his buddies can withdraw unlimited amounts of money from it using his dead boyfriend's name (the heavily allegorical "Angel") as the password (this is somehow supposed to be seen as admirable and a tribute to the spirit of the dead man).  Anything`s better than actually working, I suppose, and becoming a tool of corporate America.  When one of the men finally takes a dreaded "job" ( a mere sinecure, I might add) so that he can actually pay the rent he owes (horrors!), he acts as if he is selling his soul to Satan, and has to have two of his lady friends accompany him to the interview for moral support and to offer him assurances that he will still be able to live with himself even after he has soiled his hands with the dirty mammon from an honest-to-God paycheck.  I wonder why it never occurs to any of these characters that the capitalist system they loathe so deeply is also helping to produce drugs that will one day lead to a possible cure for the disease that afflicts them.With the exception of newcomer Rosario Dawson, the filmmakers have retained most of the original Broadway cast members for the movie, and even though their acting isn't all that impressive, some of them do very well indeed at singing and dancing.   In his direction, Chris Columbus has broken away from the confines of the original production, but he never manages to bring us into the world of the people we're watching.  Despite the constantly tracking - sometimes even spinning - camera he has chosen to employ, the film still feels stagy, over-stylized and artificial in almost every scene.As to the libretto by the late Jonathon Larsen, only one tune strikes me as truly memorable, while the rest all sound like repetitive musical doodling.  One of the problems, too, with having so much of the conversation sung rather than spoken is that the lines are sometimes so utilitarian, pedestrian and prosaic - when they aren't pseudo-intellectual drivel on the order of "the opposite of war isn't peace; it's creation" - that they become unintentionally funny when set to music.  It's not for nothing that the Sharks and the Jets didn't actually sing out most of their confrontations.There are, admittedly, some very moving passages in the last half hour of the film as the disease finally begins taking its grim toll on several of the characters, but those moments of quality are completely undercut by one of the silliest copout endings I have ever seen in a motion picture.  In that one crucial moment, the movie descends to the level of low comedy and farce, taking any pretensions to seriousness right down the drain with it.I don`t question for a moment the basic humanity and sincerity of the people responsible for "Rent" (or of its many devoted followers), but it`s hard to get too worked up over a story whose premise seems to be that people - especially "sensitive" artists - should be allowed to live on other people`s properties for free
The Thin Red Line between good and bad acting. I thought I remembered this as being a good movie when I was a kid. Upon seeing this movie again, some thirty-five years later; I was wrong. The acting is terrible and the story has more than a few technical flaws that really irked me. Such as the soldiers with no grenandes hanging from their web gear (they magically appear during the battle scenes), or only one BAR in the entire company, and no one wearing bandoleers of ammo for their M-1 rifles. And one of the biggest faux's was the use of German MP-40's (9mm subguns) by both the Americans and Japanese (In the Pacific War?).A cheaply made movie (technically speaking) for only the psychological impact. I guess I'm just used to more realism than was displayed in this movie. If you've ever seen bad acting when a soldier is getting shot - a la "Hell Is For Heroes," then you're really going to laugh at the way guys die in this movie. Ugh! I'm donating my video to the local library.
Terrible. I used to like this film back in the late 80s but after purchasing it, reading the book and watching it again I realized that there isn't much to say that is redeeming of this film. Sure it's low budget, but the story and characters are so cheesy and NOT in a good b movie way. I guess this film will still have it's fans but after reading the book (I dont normally compare books to films because its downright impossible to compare) I found the characters just not that likeable and the ending is very ridiculous. For a film to achieve cult status isn't too hard if its a b movie but whether its a good film or not is the real question. As for me I rate this low because I find it atrocious but for it's fans, the ones out there that REALLY love this film and call it a "classic" I must say I hope some day they remake the story with better actors, effects and plotting
the name says it all. this movie is one of the 3 ~worst~ movies I've ever seen.these 98 minutes seemed more like 6 hours.and for chrissake - he's NOT an american
A Great film,BEWARE OF PUBLIC DOMAIN VERSIONS!. &quot;Metropolis&quot;,Fritz Lang's 1927 silent masterpiece,is one of the most important films ever made and also a great one! But over the years,this film has been reedited,recut,and shortened which ruins the exact vision of an extrordinary filmmaker.Since its stay on the Public Domain shelf,the prints and image quality have over the years been poor.I DO NOT recommend the following versions:1.the Goodtimes Video release has poor image quality and even worse,NO MUSICAL SCORE! 2.The now-notorious Madacy DVD, which is about 5 times as worse as the Goodtimes video release,contains horrible,blurry image quality,freeze-frame opening titles,and an annoying musical score! Just recently,TCM (Turner Classic Movies) has broadcast the brand-new,beautifully restored 2002 restoration of &quot;Metropolis&quot; which I taped off of and trust me,it's well worth it! Buy the Kino restored version on either VHS or DVD,but DO NOT buy the horrible Public Domain versions which can definitely rip you off! A Terrific film and thanks to Kino for making this restored version a definite must-see! I also recommend the 1984 rerelease by Giorgio Moroder (which is now unfortunately out-of-print)and buy the soundtrack to go with it
Rapid Fire has no fire to rapidly fire with. Brandon Lee's (Legacy Of Rage, The Crow) second to last film before his untimely passing. This has Lee going up against Nick Mancuso, when Lee witnesses Mancuso whack a guy in coldblood. Lee is then put into witness protection in a safe house where even there he isnt safe. Soon he doesnt know who to trust, the cops or a rouge cop Powers Boothe (Frailty, U-Turn), but he joins Boothe's side, so lee teams up and they try to take Mancuso out. Lee cant deliver his lines but he sure knows how to kick some ass. The action scenes, some of them are tedious, but most of them for example where Lee fights the corrupt cops in the safe house, are at best. Boothes' acting in this is so mindnumbingly idiotic with him trying to be macho but he cant pull it off. Mancuso must of had a blast with his part. Also starring Raymond J. Barry (The Deep End, Dead Man Walking), Kate Hodge, Tzi Ma (Rush Hour, The Ladykillers 04'), Michael Paul Chan (Spy Game) and Dustin Nguyen (The Doom Generation, tv's V.I.P.).
You get what you pay for... terrible film-DVD transfers, and yes, you get 50 movies for about $13, but look at the titles carefully.  if you feel you can enjoy at least 2 of the movies, then this set is worth it (for me it was being able to watch "Horror Express" and "Bad Taste" for the 1st time in decades).  otherwise - WOW!  there's a lot of crappy movies in the box
error. I live in Europe and I didn't think of one thing; my dvd- player has a region- code. So, I can't play the dvd Warlock ! What to do now ?
I agree...it's disappointing. This DVD is nothing more than a recycling of 3 previous episodes of the show.  For a "best of" volume, I expected much shorter segments from many more episodes that actually did contain what the DVD case advertises, namely "the best of" and the "scariest moments."  In my opinion, this volume fails to deliver what it promises.  I am definitely a fan of the series, and I know there are much better moments it has to offer.  About the only thing you can really expect to enjoy on this DVD are some fairly decent examples of EVP (Electronic Voice Phenomenon).  Even though the DVD is fairly inexpensive, I don't think it's worth the cost
ugh. this was just an excuse to have beautiful naked adolescence running around on a beach in Fiji.Ugh
Pick up your violin, David.... I liked David Cross more when he was the violinist for King Crimson in the 1970's.  His comedy pales in comparison to his progressive rock credentials.  Hopefully, David will call up Robert Fripp and get it together with Crimson again..
Do not rent, and definetively do not buy!!. Probably the worst Disney-release I have ever seen, badly drawn, and no "movie" at all, it is a collection of three different, but thin(!) stories. In other words; not the usual Disney-charm on this one
More Madacy trash... Madacy has done it again...taken what could have been decent DVD's and turned them into trash. The video transfer from film is very poor, but the worst is the audio. Madacy has a history of producing low-cost low-quality  legacy DVD's, just look at other reviews of Madacy titles (check out  Charlie Chaplin DVD's). This is a shame because younger folks who've never  seen these classics may walk away with the wrong impression
Mr. L Mapes. I was very disappointed in this product, as the recordings were the worst I've ever seen. I could have done a better job of recording these for re-sale. With all the Computor knowledge that we have today, it's a shame that a product of this quality would be sold. Amazon, you messed up good this time.
Review of DVD not production. Firstly I have to say that this is not a Mobile Masterpiece production it is a BBC production.  The production itself is excellent, my favorite adaption of the Charles Dickens novel.Unfortunately the DVD has been put together as if you are watching the production on television.  There is an introduction by an American presenter who states that what you are watching is a Mobile production.  This is tolerable but once you start watching you find that little icons appear on the screen as would appear on television (I think they are to inform the viewer that wide screen is available).  Finally, before the end credits of the first part, you get to see what will be in next weeks episode.It would have been a simple matter to take the original recording as supplied by the BBC and use this one for the DVD.  For some reason the DVD producer decided that is was better to have exactly the same recording as was shown on American television.If you want to get a copy of this production I would recommend getting one that was made for the British market
Drown, damn you, drown!!. How could Mr. Cameron take a subject like this and a cast and brig out the worst in everybody?The production design and cinematopraphy are sumptuos, but the script and dialogue are so banal, the fine cast delivering one empty performance after another. (Including Leo, who was so good in "What's Eating Gilbert Grape?" in 1993 when I didn't yet know who he was, I thought he was really a cute little retarded kid... yet in "Titanic", there's just nothing there--- or nothing permitted).Talk about a SHIP wreck!!Only the two studio-backed block voting resulted in the record-tying Oscar wins/nominations.
FOCUS, PLEASE!!!. I haven't seen work of this quality since high school AV class. Friends of Ram Dass will skip this embarrassing mess like first period biology. Too bad this story wasn't entrusted to a more competent documentarian.
How Many Times Are They Going to Make This Doggy Movie?. You know, usually I am a big fan of older movies as they were typically made better and had better writing, etc. One strong exception that I just watched was "King Solomon's Mines" from 1950. What a doggy movie! It makes even the lamest Disney movie watchable. Basically, it is "Hey, look at that animal!" and then a cut to some stock footage, except in one case where a giant rubber spider creature creeped along like a relative of "The Tingler". Star Stewart Granger also seemed to understand every African language dialect except when it was really important. And, there was also an emphasis on how much ammunition was left, so the final bullets were used on certain natives to great effect. Once they got to the mine itself, it was still snoresville and basically a letdown. This was made before in 1937 and again in 1985 and in 2004 which seemingly the same results according to other reviews. Why do they keep making this same stupid movie???
Laughably bad.. Ha ha ha.. I can't stop laughing about how terrible this film (and I use the term film very loosely) is. What would ever posess such a great actor like Al Pacino to star in this horrible farce?The story line goes nowhere and plot is non existent. My advice to the director.. go back to film school and learn about plot points and utilizing the basic three act structure to build suspense.Seriously.. how could anyone like this boring, mellowdramatic, nonsensical, hogwash? It's as if it was a film by committee. A bunch of "executive-co producers" got together in a plush conference room somewhere in LA and while sipping their latte's and intermittantly using their blackberry's to paige their personal assistant about what type of Champagne they'd like for lunch, threw out their best ideas for a Spy thriller.. I know, how bout' we get Colin Farrell..Wow!.. that is sooo totally an awesome idea!!And that's where this film began folks.. and ends.Don't waste your time, don't waste your three bucks at Blockbuster, don't waste a rental cycle at Netflix, don't waste any good memories of the great Al Pacino you  may have, and whatever you do, don't buy this film for your DVD collection
NO ENGLISH SUBTITLES. There are NO English Subtitles as it says there are in the DVD Features. I would think subtitles would be a pretty standard feature in DVD movies these days - Artisan Entertainment is just lazy I guess...
Doubtful. Blade Runner didn't do much justice for me. There's something missing or wrong with the theatrical and the 1991 DC versions. I will give this movie another chance when it comes out next year. I hope Mr. Scott will give its proper cut
Mediocre At Best. Broly was one of my least favorite DBZ movies, along with Bojak unbound. One of the reasons I have a problem with a lot of the DBZ movies is that they follow the same pattern, Goku kills the main "bad guy" while the others are left weak and powerless. This movie in particular seemed slow on the action. Lastly, without bias, I can say that Vegeta was out of character as he said phrases like "Im going to be killed, were all going to be killed, he's the legenedary super saiyan." It bothers me when someone is out of character this much. To improve the DBZ movies, the creators must realize there are characters other than Goku, a few entire movies without him would be nice
Garry's friends show real flare. This film has many original themes that are played out in the movies of today. For those that watched "Total Eclipse" you remember Damsel Washington sniffing hair from a concealed location. Yep Gary (Alexander d'Arcy was born as Alexander Sarruf in Kairo) did it first. You have seen peeking throw a bush or from a tree at skinny dippers well it is here also. How about things that bite in the night? Yep.-----------------------Gary is taking a dance troupe to Singapore. We get to see them audition. On the way the plane crashes in the ocean. Now it is just Garry and the women. They spot an island and setup house. We know they are not alone. It turns out to be a "radioactive" Island. Something is lurking in the bushes and waiting to bite. This something is not Garry; or is it?---------------------This movie is so well known and universal that it has many names:Ein Toter hing im Netz (1960) [A Dead One Hung in the Net]Body in the Web (1962)A Corpse Hangs in the Web (1960)Girls of Spider Island (1960)Horrors of Spider Island (1965)It's Hot in Paradise (1962)The Spider's Web (1962)
biggest disappointment EVER. If you are looking for something shocking, don't bother with this movie.rape scene:  why doesn't she run???? why doesn't she fight??? how come there's all this blood on her all of a sudden??? where did that come from???? stupid.                                                            revenge scenes:  first of all, i wasn't upset enough to thirst for revenge.  second of all, the murder scenes were even weaker than the rape scene.what you've basically got here is a movie hollywood could remake, scene for scene, including every gratuitous moment. and it would get made.  it would show in theaters.  and lots of annoying people would think it was horrifying.  go rent "irreversible" it's much better at this sort of thing.
Rent it Before you Buy it. . As with volume 1, it could be a great anime but rent it first. If you can't watch it, it doesn't count for much. The discs don't play on all machines, same problem in the coding as the first. Bandai knows of the trouble with the discs but hasn't said anything about it or if they'll be doing anything about it. So again be warned.
dragging the art of skateboarding back another 30 years. if your a real skateboarder, you'll hate this film.if you don't skateboard you'll probably hate skateboarders after this film.truly terrible 'jump-on-the-band-wagon-cos-skatins-cool-for-a-while' tripe.'Gleaming the Cube' if funnier and its not even trying to be. check that out instead
You've got to be kidding. This movie is basically about 12 yr. old boys crying with each other.  When does that ever happen?  The dialogue is completely unbelievable considering the age of these kids.  What 12 yr. old worries about "..never getting out of this small town."?I guess if your childhood consisted of sitting around and crying with your friends, then you might enjoy this movie in some lame nostalgic sense.  I have a feeling Oprah would like this movie.
GARBAGE. It looks like this film was shot in someone's basement. Katt didn't sale his jokes. But his uses some of these joke in the "Pimp Chronicles" and he really sales them. Wouldn't recommend this dvd
Propaganda film. This film is about WW II, and one of the key, islands we took from the Japanese. I find it very, well acted (in a hammy, sort of way).
did they read the book?. it seems like the actors didn't even read the book before they decided how to play their parts!  amanda root is terrible as anne elliot... overly timid and shy... captain wentworth isn't at all handsome or dashing... and when they finally get together at the end, it's so awkward, bland, and unclimactic you wished you'd never watched the movie because it so tainted the way you saw that moment as you read it in the book... some people might have liked it, but i definitely didn't.  to get an idea of the adaptions of jane austen i did like, i liked the keira knightley and the colin firth versions of pride and prejudice.  this movie could have been bette
Boring. There's nothing clever or subtle about this movie, there's no energy or chemistry, and it ain't even funny. Many movies can get away with formulas and cliches, but not this one.There are two stories: one about cool kids and nerds, the other a love story. The cool kids are beautiful, dumb, and cruel, the nerds are unattractive, brainy, and kind. Josie - Drew Barrymore - is a nerd who was constantly abused by the cool kids when she was in high school. It seems that the cool kids had nothing better to do than to torture and humiliate Josie. Now that Josie is a 25-year-old newspaper copy editor - and still a virgin nerd - she is given her first journalistic assignment: to attend high school as an undercover student and produce a sensational story that will sell lots of papers. The only problem is that Josie is still a nerd, and she's no better at infiltrating the cool cabal than before. But that all begins to change when Josie eats a marijuana brownie. Deep inside the nerdish girl is a wild and crazy party girl desperate to get out, and it feels great when she does. And everyone likes the party girl better.Now the love story. There is one person who likes both the nerdy Josie and the wild and cool Josie: her 30-year-old Shakespeare teacher, who, by the way, is not a nerd but a cool teacher. I mean, he really likes her, and it shows. It almost seems that he's stalking her, because after school he's always where she is. But since the feelings are mutual, Josie doesn't mind. At the Senior Prom, while slow-dancing with Josie, the teacher is about to tell her how he feels, until she interrupts him because he is being recorded by the newspaper. In other words, Josie stops him from being caught committing a crime. Does Josie see any red flags that this teacher she loves is making moves on what he thinks is an underage high school student? No. Not only does she ignore the red flags, she makes a huge public display of their falling in love at the end of the movie, and everyone is ecstatic. Hey, what's more romantic than a cool high school teacher falling in love with a student?If in describing the absurdities of this movie I have made it sound less boring than it is, I'm sorry. It's really not worth your time.
Weak film with a spectacularly bad ending. I notice that most of the Amazon reviews of Secret Window have been written by fans of Johnny Depp, and that fact probably accounts for the higher than deserved ratings given to the film. While I have nothing against Depp, and actually think he's pretty good value, his emotional range is fairly limited. He does quirky very well, and funny also pretty well. And that's about it. I can't remember the last role he played where he was forced to connect emotionally with another character - he almost invariably plays the loner. I'm quite prepared to be proved wrong about this, as I'm by no means a Depp afficionado. But the films I have seen him in - Edward Scissorhands, Sleepy Hollow, Pirates of the Caribbean, Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas, Blow - pretty much all fit into this category.Having said that, Secret Window does not provide Depp with much of a chance to show his range, as it is about as subtle and enlightening as something neither subtle nor enlightening. Depp plays Mort Rainey, a successful author who has holed up in a cabin in the sleepy town of Tachmore Lake after a bitter separation and ongoing divorce from his wife Amy (played by Maria Bello). One morning he is confronted by a sinister redneck, John Shooter (John Turturro), who accuses Rainey of stealing his story and publishing it under another name - the "Secret Window" of the film's title. Rainey attempts to prove that this allegation is untrue, but predictably finds himself unable to do so, as things start to go disastrously wrong. Turturro's performance exudes malice, while Bello is fine as the emotionally confused ex-wife. Depp though, seems miscast. He portrays surface panic adequately, but genuine fear and paranoia are beyond him. However, I'm not sure any lead actor cast in this role could save what is a cliched and obvious thriller that provides very few thrills. The direction (by David Koepp) is fairly leaden, and, as others have already stated, the twist is both ludicrous and horribly telegraphed.
Dull Graveyard. Charles Band invites you into his Dull Graveyard...This movie starts with a little girl playing with a bunch of dolls. She mistakenly bumps into a table and breaks a vase. Her father comes downstairs and decides to punish her by forcing her to bury her little buddies in a grave outside. She somehow trips and falls into the grave, killing herself. Dad buries the daughter with her beloved toys. Flash forward to thirty years later, a new family has moved into the house. The youngest son is a nerdy geek who likes to collect action figures. Imagine his joy at discovering a whole gaggle of antique dolls buried in his back yard! These dolls come to life and start protecting their new owner by killing everyone that ever picked on him. There are no spoilers here, I'm not giving away anything that isn't on the back of the DVD case.Charles Band returns to what he knows best, making evil puppet horror movies. But just because this is what he knows best, doesn't mean he's any good at it. This is really just a reboot of Puppet Master and Demonic Toys with a new set of evil dolls. The production is shoddy, shot on a cheap DV camera with horrible lighting and a soundtrack that someone did on a Casio keyboard from 1982. Not to mention the fact that the puppets are the best actors in the movie.Ever since Charles Band came out of retirement or hiding, the Blockbuster shelves have been graced with horrible Full Moon movies that are a few pegs below what they used to be. Even in his prime, Charles Band was nobody's genius, but time has definitely taken its toll. Titles like DECADENT EVIL, DOLL GRAVEYARD and THE GINGERDEAD MAN prove that you can't keep a hack director down. Band is back, folks.
Very funny in the wrong way. I saw this movie in the theatre back in 1983.  At the time I thought it was the kitschiest film ever made. The costumes, and dance sequences were laughable and looked absurd even by 80's standards. Travolta had just been involved with a couple of flops (the romance movie with the wonderful Lily Tomlin, which I cannot remember the title) and I thought this would be the last we would see of him.  I was wrong and to his credit he has had staying power.  If you want a good laugh at a very goofy movie in which the dance scenes look more like one of today's  WWF matches or the strange love child of the later Rocky movies and Zanadu.
The Wild Side. There are two versions for this film , which is not generally known.  Someone selling it should.  I was not informed when I bought the G rated version.  THe repy I received was, "too bad.
awful, horrible, ridiculous. i cannot get thru this one.  i started fast-forwarding but there didn't appear to have any good spots.  when i saw that christian cammpbell was in this, i thought, this has to be good.  i had just finished a movie where he starred.  can't remember the name of it.  i guess a person should never buy a movie because of who stars in it.  tori spelling is well known, but not to me.  someone should have put her out of her misery right from the start.  she does not play a flake very well, and i don't know what to call her except a flake.  i stopped this dvd in about the first 1/2 hour and will go back and give it another shot, but with tori spelling as one of the leads, i already know this one does not have a prayer.  i would say; save your money on this one unless you are under 13.  i have a ton of straight and gay movies that tell a story and a couple or few that don't.  this one falls into this category. one that came with this one was "the broken hearts club" and while not my cup of tea it was far superior to this piece of garbage.
Drab. Autopsy is an ugly and unpleasant giallo from 1975 that I really didn't enjoy. Starring Mimsy Farmer, it tells the story of a spate of deaths that appear to be suicides but may actually be murders. Farmer plays Simona, a pathologist who has a very troubled personal life, as well as suffering from hallucinations at work, where she occasionally has visions of the corpses waking up! And that's just one confusing strand of a plot which is really hard to follow and much of it is unclear. Endless shots of sun flares keep flashing on the screen in an attempt to add style and intrigue, but this doesn't really work. You'll be hard pushed to make it to the end of the film having understood much of it... well I certainly didn't.But the film certainly delivers in the gore department, with lots of bloody corpses on display, plus several scenes that give you long glances at (what seem to be) actual medical photgraphs of dissections and murder victims, some of which are extremely disturbing. There's also a fair bit of nudity. What's missing, though, is any sense of joy or tenderness. Main character Simona is in a constant state of paranoia, and none of the other characters seem very happy either. Mimsy Farmer can act reasonably well (although we never get to see her look anything but miserable), but she looks decidedly uncomfortable with being naked, and her lovemaking scenes are unconvincing and poorly done. True, her character does have some intimacy issues, but no tolerance to this is ever seen on screen, in fact every male chararacter in the film pushes Simona around like a sack of potatoes, even her so-called boyfriend. This failing is down to the screenplay which makes no attempts to flesh out the characters beyond simple speaking and doing. They just don't have personalities. Simona even gets sexually assulted at one point by an ultra-sleazy colleague, but this is played out purely for screen thrills (Simona retaliates by stabbing him wildly with a fork), and no mention of the incident is ever made again, or how it actually affects Simona. By the end if the story, I had lost interest in everybody.To conclude, this is a gory thriller which has trouble engaging on any level other than looking at the screen to see gruesome stuff happening or people getting naked (whether alive or as corpses!). There's just not enough attention payed to character or story development. It's not even particularly nicely filmed. There are plenty of far more effective giallos than this out there, so I would'nt bother spending an hour and a half watching this Autopsy
A bad sequel to Once Upon a Time in China. This film does not come close to the quality of Once Upon a Time in China. First of all, the plot is weak, it does not have the kind of power that the original of this series did. The characters in this film seem like they are out of a comic book, while the characters in the first film were interesting and complex. The kungfu is mostly unrealistic wirework, and while Once Upon a Time in China had some of this, the emphasis was on realistic martial arts. In the original, the main characters were trying to resist the influence of the West which was destroying their culture, but in this version, the main characters are actually on the side of the Westerners and they are fighting their own people! There is no explanation of why Wong Fei Hung and his crew would side with the people who were their enemies in the last film. One of the reasons the original film was so good, was because it was about brave Chinese patriots trying to protect their culture, but in this film is seems as though they have switched sides
Bad porn. The setting of this film is in the late 70s, just before adult movie theatres were driven out of business by the invention of the VCR and the subsequent explosion of pornographic VHS tapes.  Burt Reynolds plays a porno director who has the effrontry to try and be "artistic" in his craft.  Heather Graham plays his psycho-starlet, and Mark Wahlberg plays a porn star who is....well.....let's just say, endowed.Wahlberg's character quickly becomes a huge hit and encounters success he would have never dreamed of. Wahlberg's character seems to be a sort of oblique allusion to John Holmes, although I don't know if the film-makers would admit as much.   At any rate, he becomes arrogant and begins to believe that he is loved for factors other than his "package."  This hubris leads to his un-doing as the world of porn coalesces with the world of drugs and LOTS of shady characters.This sounds like it would be the framework for a good movie.  Well, it could have been, but all the way through there seems to be something missing.  There are times the film "seems" to try and convey a message, but I'm not really sure.One thing I do know is that I quickly remembered why I've never cared for Wahlberg.  He has all the screen presence of a bowl of yogurt.   Also, I was expecting a LOT more skin than what the film delivered.  Given the context of the film, one would think that it would be an excuse to parade miles of topless women.  That's simply not the case.In the end, however, the biggest problem of this movie isn't Wahlberg or the lack of nudity.  The difficulty is that it's just plain boring.  I have more than a passing interest in the history of porn, and yet this flick failed to grab me
THE MIRACLE OF ... WHAT?. This is my first time in this forumI've seen the film of the 2nd disc and I found the copy...NOT ONLY BAD BUT UNNOTICEABLEAS A MIRACLE the last three fellows have seen the copy in good conditions. It is possible that FOX HOME VIDEO have changed and made new copies of the 2nd disc. If this is not true it is possible that they have discovered a fantastic ophtalmologist.I choose the first option.Are you so kind  -via Fox- to inform us how to change the bad copies in order to have all the collection in good conditions ?YoursR
I thought he already lost the election; why's he still campaining?. Hopelessly misguided.  Overwhelmingly biographical.  Smartly directed.Al Gore's never ending struggle to prove that mankind is destroying the earth and that the solution is international governmental control and primitive living reared its ugly head on the silver screen earlier this year and is now available on DVD!  Beware, though - that DVD is made of plastic, which is derived from a number of chemical compounds including - (gasp!) - oil.  The recipe for the movie, however, is 1 part science, 3 parts personal anecdotes, and 4 parts slideshow fun!Mr. Gore has taken the liberty of inventing a scientific consensus (this is, of course after he invented the internet) on which to start his new campaign for president.  His movie is almost entirely about his own life.  A fair amount is devoted to his current struggle to advance the environmental movement, and what is left over is a small amount of very misleading science.  It isn't, necessarily, bad science - it is just far from representational.  However, I won't waste this review debating the scientific ideas advanced by Mr. Gore - there are plenty of other scientists and resources for that.What needs to be recognized about this movie is that it is a campaign video and not an educational documentary.  There are components of informative dialogue and presentations, but this is really all about Al Gore, not global warming.  There is more discussion of how his political opponents have got in his way and in the way of his message than there is of actual solutions to the "problem."  This is my big criticism.  The movie masquerades as a documentary to advance an environmental cause when it really intends to advance Al Gore's availability for political office.  Even in that light it still operates dishonestly.Mr. Gore chastises the Bush administration for refusing to take action to stop global warming.  However, even when Gore was running the country with Bill Clinton, they did nothing.  In fact, Gore's proclamation in the movie that he tried diligently to get Kyoto passed but was stopped by the Republicans is bogus.  The Clinton administration found the protocol unworkable and challenged the fact that it only bound a few nations to action without timetables.  They never even submitted it to the Senate for ratification.  In this fashion, the movie continues with one dishonest claim after another.In the end, the movie is full of misleading science and statistics, complete lies and fabrications, and it focuses more on the nobility of Gore than on any perceived global issue.  The only thing that makes me give it a second star is the fact that it was smartly directed and well edited.  The message that the movie intended to convey comes across loud and clear and with style - it's just not a message that anyone should hear or trust
The world's full of lonely people. Patrick Dempsey had an usual niche in the 80s teen comedy, as did the characters he played.  He was the lovable loser who just wanted to fit in, somehow ends up getting caught up in some smutty encounter or another on his quest for acceptance, but is well liked and tended to have everything mostly work out for him in the end.  Here was no acception.He plays the lovable loser once again, this time he was an arrogant, cocky kid who blew his education by doing nothing but partying at college.  Disappointed and angry at his failing grades, his parents decide to stop supporting him and he is forced into the minimum wage workforce at a pizza place.  While Patrick is thoughly miserable working for slave labor, he encounters a beautiful, mysterious stranger who (like the plot to a bad porn movie) makes his job worth while with no strings attached.  While this fleeting encounter might have ended there, the mysterious stranger talked with her women friends about this, and soon Patrick is working as a gigalo under the guise of a pizza delivery guy.  The smutty adventures and hilarity ensue after that.  Long before Desperate Housewives he was their Afternoon Delight.What was amazing to me in watching this movie is that Patrick didn't have sex with all the women clients he eventually aquires.  He is simply a friend, a companion, someone to talk with.  I guess I just don't understand why some of the women he was servicing didn't try talking with their husbands about what was bothering them rather than letting this situation come to a head.  Of course, as infidelity is an ugly thing no matter how many screwball slapstick antics you apply to it like this movie did, it all comes crashing down on him when his mother rings up for some loving.  That's an urban ledgend if there ever was one.I gave this only 2 stars because the happily ever after ending was too hoaky for words.  Still, it is a commentary on the world being full of lonely people
Disappointing mastering. Due to a technical defect during mastering,this DVD(a verbatim transfer of the old RCA/Columbia Pictures VHS program) clips off the start of the song "Maneater".Hold off on buying this 7-song collection,because BMG may someday be releasing a more extensive Hall & Oates video collection on DVD.Legal problems concerning Lightyear Entertainment's claim of a long-term license on the 7 videos included in "7 Big Ones" have BMG's DVD on indefinite hold
Pretty Bad!!. The expectations for this film embraced the word, "epic," but all-in-all, this one missed the boat by orders of magnitude.  As a film that was likely intended to show the "reality" of life during trench warfare in World War I, it is an utter failure.  SO many missed opportunities here!  This film came about as close to accurately portraying trench warfare as "Apocalypse Now" did in accurately describing the Vietnam War, which was positively ludicrous.  In fact, this film is so bad that it makes the very limited combat scenes and trench warfare vignettes in "Sergeant York" look like an epic
R..... not PG. This movie is rated PG; yet I was not able to show this movie to my kids. I know that the world is full of aggression, however how can I sit with my family and watch a movie with so much violence between kids. Some will tell me that it is good to expose children to such violence and possibly reality of life and the human beings among each other. I totally disagree.This movie should be rated R and not PG2 stars, only because of the great acting; the story is basic, about  a father feeling awful for leaving his best buddy behind during the Vietnam War while his kids are fighting other children over a tree hut. I know I am probably going to bombarded with bad feedbacks however this is my honest opinion about this movie.
Has not aged well. Q (Larry Cohen, 1982)I have very fond memories of seeing this as a teen, and rented it for the purpose of giving it another look though older eyes. Unfortunately, to say Q hasn't aged well is being quite kind.Quetzalcoatl, the title character, is a very large bird/serpent who's flying around New York eating people who find themselves in high places. At least, he might be Quetzalcoatl (an Aztec god). Or he might just be a big mutant. No one knows. More to the point, no one seems to be overly surprised that there is a large flying serpent picking off New Yorkers. The cops assigned to the case, Shepard (David Carradine) and Powell (Richard Roundtree), certainly take things in stride. The Commissioner (Malachy McCourt, Frank's brother) is the only one who expresses any sort of normal reaction to the events-- disbelief.While the big bird and the cops are the meat of the story, its actual core is Jimmy Quinn (a young Michael Moriarty), a small-time crook who's run afoul of some tough characters through no real fault of his own. Jimmy's odd relationship with the monster could have turned this into a wonderful psychological thriller, and there are glimmers of that sort of thing, but the script never follows through. Q has more the feel of a quickie monster flick-- none of the storylines is explored much beyond the surface, the special effects are alarmingly (and hysterically) low-budget, and the characters, were they to stand still, could often substitute for props.But, hey, it's got a big flying lizard. That's something. *
Awful!. What a waste of talent! Watching this anemic compilation of unfunny bits begs the question.....who is at fault? I mean if this show was as bad as is represented here how did it ever stay on so long? First of all I don't blame the actors, actresses, and comedians. As we all know some of them were and are great. No.....here's how I think it all happenes. A bunch of pinhead writers (the kind that used to get beat up in high school) using this as a forum to "get even" with whoever and whatever snicker and giggle at what they percieve as a comedy bit that requires as much thought as turning a door knob come to a "comedy" meeting that is overseen by a dictatorial producer (let's be nameless here) threatening cast members for example with: "Hey you'll wear the rubber penis on your nose and cluck like a chicken or you'll be back doing open mic shots in the morning"! In short: vulgar, crass, lethargic, unfunny, unhip, eneven, assortment of pathetic bits that wouldn't make it past the first draft on Second City, Mad TV, or Sid Caesar. Awful
Disappointing. Weird, whacked out interpretation of Lewis Carroll's Alice in Wonderland that combines live-action with some stop-action animation to create a creeped out dreamscape.  White rabbit is a sawdust-stuffed real rabbit that escaped from the taxidermy stand, caterpillar is an old stocking with dentures and glass eyes, Mad Hatter is a marionette and March Hare is a wind-up stuffed toy rabbit with a loose button eye.  Devoted Alice fans may have a different reaction, but I found Jan Svankmajer's Alice disturbing and, at times, tedious.Everyday objects - the stuff in Alice's room - become the stuff of the dream.  Playing cards become Red Queen and entourage, the White Rabbit has a nasty looking set of incisors and a distressing tendency to shed his sawdust guts, Alice herself becomes her own blank-faced doll.  There's no law that says Alice has to be bright and cuddly, but it sure helps.  Whether intentional or not, Svankmajer's Alice is grim and nightmarish.Svankmajer animates figures in motion- real figures, like dolls and stuffed and mounted rabbits and such - but he doesn't animate facial expressions.  Combine that with the flat tone of voice by the film's narrator - ALICE is narrated by the actress who plays Alice, dubbed into English, or course - and the film has a flat, dead feeling.  The film, oddly enough for an animated feature, is leadenly paced. Some scenes seem to run on forever.  The tea party with the Mad Hatter (a marionette) and the March Hare (a bedraggled plush toy bunny with an annoyingly ill-attached button eye) runs on and on, the animation repeating itself way past our limit of patience.  The Mad Hatter wants a new cup of tea (`Change chairs!'), the March Hare scoots around in a wheelchair.  The new seats are taken, the tea is poured, the Mad Hatter wants a news cup of tea (`Change chair!') and on, and on, and on.  Sheesh - thought that scene would never end.Look - I'm not that big a fan of Carroll's Alice stories in the first place, but the movie adaptations of his stories - be they Disney's animated movie or the 1933 full-length feature with Ned Sparks as the Catepillar and Sterling Holloway as the frog - all have had something going for them.  Comedy, for one thing. Svankmajer's inspiration is laudable, but his execution is often disappointing.  His Alice is dark, grim, humorless and not everyone's cup of chai.    It's like listening to a quiet sonata played by an acid jazz band - it's familiar enough, probably good enough for the converted, but hard for the uninitiated to embrace and unlikely to win any new fans.
Someone should have 'saved' me from buying this... Bought this dvd for only 10 dollars at a not-so-local shopping centre, only because they didn't have this movie to rent at the video shop.After so much publicity, trailers, ads on busses, you'd think this would be one of the funniest and coolest movies around.However. I nearly fell asleep in it. Had to turn away more than a few times in boredom. And cliched to infinity, just watch the ending.Pathetic and predictable. If you like predictable movies? This dvd will be your new best friend. If not? Try something with a bit more imagination
FOR BEGINNING BEGINNERS ONLY!!!. Well, I guess I should've read more reviews of this DVD. It is STRICTLY for beginners. I don't sweat and my heart rate barely goes up (if I do breath of fire it helps). When I want an easy day I'll pop this in and do both sessions. Very simple. But I'm sure it's good for a beginner--a BEGINNING BEGINNER. Sara Ivanhoe is soothing though, and encouraging. But seriously, this is a very easy workout
A classic celebration of war. One of the first genres moviemakers turn to, when wanting to stir up a little historical or emotional reflection, is war.  Films about war make up some of the oldest in the history of the media, many of them about battles that never took place.  But throw in a dash of historical accuracy here and there (and at the producers' discretion) and you have a recipe for "classic" status.Exhibit A: "Zulu."  Nevermind that this is the retelling of a senseless battle fought in the name of British colonial expansion, in which countless men died, Brits and Africans alike.  Who cares that the Zulu empire was as oppressive and unforgiving as any tribe on the continent.  Forget that the ultimate outcome - "victory" at Ulundi - resulted in British control of Zululand and naturally, a barbarous system of apartheid for the next 100+ years.  (As one reviewer pointed out, the Africans who played extra roles in the 1964 film weren't even able to go see the movie under the current policies of apartheid.)  Nevermind all that.  Tally ho, mates!This is war, and war is classic.  Gather round and hear a tale of glory, courage and heroism... again.  Sure, the heroes in question are fighting in the name of racism and greed, but fighting bravely nonetheless.  And to counter any suggestion that the filmmakers condescend to the adversary, the Zulus are presented as equally brave.  Yes, bravery abounds.  After all, what better match for the white man's unflinching imperative than another power-hungry, merciless (but brave) army: that of the Zulus.Make no mistake, this war story is told from the perspective of the white minority in Southern Africa; there are no significant individual characters on the African side.  And looking at things from that angle, one would have to spin the British effort in a somewhat positive light, or never sleep another night.  But to pretend that it is accurate or just to arbitrarily assign themes like "glory" and "patriotism" to what adds up to brutal militarism, is to deceive one's self utterly.  If anyone can tell me how the effort to defend British fortifications in South Africa in 1879 has made Africa (or the world) a better place, I will gladly take it all back.In the meantime, filmmakers will continue to rouse passionate armchair patriotism, recalling the brave men who sacrificed their lives for the greater good, whatever that might have been.  Unfortunately, it is the public willingness to accept these tales as accurate, these missions as noble, and these surges of testosterone as plenty justification, that many more men and women will be needlessly sacrificed for years to come."Zulu" is indeed a classic war movie.  But ask yourself: is that always a good thing
Bad pacing destroys this Spaghetti. There are many interesting aspects to this film, but unfortunately the pacing and anti-climax sink it. The first half hour is sadistic brilliance, including a great scene of bullets being removed from a man's stomach and some disturbing scenes involving a lynch mob hanging and shooting a group of outlaws. Then it slows down...a lot. Nothing happens for about an hour, and then it inexplicably ends. "Cut Throats 9" and "The Hunting Party" are two far superior exercises in Western sadism
Not a sleeper. I now know why I had not heard much about this movie.  Only buy it if you like Broadway musicals because it is not your typical Doris Day movie.  I feel like I am watching parts of Monty Python and the Holy Grail when the prince says "I just want to sing"
awful. The Nine Lives of Fritz the Cats succeeds in being offensive, but that's about all it does. Unlike the South Park movie, which came out in 99 and had a lot of comparisons to the Fritz the Cat serious, Nine Lives is neither funny nor smart. It's disgusting, just like Crumb's comics
For Verisimilitude or Acting Ability, Look Elsewhere. This is the type of movie that has me shaking my head and wondering why time, effort and money are invested in such projects while much worthier cinema ideas are left to die 'a'borning'.Roger Ebert gave this movie three and a half out of four stars.  Although a fan of Ebert's movie reviews in general, I will say that his review of this movie is a good example of why it may be said of his reviews, "When they are good they are very, very good.  But when they are bad they're just terrible."The child lead, Blake Heron is not accomplished enough for casting in anything more ambitious or sophisticated than a school play and the adults who attempt to support him is this travesty of an attempt at a rite of passage film must have been hanging their heads in embarrassment between takes.Even the old veteran of such notable efforts as "In the Heat of the Night" and "The Pawnbroker", Rod Steiger is cast as a supportive adult trying to help the young boy (Heron) gain the insight and commitment required to get an abused Beagle pup he has become attached to away from an "old boy" trapper/poacher.  Perhaps Ebert felt some obligation to pay tribute (with a positive review) to any film in which a minor luminary like Steiger might appear but I can't help feeling that his primary responsibility should to the movie going, purchasing and renting public that reads his reviews looking for guidance in making decisions about investing their time and money.Be advised: this is a stinker and a waste of your time
"Is this funny still?  Yet?  I honestly can't tell...". Seasons One, Two, Three:  "Go Man, Go!"Season Four: the one to forego.Speaking as a fan who was first stupefied (amazed; astonished) by Bob and David back when they were the Kings of Megaphone Crooning ("People didn't want to hear songs about things that hadn't even been invented yet! They wanted to hear songs about NEW things."), that is, speaking as the rare fanatic, the rare "Mister Mr. Show" raising his voice on Amazon who laughs just as hard at the good G rated sketches as he does at the good NC-17 rated sketches, I find "Season Four" the most generous sampling of limp and lifeless MS sketches available in one package.Funnyguy Bob Odenkirk, reputedly a rather gruff fellow in real life,  says that Four was the season when "well-crafted" sketches were "in", "absurdity for absurdity's sake" was "out".  No longer, he claims, was Mr. Show a comedy show best appreciated by other comedy writers.Translation:  they dumbed it down for the audience (and/or: horsing around in the writers' room suddenly earned you an hour in a pointy hat, facing the corner).   Enticing as the term is, "well-crafted" here seems to mean "warmed over SNL type stuff", as in: spicing up the world's 1000th Jerry Springer takeoff by setting it on a lifeboat (momentarily forgetting that incongruity usually works best when it is "funny" incongruity) and ladling on the same gay panic, the same class anxiety that makes the real Springer show such a howl.   Overall, MS4's concepts  become less novel, less thinky, less left-field-funny, with a stronger than ever reliance on the tried and true. What I mean is: a stronger than ever reliance on stoopid-guy raunch humor. But at least SGRH is a species of comedy.  I haven't nailed down a label for what fills the cracks and crannies, and accounts for at least 75% of of the ones and zeroes on these here digital donuts. Excelsior?  (ex-cel-si-or   (n.)   Slender, curved wood shavings used especially for packing (originally a trademark)).This set did make me grin a few times -- over the course of five and a half hours.  One, and only one, sketch makes me laugh out loud: the phenomenon of "Monster Parties" (as documented in novelty songs such as "Halloween Shindig", "Dracula's Pajama Party" and the like) examined with pitch-perfect tabloid TV grammar.  Original, bent premise anchored by yet another  simultaneously vicious and sympathetic David Cross performance.For the most part, the gang seems tired, like they're having an exhausting time at this point telling funny from not-funny.  Surely, anyone who makes a living intuiting what will make people laugh must at one time or another come to such a pass.
Pretentious, boring, political, un-real. Thirteen year olds can be easily impressed by cheap tricks, "heartfelt" lyrics, and a lot of pretty lights. So it goes with some reviewers of this movie. This movie contains the unending internal reflections of about 6 or 7 different characters. These reflections never really go anywhere, never draw substantive conclusions. Primarily, there is just a lot of whining. THe only exception is the Sean Penn character until the end, when he whines at least as much as everybody else. "War is tough" is one of the main themes of this movie. Is that really a revelation?One thing you learn early on in acting or directing classes is to "play opposites," meaning put contrasting things in juxtaposition so that the contrast highlights both sides. An example is when a very evil character such as Richard III uses humor. "I'll have her - but not for long." THe fact that the guy is joking about killing his new bride makes him all the more evil to us. At the same time, perhaps we can't avoid laughing in spite of ourselves.OK, so this director had some of the same classes I did, but he has to use the technique over and over and over and over and over and ... until it starts seeming boring and banal. War scene, lots of dying. Oh look, a pretty butterfly! More blood and bullets. Oh gee, the light going through that leaf is beautiful! Use this trick once or twice and maybe it seems new to the uninitiated audience. Use it more than three times and you are asking for trouble. This director must use it 10-15 times. He turns it into a cliche. When the audience can predict when they are about to see the next opposite, you have overdone it.So what do we have so far? A bunch of whining character crying about war being bad and a bunch of contrast scenes. And really, that's pretty much it. The movie could have been cut in half with no loss because if there is one thing this movie is, It Is Redundant. It is spoon-feeding you the same message over and over and over again. Ouch, war hurts! Ew, mutilated bodies are yucky. Oh gosh, a little bird got hurt!!! We are so nasty! We must stop this war!!! (never mind the fact that thousands of little birds get eaten alive by cats every day)The director focuses on the yucky and inconvenient aspects of war - which I suppose would be briliant, except I think almost everybody on the planet already knows that wars are yucky and inconvenient. It's almost as if the author doesn't Believe we know, that he somehow thinks we missed it. And if only he reminds us at every possible repetitive opportunity, again and again and again, well, then maybe we will "get it" and start opposing wars, I guess. Never mind about Hitler and the 6 million jews. Never mind about Pearl Harbor. War is a yucky thing done by bad men, or nice whimpy men trapped in a situation by bad men. It has no meaning and there is nothing remotely noble about it. We were just wasting our time fighting the Nazis. The Nazis were just misunderstood! If they want to cook 6 million jews in the ovens, let them do it.An adult movie deals with realties and poses questions like, "how do I get myself to do something that I don't want to do, but that I know I should?" Making yourself do things that are not pleasant is one of the hallmarks of reaching adulthood. This movie takes a very adolescent perspective and asks, "if I whine enough, can I get out of my chores?"The dumbest scene in this movie is when the Jim Caveziel character is surrounded by Japanese and for no reason whatsoever, will not surrender. He stands there in the middle of about 40 Japanese soldiers and decides (after looking at some pretty leaves and butterlies) to raise his weapon so they will shoot him. The funny thing is, it's completely unnecessary: his comrades have already been warned. His death accomplishes nothing but relief for the audience - he can no longer utter his inane internal monologues.I think if you are a left-winger or have a thing for looking at the bodies of naked boys, you will love this movie. It's the kind of propaganda piece that a vacant, unquestioning mind will eat up. If your leanings are more adult, however, you may hate it. You'll wonder why the story is so one-sided, why nobody seems to believe in the causes they are fighting for, even though the Japanese did attack us, and the Germans did some naughty things too. None of that seems to matter to the storyteller."Why can't we all get along?" he cries, as the germans load another group of jews into the ovens and turn up the heat...A final note: if you want to see two really good war movies that make valid criticisms of the "war spirit" and how wars are conducted, see "Gallipoli" and/or "Breaker Morant." These movies are extremely effective in making their points without using cartoonish characters. The characters are real and the plots move the story foreward."The Thin Red Line" is what I would call "professed brilliance." A couple of simple tricks are used to try to impress the audience. But there is no real meat here. It's just a bunch of pointless whining. The poetry is poorly written and pretentious. And the characters are not real.
Terrible. I could not sit through this movie. The acting and screenplay are terrible. This film could be described as a bad made-for-tv movie at best.I ended up fast-forwarding though the entire movie after the first 30 minutes and turned the player off before I reached the end. I couldn't take it anymore. This movie is one of the worst I've attempted to watch in a long time.Not recommended.
Thin, yes.. Good, no.. Simply not an enjoyable film. Nick Nolte's performance was poor and monotonous, as were most the actors within the film. As a member of the US Army, I've seen my share of battles, both in the theatre and upon the battlefield, yet this movie however lived up to neither. A long list of names does not equal a meaningful film
too loud. When the background music completely overpowers the dialogue, you may as well turn it off.  The background music was piercing and I needed to have the remote in hand to keep adjusting the volume.  Not everyone has perfect hearing and shows with overwhelming background music are becoming the norm.  A shame because otherwise I could have enjoyed Crash
Its just ....ok. The first "Cruel Intentions" was highly underrated. There was a strong chemistry within the cast (obviously since Reese & Ryan married!) and the characters weren't one dimensional. Even evil Kathryn was capable of pain that Sarah Michelle Gellar managed to convey in brief moments which was perfect for that character. But Cassidy for CI3 falls way short of being three dimensional. She's just cruel for the whole film and showed no weakness. Everyone has a weakness. However, I will say that the character Patrick somewhat intrigued me. He went beyond the game of cruelty and ...well, I won't give away what happens, but I was very disturbed by it. As for Kerr, he was alright. Its not his fault his character was kind of dull. Anyway, the film is "ok". Its worth watching if you run into it on cable, but I wouldn't buy the movie.
How are people rating this 5 stars. I should first say that I have not watched the series, but will follow that up by saying that this movie has not persuaded me to do so. I am a casual anime fan and for reference will say that the anime's I have enjoyed include Dragon Ball Z, Outlaw star, Cow boy bebop and Ninja Scroll.  If you have only seen 2 movies in your life time and the other one was "Big top Pee-Wee", then maybe (and I stress maybe) I could understand a 5 star review. If you are a die hard fan of anime and if all it takes is a couple of bloody scenes this may be for you. If you are 15 years old you might be impressed with this. However if you expect depth of character, story evolution and strong plot, skip this.In a nut shell some girl is depressed and wants to disappear/Die, what ever, so she disappears and shows up in Gaea as the Wing Goddess. Two separate factions have been warring with each other over a dragon armor suit that holds the fate of the world. The girl is the key to the suit in a way it goes to whom ever she decides; the good guys get it the end. Believe me when I say this is the better telling of that story and the less painful one.The Good: a couple of good fight scenes and the animation were pretty good.The Bad: The tone of a movie is very important and this story was way over dramatized. The characters aren't developed at all so you can't really bring your self to care about them, or want to pay attention to them. The movie felt like they were trying to squeeze the content of a long draw out series into 95 minutes and they failed miserably. I considered turning this off several time but felt that I should finish and form a complete opinion about it. Well I have and it aint good.
Mediocrity. Heavyweights was a quite a disappointment, considering the presence of Ben Stiller.The movie sheds light on a popular summer camp for fat children that unexpectedly finds itself under different management.  The new administration will make it clear very soon that some major changes are to take place...The plot and the acting are surprisingly (!) average, while the humor and the dialogues are below average.Ben Stiller's character, a cross between Zoolander and Dodgeball (both being AMAZING movies), was unexpectedly plain and bland.As for the rest of the cast, this film does not seem to be their thing.Though the potential for a great movie was definitely there it fails to take off.  A shame really...  No masterpiece here.
Did I watch the same movie???. Ok.. I read the other reviews for this movie and I am a little confused.  Was it the same movie?  The martial arts were "ok" in this, but nothing I havent seen done better before.  The story-line  was.. ummm. well, nevermind.Oh and did I mention the film doesnt end????  I mean I didnt really care but it still sucked to cut the story line half way though.I really wantedto like this movie... but the only good thing I can say is that some of the sub-titles are hilarious
not amazing. don't think to be amazed by this.it is a nice gentle documentary of what air force today is.I don't know what Imax could do on such a filmwhen it is finished after 40mn max you feel realy disapointed and you expect the real thing to start but the Dvd is finished..game over!!
don't bother..the movie is not gripping ni important. I bought this film and was very disappointed don't make the same mistake I did.  do not buy it a tremendous wasted of moneythe theme is important but this ia a treatment demasiado corritente nada especiall
Disappointing British Series. I am a big fan of British mysteries and had reasonably high hopes for this series from the reviews.  Alas, I found them much less than I had hoped for.  The stories and the acting, with the possible exception of Kenneth More, seemed sophomoric and overdone.  The secondary actors (several of whom I am familiar with from other films) were way over the top, shouting and declaiming far more than the part called for amd much more than I have seen them do elsewhere.  While some of the stories were pretty good and some were really pretty bad, the acting almost without exception made me feel as though I were watching an amateur play.The episodes all had a very stage-y feeling that became very wearing after a while.  All in all, this series was a severe disappointment.
more like 2 and a half stars. Before I get started with my review i must say one thing. Im not just a mindless hater, trying to bash a fanatical fanbase of the legendary superman franchise. I liked the original movies, with the real superman christopher reeves and the real lex luthor gene hackman. with that being said here is why i really didn't like this movie.i felt it was too long and drawn out. Too much time was spent on Lousi lane crying and complaining about superman not saying goodbye before he left. she whined to her reporter friend, she whined to her husband, she whined to clark kent, she whined to her boss, and finally she whined to superman in another overly long melopdramitic flying scene. essentially making this movie a quasi chick flick/comic flick. and although the soundtrack was stunning at times, too much time was past just showing different scenery and background environments while letting the music play. yes atmoshere is great in movies but enough is enough.  basically im saying this movie was 90% melodrama and atmoshperic mumbo and 10% action.and although the action scenes where pretty cool, it is nothing we haven't seen before in a superman flick, or any other super hero flick.acting wise, i think the guy playing superman did a pretty good job, nothing compaired to reeves, but im not going to complain about that too much, he was servicable. and noone can complain about kevin spacey, he is just awesome, although i dont think he had the charisma that hackman has as lex. did not like louis lane. too whiney.story wise, this movie didnt really make much sense. it was way too out there. i mean yeah its a fantasy story and you have to use your imagination but i mean come on. lex luthor is going to basically destroy over half of the worlds population by creating the new continent and people are just going to go "yeah lets move there" and lex is going to make lots of money. not likely. i mean it would take years among years to make that crytallic and dark damp place to be somewhat livable. i dont think that lex would really be the type to want to put years of planning and prep to make this work. i mean most criminals want their power NOW, instant gratification. maybe im being overly harsh on a fantasy storyline, i just think they could have thought of something better, and more feasable.this movie was alright, it would have been helped a lot if they trimed about 30 minutes of melodrama away. and no i am not saying more action and less character development in movies, cause character developement is one of the most important aspects in the success of a truly great movie. however whiny crying does not constitute as strong character development in my book
It's OK. The transfer is real real bad, the story is also weird but its o
MORE MOUNTAIN MADNESS... When I saw this DVD in the video store, I knew that I would rent it, as I have a thing for mountains, despite the feeling it would not be a very good movie. Well, my expectations were met. The movie, although mildly enjoyable at times for its mountain views, is pretty much a stinker. It is definitely not a keeper.The plot is simple. Scientific data indicates that a particular mountain in the Urals in Eastern Europe is going to undergo a massive avalanche that will bring down about half the snow on the mountain onto a ski resort. Of course, the person who brings this information to the village's mayor is met with derision.  No one wants to believe her. Like John the Baptist, she is a voice crying alone in the wilderness.Meanwhile, two mountain bad boys, brothers who run snowmobile tours in the mountains, have their own troubles. The younger one has had a bad break-up with the resort owner's daughter. The other one has his hands full keeping his wilder, younger brother in check. The resort owner's daughter has her own issues, as does her father and his business partner. When the inevitable happens and disaster strikes, let the games begin.Over all, the special effects are repetitive, which is to be expected, given the fact that this is an obviously low budget film. The plot is loosey-goosey, with a number of silly sub-plots to nowhere, as the script is just plain bad. The directing is laughable and ham-handed. The acting is, for the most part, dreadful, with the exception of the resort owner, who gives evidence of some acting ability. No one in this film should give up their day job just yet.The bottom line is that viewers should take a pass on this film, unless, like me, you are a sucker for mountains or disaster films. Even then, viewers should proceed at their own risk.
A Big Waste Of Time!!!!. I loved the original movie, and I love Johnny Depp so I thought this movie would be awesome.Wrong wrong wrong!! First of all, the child actors were horrible, well the Charlie and Mike characters were ok, but the two girl actors were the worst I've seen in a long time. And what did they do to Johnny Depp? He was so creepy and weird. I took my nine year old to see it in the theater, and even she almost fell asleep. If you really want a treat watch the original with Gene Wilder
curse of the producers missing cut. I've seen both versions and suggest skipping them both (along with Halloween 5) unless you just can't help yourself.Pros for "The Curse of Michael Myers": better pacing; some of The Shape's (George Wilbur's) more intimidating moves are in the "new" ending which makes up the last 17 minutes of this version.Pros for "The Producer's Cut": I personally enjoyed the "origin" of Michael Myers presented in this version (even though the movie was slow); although I felt really bad about Dr. Loomis' fate at the end, I enjoyed Michael's escape.Neither origin really adds much to the story line and the end of the theatrical version is pathetic. At the end of The Producer's Cut you may wonder if Michael is off to continue his pranks or is done killing. Guess H20 answered that question...Happy Hallowee
Worst BE we own. My son, husband, and I really do not like this DVD because (unlike other Baby Einstein DVDs) this DVD is too focused on cheap looking computer animation. There are very few puppet scenes, and the ones they have are pretty quick and lack much depth. The music is pretty bad, too. I prefer the music of Baby Mozart or Baby Beethoven. This sounded synthetic and computer-generated, not "real." I found this DVD to be boring and couldn't keep my attention or that of my son. My son (15 months) can't watch this entire DVD. He gets very bored and sick of the monotonous sign language instructions  (which take up most of the DVD and are pretty fast in pace).  I was underwhelmed and wish I hadn't purchased this DVD. It is not like previous BE DVDs.  I suggest Baby McDonald, Baby Da Vinci, or Baby Mozart to those who wish to purchase a BE DVD.
...you had me at goodbye... ...this movie is at the top of my list...unfortunately, it's the 'worst movie of all-time' list...that's right, ladies and gentlemen, friends and supporters of this film...this movie is trash (and not just for cuba's horribly annoying acting)...it's also one of the reasons so many relationships end up miserable...come on...do you really think renee would have ended up with this guy if his career went in the other direction...it was pure desperation rather than inspiration that made him succumb to showing up with his hat in his hands...and if all you base a relationship on, is the end justifying the means, well, i wish you luck with your next soul mate..
Miscast lead in an otherwise enjoyable movie. This otherwise enjoyable futuristic action romp is cursed by the casting of a gratingly over-the-hill Arnold. And since it was released and Arnold has gone on to be an unsuccessful, ineffective, nastily prejudiced right-wing politician, it has become increasingly hard to watch his old movies and see him as anything but an unsympathetic person. The movie might have squeaked two stars from me back in the year it was released: now, it's like trying to watch Richard Nixon playing the terminator..
Best show ever, but DVD has problems!. I bought this the day it came out and watched a couple of episodes without incident and then began watching "The Bend In The River" when the problems started. At 1 hour 10 minutes and 43 seconds into the episode right when Hannibal says "sure" the dvd just stopped and went to the main menu. The rest of the episode was missing...it just stopped so I tried it out on two other dvd players I have here and then figured I got a bad copy and went up to the store to exchange it. Well, once I got it home the second one did the same exact thing, so I exchanged it a third time. The third copy actually plays through the episode but freezes for about 5 seconds in the exact same place that the others were messed up. I haven't even gotten to the other 5 DVD's but my assumption from reading the reviews here is that they are going to have problems too.I can't understand how they release these seasons of the A-Team so painfully slow at Universal and can let something with this many errors reach the stores. In the 10 months since the release of Season 2 could they not have had some type of quality control make sure that the Season 3 DVD's actually played?This release has absolutely no bonus features unlike the Columbia House collectors edition ones, which have some outtakes and other things. And I have to wonder with this release just like the other two seasons why can they not put chapters in where the commercial breaks are instead of having to fast forward to get back to the spot I left off? Just like Season 2 these are double sided DVD's which scratch very easily and make all kinds of noises in the DVD player, I would have liked 6 single sided DVD's much better. And one last problem is that when you put the DVD you absolutely have to watch the Universal Studios introduction for about 10 seconds because you cannot skip it and access the menu.There are two good things I can say about this release the first being that it's the A-Team, which is the best television show of all time and this is probably my favorite season. The second good thing is that a coupon is enclosed for $5 off of Season 4 when it gets released. To have released this Season with this many errors and problems on the DVD's is an insult to A-Team fans everywhere who have waited 20+ years to buy this on DVD. Universal needs to recall all of them and issue working copies.Update: I have just gotten off the phone with Universal and they have said that they will replace the DVD for me and others who are having problems. You can call them at 972-293-5903 or email ushe.consumerrelations@worldmarkinc.com and put A-Team Season 3 replacement in the subject line. I have added a star to my review since they're customer service was friendly and returned my call promptly, but I have still subtracted a star for each trip I have made to the store.
Well acted, beautiful imagery, but SLOW, DULL and OBVIOUS. All-star, REALLY HOT, awesome cast; excellent acting, great costuming and beautiful cinematography. A+ shirtless Jackman scene.However, a convoluted mess of a movie with a labyrinthine storyline that is made mind-numbingly clear by the repeated insertion of painfully obvious foreshadowing. The story circled back upon itself several times, which made the excruciatingly too-long dramatic scenes seem even longer in a deja-vu sort of way. Could have been half an hour shorter, takes an ETERNITY to get to the point. I would have enjoyed it more had I fast forwarded through most of it. I'm glad I watched it, but a second viewing might be the cure for insomnia
WHERE'S THE SHOW???. Ok, this is by far the most pathetic taping of a show (although Sweeney Todd comes to a close second).  Where is the show?!  They cut out the "Glory" battle scene and just had the actors come out and look happy instead of creepy like they should when they do the slow-mo battle scene (that was not in the movie...).  Also, where is "I Guess I'll Miss the Man?"  That's a BEAUTIFUL song that was cut from the movie why?  Also what about "Prayer for a Duck" and MANY others!!!  This is by far the worst ladies and gentlemen and completely ruins the show created by Stephen Schwartz and the great Bob Fosse!Oh yeah, and Chita Rivera's "Spread a Little Sunshine" was pathetic, and the Players did not convince me that they were creepy and really wanted Pippin to do the "grand finale."I was in this show and it was the greatest show I've ever done, but this DVD is pathetic.  Don't waste your money on the costly price of $19.99, it should be $7.99 because of how many great songs and scenes that were cut from this show
Not enough variation. Although the video was easy to follow, there was no variation between the segments.  The 10 minute segments were basically the same. I was looking for a quick video that I can do in the morning but it seemed that I spent most of the time warming up and stretching and then continuing with the same moves.  If you are at all experienced and are looking for a quick targeted workout this is not the video for you
Just Take the Hockey Mask and Run. If you follow my writing, you know that I thought Part 1 and 2 were pretty good; I did NOT like this 3rd chapter; I liked 4 and 5 fairly well; 6 was my absolute favorite; I did not like part 7; part 8 had some redeeming aspects; and I have some respect for "Jason Goes to Hell." I know some people liked this third chapter, and they are entitled to their opinion. But I was utterly repulsed by this disgusting chapter. This 3rd chapter takes off just about where part 2 left off, and Jason claims another 2 victims. We then meet the next group of Jason's potential victims. This could have been a decent chapter except for what is to follow. With the possible exception of Kris and Shelly, this group of teenagers or young adults is so flat and 2d. There really is no getting to know them. Shelly and Kris go shopping and run into an obnoxious cycle gang. Shelly is a shy person who is unhappy with himself. He accidentally hits one of their cycles. When the gang leader breaks Shelly's windshield (or to be more accurate, the windshield of the car his friend loaned him), Shelly gets angry, chases the gang leader with the car and crushes his cycle. (The one and only redeeming element in this movie.) The cycle gang follows Shelly and want to burn down the barn to get even. They are so obnoxious and repulsive, we almost can't wait for Jason to kill them. And when he does, I doubt the average viewer will feel any sympathy for these 3 rotten people. Later, Kris tells about her past with Jason. (This was a little before Part 2.) Of course, Jason begins to kill the rest of the kids. Because they are so flat and 2d in this 3rd chapter, we don't really feel for them. Another annoying aspect of this film is that the murders are especially disgusting and vile in this 3rd chapter. (To be sure, I know this is suppose to be a horror, and that some people probably liked that aspect of it.) But even violence and murder can be filmed with a certain amount of taste. (In "Saturday Night Fever" Director John Badham did what he could to film a rape scene with at least some degree of taste! And let's be honest. In a way, rape is worse than murder.) As most of you know, Jason finds his hockey mask in this chapter. Well, following the typical formula, one person survives and manages to flip the tables on Jason. Since zero stars is not an option, I'll justify my 1 star rating the best I can. (The decent scene where Shelly runs over the cycle and the fact that Jason dispatches this obnoxious cycle gang warrant the one star.) I'll conclude by saying that if you don't have a problem with 2d flat characters and especially disgusting murders, then you probably will enjoy this 3rd chapter more than I did. Thank goodness for parts 4, 5, and 6!
Really bad!. It's difficult to fathom that anyone would make such a bad movie.  I agree that the young lead actor is very cute, but that's the only redeeming quality this movie has.  The storyline had potential, but it failed miserably because of poor acting and dialogue.  My friends and I just shook our heads in dismay when we watched this
Horrible. This DVD is a horrible example of Latin dancing. The steps are extremely difficult to follow mainly because they are shown at such a slow pace that it makes it more challenging. I have taught ballroom dancing and this dvd made it hard for me to follow. It's not enjoyable to watch and there are errors on the dvd itself where there is supposed to be dancing and there isn't. Even for a beginner this dvd is not worth buying- you could learn more from reading on line how to do a dance rather then attempting to watch this video.
What ... the ... hell?. It's hard to believe I watched the same movie as everyone else here. This movie fails on every level. It isn't a good action movie, or a good silly movie, or a good comedy, or a good satire ... or much of anything but an endless parade of lame gags, terrible dialogue, weak characters, vapid plot, and so on. There isn't anything redeeming about God of Cookery. Don't be fooled into thinking you'll like it because you like Shaolin Soccer, Iron Chef, Rumble in the Bronx, Ong Bak, or almost any other far-superior show or movie to which it might be compared. God of Cookery is just painful, feeble, and empty
Praying for engine trouble!. Saw this as an inflight movie. Boy, did I pray for engine trouble, so we'd have to land and I could get away! Sucks or what? I liked Smith in 'I, robot', 'Independence day', etc, but this was awful. It's a one-joke movie. Problem is, the one joke was the one plastered all over the TV spots and trailers (the jet ski incident). The highlights involved the subplot of him teaching a guy to be cool - wish that'd been the main storyline instead - far, far superior! Will not be adding this to my wishlist
Reincarnation .....doggy style?. A trouble some pooch who has reaccuring dreams of being something else, something far greater.... A man. After a series of silly events he begins to take these dreams seriously and goes off on an adventure to find his family and his old life before..... HE DIED.While the story is very touching and has a very good moral too it it was far too too long for me and seemed kinda cheesy at some pionts they kept on reinfasizing reincarnation, reincarnation, reincarnation. It was interesting but at one piont it became very boring and I lost intrest. I have only been able to sit through it one time, because of this. It jusy seemed like the man was really in a coma and that at one piont that he was gonna wake up from this long boring nightmare but he never did.A great move to show small children at bed time so they fall asleep and perhaps people with a long patience or perhaps people with  an intrest in animals and dogs would like to see it
Interesting subject...poor documentary style. Ray Johnson is a virtually unknown figure of the Pop Art scene and his story is filled with interesting figures from New York at the time. Additionally his suicide puts a tragic spin on his biography. I was disappointed though once I saw that 'How to Draw a Bunny' was not going to let the viewer at the information so easily. What you do get is interesting enough but it comes with an soundtrack consisting of drum riffs that is engineered at the same level as the interviews which proved to be very distracting. About 30 minutes into the film I realized that I had yet to see any of Johnson's work in the film. When it does appear it is quickly cut, cropped, or shown in bits.'HTDAB' does not suffer from lack of information. After a while, I got the feeling that the filmmaker had almost too much information and interviews often stray off unrelated to each other. I was left to wonder why some anecdotes went on for five minutes while other more interesting ones were cut off to quickly.At times too much of a 'personal touch' interferes with the film. Why for instance do we need to see a re-creation of a valentine xerox work of Johnson? Was the filmmaker concerned that it might serve to undermine the actual work? Its not too much of a shame...you get the point of the film -and Johnson's collage and xerox work- rather quickly but the details that are supposed to be the meat of any documentary are downplayed by the garnish.
ORIGINAL IS WAAAY BETTER~!!. If you want UNCUT ORIGINAL version, ALWAYS look for ORIGINAL LICENSED Production. NOT US Release. Its a foreign film, it should not be US version to begin with~! HELLO!!!?? Why settle for LESS with US Version where they edit and cut so many excellent scenes especially with Jackie's Fighting Scenes. And US Release ruins the speed and sound as well. I have been collecting Jackie Chan's movies both HK and US Release Version for quite some time now. I found HK Version to be MUCH MORE in enjoyable, and HIGHER in Quality. American Market always like to "Americanize" and "Control". Regional Code Regulation thing is one of the example to CONTROL the Market. Why not let everyone enjoy the same HK Original Release move the same way ENTIRE WORLD enjoys it ?? No one makes Hollywood American movies to "French version" or "Chinese Version" ~! This what Americans are doing~! Well, enjoy the cheap "American version" then~! LO
Supercreep. Steve Coogan steals kids toys and soils them with his X Ray eyes. Knowing Me Knowing You is nowhere near as funny as his Alan Partridge sitcom or the Day Today. David Schneider and Patrick Marner deserve better than this. Eat my GOOAAAL
Should be called a documentary!. I thought this would have more complete songs--like U2's Rattle and Hum or Styx's Return to Paradise.  Instead it is a documentary with short clips of Jimi performing.  Disappointing..
Too true to Life. I read the book when it was first published and then a friend had a son diagnosed with leukemia and went through the same thing as the Mom in the book. Fortunately he had a lot of advocates that pushed him to ignore the insurance company and his son finally found a donor match but it was too late. So I feared that this movie would not be up to the book. My fears were unfounded, the casting was brilliant and I loved this movie, even though it is tough to watch, I still catch it in reruns on the satellite occasionally and "must watch". That is how good it is
Overplaying the Star Aspect. I used to own the VHS version of this, but threw it away when I realized that it had very few funny sketches on it.  I agree with some of the other reviewers who said that it just seems like they went for the sketches with the most famous people in them.  I saw the Coffee Talk sketch with Madonna and Roseanne and Barbra Streisand when it first aired; I didn't think it was funny then and I don't think it's funny now.  I found it totally boring.  I know there were better Coffee Talk segments.I found the Wayne's World segment with Tom Hanks and Aerosmith to be pretty boring and not very funny, ditto with the Danny DeVito episode of Simon.  The best episode of Simon that there ever was was the one with Macaulay Culkin, hands down.Lothar of the Hill People is one of the stupidest things I have ever had to sit through, and the thing with Ron Wood, Liam Neeson, and Nell was stupid also.I loved the Mick Jagger sketch and I think that Philip the Hyper-Hypo is hilarious.  I had a cousin who was sort of like Philip when I was growing up, and he used to come over and destroy everything in our house.The other one that almost made me soil myself the first time I saw it was the British play review with Steve Martin and Dana Carvey and (I think) Eric Idle.  That is one of my favorite single sketches in the history of SNL...the world--BANG! the wooorrrllld
So So Film Shows Its Age. First, If you can find this film to rent, do so before buying. It is listed as a French sex farce. It is more French and farce but yes there is simulated sex as well. It is a shallow film without much substance. It was only an okay film, and in retrospect not worth buying. It probably will not remain in mycollection. There are much better "sex farces" such as the Italian films starring Laura Antonelli. It is worth a look I guess, if you can rent it.   Charlie Spive
floozy & boozy jessica gets her golden boy. jessica lange won an oscar for this, proof positive that some years are so bereft of strong performances, they HAVE to give it to somebody. apart from that, this is a silly exercise in anti-government paranoia, with a wasted tommy lee jones and not much else.
Doesn't hold a candle to the original. This is a remake of An Affair to Remember with Cary Grant and Deborah and it does not work. Some movies just should not be remade. The ONLY thing good about this movie is Katharine Hepburn's appearance. Get the original
Bette and Woody?. Bette Midler and Woody Allen together would make one think of a movie that is very funny and pleasing. Instead here we get one that has more romance and drama than comedy as Bette and Woody play a couple who is celebrating their wedding annivesary as their children have both left for school. They also discover that they have been cheating on one another. The movie gets boring rather fast as Bette and Woody are the only ones we get to see as there are very few supporting characters. I would have expected better from these two
Just An Okay High Definition Release ... Disc Picture:The stylized VC-1-encoded 1.85:1 HD DVD picture features differing color schemes depending on the location. The entire presentation is void of highly resolved fine details.Soundtrack:The Dolby Digital Plus 5.1-channel soundtrack is not overly exciting, although bass is delivered well through each of the channels, although the noise floor is low, dialogue and effects are generally well recorded, and the sound matches the storytelling nicely.
Worst teen romance flick I have seen.... Whatever it Takes...This movie was not even worth my time in watching it.  I even heard it was so good I bought it and I hate it!  I love teen/romance movies but this one was not one I will ever watch again and struggled to get through the first time!Reading the synopsis will let you know just what the plot of this movie is.  My thoughts skip this one all together.
Cross-color artefacts. This Deluxe Edition DVD has the worst case of cross-color artifact I have seen on any DVD movie so far. It has a "Mastered in Hi Definition" sigh on the back of the DVD; well, it may be mastered in high definition, but they obviously used a composite source and a terrible color decoder. This artifact is really very obvious on a big plasma TV, and my DVD player's "Cross-Color Suppression" filter could not remove it completely
not very interesting. maybe i'm just too picky because i'm fond of the quality of recent bbc films.  i did not think much of this movie (pseudo-artsy, in my  opinion..very drab and plotless).  the characters are flat and boring.   honestly, i can't believe i watched the whole movie
Very Poor. This was a very poor document.  I had met the swami that takes you all over, and spent some time with him.  He is a complete fake with a huge ego problem.This documentary is an embaresment to Hinduism and the Kuhmba Mela.  They only showed one true saint in this documentary and that was Ammachi.There were far more true saints there that could have been shown.There were true Guru's there.  True renunciantes and holy men.Instead, they showed ego driven teachers, false prophets, and naked men begging for attention by stretching and pulling things with their penises.How enlightening can that be
Pretty stupid and obnoxious. Almost unbelievably bad, except I saw the remake of 'Shaft,' which should have been a forewarning.  This is like a comic book for filmgoers.  No, not a graphic novel adapted to the screen.  More like a comic book for kids, that you'd be embarassed to own at any age.  Doubly offensive is the high quality soul music that is on the soundtrack, a travesty to the nth degree.
sorry I got it. could have been a truly interesting film, just plain simpleminded and annoying
Brad was the only hilight. I thought I was going to be watching a very special movie based on all of the hype and reviews. I wasn't looking for a Die Hard movie and had no real expectations beyond what I mentioned. I was really disappointed with how disjointed it was and to be quite honest, the lousy acting. The only real joy was Brad Pitt. I don't normally consider myself a Pitt fan, and, I didn't realize he was actually in it. He stands out in this move where I think Bruce essentially mailed it in
Bad porn. The setting of this film is in the late 70s, just before adult movie theatres were driven out of business by the invention of the VCR and the subsequent explosion of pornographic VHS tapes.  Burt Reynolds plays a porno director who has the effrontry to try and be "artistic" in his craft.  Heather Graham plays his psycho-starlet, and Mark Wahlberg plays a porn star who is....well.....let's just say, endowed.Wahlberg's character quickly becomes a huge hit and encounters success he would have never dreamed of. Wahlberg's character seems to be a sort of oblique allusion to John Holmes, although I don't know if the film-makers would admit as much.   At any rate, he becomes arrogant and begins to believe that he is loved for factors other than his "package."  This hubris leads to his un-doing as the world of porn coalesces with the world of drugs and LOTS of shady characters.This sounds like it would be the framework for a good movie.  Well, it could have been, but all the way through there seems to be something missing.  There are times the film "seems" to try and convey a message, but I'm not really sure.One thing I do know is that I quickly remembered why I've never cared for Wahlberg.  He has all the screen presence of a bowl of yogurt.   Also, I was expecting a LOT more skin than what the film delivered.  Given the context of the film, one would think that it would be an excuse to parade miles of topless women.  That's simply not the case.In the end, however, the biggest problem of this movie isn't Wahlberg or the lack of nudity.  The difficulty is that it's just plain boring.  I have more than a passing interest in the history of porn, and yet this flick failed to grab me
Modern Film Making at its... Weirdest. Do you not understand modern art?  Or does 50% or more of the art in MOMA confuse you?  If you answered yes to either of these questions then this film is definitely NOT for you.  If you answered no... well, this film still might not be for you.Do you like to watch people walking around?  A lot?  Walking everywhere?  If you watched a documentary of someone, would you be pissed off if they cut out anything at all, including scenes where people just sit around, or perform mundane activities like making salads?  If you answered yes to these questions, then this film is DEFINITELY for you.Eraserhead is an experiment in patience (on the viewer's part.)  It starts slowly, the (meager) plot unfolds slowly, and it ends slowly.  Nothing is lost by watching this movie 2x-4x (except the... unique... soundtrack.)  There ARE some interesting/worthwhile scenes but they are few and far between.  There are however, many riveting scenes such as someone getting out of bed, in bed, and out again, someone else walking, walking, walking.  People sitting on a couch.  A woman ululating for no apparent reason.  And many many more.  I don't know about you, but my dreams are more interesting than this.  This film really could have benefited from having 30 minutes or more cut out, but it seems to me like the director felt it necessary to pad the film with unecessary scenes in order to make it 'feature length.'  It's possible to have an artsy film not be boring (see Space Odyssey, Waking Life) but I think you need a little more than what is presented in this film.If you've never seen this movie before and don't really know what it's about, I highly recommend you rent it first.  This film is not for many people.Since this film is about 1 quarter interesting and 3 quarters boring, I give it 1.5 stars, plus .5 stars for a good job on the baby
Disappointing. It could have been a good one. But everything seems to be out of focus. The love story does not work between Redford and Lena Olin, the story is too simplistic: revolutionaries are good and the Batista regime is evil. What a way to learn some of your neighbor's history! Of course there's more than that.Simplifying the views may be good for propaganda's sake but as for history or even plain entertainment you need to give us something better.We may not know or care about Cuba's recent history but we know when the teacher is playing sides.I don't understand how a good director like Pollack can sell himself -and his reputation- so cheap to the Hollywood-propaganda-industry.It all comes down to this: the ones who dream about revolution are the wealthy and the rich, but powerless, who think themselves better than the ones who have power, and want to use the ones who don't have riches nor power for their own goals.There have been, of course, exceptions. See Durruti, the Spanish anarchist, for one example. He belonged to the humblest and poorest class of society. But how did he end? Killed during the Spanish Civil War by not others than the Communists.
Feeble at best. If I had the choice I would rate it 0 stars. The video talks to people like children and treats the viewer as if they've had no human contact in their life
corny, but still funny!. It almost seemed like the acting got worse after every season.  I'm really a big fanof what's happening. There is a episode where Raj is singing a ballad which I foundreally funny, because I never thought I would ever see Earnest Thomas (raj) sing a songwith so much sincerity.  The third season is really corny, however, if you havebeen a on going fan you will enjoy watching many of the episodes.....if you werenever a fan of what's happening! don't waste your money, or just buy the secondseason (the best season)  and call it  a day
Not exactly the "The Texas Chainsaw Massacre". After seeing the overhyped "American Gothic", I must say that I came away disappointed.  What you have here is a movie that was constructed in the mold of the original "The Texas Chainsaw Massacre" where you have some unsuspecting people coming up on a crazed homicidal family.  Unfortunately, the family really comes off looking goofy and silly more than dangerous and deadly.  I would certainly rather come upon Ma and Pa's family than Leatherface and his family if you know what I mean.  "American Gothic" does a decent job of painting a crazy family portrait for sure, but Ma, Pa and company just do not exactly strike fear in the viewer's heart...they just are not that formidable as far as their prowess as horror movie villains.  The kills are not too bad, but certainly are not anything to write home about.  The acting is okay and production values are not too bad for a movie of this nature.  I just did not like the way that Ma and Pa's family came across to the viewer...they come across more weird than horrifying, more eccentric than anything else and not exactly dangerous.  Don't get me wrong...obviously, they killed some people, but I was not convinced in the manner in which this was done or in the family's disposition as brutal killers.  Also, I felt that the ending was rather weak and very predictable.  I guess they just do not make them like they used to anymore.  In short, the way I look at "American Gothic" is that if the original "Texas Chainsaw Massacre" is a FIVE STARS horror movie, then this movie, comparatively speaking, is certainly worth no more than ONE STAR...it is what it is folks!
best movie ever... if you're retarded. The dynamic Root duo deliver yet another yawner in this painful children's comedy.  My advice to Root is that he should be selling barbeques rather than this silly trash.  The only thing that redeems this movie is the acting of the child Curtis.  Big props to my man for his preformance.  Hope to see you in more movies to come.p.s. I think Taylor Root is still a virgin
Absolutely Nauseating!. I don't care what the Hollywood media machine has told the world about this annoying and worthless film. Every character is a cliche. Warren Beatty and Halle Berry have NO chemistry! If this is what's left of his creative soul, he should just check into a home and get an alcohol addiction -- the anti-depressants are overwhelming his common sense.The only redeeming quality is Oliver Platt's natural comic presense. But that does not make up for this film insulting every ethnicity, culture, community, and individual in America, not to mention all of our intelligences.I was so disgusted and nauseated by this film's arrogance and hypocrisy that I had to leave my grandmother's house -- she still finds Warren charming! If aliens were to see this movie as a first impression of us, we would all be gone in a flash of brilliant white light, which anyone who likes this movie would deserve. This movie makes me angry for living in Hollywood.By the way, Warren Beatty "raps" throughout this film, so have a trash bag and smelling salts handy. ZERO STARS
Well, that was dreadful. I only bought this DVD, because I'm a rabid Jason Isaacs fan, and I'm intent on eventually seeing everything in his IMDB listing, but yeesh.  This was just painful.  The only good parts were Jason as Clark Devlin and Debbie Mazar as Steena, and those parts were entirely too brief.  In fact, there is a much, much better movie featuring those two particular characters implied in this forgettable little piece of nonsense.I really wish I owned that movie.
What a pity!. I hope people don't start to think of this movie as Alien 5.  In my mind this is a whole new venture, one that is separate from any of the work that Sigourney Weaver did on the first four Alien films.  The first 4 films are pretty good and I really like the whole series.  It works rather well and I would love to see another Alien film with Sigourney in it.  I think they could pull off one more film.  Ripley's a great hero.This movie was pretty bad.  The only reason I give it 2 stars is because of the special effects.  I felt like I was watching a Scooby Doo version of Alien.  Whoever greenlit this film clearly just wanted to make money.  The plot was..well..stupid and the atmosphere of the movie was pretty much non-existent.  Each of the first four Alien movies were provocative in some sense no doubt because of Sigourney's involvement.  This one was as boring as a white wall and it was as cheesy as a funhouse at a state fair.
Not the Classic John Mantley Story. There's a 1957 film of the same name, by director William Asher and starring Gene Barry: THE 27th DAY. It's based on the terrific John Mantley speculative fiction novel; this is not it, nor is it a remake of any sort. Those looking for the original won't as yet find it on DVD, and should not mistake this film for that one in any way. This is a completely different genre, and far from a classic. If you want to enjoy the original story, you can still find the book on Amazon.com, and hope for a DVD release of the film
Mortal Kombat: Annihilated. Such a sad sequel to the best video game movie. Mortal Kombat: Anilhilation was anihilated the day it was made. The story was poorly done. I didn't like how the characters act in this film. Jax {Williams} acts like a afician-american stereotype. Sonya {Hess} acts like a weak little bitch. Sindel {Vander} acts like one of those pathetic villianess you see in those direct-to-video films that have dumb villianess. And Brian Thompson should be a shame of himself, such a good character actor playing a pethetic Shao Khan.One thing that sucks in this film is that Radien {Remar} and Shao Kahn are brothers and Shinnok {Schore} is their father. What a pathetic change to add in this film. Raiden and Kahn are far from family and Shinnok and Kahn don't even like each other...and they're not father and son in the game.This film cost $30 million, yet the special effects in this film look so cartoony. In fact, I've seen Playstation One graphics look better than that.This film is really bland, and John R. Leonetti directing style sucks.If you wanna watch a sequel to Mortal Kombat, just watch yourself playing Mortal Kombat 2 on Midway's Arcade Greatest Hits 2 on Playstation 2 and XBOX
WHAT WENT WRONG?. What in the world happened with this clunker?  You have a script from Oscar winning writer John Patrick Shanley (Moonstruck); a cast any director would die for; and an initially interesting premise.  But even with all that, THE JANUARY MAN is not a good movie.  Shanley's script is so disjointed and the only attempt at comedy seems to be Kline's physical confrontation with the killer.  It takes the movie at least thirty minutes to focus on the killings, and even then, it plods along.  Shanley may have tried to hard to force the genres to work, and it shows.  And director Pat O'Connor should be required to do community service for his mishandling of this talented cast.  Kevin Kline, usually a strong presence in any film, plays Nick Starkey like it was an After School special--bland, unfocused and murky.  Susan Sarandon, who has won an Oscar, tries to be a kind of Julia Roberts femme fatale, but she's about as seductive as a seahorse.  Rod Steiger and Danny Aiello overact so badly, it's hard to believe these gentlemen have given us such good work in the past.  Harvey Keitel needs to play villains if this is how he chooses to embody a "good guy" for a change.  Alan Rickman's Ed is stereotypical artiste, but he at least adds some needed color to the movie.  And Mary Elizabeth Mastroantonio is pathetically dull and lethargic.THE JANUARY MAN could have been a good thriller, but under O'Connor's awful direction and Shanley's poorly developed script, it merely becomes one of those classic examples of a good movie gone bad
Blood is thicker than Water: Gory, Flawed---& Beautiful. Nobody in Hollywood would deny that the movie business is War. And as we all know from General Sherman, War is Hell.First-time director Kevin Yagher found that out the hard way. When studio chiefs brought in Joe Chappelle to fill in what they thought were gaps in the movie, Yagher walked off the set, pulled his name from this fourth Hellraiser installment and cursed it to movie development Hell, branding it with the ultimate shame of having been directed by "Alan Smithee", the Hollywood calling card of a disaffected director.Frankly, I think Yagher acted prematurely---"Bloodline" is flawed, one of the weakest of the brooding "Hellraiser" franchise---but taken on its own terms, it bumps and grinds quite nicely and sheds plenty of the red sauce along the way."Bloodline" is an entertaining little wallow in the ghoulish legendry of the hellish Cenobites, their tormented minions, and the earthly conjurers who hope to bring the Demons into the material world for gain and glory, and end up giving "body piercing" a whole new meaning."Bloodline" feels like a film created by committee, which is exactly what it turned out to be. It is uneven, jumping from scene to scene in fits and starts; it's evident that Yagher's vision was unfulfilled and his contempt justified.The film begins on a space station, with Science Officer Dr. Paul Merchant (played by French Canadian actor Bruce Ramsay, who does a stellar turn with all of the Le Merchant/Merchant roles) interrupted by a security team while trying to summon the demonic Cenobites using a high-tech version of the infamous Lament Configuration.Interrogated by one of the marines (played by the lovely but underused Christine Harnos), Merchant reveals that he is the last in a bloodline of inventors and scientists, and that his ancestor Phillip Le Merchant was a fabled 18th century French toymaker who first created the hellish Lament Configuration.Here's my advice: while I bought "Bloodline" for its gaudy, gory imagery and style, I would rent it and watch the first 40 minutes, if only for the fact that Yagher commits to celluloid some of the most graphic, stylish, erotic and disturbing images ever filmed.The story of the toymaker's design and delivery of the wicked box to a French nobleman, hedonist and sadist (played to the wild-eyed feverish hilt by Mickey Cottrell) is both hellacious and eerily beautiful, shot in natural light, the candles and firelight glittering on a palette of flesh, bone and blood. It is beautiful stuff, and I can see why Yagher resigned in disgust when his vision was commandeered by Chapelle.Oh, and Chilean actress Valentina Vargas is glorious as the demoness Angelique, with or without skin: she can rend my flesh any day of the week.Other than that, "Bloodline" is forgettable: we move from Le Merchant to his 20th century architect descendant and a skyscraper crammed with Cenobites, and thence to the haunted space station. While some reviewers have complained that the gory sequence in which two hapless twin security guards are transformed is both gratuitous and brings the movie to a halt, I enjoyed it: it's a wickedly bloody, gory piece in prime Hellraiser style. Finally, Douglas Bradley is in fine form as Pinhead---but then again, when isn't he?For the hardcore Hellraiser fan, buy this DVD---if you don't have it in your collection already. For the casual gorehound, a rental might suffice, if only to savor the supple, gorgeous, haunting 18th century prologue. For filmmakers, it's a prime example of how not to go about making a horror movie.JS
A merciful two star rating; Look for future Arena Football Def. Coor. Stan Davis as 1 child actor & funny bit about Cheap Trick. Surprisingly sleaze and Chauvinismby female Director Heckerling! Sheduplicated it in Chevy Chase vehicleNational Lampoon's European Vacationtoo! Many child actors got their starthere, but the thing that cracked me up,as I saw it when it came out (unfortu-nately) was the dialog of my fav band,Cheap Trick: Ticket scalper "...Themagntism of Robin Zander and thecharisma of Rick Nielsen...and whatabout the tunes, 'I Want You To WantMe, The Dream Police...nan-nan-nah,'You're momma's alright, your daddy'salright, they just seem a little weird,Surrender, surrender...", before he'sinterrupted. If that isn't somebody'sidea of 'Surrender', they've stumbledonto this review by mistake
Biscuit eating fools. The film-makers will walk the plank in shark infested waters for this one.Blackbeards ghost does not wander around a random college campus making smart comments, pulling lame pranks, and acting like a low-life burn-out loser, I do. Blackbeard is obviously drunk on his ghost-ship in the caribbean. The film-makers are obviously the heirs to filthy british royalty carrying out a plot to give pirates everywhere a bad name.
Dull and boring. This 'Trick' should refund your money... Like most indie gay themed movies, "Trick" had quite a bit of buzz around it. A terrific movie with Tori Spelling! How could I not love it?  I loved "Die Mommy, Die!", "Girls Will Be Girls", and "Jeffrey". So I gotta love this too, right? Right??I found it cloyingly sweet and completely out of touch with reality. A hot go-go boy wants to hook up with a nerdy dweeb?Uh... why??So they spend the whole evening looking for a place to get busy.  And then it's one contrived situation after another getting in the way of their plans.  As much as I can't stand Tori Spelling's "acting", she's the only performer not phoning it in. (Maybe she had an extra espresso before the shoots?)  What little life there is in this movie, it owes it to her.The problem is that both male leads are incredibly dull and not that good looking.  The "sizzling" dancer looked like bored monkey. And the soft, sensitive Gabriel has no personality. Why these two people continue to want to have sex with each other after six hours of roadblocks is a complete mystery.  I guess if go-go boy dropped the zero and found another guy (which wouldn't be too much of an effort for him), there wouldn't be much of a movie.A cameo by Miss Coco Peru is a nice treat.  But she's lit so unflatteringly and gives a monologue so ghoulish, you'd think she was in a different movie.High expectations, very low gratification. Honestly, skip it
Not Too Great!. This was a definite let down.  It is too bad that Pablo's first DVD since Bits & Pieces cannot nearly hold a candle.  Bits & Pieces was far more funny, enjoyable, and original.  I have seen him live once and am going to see him again in a couple of weeks.  Hopefully it won't be the same garbage.  If you are looking to laugh your butt off, don't purchase this DVD, purchase Bits & Pieces
Quite possibly one of the worst movies ever made. The book made a huge impression on me 35 years ago. I fell in love with the story and was envious of Sam's year in the wilderness.Last night, I found the movie for sale at a local book/music/DVD store. I vaguely remembered that My Side of the Mountain had also been a movie way back when, but I had forgotten all about it. I bought the movie and my wife and I watched it.Ugh. This movie was a waste of time. It was poorly written, abysmally acted, and strayed so far from the book that it was virtually unrecognizable to anyone who read and loved the book.My wife and I got the impression that the movie was adapted by someone who doesn't like hunting or killing of animals. Reference after reference was made in the movie to guns and hunters being bad, killing animals being bad and even Frightful was killed by a hunter apparently out shooting for sport. So Sam never got his deerskin outfit (as he did in the book). Instead, he bought leather gloves and wore some kind of yellow rain slicker during the winter.At one point near the end, when Bando returned to visit, there were so many people in Sam's hollowed out tree that I could have sworn it was a magic tree, much like the magic tents in the latest Harry Potter movie. Small from the outside. But huge on the inside.What an awful movie. Even the cinematography was horrid. If I had to watch Frightful fly around for minutes on end one more time I might have shot her myself.Avoid this movie at all costs!But please, do, read the book. It's one of the best children's' novels ever published
the real Pinero deserved better. First, let me say that Benjamin Bratt was great, despite the fact the script didn't give him much to work with. The rest of the cast, also very good.But I wish the filmmakers had more courage.I knew absolutely nothing about Miguel Pinero walking into this movie. But I'll say this for the film; it made me want to learn more about him. Unfortunately, it didn't really give me much information.The filmmakers seem to have a genuine reverence for this poet/playwright, but seem petrified of exploring any of the negative aspects of his life in any kind of depth, in case that might take some of the shine off their reverence.For example, the movie strongly hints he was bisexual. OK, so? If he was bisexual, what kind of struggle did that lead to in his relationships, or even more interesting, in himself? The movie never even begins to address these questions.It also portrays Pinero as the victim of child abuse. Pretty powerful stuff, no? We see disturbing images from his youth. But they are never really followed up on. They are just there, as if to say, "hey, that must have been pretty bad."The movie suggests that most of this talented man's relationships were quite complicated. But we never really get a demonstration of that. Only vague innuendoes that are occasionally thrown out with little reference.The real Miguel Pinero sounds like he was a talented, complicated and very interesting man. One who deserves a better treatment of his life's story
not worth your time or money. I saw this movie 'cause I love horror, and I love Halle. But this movie just sucked
Disappointed. As a fan of Acorn Media and a viewer of anything BBC that I can get my hands on, I have to say that I was disappointed by this production. Lovelace was far too villainous (every villain needs a redeeming quality). And the presentation of the "fake fire" followed by his complete recklessness seemed straight off the set of a high-school play.I regret being this harsh, as I'm always rooting these programs to be first rate. But the performance turned up no redeeming characters for me -- save for Hermione Norris (whom I have worshipped ever since seeing Berkeley Square). Saskia Wickham's performance as Clarissa is without nuance, never truly tempted and predictably snappish throughout.I walked away from the screen wishing Andrew Davies had writ the script
THIS MOVIE WOULD HAVE BEEN ACTED BETTER IF THEY USED REAL RETARDS!!!!!!!. I can't give it any less than one star but what the heck, The girls were hot so there's the one star. Other than that I am literally dumber after watching this movie! I swear to god! I passed out after watching this film because I got so stupid I forgot to breathe! They should stop beating around the bush and hire retards from the mental home to play the lead roles because lord knows they would have done a better job! Even if they just ran around the set yelling "1,2,3, Potato Salad, March!" The dialogue would have been 1000 times better. Message to the producer:Give it up loser!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Disappointing sequel. The first Saw movie was like a breathe of fresh air to the genre.  It wasn't a PG-13 rated teen fest or a remake of a classic 70's horror film either, and while it wasn't perfect, it still managed to deliver the goods with a little bit of originality thrown in.  Saw II picks up where the first film left off, with Jigsaw (Tobin Bell) playing another game with a group of people; among whom is survivor Amanda (Shawnee Smith) and the son (Erik Knudsen) of crooked detective Eric Matthews (Donnie Wahlberg) who is forced to play along as well.  Replacing James Wan as director, Darren Lynn Bousman ups the ante in terms of grotesqueness and the design of Jigsaw's game, but the story (originally based on an older story by Bousman that was later transformed into Saw II) isn't close to being as engaging as it was the first time around, and besides Bell, Smith, and Wahlberg; the rest of the cast (including a returning Dina Meyer, along with Glen Plummer, 7th Heaven's Beverly Mitchell, Franky G, and Emmanuelle Vaugier) range from grating to awful.  There's some pretty good gore effects, and the scenarios offer some imagination, but Saw II is a far step down from the original.  All in all, Saw II isn't horrible, but it's definitely the worst entry in the series by far
What For Pussycat?. I am a big fan of Woody Allen and I presume that I will eventually get around to seeing all of his movies.  Prior to viewing "What's New Pussycat?", I would have presumed that I would enjoy each and every movie.  However, "What's New Pussycat?" has shown me that even Woody Allen can make a disaster movie.What is wrong with this movie is just about everything.  The acting can only do so much with an impossibly awful script and a director who seems to want to magnify the faults rather than cover them up.  We start with a man whose problem is that he must seduce every acttractive woman he sees.  Peter O'Toole won the rights to play this character and he is surrounded by beautiful women.  He proceeds to make it all seem so boringly ridiculous.  He calls all his femine friends "pussycat" which gets old after a while.  He constantly displays a bewildered expression coupled with a rather interested/disinterested approach toward his playmates.  He seeks the help of a sexually challenged psychiatrist played by Peter Sellers.  Sellers does his best with what little he has to work with.  He has the Dr. Strangelove accent down pretty good and he is constantly on the make but the humor that emerges is so weak as to be embarassing at times.  Woody Allen wrote the script, which is the most shocking disappointment of the whole picture.  I once heard a comedian remark that a good comic writer can give you 10 new jokes of which you can use 3.  With Woody Allen, the comedian said, you can use all 10.  In "What's New Pussycat?", I wish there HAD been at least three good jokes.  This overlong look into the problems that O'Toole's character suffers from eventually attempts to save itself with a sort of Bennie Hill-style slapstick.  I take that back; there's no justifiable reason to besmirch the good name of Bennie Hill by associating it with this turkey.  Anyway, the movie ends in a chateau with a sort of musical beds involving all of O'Toole's mistresses.  An incomprehensible brouhaha ensues and the revelers escape to a neighboring go-kart track.  (Presumeably all fashional French Chateaus have a conveniently adjacent go-kart track).  This enables the movie to sink so low that it boggles the mind.  After all, we have some top talent in Allen, Sellers and O'toole and we see them spontaneously go go-kart-riding off into the sunset (or the side of a building, or a mud puddle, or something meant to be funny).  I was glad to be done with the movie.Woody Allen is a great talent.  Peter Sellers was a great talent.  Peter O'Toole was a great talent.  Watch them in their other productions but spare yourself the one movie that each one of them should not have made
Unrealistic. OK - I can get over the fact that the cat can talk, etc.  But the idea that he has a British doppelganger is TOO MUCH!  Any true reader of the comics knows that there can be only ONE Garfield.  I've got nothing against British people, but a British Garfield just doesn't make sense.Also, my friends left part way into the movie.  We were having a Garfield marathon at my place and they didn't even stick around for Garfield themed mad-libs.  I had to turn the movie off like 25 minutes into it (I don't watch movies alone - DEPRESSING!  it's like 'get a life jeff!").Anyway, I eventually did the mad-libs.  Here's a snippet (the words I filled in are in *asterisks*):Garfield *jumped* to Odie and *screamed*, "Odie, go look under the *microwave*, there is a treat made of *brussel sprouts* just for you!"  Odie *barrel rolled* toward the treat with his panting *tooth* hanging out and immediately ate the *silly pants* treat.  After he was through, he let out a *yodel*.  Garfield.........and that's as far as I got
Major Problem. This movie had a lot of potential.  I did not even mind the changes in the movie from the stage production.  BUT, any one with any singing experience knows that it is IMPOSSIBLE to sings these songs without opening your mouth!  The leads are all running around singing intense songs with their mouths open a crack.  I could not enjoy this movie at all because I knew they were lip syncing.  If something like this bothers you, I would avoid this movie.  The acting definitely falls flat.
Erotica in The old West. This is the saga of two women, friends, who find themselves sexually frustrated because their husbands are married to their work. Grace (Amy Lindsay) and her good friend Jenifer (Kim Yates) and their spouses are on some kind of vacation together or maybe their husbands are attending a work related convention. In any case, they are staying at a hotel somewhere in the west and are bored silly.Realizing this, Grace's husband Ray (Jim Stevens) arranges for her and Jenifer to visit a restored, old west ghost town. At the ghost town Grace and Jenifer begin to explore their setting when their new settings. Eventually the come across an antique mirror in a storeroom of the saloon. When Grace tries to touch the mirror, her hand penetrates it, so of course, being world class explorers, they decide to go through the mirror.On the other side of the mirror, they are still in the Saloon, but it is now in the eighteen hundreds. To make a long story short, The Madame of the saloon thinks Grace and Jenifer are two hostess/prostitutes she had sent for and puts them to work. In the meantime, Jenifer's Husband appears as Sheriff Bart (Nicolas Yff) and Grace's husband is now Reverend Issac. Much to the annoyance of his girl friend, Evie, Sheriff Bart takes a shine to Jenifer and she sets Jenifer up for the murder of the sheriff's deputy. After a very speedy kangaroo court, Jenifer is sentenced to hang in the morning.In the meantime, after a couple rolls with the customer's, Reverend Issac is trying to save Grace's soul, while she is trying to seduce him. Grace wins, but she has to save her friend from the hangman. Together they escape and retrace their steps though the magic mirror back into the twenty-first century and their now attentive modern day husbands.Report CardStory - D-Acting - CDirecting - D+Cinematography - C+Cast - C+Eroticism factor - C-Entertainment factor - DConclusionTimegate: Tales of the Saddletramps is not quite awful but I certainly wouldn't have missed anything had I not seen it. The Plot/story was contrived, silly, hokey and frankly not very well presented. In the scene where the girls go back in time by going through an antique mirror, the special effects were so poor that you could tell they were walking beside instead of through the mirror.For a low budget softcore movie the cast, acting and sets weren't too bad but the weakness of the screenplay and directing by Sam Silver, trumped everything else.The nudity was full but not explicit. There were about eight sex scenes of varying intensity and creativity, none of which came close to being exceptional. None looked authentic, though a couple with Kim Yates, in my opinion, did feel sensual. Kim has a very nice body and was the best performer in the film, though not enough to raise my rating above 2  stars
OVER RATED GARBAGE!. I bought this thinking "oh no! Am I going to be able to handle this?I mean this is the movie that is suppose to be worse as far as violencethan SALO-MEN BEHIND THE SUN-HENRY PORTRAIT OF A SERIAL KILLER and let'snot forget the crem dela crem CANNIBAL HOLOCAUST,well let me tell youthis is CAH AH RAP! I own a lot of crap too,some I even enjoy but thisis nothing to say the least. All it is is a demented guy in a samuraioutfit slowly dismembering a girl(who sometimes blinks I might addwhen he goes to cut the other parts of her body very annoying)inthe end he puts her severed parts in his so called garden(hencethe name). To think not only did I shell out some hard earn cash$32.87(it breaks the heart) I was even doing a little happy dancewaiting in line to purchase this,this fiasco. So whoever you aresave your money,and to think Charlie Sheen freaked out when hesaw this,hey Chuckie boy stay away from Henry and Cannibal oryou will be crying "MAMA-MAMA" you wienie head you got me allworked up for this-this-FIASCO
Greatest American Hero-Season 3. I recently bought season 3 of "Greatest American Hero."  WHAT'S UP THOUGH WITH THE EPISODES BEING OUT OF ORDER?  Ralph and Pam are married in about 3 to 4 episodes (disc 1 & 2) before we actually see the wedding on disc 3.  It was disappointing when I started watching the episodes and realized this.  I decided to copy the episode guide so I could view the episodes in the right order.  The first two seasons released were in the right order; possibly Anchor Bay manufactured season 3 wrong
WOW. Boy this movie was weird and psycho. I happen to like the weird movies but it was WAY off the psycho side for me. Friends try to cover up an "accidental death" from one of their friends when they try to pull a prank that goes horribly wrong. Things like this, I try to stay away from. Although I am glad I saw it so I won't always wonder if this movie was actually watchable or not. Now I know. I gave it 2 stars because the movie DID have it's charms.
HORRIBLE!. I was forced to watch this movie for college.  It was the most vulgar, unnecessary piece of junk I have ever seen.  This is a perfect example of the demoralization of America
Personal Best needs Qualification. I purchased the set hoping to get the some of the best bits / most well known sketches of Monty Python and I have been sorely disappointed.  The interludes in Cleese's disc are ludicrous / unfunny, as are a number of them on other discs.  My suggestion would be for the owners of the material to have a fan vote for what is the best and make a set out of that so maybe we could get the Ministry of Silly Walks and other well known pieces rather than second rate renditions filmed at the Hollywood Bowl
Worst movie EVER!!. I purchased this movie based upon the reviews and recommendations from others on Amazon.com who ( I assumed ) had watched it and liked it.  Not knowing the titles or directors of good erotica, I based my decision on those comments.  I have to say, and I'm usually NOT one to go off griping about things that don't deliver on their "advertised" qualities, but this was by far and without a doubt the WORST movie of ANY category I have ever seen.  I considered selling it on e-bay just to recover some of the cost, but I refuse to subject any poor unsuspecting man (or woman) to this garbage.  If you're looking for something to set the --mood-- this movie will NOT do it
Kundera was right to object. The movie doesn't at all reflect the original book story in its core concept. If I didn't read the book before I wouldn't be able to guess what is the movie trying to explain. I doubt anybody, based on the movie only, would be able to understand what happend in 1968 in the Czech republic and what was the consequence for the entire society
Subpar. One cup of coffee away from a psycho ward or one cigarette puff short of nuclear meltdown, James Woods is always a fascinating study for an audience that thrives on the unpredictable. This movie could have used more of his patented bug-eyed nuttiness. As it stands, Woods plays the role of unconventional cop in pretty conventional fashion, which, coupled with a murky, uninvolving script and slack direction, amounts to subpar and generally uninteresting slasher fare. There are moments of genuine quirkiness, as when he seemingly ad-libs a cynical remark suggesting that sex rather than sensitivity is what motivates his interest in Lesley Ann Warren. But those moments are few and far between, and I suspect this film went from production directly to video release without a commercial run. Woods should give up the lover-boy fling and stick to his specialty--being the edgiest guy in Hollywood. That should be enough for anyone
contrived, implausible crime drama. "Four Brothers" is yet another nail in the coffin of John Singleton's increasingly moribund moviemaking career.  The director - who burst upon the scene in 1991 with the vibrant and gritty "Boyz n the Hood" - has here mounted a film so burdened by implausibility and contrivance that it makes one wonder if the once-promising filmmaker will ever be able to get back on track again.  The story, reeking of artificiality, features Mark Wahlberg, Tyrese Gibson, Andre Benjamin and Garrett Hedlund as four troubled young men raised by the same foster mother.  When she is killed in a convenience store robbery, the quartet launches into action, seeking revenge against the perpetrators and becoming slowly convinced, through their investigation in the neighborhood, that the killing might not have been as random in nature as they had been initially led to believe.The main weakness of this film is that it gives us virtually no reason to care about any of the characters.  By not showing us any scenes between the boys and their foster mother (except for one embarrassingly bad Thanksgiving dinner fantasy sequence that looks as if it were conceived by a first-year film student), we are forced to take their relationship totally on faith, rendering the boys' thirst for revenge arbitrary at worst and academic at best.The acting is uniformly flat, with the characters little more than wafer-thin stereotypes, and even the action scenes come across as surprisingly mundane and second-rate given the Singleton pedigree in this area.  The boys' running around from venue to venue in their Detroit neighborhood, brandishing guns in full view of the populace and screaming for information about their mother's killer, is ludicrous on the face of it and often reduces the film to the level of cheap low comedy burlesque.With nary a single moment that rings believable or true, "Four Brothers" is by-the-book filmmaking from a director who has proven that he has the wherewithal and talent to do so much more.
Tobe Hooper? Richard Matheson? Masters of Horror? What happened??. One of the most eagerly awaited episodes in Showtime's Masters of Horror series, Dance of the Dead is sadly disappointing.  Now granted, it's been a long time since Tobe Hooper, the craftsman behind the legendary Texas Chainsaw Massacre, has done anything remotely spectacular, but the potential was here.  Based on a great story by I Am Legend author Richard Matheson (and adapted by his son, Richard Christian Matheson), Dance of the Dead revolves around a Mad Max-ish post-apocalyptic future in which a sheltered girl (Jessica Lowndes) gets in with a bad boy (a beefed-up Jonathan Tucker, from the 2003 re-make of Texas Chainsaw Massacre) who does work for the MC (genre icon Robert Englund) of a club that does some very different performances than you would expect, only to learn a shocking truth about her family.  What's the most disappointing here is Hooper's techniques, which are quite a number of quick flashes, edits, and cuts; which were most likely done to give the story a tripped out feel, but only distract the viewer.  Not to mention that a majority of the cast are so bad delivering some truly atrocious dialogue (Lowndes and Tucker are the only ones who don't seem to be sleepwalking) that the episode has an overly campy feel to it, and the music (allegedly by Smashing Pumpkins frontman Billy Corgan) is nu-metal drivel that is as derivative as Hooper's directing techniques.  It's a shame, there was a lot of potential here between Hooper, the story, and the cast; but it all got wasted.  There's some nice moments here and there (the apocalyptic flashback sequence is very nicely done), but there's not enough here to make Dance of the Dead what it could have been
Where's the comedy?  So slow and boring it puts you to sleep. Synopsis (including Ending):Don Ameche (Gino), a Chicago shoe shine man, is approached by the mafia to go tojail for "3 to 5 years" to take the place of their Mafia boss accused of murder becausehe bears a striking resemblance to him.  They'll pay him yearly and satisfy his lifelongdream of fishing on a boat.   Joe Mantegna (Jerry) takes Don Ameche (Gino) on a 3 dayvacation to satisfy his every wish before he's incarcerated.  Joe Mantegna is on probationfrom the Mob, after disobeying orders from a previous job.  Joe Mantegna goes"outside channels" to take Don Ameche (Gino) to Lake Tahoe to the "Galaxy" Hotelwhere they stay, wine and dine, and try to have a good time.  Things turn difficultwhen a local real Mafia Boss brings Don Ameche (Gino) to his house as a guest andthey form a bond.  The real Mafia Boss has a gathering of crime bosses planned andDon Ameche and Joe Mantegna are caught in the middle.  They escape the gatheringand on the day Don Ameche is brought back to Chicago, Joe Mantegna is orderedto kill Don Ameche and make it look like a suicide.  "It's cleaner this way...", he's told.Joe Mantegna refuses the order, and the film ends with a Mafia employee testifyingin court and getting sentenced to jail for 20 years to life.The Good:Joe Mantegna is an underrated actor generally and it was nice to see a familiar face inthe real Mafia Boss in Lake Tahoe.  Other than that, there's nothing else going forthis one except a slightly funny scene with the concierge.The Bad:The Mob wants tough guys, right?  This is a comedy, right?No ones a tough guy and there's no laughs.Joe Mantegna plays a sissy instead of a Mafia tough guy.Don Ameche plays a senile acting senior with no personality.I wanted to like this film but I coulden't because it was very slow, very boringand none of the characters were interesting.We never have a scene with the real Mafia Boss that looks like Don Amechaand the two never meet.  You would expect a friendly "Thanks for going to jailfor 3 to 5 years for me" but it doesn't happen.At the end someone for the Mob is dressed up like the real Mafia Boss and he'stestifying in court and gets sentenced to jail.  He doesn't look anything like DonAmeche or the real Mafia Boss and yet, he's right there taking the fall.If the film didn't need to depend on Don Ameche's appearance, why didn'tthey send him to jail from the beginning?The worst David Mamet experience I've had.  Very surprising stinker.The Characters:If Don Ameche played a less passive character he would have been more interesting.If Joe Mantegna showed more conflict as a character with reasons behind them,he would have been more interesting.  As the film stands, they're both flat.Don Ameche had no personality and his only lines are the ones other charactersused.  When a character says something, you can be sure Don Ameche repeats it30 minutes later like a senile robot.  Don Ameche's dialogue leaves a lot to be desired.Add to that his boring and stale acting in this film.He played very dumb, not interesting, like a real man in crisis about to go tojail for money.Overall, Joe Mantegna was not believable as a Mafia hired hand.Don Ameche was too passive and uninteresting, and Joe Mantegna is toopassive and stale.Scene Criticism:A couple scenes stand out as being very weak and unrealistic.(Gas Station scene where Joe Mantegna is given $3 more in gas than he asked for)Joe Mantegna is working for the mob, and he asks for $1 of gas,and gets $4.  He doesn't have the cash to pay, and when the gasattendant takes the car keys his reaction is "Please, please, please"A real Mob guy would punch the gas attendant, take back the keys,and leave for the plane they were late for.  A mob guy that won'tdefend himself for $3?(Scene with Don Ameche offered money to go to jail for 3 to 5 years)Don Ameche doesn't put up a fight or try to leave the room, and istoo passive.  We don't learn about his past or his life or family.There's not enough time spent on the offer, and the scene wasover valued for it's lasting value.(Bedroom scene with Joe Mantegna trying to let Don Ameche escape)Joe Mantegna had no real connection to Don Ameche's characterto justify the scene.  Instead it's 2 strangers.Personal Commentary:The test for a comedy for me is - "how many times did I laugh?"This film never made me laugh.  I'm shocked the film costs $24.99on DVD.  Rent it instead.  It belongs in the $1 bin at Wal-mart.Writing Criticism:Lines like "He's the guy behind the guy behind the guy behind theguy" and lines like "A big man knows the value of a small coin"and the story about the grasshopper and the ant make no sense.The writing is drivel.Alternative Recommended Film:  "Trading Places" with Dan Aykroyd and Eddie Murphy and alsoDon Ameche, albeit in a smaller role
Fake and Derivative. This review will be simple: Garden State is fake, manipulative and annoying.It tries way too hard, and every "idiosyncratic" element seems forced and insincere.I hate to offened any reader out there, but the entire time I was watching this flick I had one re-occuring thought:"This is a movie for Tools."You know those big-budget, well-shot TV commercials for Cars or Cellphones? It's about two hours of that: Vapid and pretty, micro-managed and insincere.The compulsive, overstated attention to detail is obnoxious and trite. The Director and cinematographer are more concerned with framing shots "well" than making a decent movie.Skip this one!Cliched, derivative, phoney, forced.If you're in the mood for something in this 'genre' just rewatch your Wes Anderson collection or maybe 'I Heart Huckabees' or even 'Eternal Sunshine...". Don't waste your time on this drivel
This Lady Snowblood Doesn't Fly. The Princess Blade is a homage to an infinitely better movie, 1973's Lady Snowblood. It's not like they try to hide that fact - it's a homage, not a rip-off. The Japanese name of both films, Shurayuki-hime, is identical, and the two main characters even have the same name, Yuki. In Japanese, "Shura" is a Buddhist term very like "Hell" or "netherworld," a place of violence and carnage. "Yuki" mean "snow" and is a common girl's name. "Hime" means "princess" or "lady." "Shurayuki-hime" is also a play on "Shirayuki-hime," the Japanese name for Snow White. All this according to the movie notes on the Lady Snowblood DVD.In Lady Snowblood, in Meiji Japan the titular character is the child of a woman whose husband and son are murdered by a band of thugs. After the murders, the wife is raped and tortured by the killers for three days. Surviving that ordeal, she dedicates herself to tracking and killing the people responsible. She offs the first one but is then captured and jailed. Dying in prison in childbirth, she charges - some would say curses - her infant daughter to finish the job when she's old enough. For what it is, this is an extraordinarily well done film. Even with all the extreme violence and second-rate actors overdoing their death throes as they spurt buckets of fake blood we'd expect from a Seventies Japanese samurai flick, there are also moments in Lady Snowblood that are eerily beautiful.In The Princess Blade, in that unspecified near-future time so beloved of low-budget sci-fi, Yuki's mother is the leader of a gang of assassins. Betrayed by one of her own, she's also tortured for three days, but in this case doesn't survive the experience. The daughter, unaware how her mother died - she's only two years old at the time - becomes a member of the gang herself. Not until she's almost 20 does she discover the gang leader is also her mother's murderer. After trying and failing to kill him, she runs for her life and the movie proceeds from there.If I may be allowed to seemingly digress for a moment: I believe that most people - unless they absolutely hate a particular type of movie - will enjoy any film, of any genre, as long as it's well done. Look at all the people not previously fans of anime who loved Ghost In the Shell. The Princess Blade is low-budget, hyper-violent, Japanese chop-socky. It's well enough done that if you're already a fan of such movies, you'll probably enjoy it. However, unlike Lady Snowblood, The Princess Blade is not well enough done to have crossover appeal, i.e. it just won't do it for people not already predisposed to like this sort of film.If you're a genre fan, I'd say of The Princess Blade, go for it. If not, and you just have an idle interest in watching a good low-budget Japanese flick with a sword-wielding female assassin as the main character, I suggest passing on The Princess Blade and watching Lady Snowblood instead (now available in an absolutely superb DVD transfer, by the way). You'll enjoy the experience immensely more
Great panoramas. Repugnant story. I do not like movies or stories where people get in trouble by doing things they know they should not do. I like them even less when they hurt innocent people by doing things they know they should not do.Summary: Two people use their lust for each other as an excuse to fall down on their jobs, break commitments they make to their spouses, and hurt people they love, but their long-lasting love for each other helps them avoid depression.If these two people had been a man and a woman, this would be just another adultery movie. But because this is a mainstream movie about gays, it shocks people into ignoring the fundamental theme of abuse. If two lovers make the mistake of marrying other people, they should either live with the mistake, or get a divorce (preferably before having children). They should not punish their spouses and children for their mistake.[...].Other people obviously enjoy watching stories of abusers. I don't
I Can't Buy Into It. Amanda Pete is sexy and there was a bit of nudity, but otherwise this film did nothing for me. A bunch of guys who get together once a week and talk about their conquests? I can't even relate. And they're trying to convince me that women are just as ruthless in their hornyness? Yeah right! See it if you're a big fan of fart jokes, or whatever..
Matrix Part Four... Keanu Reeves took this part just after he had done the Matrix movies, and many complained that this movie looked so much like the part he played in those other films.There is little to admire with this movie.  It is insulting to people's beliefs (it was actually banned from showing by many countries in the Middle East due to the subject matter), and beyond the all too noticeable CG effects, there is no story nor script here at all.  One must feel sorry for Rachel Weisz, because she is trying so hard to play a good character here, but without a script, it is all pointless
What a bad movie ... I really liked Ashton Kutcher's version, in my opinion, a very good movie but this... It seems like the director didn't understand the first part. I expected it would be a similar story but, it really sucked. Don't waste your time and money with this movie
Disappointing. I ordered this version after reading reviews of it and Badder Santa, thinking maybe I was getting something more than the movie I'd already seen and loved.  I didn't care for this version.  It is lacking a couple of scenes that I think help to tie the story together, and in apparently seeking a more "noir" theme includes scenes that are probably more than I needed to know...like the van backing over the security guy.  They killed him, okay, I get it.  I also didn't like the ending as much (although I won't give it away for those of you just dying to see it).  I will donate this to the Friends of the Library sale and buy myself a copy of the "vanilla" version
How do you make incest *dull*?. For a topic this edgy, this is an incredibly dull film. The actors are good enough, mind you. But they can only do so much, because the real problem with this film is the script. For the first twenty minutes or so of screen time, the viewer is led through a series of confusing and rather disconnected scenes involving the perpetually discontented Natalie and the nice young man who turns out to be her younger brother. (You *might* not pick up on that fact at first, since there are minimal references to it in the first third of the film--certainly the two *look* nothing alike.) Finally the main part of the plot begins, with Natalie just as discontented, despite being married to a wealthy and quirky-but-ultimately-nice guy (Alan Rickman, for whose sake I watched this film at all--not worth it), and with her brother seemingly happy with his life, but somehow still willing to be drawn into a sexual relationship with his sister. From that point, things spiral--no, that's too dynamic a word to describe it--*mosey* out of control, with the fickle sister trying to break off the affair, the poor brother (the only particularly sympathetic character in the film) becoming obsessed with the relationship, and the worried hubby's suspicions growing (although not in the right direction). There's so much here that *could* have been fascinating and compelling, but isn't, on any level. The plot just wanders aimlessly through an only semi-believable situation, scattering out the occasional pebble of human misery with its slogging feet. This video seems to have disappeared from most rental shops--mercifully for the public--but I certainly wouldn't recommend resorting to buying it.
Humm Drumm. Not much here.  Just same ol practice techniques like sweep picking, patterns, etc.  The stuff that's on EVERY guitar video.   Buy Rockhouse Videos instead.  They show you stuff you can use NOW
Could have been better. Yup. I like the cartoons and books better than this. sorry
Is this what Spike Lee did during the Summer of '77?. He was apparently obsessed with penises (black and Italian), lesbian sex, and oh, yeah, gay bars.I think there was a psycho in there somewhere, running around and blowing away BQE young couples with a .44 caliber gun. I was a kid, and I sure as hell was scared to death that summer. Apparently since Son of Sam didn't target young black men, it was a mere backdrop to Spike Lee's frame of consciousness.That's what happens when you're a narcissist (Spike, call your shrink.)This COULD'VE been an excellent movie. Adrien Brody, probably one of the most underrated actors around, once again shows how he can shine in a character role. Unfortunately, the rest of the actors blow (no .44 caliber pun intended.)Mira Sorvino, once again, is one of the most annoying actresses of any generation ("You guys think I'm pretty? I'm pretty, right?" No, Mira, you aren't, and you have BIG thighs), and I'd turn the gas on if I were John Leguizamo. His role in this movie is basically to hump anything that doesn't move faster than him, and thanks to good ol' Spike, we get to see the gory details.Watching Leguizamo graphically having 86 orgasms is enough to make me consider turning lesbian (just as long as he'd stay away.)I'm sure Leguizamo has a career in films. If they ever redo Saturday Night Fever, he can be the little geek in the platform shoes who knocks up his girlfriend and jumps off the Brooklyn Bridge. Every time Leguizamo came on the screen in this movie, I kept expecting him to follow John Travolta under a "Stayin' Alive" backbeat. Leguizamo is THE spitting image of the little jerk who followed Travola around in Saturday Night Fever - but without the geek's redeeming qualities (i.e., I never had to watch the geek have an orgasm.)Aside from the 822 gratuitious sex scenes in this mess, the language actually starts to become an impediment. If Spike Lee was forced to remove the F-word from this movie, the running time would've been 9 minutes.The premise - about all the stuff going on in the area where Son of Sam stalked - is an excellent one. I'm hoping that someone else does a movie about it. Just imagine what a movie with an actual PLOT would've been like!(Spike, call your English teacher. The F word isn't a cover for an absence of a storyline. And if you aren't getting financial backing for movies - yo, Spike, trust me, babe - it's NOT because of racism!
disappointing -- especially for the x-men fans!. If you have read (and enjoyed) any of the X-men, save your $, buy the graphic novel of the original dark Phoenix saga, and pretend this movie wasn't made.  If you want to see some special effects & aren't that hung up on character development, I'd still just rent it
Hollywood Apocalypse... Sorta. It's a truism that great novels make lousy movies. For evidence of that fact, you need look no further.As the great Hollywood novel (at least there's no convincing competitor), it was inevitable that "Day of the Locust" would hit the screen eventually. And when the time came, some effort was made to ensure the job was done right, beginning with the selection of the director, John Schlesinger, a literate British expatriate with a superb track record. But the 70s was the epoch of good intentions gone awry, in film as in everything else."Locust" was made during the period when many people considered William Atherton to be an actor. You can see him in a number of major films, his expression never changing, with all the emotional impact of a log. It's one of those things that lends conviction to the claim that the industry runs on herd instinct.But it's not all Atherton's fault, because nobody comes to life in this flick. Not even Karen Black, one of the most idiosyncratic actresses ever, for all that she's playing a hooker (Karen must have gotten very tired of that kind of role). Not even old pro Burgess Meredith, as her deadbeat old man. Donald Sutherland reveals a flicker or two, for all that he's supposed to be playing a lump. The sole exception is Jackie Earle Haley, who portrays the evil-minded child actor Adore with truly demonic intensity. Maybe they should have let him direct.It would seem difficult to make scenes like the collapse of a huge Napoleonic war set or an illegal cockfight look dull, but Sclesinger brings it off. I don't know how -- this is, after all, the guy who made the selection of a new wardrobe for Cold War traitor Guy Burgess look enlightening and entertaining in "An Englishman Abroad". Maybe the milieu overwhelmed him. It's happened to other people.It all comes to a head at the climax, which is supposed to illuminate an apocalyptic painting of the destruction of LA by Atherton's Todd. In a single truly effective scene, the distraught Homer Simpson murders the noxious child actor Adore. And then...Well, if you want to see the dullest riot scene in film history, here you are. It's as if Schlesinger said, "Okay, this the 30s, and there were Nazis around during the 30s -- so let's make the rioters Nazis!" Thus we get a lengthy sequence in which people wearing very silly masks (they look like a chorus of Leatherfaces from "Texas Chainsaw Massacre") stand in one spot goose-stepping. Every now and then the camera shifts to a masked woman staring through a car windshield. And that's your riot.To top things off, Schlesinger then gives us a "symbolic" coda that succeeds only in casting into doubt everything we've seen for the past two hours.Nathanael West had an unbelievably tough career as an author. His publisher went bankrupt a week before "Miss Lonelyhearts" was due to be published. He died in a car crash only a short time after "Locust" appeared. Then they went and made this movie. Remember that next time you start thinking that life is unfair.
CUBY GETS DIRTY. The strange and baffling career of Cuba Gooding takes another dive in this attempt to mirror the success of Denzel's TRAINING DAY.  Unfortunately, Cuba's not Denzel and this movie is way below the quality of DAY.  Filled with enough foul language to fill the Pacific Ocean, the movie attempts to be artsy but is merely another bad cop movie, filled with bad cops---where's the good ones?  Clifton Collins Jr., so good in CAPOTE, is wasted in the role of the apparently honest partner of Cuba who is going to testify in Internal Affairs regarding the killing of an innocent bystander during a drug bust.  All though this Cuba swaggers like a rap star and Collins has to try and act tough with him.  There's an unusual twist in the end and a very long russian roulette sequence that do nothing to redeem this disappointing film
Shamefully Dissappointing DVD. The shows themselves are wonderful, but the people who put together this DVD set should be ashamed of this paltry effort! There are NO cast or staff interviews about the ending of such a wonderful series. NO commentaries. No English sub-titles.  NO John Spencer honorarium of any kind. They didn't even take the time to include the 1 hour re-showing of the original pilot they aired before the finale!  The only "extras" are two not-special-at-all special features dealing with the debate. This DVD set is definately NOT worth the money to buy it brand new.
DON'T BUY THIS DVD!!!. It's an understatement that many of us feel ripped off by WB's attempt to unfairly empty our wallets. If we refuse to buy these horribly priced episode dvds and at the same time purchase the available full season box sets that are of value then we can make some headway. They are in the business of making $$$. Slowing their cash flow will force them to give us consumers' products we demand or risk losing our disposable income. Die-hard fans of this series and other series must convince every parent to withhold from purchasing these dvds until full seasons are made available. C'mon WB, we love these shows and will pay for them. We only ask that you don't rape our wallets. Give us the full season box sets much sooner
Good movie. Funny and very inspirational. Good way to encourage young teenagers to build self esteem. If there's a will, there's a way. Anyone can dance
On the Box. On the rear side of the box it clearly says that this DVD includes Spanish and French language in Mono format. It isn't true, doesn't have other language than "3" English tracks! The film is in B&W also. Don't tell me that there isn't technology to translate this in color and make it available in other languages! The film is good anyway
Please, I beg you, stop playing. A very mediocre adaptation of a David Leavitt novel, "Food of Love" never takes off as a film, despite beautiful location footage. Some of the blame is on the English actors straining to speak with American accents (we can tell), but that pales compared to the Spanish actors whose dialogue is dubbed in.  It amazes me that we can simulate explosions in film, but nobody has successfully figured out how to dub in dialogue without it sounding stilted.This film has moments of unintentional comedy (pay special attention to the "sexy" fluttering bathrobe Allan Corduner wears while entertaining a hustler; it looks as though he stole it off a Jedi Knight) and unmitigated horror (fluorescent lights and bad makeup turn poor Paul Rhys into a vampire in a record shop scene - yeesh!)  And despite a shot of Lincoln Center here and the view from the Brooklyn Bridge there, it's obvious the actors never set foot in New York. I was disappointed in this film and by the end of it, I was bored.
Alot of hot people... but the movie it self blew. Yesss.... lots and lots of really hot people.. but the move sucked.
An American Discgrace in the Discount Video Bin. This film sucked harder than a boatload of whores during shore leave. I originally saw it for free and afterwards, I still felt screwed. It stank so badly that I checked the soles of my sneakers on my way out of the theatre. Yeah, I know. Call me "Mister Tact".A "horror-comedy" that's neither slightly funny nor remotely scary, this film is a supposed sequel to the 1981 horror classic "An American Werewolf in London", (which is possibly the best werewolf film ever made). The filmakers had a lot to live up to and, boy, they blew it in every department. The effects were ludicrous, the cast was lost, the script was bathroom tissue with identity issues, and the director should have been shot (with something other than lots of narcotics). This film is a textbook example of the Hollywood machine clanking its way through a total goatscrew.If you have already been suckered into buying this DVD, I feel your pain. You are undoubtedly now using it as a coaster for a Heineken or as a tool to chisel old dingleberries out of your asscrack
Nothing but soft porn. The novel of Wide Sargasso Sea was  decent book. A re-writing of Jane Eyre's Bertha. But the film is really hard to tolerate. It starts out ok. Although it seems to start deviating from the book early on. Past the point where Antoinette marries Rochester the film turns in to nothing but soft porn and the acting gets worse too.
NOT THE GREATEST BOX SET!. I'm not a big Doris Day fan, but I thought I give the set a shot. Thought Love Me or Leave Me was excellent, Calamity Jane was very good and even Lullaby of Broadway and Young Man with a Horn weren't bad, but the rest were sickenly sweet. I thought Jumbo and The Pajama Game would NEVER end. Even Jimmy Durante couldn't save Jumbo! And The Glass Bottom Boat wasn't even worthy of the Three Stooges. The good news was I was able to sell 5 of the movies on Amazon, kept three and even made a profit by selling them individually so the box set didn't cost me anything and I made a few bucks on Doris too
Trouble staying awake. Can't understand what all the fuss is over this movie. It's cute but so boring. I could hardly stay awake.
the book is a lot better. i had high expectation on the video but it turned out to be quite disappointed and boring, i have to say that the one is one of my favourite books i ever rea
Disappointed. This documentary is not very in-depth and was not made very well.  It seemed to be made in a hurry as there are some obvious mistakes and was not made with much detail.  Only a few schools across the country are represented, so I don't see how that reflects the title, Friday Nights in AMERICA, indicating that schools across the entire country would be discussed.  Overall I was very disappointed
Enjoying videos. Not often can we really enjoy a video with grandchildren - or even by ourselves - but this was great with many laughs
"Based on True Events" but still kind of dull... The first ten minutes of this film seemed promising but unfortunately it never quite came together for me.  I only kept watching because I was vaguely interested in who the real "Dori Lawrence" could have been.  (Online sources think that it is perhaps an actress named Sarah Holcomb.)In the end however, I didn't find myself really caring who the real life actress was...and even the fact that this film is "based on true events" doesn't make it any more relevant and/or "real" to me.I think it maybe tried to cover too much in too short a time period and it just came up short.  Parts of it were certainly interesting, but in the end the film as a *whole* couldn't hold water.  There are just too many holes.My first comment after the first fifteen minutes:  "This looks good, I think I'll have to borrow it and watch it again."My final comment after the credits rolled:  "Huh.  Actually, I don't think I liked it.
Back to the well, and this one was shallow to begin with... I hate to admit I actually own this thing on VHS.  And unless my mind is going more than usual, I have this cut of the movie too.Double (and more) dipping by the studios seems to be the way of DVD.  We get at least four issues of Terminator 2, but none of Robinson Crusoe on Mars.  I personally am sick of it.Director's Cuts, Unrated Editions, and other snaky ways of trying to separate my money from my wallet.  No wonder I've taken to borrowing nearly all my DVDs from the Public Library.No, you generally don't get them the day they come out.  But honestly, when was the last time you purchased a movie from Hollyweird that was worth keeping?  Don't do it
Ugh!. Where to start.  It was nice to see Jonathan LaPaglia (Frank Parker from "7 Days.") Other than that, the movie was horrible.  The acting and dialog was very nearly painful to endure, and as for the special effects...I think the Teletubbies had more cutting edge effects than "Attack of the Gryphon.
The Outbreak snakes?. What do you get when you put nameless terrorists who easily invade top secret military facilities, snakes(which coincidentally often look like rope coiled up) that are smarter than your average actor, and Treat Williams as your biggest star?  The only possible answer is this movie.  Actually calling it a movie would justify it in some sense.  Whatever you do don't rent, buy, or borrow this trash.  It isn't even a movie you can laugh at most of the time.  The belief that this is filmmaking (even bad filmmaking) saddens me
NOT WMVHD. Bought this DVD on the basis that it was a High Definition DVD using Microsoft's WMVHD technology i.e like the other IMAX titles such as Amazon, The Living Sea etc. Those titles ship with two disks - one standard, and one PC only (high definition) version. This Greece title is just a single, standard definition DVD. Nothing special. This lower quality title costs the same as the higher quality IMAX titles. Be v. careful of what you are buying. If you receive two disks, then you're ok...
Let's just say you should not watch this instead of reading the book. Shekhar Kapur's vision of A.E.W. Mason's The Four Feathers is well done visually, but unfortunately much of the original story is lost to create a more fast-paced and action-packed plot. While the basic story is kept, many small details seem to have been needlessly changed. For those who don't know, The Four Feathers is supposedly about Harry Feversham, a man enlisted in the army. When Harry is informed he will be sent to war in the Sudan, he hides this information and quietly resigns from the army to be with his fianc, Ethne. However, life with Ethne is soon changed when he receives three white feathers from his army colleagues. Explaining to Ethne what he has done and that the feathers are a symbol of cowardice do not help Harry; in fact, she tears a feather out of her fan to make four feathers. Harry then sets out to regain the lost respect of his friends through helping them, in an ultimate goal to regain the respect of Ethne.For the most part, only minor details are changed from the novel to the movie; for example, the way that Harry's friend, Jack Durrance goes blind, or the fact that Harry disguised himself as a Greek, not as an Arab. The change that seems most prominent, however, is the fact that in the film, Jack Durrance knows of Harry's resignation from the beginning. This subverts the whole quest that Jack undertakes to find out the truth in the novel. In addition, the entire `battle' between the warden of the House of Stone of Omdurman and Harry and Abou Fatma was created solely for action value in the film. However, despite this addition of action, the movie still seems to drag at points.Films are almost never completely accurate when following a novel; that is why they are only based on them. However, as I've said, a lot of the changes made seem senseless. I would recommend this film to someone who has not read the book or who does not mind liberal film interpretations of novels, if they have an hour or two to waste. Those looking for a movie to keep them on the edge of their seats would be advised to find something else.
emotionally and dramatically flat and lifeless; set decoration is the only lively thing on display. Roland Joffe directed two masterpieces: The Killing Fields & The Mission. But those two films, directed in 1984 & 1986, were made twenty or more years ago. I'd recommend either of those two films to anybody but Vatel I would recommend only to those viewers who can enjoy a film for its look, its set design and its attention to period detail even when the story and characters themselves are not all that captivating.Vatel is a film that should have everything going for it. As mentioned the director has at least two masterpieces to his credit, Tom Stoppard had a hand in the screenplay (more on that in a minute), Uma Thurman is beautiful, and Gerard Depardieu & Julian Sands & Tim Roth are each capable of delivering memorable performances when they feel inspired. The problem is no one feels inspired by this material. And that is in part due to a lackluster set of characters--supposedly based on actual people--and a story that never really manages to capture our imagination.Gerard Depardieu as master steward "Vatel" is required by his boss, the gout-stricken Prince Conde aka General Conde, to arrange elaborate feasts and entertainments for a visiting retinue of royals that include King Louis XIV, his mistresses, his brother, and various advisors & handlers. If these feasts and entertainments succeed in capturing the kings fancy then Vatel's boss may receive the honor of commanding the French troops in a war with Holland (that may or may not happen). So virtually every frame of the film is dedicated to following Vatel as he personally oversees virtually every dish and set decoration before it is presented to the royal retinue. As viewers we are amazed by Vatel's ingenuity with everything from outdoor theatrical sets that resemble large fold-out books to his ability to make delicate lanterns out of vegetable gourds (Martha Stewart would be impressed) but our interest is purely aesthetic because we never really care whether the Prince gets his royal comission or not and we barely care about Vatel. Next to the selfish, scheming and utterly corrupt royals the selfless and earthy and incorruptible Vatel seems, well, selfless and earthy and incorruptible. Along with his many domestic and artistic talents Vatel also has an uncanny way of understanding people's true natures and needs better than they. The problem with Vatel is that he is perhaps too selfless and so while he busies himself with entertaining others his own life is virtually a non-event.Uma Thurman plays a woman of precarious social standing. She is from a noble family but her position at court is not yet secure and like everyone else she must humor the King to assure his continued favor. When he suggests that they meet in private "for a cup of chocolate" she has no choice but to agree. She is under no illusion that she is anything but a temporary amusement for the King but to refuse the King's advances would be social suicide. The royal world sickens her and we are supposed to see her as somehow too earthy and real for court life but one problem is that this character is barely there. Uma just barely goes through the motions when she is onscreen; instead of seeming like she is dissatisfied with court life she just looks like she is dissatisfied with having to be in this royal dud of a picture. This is too bad because she is supposed to be the muse that awakens or re-awakens Vatel's long dormant passions but there is absolutely zero spark between Uma Thurman and Gerard Depardieu. When the obese fifty-something Depardieu kisses the thirty-something Uma we just don't get it. Few screen romances have ever felt so unconvincing and so void of passion and so uncomfortable to watch. We do know that Depardieu as Vatel is capable of feeling affection because he is very fond of his pet parrots but alas none of this affection is apparent when Uma Thurman is in frame. We're supposed to feel that its the rabid social competition of court life that reduces love to a mere game of conquest and that true love in such a world doesn't have a chance. Instead what we feel is that lack of chemistry between actors is what kills passion.  Since the Depardieu-Thurman romance doesn't manage to throw off even one spark the primary story-line is D.O.A. . The elaborate theatrical productions and fireworks displays might hold your attention for a few minutes but this film is not interesting enough to hold your attention for two hours.Julian Sands does a pretty good job as King Louis XIV and Tim Roth an ok job as one of the kings advisors but neither of these actors are given anything very interesting to do or say. Though Tom Stoppard's name appears in the credits when you look closer you realize that Tom Stoppard didn't write an original screenplay rather he merely adapted a French text. Thus even though this film tries to ride on the coat tails of the Stoppard penned Shakespeare in Love this production does not have any of Stoppard's signature cleverness or wit.
Nice to look at is all. Beautiful scenery, nice costumes, great acting, and handsome people, without a good storyline do not a great movie make
The Character of Martha Dunstock. Rather than give another general review as others have kindly done,  my review focuses on one aspect of the film, indeed one character, that of Martha.Martha Dunstock is known throughout the film as Martha Dumptruck. Even the film credits include the nickname `Dumptruck' besides the character's surname (evidently feeling the need to labour the point). Portrayed as unattractive and pathetically grateful for any attention she is given, she unwittingly provides the Slater character with information enabling him to murder a student. Later, when the cult status of the `suicides' (that is, murdered students) becomes apparent, Martha attempts her own suicide by walking into the path of traffic. But her attempt is shown as a failure. At the end of the film Martha is bruised and now disabled, in an electric wheelchair. Ryder's character, having finished her voyage of self-realisation, rejects the school Prom night and instead invites Martha to stay in with a video and popcorn. Martha gratefully accepts and the closing scenes show Ryder walking along the corridor while Martha encircles her like a planet around the sun.The image of Martha in her wheelchair, an object of pity for Ryder and for the audience, signifies to us fears of being different, of not being beautiful, of not being loved and respected. Martha is the person we are all frightened of becoming. She is given no means of solving her predicament by the film maker. And though some of us in the audience may be fat, or disabled, or both, we may yet still fear Martha, and are invited to consider Ryder's protagonist's journey of self discovery as our own, even is in physical and social reality, we are more like Martha.For this reason, `Heathers' fails as an exploration of the `Hell' of High School ( a description often used by Buffy/Angel/ Firefly's Joss Whedon). Those in the audience NOT as thin and complying with Western standards of `beauty' as the protagonists (probably the majority of us) ultimately may find the so-called subversion of cruel hierarchy in this film just that little too shallow, leaving a bitter after-taste. The way `fat' people are portrayed in films such as these unfortunately often reflect the predictable, transparent and absurd fixations of the film makers. Sadly this is happening even today - in some ways it has gotten even worse since the Western World decided to wage a 'war on fat' (to quote Paul Campos) - and even at best it is lazy film-making.
booooring!!!!. This is just an art appreciation lecture on disc.  I guess art lovers without access to museums or art historians' work would need something like this.  However, live art lectures have a question-and-answer format that makes them interactive and fun.  This work was just dull.  The disc does a good job in mentioning that Matisse worked in several styles.  Still, it's just one piece after another.  Nothing moves on the entire disc, making everything feel so static and overly two-dimensional.  This disc leaves many questions to be answered.  For example, they show a painting of Madame Matisse and never once mentioned when the Matisses got married.  They mention a series of dancing female nudes and then a picture of male musicians.  They never say anything about the men being airbrushed or the obvious Japonisme influence on the piece.  Though an average-length documentary, it feels like an eternity due to the dullness of the work.  Blah! and yawn
Opt for Something Better. I think Denise Austin does a decent job in some of her other videos, but this isn't one of them.  She lacks any type of warm up in this one and often looks like she's just trying to make up steps in order to fill the time slot.  The moves are not well choreographed and very awkward.  Some may find encouragement in the times Denise gives the camera a bug eyed stare and says "We're burning butter.... yeah" but I found it annoying.  I think there are much better workouts for the money out there
Ink-a-dink-a-dink!. I have now seen two Judy Garland movies -- The Wizard of Oz and this one. All bets are off about a third.I Could Go On Singing has the morbid distinction of being Judy's final film. She plays -- get this -- a world famous tough-talking yet vulnerable vocalist with a tormented personal life and an appetite for prescription medication and martinis. Quite a stretch.Overall, this movie is a confused hybrid of a melodramatic soap opera, a London travelogue, and a "live" Judy Garland stage performance. It will probably be filed under "Musicals" at your video store, but that's not really accurate -- nobody spontaneously breaks out into Wizard of Oz-style song and dance production numbers. Instead, the tunes are performed by Judy's alter-ego "character" Jenny Bowman at pseudo-live sold out (of course) solo shows at the London Palladium. She sings a handful of oddly forgettable and unremarkable showstoppers, including the title song which features unfortunate lyrics such as these:I could go on singing, til the cows come homeAnd the rooster starts to crow, crow, crowWhen I see your eyes, I go all out I must vocalizetil you shout "enough already!"I could go on singing, til the moon turns pinkAnything from Faust toInk-a-dink-a-dink!Not even Judy can manage to deliver this stuff convincingly, but she gives it her best shot.The notable exception is the little-known gem of a torch song, "It Never Was You" by Kurt Weill, which certainly deserves to be heard more often. There is also some remarkable instrumental soundtrack music by Mort Lindsey (co-composer of the Jeopardy theme song), especially the zippy "Helicopter Ride" symphony and the experimental, Ives-ian "Matt's Dilemma" interlude. And you get to see Judy's son (Matt -- the dilemma being he doesn't yet know he's Judy's son) performing Gilbert and Sullivan in drag, if that's the kind of thing you're into.Otherwise, Jack Klugman, Dick Bogarde, and the rest of the cast are merely props on Judy's stage, though the kid who plays Matt is a likeable enough chap I guess. Dramatically, though, I Could Go On Singing is awfully cornball, overwrought stuff, and it all comes to an abrupt, unsatisfying conclusion.It also doesn't help that the MGM DVD is a cheapo affair with no bonus features to speak of (no, the "theatrical trailer" doesn't count) and only barely adequate mono sound.Grade: C
Nice sets, now where's the story. The production designer of this movie should have been nominated for an Oscar, but his designs were tied to this "shaggy dog" "Alien" rip-off that try as it does never delivers the goods. A real shame for all involved
Buyer Beware!!. We got about 5 minutes into the video when my 4 year old started crying, it had frozen, wouldn't work at all. We returned one, got a new one, it freezes too!  We have almost all the Strawberry Shortcake DVD's, and this is the ONLY one we have had a problem with, and the story looks so cute. I think the mass production on this one really got screwed up and I caution buyers to beware.
DULL !!!!. MASSACRE IN DINOSAUR VALLEY IS NOT WHAT YOU WOULD THINK. WELL OKAY MAYBE IT'S EXACTLY WHAT YOU THINK, HOWEVER ON THE BACK OF THE DVD IT GAVE YOU THE IDEA THAT THIS WAS A CANNIBAL MOVIE THEY ALSO GAVE YOU THE IDEA THAT THIS WAS AN ACTION MOVIE,CRAP!!!!    THE MOVIE CONTAINED NO GORE NO STORY NO ACTION AND JUST PLAIN DID NOT MAKE ANY SENSE THE MOVIE IS ABOUT SOME IDIOT'S THAT CRASHED LANDED IN SOME CURSED VALLEY (WHY THE VALLEY IS CURSED I HAVE NO IDEA)THEN THEY START TO RUN FROM SOME NOISE ALL OVER THE JUNGLE THEN SOME JERK START RELIVING THE GLORY DAYS BACK IN THE WAR STARTED KILLING AND PUSHING EVERYONE AROUND.TWO GIRLS GOT CAPTURED (WHAT,S LEFT OF THEM) THEN WAS RESCUED BY AN INDIANA JONES WANNBEE.THEY  FINALY MADE IT AWAY FROM THE CANNIBALS (WHICH BY THE WAY THEY LOOK LIKE A POOR MAN,S CANNIBALS) ONLY TO BE CAPTURED BY SLAVE TRADERS (THIS IS WHAT THE MOVIE IS TRULY ABOUT) AND IT GETS EVEN DUMBER. NO GOOD QUAILTIES ABOUT THIS DVD MAYBE FOR DELETED SCENES THAT THEY SHOULD HAVE KEPT IN THE MOVIE.
I much preferred Cruel Intentions. Of course, I saw Cruel Intentions first, and it appealed to me more because of Ryan & Reese. (No longer Hollywood's Golden Couple, if they can't last, what hope is there for us mere mortals?) You always prefer the one you see first, and for me, it is definitely Cruel Intentions. Plus, I have a tendancy to detest 'costume' films, and can never sit through them (Emma, Sense & Sensibility etc).Although there is a lot similar between Dangerous Liasions & Cruel Intentions (many of the lines stay practically the same), and Swoosie Kurtz, who plays Madame de Volange, went on to play Dr. Greenbaum in Cruel Intentions (in both films, Valmont seduces her daughter), there's just something magical missing. I couldn't tell who was who in Dangerous Liasions, and Keanu Reeves, is infamously stiff in this. (Loosen up, man!) I just couldn't sit through it, and I always know when I start films or even books, I know I cannot sit through it.Unfortunately Dangerous Liasions is not for me, although I'm the only reviewer who seems to think this. Everyone else is raving about it. But you have to be really into the film, and be able to keep your eyes above chest height on the actresses
Dust Off Your Bong For This One!. Sit down under a tree, give it a big hug, fire up you bong and go to sleep. That's what I was waiting for Freeman to do all movie. It's a shame that special effects that were so ground breaking were waisted on this Sci-fi Hippie flick. I'm surprised that Freeman's suit wasn't tie-dyed. Keep your money say no to drugs!
Paaaaaaaa . . . leeeeeeeez. I often wonder if some if not most of the people writing rave reviews, 5 stars, are really paid, biased, professionals pumping up the movie for increased DVD sales.
pilates intermediate. A great DVD, with an intense 30 min workout. I take this DVD on trips, and with my laptop, I can easily keep up my exercise routine while away from home
A TRIBUTE. A tribute is defined as "a gift or other acknowledgement of gratitude, respect, or admiration."  That is what you have here.But, if you want a true picture of that incredible morning, don't waste your time and money, look elsewhere
This just didn't do it for me. Maybe I loved the original one too much, but this version of the story did not work for me. I especially was dissapointed in the music and the oompa loompas. Stick with the first one. It was perfect
Dumb. Cool band.  worst videos ever.  ever.  makes me like them less.  Fearless Freaks is good.  This is garbage...
Too Much Downward Facing Dog. I'm sorry, but it seems as if Kristin is stuck on one continuous Downward Facing Dog on this DVD.  It seems like there could've been alot more "moves" to mix things up in this workout-I felt like I was staring at the floor most of the time, and it's really hard on your wrists!  I guess I'm used to a little more variety in yoga workouts..
boring and very disturbing. mustic river is the worst eastwood movie ever well the acting is very good over all but the movie is very boring long and very disturbing it sucks
it was ok....but the guys could've been hotter.. I understand the low budget...stuff like that happens, but the voices didnt match. The mothers voice didnt seem real at all. It sounded like it was from a child. No way would an older woman's voice sounds like that. I like it how Devon's character has to understand his new and emerging feelings, and realize that he's not the only one that feels that way. It's nice to know that his soon to be ex-girlfriend is the understanding type. She's even involved in the end when it comes to uncovering the truth about Devon's step-dad. That's a true friend.I felt so bad seeing Brian in such a bad shape when Devon rescued him after he was beaten up. I was gonna cry. He said that he was raped and that's just one topic that always gets me. My heart just goes out to the victim. I'm glad that earlier in the movie he becomes willing to share his feelings more with Devon, and actually calls him back after they get into their first fight. Brian cried once he hung up the phone and that always shows a more sensitive part of the man and that's such a turn on for me.Good movie...I've seen better when it comes to acting, but it was still good. I'm glad that I bought it, but would've liked to have seen more of the Devon and Brian relationship. Oh well. Good job. B
LET ME BORROW YOUR PEN. The frivolous use of writing instruments is the only original idea in this tired kung fooey saga.  Although physically imposing, Daniel Bernhardt's acting range is that of a rutabaga, and even though the fight scenes are reasonably well choreographed, they are not enough to overcome the basic lucidcrous plot.  The other actors in the film are lifeless and dull; the movie's thin plot has been done in hundreds of karate classics, so there's little to recommend this film; I give two stars for its sheer existence
John Tucker lives???. Okay the person that puts this movie in the same catogory as "Bring it on", "Clueless", "Mean Girls" and, especially the superior "Heathers".. is painting a false picture of what this movie is.. I'm sorry but, "John Tucker Must Die" is no where close to being as sharp or clever as these other mentioned films. These other films have a balance that allows more adults to enjoy them as well as the intended target of younger teenagers. "JTMD" appeals more to that teen crowd and has older viewers wondering if this has anything new to offer.. and wonder is all I did. This film tries taking alot of plot lines and ideas from other teen films and brings them all together.. the results are one BIG mess. 2.5 stars is all I can give.. the other films mentioned above are the ticket. "Heathers" = 5 stars. "Mean Girls" = 4 stars. "Bring it on" = 4 stars. "Clueless" 4.5 stars. All four of these movies have something that "John Tucker Must Die" doesnt have..
ZZZZZZZ. Too bad such a great historic moment was trivalized. Choppy. Too long. No substance. Phony. Suggest Clint return to being a mayor. His acting & directing days are over.
For such a Fun band, this is a BORING DVD. I bought this believing that it was chalked full of "full length" videos of the sweet performing. Instead we get three very boring men discussing a very small amount of information on the band. The three men consist of one of the song writers, the guitarist and an early manager. The song writer has more gravel to his voice than Tom Waits, the guitarist is sadly very bloated, and the manager is slouched on a sofa wearing khaki shorts complaining about how the band should have gotten into arena rock. (He's the worst of the three!)Just as I was enjoying "wig wam bam" when the video cuts off and back to the chat! No little Willy video at all!They also don't include more than 30 secs of the"love is like oxygen" video. That's sick to fool the fans into thinking they're buying a music video/concert dvd when it's simply a lame documentary.Don't buy it, watch the videos of youtube or buy a dvd from the UK.
Missing Disc. This product did not include the second disc of the set, instead including a second copy of the third disc.  This is quite intolerable
Lazy Filmmaking. I was quite disappointed with this film.  The director used some non-actors to play some of the parts, and it shows.  Also, the editing and camera work is shoddy.  In one particular scene, you see Mouchette turning her body, which causes a coffee cup to move toward the edge of the table.  In the next shot, the cup falls to the floor.  The effect is very self-conscious and clumsy.  Finally, the actress playing the girl fails to convince us of her state of mind that occurs at the fim's end.  Perhaps other viewers may like it
NOT THAT GREAT !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. I LIKE BUDDY GUY ALOT AND HAVE MOST OF HIS CD'S, HOWEVER THIS DVD IS NOT THAT GREAT. I GUESS I WAS EXPECTING IT TO BE HIS CONCERT FROM THE CD BY THE SAME NAME, WHICH IS GREAT. THIS DVD IS SHOT AT VERY CLOSE ANGLES AND ALMOST IN BLACK AND WHITE. THE CONCERT FOOTAGE IS DONE IN A KIND OF A DRAB BROWN COLOR. THIS IS A BIOGRAPHY DVD ALSO. LITTLE INTERVIEWS MIXED IN WITH THE SHOW.ANYONE WHO HAS SEEN BUDDY KNOWS HOW INTENSE HE CAN BE IN CONCERT AND THATS PART OF HIS CHARM, BUT THIS DVD LEAVES ME FLAT. THERE ARE OTHER SHOWS ON EBAY THAT ARE MUCH BETTER SUCH AS THE NORTH SEA JAZZ FESTIVAL SHOW IN 2002. IF YOU WANT SOME REAL BUDDY GUY, THATS THE ONE...........
Nope. I was not into this movie at all.  My mother recommended it to me but it was lame all the way through.  A middle-aged man decides he wants to do something different with his life, so he takes a dance class.  Ofcourse there's a fine dance instructor, a crush is pursued, a wife gets jealous, hires a detective, and *gasp* his crush is found out.  The movie was too predictable and it just wasn't for me.  Not a bad movie, just not my cup of tea.  Richard Gere was cute as usual, which was the only thing that made me watch it to the end, besides wanting to know what a correct quick step looked like since "So You Think You Can Dance" never had contestants who mastered it
Don`t try to use weights Kathy. This was one of the worst tapes I have ever done.This is no quik fix program.I don`t think Kathy Smith is that good of an instructer.She break this workout down into two parts,I on`t like that sort of thing.I did the whole 60 minute tape,I was not pleased.I think she is not clear with her instructing.Back in the day Kathy Smith didn`t even use weights.She is just trying to copy the Firm.I don`t like her old tapes either.I thought this was terrible and I would not do it again
The Ultimate 3-D Collection H3D Viewing System. Well....I'm not happy with :(The DVD's are cool indeed but the so cald H3D Viewing systemi don't like, why ?!Sure i can see depth, sure i can see 3D with it,But, NOT like in the pictures on the H3D Viewing System Box, nothing comes out of my TV or the so caldcome-off-the-screen effect, that's for sure...And it's NOT that i plugged it wrong !Or... i have bad eyes :
Very unhappy. I have still not received this product and am being bounced from staff to staff by DHL Global Mail.This is a ridiculous and unacceptable situation.I will never use Amazon again, I feel cheated
Some Silence Please!. One of the main problems I've noticed with some films done by folks new to filmaking is a HUGE overreliance on what they perceive as witty or &quot;Politically Important Dialogue&quot; This film, while advertised as a gay Big Chill with a twist, was more similar to sitting in a classroom while a bunch of senior creative writting majors read their mid-term rough drafts to the class.  First we have the innocent couple debating telling folks that they are engaged.  Then we have the sexy troublemaker rambling on at dinner about how eating meat is a sexist evil perpetuated by the partiarchy, next is the overly dramatic girl with self esteem issues that is horrifically poorly acted to the point that you cannot tell if she is an escaped mental patient or just somebody who likes whinning in a babyish voice.  Basically the plot of the movie wasn't too bad and it would have made a fun short film, say...20 minutes. The problem was in trying to show us how clever some of the characters were it passed the point of sardonic or tongue in cheek to merely self indulgent and boring.  The homophobia at the end seemed a bit stuck on as well
typical junk from disney for material young girls. terrible and moronic screenplay and dialog, horrible acting, bad directing with formulaic sound track, mimicking every movement of all the characters just like disney's cartoons. don't why all the movement even expression on the faces of these terrible actors need music to exaggerate or emphasize it. these two young female actors need go back to performing art school to learn the basics or just quit. i strongly suggest that dmv files a complaint to disney for the low blow insult to their driving test people. what a big yawn with teary eyes, i just couldn't help it
kitsch is global. A 130-minute barrage of unrelieved bathos and sentimentality, this Swedish import doesn't so much insult your intelligence as complacently assume that you never had any in the first place, wouldn't know what to do with it if you did have it, and in general favor entertainment that bypasses the brain entirely and addresses itself directly to the tear ducts. The plot is of the type commonly described in laudatory reviews as "well-worn," which seems to be a euphemism for "shop-worn," "clich," or "stupefyingly unoriginal." Here it is (spoilers follow): Daniel, a big-shot conductor in emotional difficulties and poor health, returns to the quaint rural village of his childhood, takes over and revives the local church choir, heals himself and everyone else in sight with his life-affirming yet charmingly diffident zaniness, finds love, finds his inner child, and finally, at the moment of his and his choir's greatest triumph, croaks. A great director and screenwriter might have been able to conjure some life out of even this forbiddingly stale and schmaltzy program, but Kay Pollack isn't up to it. Instead, in a kind of perverse tour de force of misbegotten inventiveness, he celebrates, embraces, wallows in the schmaltz, throws it at you until it's dripping off you like oobleck, and somehow keeps finding more reserves of it tucked away in odd little corners of the film. Indeed, there's something horrifyingly impressive about the way this movie gets relentlessly stupider and more bathetic from the first frame to the last: it almost bespeaks a kind of strange talent, albeit of the Ed Wood variety; and while watching it I almost suspected a cynical provocation of some kind, as in the Kingsley Amis story about the poet who, at the end of a long and successful career, publishes a volume of intentional gibberish in order to expose the critical establishment as a passel of clueless poseurs. (Speaking of whom: "As It Is In Heaven" was nominated for Best Foreign Film at the Oscars in 2005, after being strewn with similar honors in Sweden, where it was reportedly seen by some TWO MILLION viewers. We're used to this kind of idiocy from the Academy, but what's going on in the country of Strindberg and Bergman? Has someone been putting something in the kttbullar?)A standard feature of movies like this (and books like this, if it comes to that--cf. Ayn Rand) is that characters are presented not as human beings but as representatives of some principle or other that the filmmaker deems important and relevant. AIIIH is no exception. The parade of didactic marionettes includes:-- Daniel's love interest, a ditzy twenty-year-old blonde, who represents the Life Force;-- the humorless, sexually repressed, hypocritical preacher, who represents The Church, which as we all know is a sinister combine bent on stamping out the sex drive and repressing all manifestations of joy and spontaneity, especially in modern Scandinavia;-- the wife-beater whom everybody at first inexplicably tolerates, and then finally locks up and forgives--who represents Violence and What to Do About It;-- the retarded kid whom Daniel insists on letting into the choir, chiefly so that he can become the film's symbol of the Virtues of Inclusiveness and the Deep Human Wisdom of Special People. (Incidentally, it's about time somebody realized that sentimentalizing retarded people, in movie after movie, as symbols of purity/goodness/wisdom-beyond-the-ken-of-those-cursed-with-normal-intelligence, or whatever, is just as disrespectful and exploitative as making cruel fun of them; it just SEEMS nicer. CAN'T we have a movie that depicts a retarded person as a human being? The only one I can recall seeing is "Best Boy," a documentary about the life of a retarded man that came out about 25 years ago. Apart from that they've been reduced to targets of witless ridicule, as in "There's Something About Mary," or turned into plaster saints as here.)So, to sum up: save your money and your time, which would be better spent sleeping or watching reruns of "The O.C."  Run, don't walk, from your local art theater if this is the main attraction. And don't forget the moral of the story, rather comforting to me as an expatriate American living in a Europe that preens itself on its superior wisdom and sophistication vis--vis the USA: kitsch is global.
Beware. I made the mistake of not watching this before allowing my 3.5 year old to.  I don't consider myself overprotective, but these stories have a kid abusing a dog (Pluto), a kid having his pants pulled down and being spanked over someone's knee (including showing the kid's bottom from above), and Donald chasing Chip & Dale with a revolver in the first 2 cartoons among other things.  I turned it off after that.  Talked to several other friends to see if I was overreacting & they recall seeing that kind of stuff when we were little but all agreed they don't want their toddlers seeing it anytime soon.  Was a little surprised this made it out of Disney especially in today's day & time....May be okay for older kids, but I don't really want to explain guns or why it's not funny/okay to abuse our dogs to my 3.5 year old
just not good. this movie sucks. ending is predictable. the line about being as quiet as an ant pissing on cotton was ALMOST good. Reservoir Dogs--now there's a heist film
great idea, bad films. What a great idea for Universal to release some early  Cary Grant films, since he was under contract with Paramount and made over 15 pictures for that studio. But what a horrible choice of titles...Who sits on top of Universal Home video and points his finger to some of the worst movies ever made? What about consulting a film historian for a change, instead of a marketing guy?"Kiss and Make Up" is probably Grant's worst film ever, the unfunniest comedy of the 30s with the actor ostensibly trying to make something out of a bad script. Not to mention "Wedding Present" and "Big Brown Eyes", what a comedic misfires...As for "Wings in the Dark", believe it or not, Grant plays a blind aviator who flies up to the sky to save Myrna Loy from falling (in a way it's also sort of, unintentionally, funny). The only good one is "Thirty Day Princess"...These people at Universal just ignored that at Paramount Grant made two great films, one of them never published at all and it's called "Hot Saturday", a pre-code, pre-lib, comedy in which Nancy Carroll gets it her own way without paying any price, actually she wins a wonderful prize...The other title (published just on video) is "The Eagle and the Hawk" with Fredric March and Carole Lombard. And among better films he made for the studio "The Woman Accused", "This is the Night" and "Madame Butterfly". Shame on you Universal.And for the future, if you have in mind a Claudette Colbert Collection or Fredric March or Miriam Hopkins, please ask for some advice
I've seen better. I was somewhat entertained watching this movie, John Travolta made it more interesting that it would have without him. However, it did not really impress me very much. It's the kind of movie to see only once, it's definetely not a collector's item.
just terrible. Honestly, I cannot believe the positive reviews this product has received here!  I find I can usually rely on amazon reviews for good information, but this is a truly awful DVD.  It's full of superficial, meaningless stories and silly clay dolls with beady little black eyes and no human expression whatsoever.There are SO many more worthwhile shows for this age group out there: Little Einsteins, classic Sesame Street (Cookie Monster's Best Bites, for example), The Wiggles...the list goes on and on.  Keep looking
Big Disappointment!!!!. This video entertains my 21 month old, as do other Pooh videos, but I bought this for educational purposes. I was highly disappointed to see that the "A", "B" and "C" named in the title were not even presented ~ Only the first letter of each of the character's names were. I thought the title was very misleading and do not recommend this to anyone interested in using it as a learning aid for the alphabet. The Pooh - 123's video is excellent with it's presentation of numbers and counting from 1 to 10.
Is this horror ??. Well...don't know where to start......bought this one because it has Jeffrey Combs in it, Stuart Gorden is director.....and they did a good job on Re-animator.but let me tell you, horror freaks will be disapointed. Only one really bloody scene is worth watching...not because of the blood, not because of the gore.....just, because it is the only bloody scene in the movie...a nice looking woman is eaten by the "castel freak".....If you have seen Re-animator, The Evil dead, From Beyond, Hellraiser and maybe The Thing, then skip this one..you will be disapointed like me....Even a John Woo action movie has more blood in it.....
Awful, just awful. Whatever significance this film has, it derives from the stellar cast. Tyrone Power and Henry Fonda do a credible job portraying Jesse and Frank James despite a screenplay that takes criminal liberties with the historical record. You may find it entertaining, but don't come away from it thinking you've learned anything useful about the James boys. The distortions become all the more shocking when you realize that there were still people alive in western Missouri who remembered the original people and events when this silly thing was released
Horrible sketch comedy....terribly dated, and not very funny... Despite being a comedy show, this turned out to be a rather depressing experience. There were a few amusing bits here and there, mostly there, but the targets of the satire were very lame.  Most of the parodies are from pop culture in the 1990's, so they are extremely dated.  The "Information 411", "90210", and Yakmin Shirmnov sketches were particularly painful to watch, as bad as anything on SNL.  I only made it through the first 8 episodes, and skipped the last 5.  The commentary on episode 8 was more interesting (check out Garofalo screaming how she hated kissing a sock puppet because she hates "sexuality".  I still don't know what she meant by that) than the actual episode.  As we know, Ben Stiller became a star playing neurotic, clumsy nerds, Andy [...] has done a plethora of drugs and seems to be on the path of being the next Courtney Love (in terms of obnoxiousness and drug intake), Janeane does supporting roles in mostly forgettable (and sometimes wretched) films (even though she does have talent), and Bob Odenkirk did Mr. Show and recently (as of November 2006) directed the awful Let's Go to Prison.  The only sketches I remember in which I mildy laughed were the "B Minus Time Traveler" sketch.  Stick with Monty Python's Flying Circus, which is still unsurpassed in sketch comedy.
Mortal Kombat: Annihilated. Such a sad sequel to the best video game movie. Mortal Kombat: Anilhilation was anihilated the day it was made. The story was poorly done. I didn't like how the characters act in this film. Jax {Williams} acts like a afician-american stereotype. Sonya {Hess} acts like a weak little bitch. Sindel {Vander} acts like one of those pathetic villianess you see in those direct-to-video films that have dumb villianess. And Brian Thompson should be a shame of himself, such a good character actor playing a pethetic Shao Khan.One thing that sucks in this film is that Radien {Remar} and Shao Kahn are brothers and Shinnok {Schore} is their father. What a pathetic change to add in this film. Raiden and Kahn are far from family and Shinnok and Kahn don't even like each other...and they're not father and son in the game.This film cost $30 million, yet the special effects in this film look so cartoony. In fact, I've seen Playstation One graphics look better than that.This film is really bland, and John R. Leonetti directing style sucks.If you wanna watch a sequel to Mortal Kombat, just watch yourself playing Mortal Kombat 2 on Midway's Arcade Greatest Hits 2 on Playstation 2 and XBOX
Please, one Jet Li per movie. (Spoilers below, but the flick's too stupid for it to matter.)Computer technology has greatly aided the filmmaking industry. Twenty years ago, it would have been impossible to create the stunning visual effects seen in "Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone", let alone an entirely digital movie such as "Monsters, Inc." However the prevalence of any new technology is invariably followed by those who would rely on gimmick alone rather than quality. Such is the case with martial arts master Jet Li's latest offering, The One.The One takes place in the future where inter-dimensional travel has become possible. Each dimension runs parallel to our own and is home to the same people, but under different circumstances, living completely different lives. Voyaging to another universe is for authorized dimensional police only. Li plays a former member of this police force going by the name Lawless. We learn, through clumsily constructed exposition, that he has defected after discovering that every time one of his alternate reality selves dies, the `life energy' from the dead self is distributed among the remaining selves. So Li is on a mission to travel to all of the universes and kill himself in each, becoming increasingly more powerful until he becomes `the one' at which point he imagines he'll be unstoppable.As one might guess, Li also plays our hero, Gabe. Gabe is a cop in a universe that isn't aware that other dimensions exist. He lives a happily oblivious life complete with friends on the force and a beautiful wife, T.K. Lawless travels to this universe followed by two other dimensional law enforcers, Funsch and Roedecker. The two try to stop Lawless from killing Gabe, his last remaining twin, and achieving ultimate power. Oh, and did we forget to mention that it may also cause all the universes to explode? Maybe. No one in the film seems sure.Immediately, the premise of this film catches the audience's attention. What if there are other worlds out there? Am I as unique as I believe myself to be? What would I be like if one small element of my life were altered? These are all very intriguing questions and writer/director James Wong took care to ensure that none of them were addressed in this film. Indeed, it appears that all opportunities to include thought-provoking content were patently avoided. The fact that this is an action movie, and a martial arts flick on top of that, suggests that one shouldn't expect in-depth social commentary or even a complex plot, but The One continually disappoints it's viewers by raising interesting concepts and then failing to focus on them.For example, it would have been clever to show Lawless assassinating several different versions of himself, each with a different appearance and lifestyle. This could have easily been done in montage or in a sequence of short combat scenes that would have prepared the audience for the main action of the film. Instead we see only one other version of Li aside from his two main characters and a few humorous images displayed on a computer screen that make it appear as though the director simply gave Li a box of wigs and jackets to play with. Furthermore, the characters are quite weak. We are given brief introductions to each of the main players, but these serve only to remind us of some stereotype or character from another film that we can use as a mental placeholder in lieu of actual character development. After all, this is an action movie; we've got to get to the fighting as quickly as possible. As if that weren't enough of a deterrent, characters are unceremoniously and unnecessarily killed just as we have some semblance of an attachment to them. Both Li's wife, portrayed by the usually brilliant Carla Gugino, and Roedecker, played by the equally talented Delroy Lindo, are executed for no other reason than to motivate Li's good guy character and fuel hatred for his bad guy character, as if the audience could tell the difference.Predictably, the movie culminates in a huge action scene where Li fights himself. It should have been impressive, but was instead boring and much too long. The computer wizardry that allowed Jet Li to kick his own ass was actually so flawless that I forgot to be impressed by it. After Gabe finally defeats Lawless, the film tries to trick us unsuccessfully with the old `which one is which' routine, but I doubt any audience member was fooled. Justice prevails as the evildoer is punished by being transported to a prison universe that looks like the set of a cheap music video. Our hero is rewarded by being sent to yet another alternate reality where he isn't a fugitive for his doppelganger's crimes and his wife is still alive. Gabe doesn't seem to mind that his real wife is dead and he's been presented with a cheap substitute. And how does he or the police know what his wife's history is in this world? He might fall in love with her all over again, only to discover that her favorite actor has changed from Cary Grant to Adam Sandler. Gabe can pretend his soul mate isn't dead, but he better not come crying to the dimension squad when her stand-in turns out to be a lesbian pyromaniac, decoupage lover, or a carnival freak who has undergone complex surgery to make herself a human lizard. ...Actually, that would be pretty cool. Why wasn't the movie about that?Overall, The One has few redeeming qualities. The action has been done better in The Matrix and Jackie Chan's canon, the plot is riddled with holes, and the two accomplished character actors, Lindo and Gugino, can't compensate for the fact that Li still hasn't gotten the hang of the English language. If the premise of The One is true and alternate realities do exist, I hope to one day travel to a universe where they never made this film
Dull Brass. Interesting only because it was made by Europe's premier exploitation director, "Kitty" is tedious and has pretensions to being an expose of the Nazis. This film is nothing more than a forerunner of the Italian (...) genre that flourished briefly in the 1970's. As to the controversial and perverse elements - they are clumsily handled and pointless. You'll find more (...) readily available elsewhere and the horror of the Nazis is presented much more graphically and forcefully in movies by Speilberg and Polanski to name but two. If you're interested in a more thoughtful attempt at controversy from Italian directors with better artistic credentials, you might try "Seeds of Evil" and Pasolini's "Salo: 100 Days of Sodom"
Terrible. Acting plot and everything is so bad that it made me cry... Dragonheart was breathtaking this is......B.S.. worst acting and story i ever saw in a movi
British Couple in Africa in 1913. A British couple with daughter, start a coffee farm in Kenya Africa in 1913.Haley Mills and family are pleasant. However, the pleasant is undone, by adultery and deaths (not Haley Mills), and the little girl is the only English-speaking child in a 100 miles.A pretty scene of gazelles, is undone by a gazelle being shot. A terrific song duet at the piano, is undone by the singers being adulterers, singing for the deceived spouse, in the spouse's home. Schizophrenic producer.One tragedy within 2 hours, is enough for me, rather than ten. Different from TV, holds your attention, is ok, some scenes of interest. I will not keep it to watch again. However, if price is not a thought, then it is of some interest. We never see the flame trees grown, only saplings. We never see the sprouts of charm blossom.Good cast and location. Only, the idea of a British child on a farm in Africa, is worth keeping. Add some other children. The end of the leopard episode is good, but not the beginning. Re-write the rest. A missed opportunity for a good film. Show the workings of the coffee farm, from seedlings to harvest. British farm life in Africa, without the game hunting, and a happier script would be better. I recommend Johnny Weissmuller's good "Tarzan" series.
Batman - The Movie Review. But this for my kids and it was the most boring movie I have ever watched.The shows are more entertaining to watch then the movie
Slow start, great finish. A beautiful muppet ensamble that just takes to long to get starte
for die-hard vincent perez fans only... i have to say i was pretty disappointed by this film.  afterseeing indochine, queen margot, and le libertin, this vincent perezfilm was a sleeper!  not only is the dialogue stilted and undeveloped, but the different accents kinda threw me off.  (vincent perez speaks decent spanish--but his english is tinged with a french accent while the rest of the family speaks english with a spanish accent!) the actors make a valiant attempt at salvaging the movie, but the result is a cheesy, overblown, wannabe epic.  (it's almost painful to watch mary and francisco interact.) while the scenery is gorgeous, there are other films with far better stories, character development, and dialogue.  try belle epoque (with ariadna gil and penelope cruz) or le bossu (with vincent perez) for a better representation of these actors' talents
Nose candy? Want some?. For the first time in reviewing films, I found myself immediately uninterested in this story.  I don't know if it was the way that it was filmed or the story behind the characters, but it felt bland, overused, and completely unoriginal.  Within the first thirty minutes, I found myself rather apathetic with all the characters and the story.  I felt as if I had seen this structure before, and Tart was providing nothing new to surprise me.  After thinking that it may just be my mood, I stopped the film and chose to start it fresh in the morning, but the same feeling persisted.  I just didn't care.  That is not a good sign.  The characters were bland.  When I say bland, I literally mean that by watching them develop, you will never have any flavor hit your palate.  The story seemed recycled, nearly to the point of plagiarism.  Now, I am not saying that Christina Wayne stole this story, but she added nothing fresh to the perspective.  The casting was horrid, the underlying symbolism and themes were so far lost that no critic could find them (nor the characters), and the stories were vague and sloppy.  You knew nothing about anyone or anything, and instead of pushing more emphasis on the characters, we instead found ourselves with drugs, minor sex, and money pushed into our faces.  These are themes we have seen in every film since the dawn of film time, yet somehow could not be creatively captured by Wayne.What immediately pulled me away from this story?  It was mainly the characters.  I have seen most of Brad Renfro's work, and honestly he needs to redefine himself.  Director Larry Clark has defined him, and oddly he cannot get out of that stereotypical character.  Within the first twenty minutes of Renfro's screen time I was bored.  I knew exactly what he was trying to portray and why.  It was spectacular nor impressive, just repetitive.  He needed to bring some excitement or suspense to his role, instead of just blandly playing this random socialite.  Without a strong character, the final climax of this film comes instead as a letdown.  Renfro did not showcase the best of his abilities in this film.  While I am on the subject ... nobody showcased the best of their abilities.  What is going on with Dominique Swain, outside of Lolita, I don't believe she has really emerged as an actress, and following-up with roles such as Cat Storm doesn't help. Bijou Phillips was the only actress that I witnessed actually try to bring something remarkable to the screen, sadly due to everyone else's horrid acting, she was lost.  Rambling here and there, and honestly nearly forgotten about during the second act.  Melanie Griffith was a pointless cast and most of this film's budget probably went to her TWO scenes that she was in.  Maybe the rest of it went to the random guy from The Kids in the Hall, who desperately needs to place himself far away from this project.My biggest problem, outside of the acting, was the pacing of this film.  Nothing, and this is hard for me to say, but nothing gelled together.  There were so many sub-stories happening throughout the course of the film that no actual substance was formed.  The robberies, the teenage "angst and woe", the wealthy socialites learning how horrible real life is, the random Kids in the Hall guy, and even the ending just felt rushed and horribly edited together.  With this shoddy craftsmanship the whole story never really formed any true shape.  Family structures were never defined, characters were never given any emotion, and all we are left with are bits and pieces of honest leftovers.  Wayne did not complete the task at hand.While I hate to put the entire burden on the director, with this film I am left with little choice.  With a horrid title that just screamed the complete opposite of what this film was about, with amateurish directional ability the cast pretty much was able to give every emotion in every scenes, leaving us with disgusting acting and poor developments, and with vague storytelling it is hard to place any "good" behind Tart.  This was a film I had heard nothing about, and after viewing it I can see why.  All Wayne has done with this film is random take excerpts from other films that have done a better job of defining all the elements above and cut all together to make the film Tart.  It is hard for me to say this, but Wayne ruined this film.  While I don't believe there was much to fully take from the story, any remaining elements of excitement were drained as Wayne took the helm.  While most of the time you can credit some of the story, perhaps strong acting, or even the music, in Tart you can credit nothing.  From the opening sequence until the end, I felt like I was swimming through very lumpy oatmeal.  No consistency, no strength.Overall, this film is a waste of your time.  If you are searching for some deep symbolic elements or possibly some banter on our society, you will not find it in this film.  While I know that was what Wayne was attempting to show, the final product seems like it was edited on an Etch-a-Sketch.  It was an embarrassing film to sit through, and encourage nobody to pick it up.  Wayne threw to the wind all the teachings of her Columbia University education and destroyed two hours of my life.  Avoid at all costs!Grade: * out of ****
THIS is the review I wish I'd read before buying. I looked at the name (Groovaloos) and I looked at the cover -- and my gut told me not to get this DVD. I went against my gut and believed the reviews; I wish I'd listened to my gut. For those of you who think it looks and sounds a little hokey, you're right on the money. They can all dance, but compared to what I expected, they seemed mediocre. Here's the lowdown: (1) the sound sucks - they're in a city park and you can hear the instructions fine, but the music isn't loud enough to really "feel" something that makes you want to move, (2) they just seem like a group of people who don't naturally have a rhythm, but they've learned some moves; it's SO not inspiring, (3) it's not edgy enough, and (4) it looks good if you've got a group doing it, but when someone's doing it alone, it's just okay. Overall, this DVD was okay, but not great. Get it only if you're truly desperate
who decided to make this train wreck?. I have always hated the coy sex comedies of the early sixties -- men "taking advantage" of women who had to protect their "virtue".  Who could possibly have thought a remake would be a good idea?  This is no tribute, its a virtual copy of something that was witless and offensive to begin with.  I watched this on cable just to see if Renee Zellweger really took part in a movie as bad as this looked, and she did and it was.  No update, no twise, just a pastiche of bad movies.  Even the clothes were so over the top that poor Renee looked like a child playing dress-up
Who writes this stuff?. There is in no way anything in this film that could even remotely be mistaken for hard core content.  It was with out a doubt one of the most disappointing films I've ever seen and wouldn't even classify this as soft core.  My advice to anyone who's out shopping for films of a truly adult nature is that they ignore the reviews listed by wanna be film critics who wouldn't know a good film if it fell out of the sky, landed on their face, and started to wiggle.  Go online and find real info about the films you are interested in, or narrow certain studios that you know turn out quality work.  This piece just wasn't even worth the plastic it was re-mastered  on
Item did not work. When we tried to play the item on our DVD player the beginning and the end were all garbled and we had to return it.  We ordered another copy direct from the manufacturer, which worked properly.  I am upset that the full purchase price was not refunded.  I can see deducting shipping and handling.  But, a restocking charge -- that is outrageous!  The merchandise did not work properly and there was no offer made to replace it!  Please remind me not to buy from amazon.com
Not for the beginner. I was hoping for a beginning lesson on grooming my dog - just the basics.  This is more styling and tips, for those who are already using grooming tools and know what to do.  This would be useful for someone wanting to improve their grooming skills, but not very useful for a beginner
Can't rate what I don't have!. I ordered I Love Lucy Seceond Season in August, but as of today HAVE NOT received my merchandise.This item was NOT out stock, so I am confused as to the delay, since all other products I have ordered from Amazon have arrived in a timely manner.Also ordering certain items on Amazon, have been MOST difficult in finding the correct merchandise that I want.  Also I had to return damaged merchandise, and so far have heard NOTHING on my order, refund, or any communication from Amazon.Right now, I have to say I am somewhat disappointed in Amazon.Cheryl Henninge
another waste of a possible good movie. umm the title says pretty much how i feel about this movie soo much potential but it chokes. they are a few nice  scenes but  not enough to watch it again and  who really wants to see terry bradshaw's body  come on that was sick
Pretty Bad. Another movie using actresses seemingly straight out of soft porn. It's fun to watch them die onscreen sure, but it's redundant. I'm not surprised to read it's by the Shark Attack people. They're terrible too, but of course if they make a #4, I will rent it knowing it will be stupid. &lt;sigh&gt
Hollow. Terrible.  One Good Line Quoted Here. The characters are not appealing and the story is not interesting. An effort to watch. Make-up, dyed hair, costumes poorly done. One man's eyebrows, the suitor's, are altered like a woman's! No scenery or homes of interest, except a glance at the sailing ships in the harbor. Not a pleasant pace, without humor, without intrigue. A lesbian undertone in one scene.The only positive thing I can think of is this good line of Jane Austen, quoted. Fanny sums up in one sentence, why she will not marry him. Women who have spent hours within romance in uncertainty, will wish to sum up their certainty with Ms. Austen's line: "His sole interest is in being loved, not in loving". This line is an exception to a lifeless script.There, now you do not need to endure the painful movie. Here are two lines re-written by me: For the woman dealing with a trifling man: "No man suffers pains of love on the stage." For dealing with the infatuated man: "You have wounded yourself, but not with love."This movie should be re-made by someone sharing the ideals of Jane Austen. There is plenty to be mined from the novel to create a pleasant film, humorous, with singing, with interest. A movie can take the best of the book, in the spirit of the book, which this movie did not carry, and make a movie better than the book. This movie is bad any which way.Well-made period romance films are: "Pride & Prejudice 2005, 1996, & 1940", "Wives & Daughters", "North & South". Fairly made is "Under the Greenwood Tree". I rated "Persuasion" at 2-stars for the wooden acting; however "Persuasion" is 5-stars compared to this "Mansfield Park". "Persuasion" has attractive scenery, costumes, beautiful singing, and an uplifting plot; though of interest only to women, preferably who have already read the book.
Houseboat sunk. "Houseboat" never arrived here.  I have been patiently waiting at the dock, but no boat.  PLEASE send it at once
only 2 stars, because.... OK, I have seen this movie a couple of times, and I can only give it 2 stars, because.....IT WILL MELT YOUR EARS WITH TONS OF UNNECESSARY CURSING!  I mean BAD cussing!  They went WAY overboard with the expletives, and ruined what could have been a very good Dawn of the Dead sequel!  The first scary moment with the woman's dream where she's looking at a calender, and the Zombies hiding in the dark, this movie had such possibilities.  Too bad they RUINED it with such foul language!  Would a true die-hard horror movie fan forgive the cussing and buy it anyway?  Not me, that's for sure!  Although if you're not offended in the slightest by profanities you might, but I can't imagine any person being so callous
I Love Freddy But this is Not Him. This movie is a decent movie with a lot of gore but the plot is weak and the acting is horrible. Kim Myers is a good actor but she does not fit in this roll like she did in Bloodline. Freddy still is a psycotic killer but he changed into more of a jokester which really is killing the series. Also Mark patton's character whines and cries through out the movie like a little baby and it really kills the movie. This movie is just for hardcore fans or people collecting the entire series. This only gets two stars because of the violence and gore.
Annoying Lear. I didn't enjoy the film.  I also didn't enjoy the original play by Shakespeare.  King Lear is one of my least favorite Shakespeare plays.  I don't consider it particularly creative to remake a play that has already been done, and to add nothing of value to the original.  You can set it wherever you like, in medieval Japan or on the Moon, what's the difference.  It's King Lear, a downer of a play, there's nothing great about Ran just as there's nothing great about Lear, and it takes up three hours of your time.A moron named Lear, or Hidetoro, or whatever his name is, relinquishes power in his kingdom and turns the power over to his oldest son.  The youngest son warns him that it is a bad idea because the sons will be disloyal to their father.  He is right, of course, and Hidetoro Lear gets treated shabbily.  He's wanted dead or dead.In this treatment of the annoying plot, he loses his mind.  He has a faithful follower or two.  They overact.  There is nobody to root for in this depressing and ridiculously overrated downer of a play.  Lear Hidetoro is an absolute jerk.  Am I supposed to care what happens to him?  Why?  Because he used to be a powerful king, and a cruel one?  You may as well cry over Saddam Hussein.Look at this movie with fresh eyes.  Look at Shakespeare's King Lear with fresh eyes.  This stuff simply is not very entertaining, and is not very good.  The hell with King Lear.  He's an annoyance
Good movie but beware the inferior print. The one-star rating refers to this particular version. The film itself is a pleasant British comedy about a young couple's adventures with an ancient movie theater and its ancient staff. However, this is an extended-play tape of a bootleg-quality print with inferior picture and sound, and fans of the film will definitely be disappointed by the video presentation
Out of date. I was unable to complete viewing of this video due mostly to a lack of relevance to modern nightclub dancing.  The sytle is far to '80's-ish to be useful
lousy script with nothing but.....????. either drinking, cursing, and laughing in the pub, or replaying the messy home life style. what is this? you call this 'one of the year's top 10 movies!', 'two thumbs up!', 'one of the year's funniest!'?????????? this is one of the most terrible movies with bore-to-death storylines i've ever seen. acting maybe acceptable but, with such a lousy script and a bunch of ugly young female actors, i have to pass. wasted my money was fine, but wasted 95 minutes watching this silly movie? well, absolutely not! rejected the dvd out of the player after about 15 minutes. thanks for nothing
Boy Is This A Stupid Movie. Forty years ago Hogan's Heroes worked because it was pure farce and its German POW camp was acceptable as a setting for a comedy, while Life Is Beautiful failed in large part because a German concentration camp is not a place to set humor. I was told this was a charming movie with a lot of joy within it. "Joy despite the misery," is what someone said. I found it ridiculous, boring, and an insult to the memory of those who were murdered by the Third Reich. Roberto Benigni wasn't funny, just manically irritating. The actor needs either animal tranquilizers or a punch in the mouth, I'm not sure which. Maybe both. Life Is Beautiful was a horrible film that shocked me with its idiocy, far-fetched plot turns, and overall annoying awfulness start to finish. How filmgoers ever fell for this incredibly unfunny waste of time baffles me
Shameful schlock!. "Fun." "Sweet." "Nice."  These are some of the words others have used to describe this DVD.  For my part, I propose grating and schmaltzy. Oh, not to mention racist. This is the stuff that gives the adjective "precious" a bad name.I could tolerate the consistent tone of preciousness in these ten tales if they weren't already riddled with inconsistencies.  It makes for a jarring viewing experience when I can't figure out whether or not I'm supposed to suspend my disbelief.  For instance, there are no talking animals depicted here; the cows, pigs, frogs, and duckies behave pretty much like one would expect cows, pigs, frogs, and duckies to behave.  But then there's Squeakles, a too-cute-for-words caterpillar who happens upon Sonya Lee's garden.  Ms. Lee in one scene actually tucks the caterpillar into bed while he makes soft cooing sounds.  Caterpillars don't coo!  They don't sleep in beds!  They don't make friends with people or frogs!  Let's say I should accept all these traits as stemming from some kind of "magical realism" framework; why then do they apply only to Squeakles and none of the other animals? I may only be four years old, but please don't insult my intelligence.  I wasn't born yesterday.And what about the producers' nod to political correctness, ensuring that the posse of Little People includes a Token Black Kid (Michael) and a Token Asian Kid (Sonya Lee)?  It's a veritable rainbow coalition of the precious, yet notice how it's the white kids who are recognized as the ones who "love to lead" (e.g. Maggie) while Michael is off doing his magic routines and Sonya Lee is laboring in her garden?  This is a parable for the globalized world:  Asians must produce everything and  Africans labor in superstition, while light-skinned, round-eyed peoples are the consumers making all the decisions that matter.And another thing:  when I put a DVD into the player I want to be able to watch all its episodes straight through.  With this disc, all I can do is play half the chapters before I'm back at the menu.  Let me have an uninterrupted viewing experience!  And stop peddling this hokey Danish schmaltz, which is clearly aimed at bringing down the collective IQ of America's children and reinforcing the prevailing myths of white supremacy.
SEQUEL?. Face it people, this is not T2 or The Godfather Part II, and why is there a sequel to the hitcher anyway? The first "The Hitcher" was a classic movie which was a perfect reimagining of Steven Speilberg's classic DUEL. There was no need for a sequel. The story was told, nothing more to tell. A sequel? Dragonheart fell victim for this. A sequel will just tell the story all over again. Not even C. Thomas Howell could save this movie from being a failure. All in all, not entertaining and unnecessary. Not recomended
Could have been better. "Hands of a Murderer" was the first Sherlock Holmes adaptation I ever saw (though oddly, it was titled "Sherlock Holmes and the Prince of Crime"). Being around 12 years old at the time, I considered it to be just about the greatest thing ever put on film. Time has jaded me, however, because now I see it as a rather goofy and unimpressive entry. The storyline is decent enough: the evil Professor Moriarty desperately wants to get his hands on a secret code that Holmes' brother Mycroft is protecting. However, it is all carried out with quite a bit of camp. Edward Woodward (Sherlock Holmes) is clearly too old for the role, and, quite frankly, does not much resemble the tall, lean figure of the stories. In addition, he seems to spend much of the film in an oddly grumpy mood, as if he were disturbed from a nap in between takes. John Hillerman's Watson fares little better, delivering his lines in a dreary, sombulent tone. Anthony Andrews (side note: see "The Scarlet Pimpernel" for a GREAT performance) is the only saving grace, and makes a  believeable Moriarty, though perhaps a touch too young.Despite its weaknesses, this film is fun to watch on a lazy or rainy afternoon, and is recommended for collectors of Sherlockiana and/or Holmes on screen. Two stars out of five
TRULY BAD. There's absolutely no way anybody with any love for the movies or Woody Allen could love this really really poor movie. I thought Hollywood Ending was bad but this is worse!!!If you are a Woody Allen fan do yourself a favor and stay away from this one! The man has many a good movies in his filmographythis is certainly not one of them !!!!!!!!
Bad usage of time!. This video has a long introduction and commercials. Commericials at the beginning and the end.  There is a lot of wasted time.  I found it an extremely inefficient use of my time--I am returning it today
Two half naked roman dudes fight over a half naked male brat. Fellini brings light on space instead of space on light.He brings mysticism to the movie not the movie to mysticism.He brings boredom and rattling to a new height.Lots of nice emotionalism and sweat.Waging tongues and blood. Candles and tits.Bondage and perversion.We learn Italian words that we can not use.Here is a good tidbit "Child of Aphrodite and Hermes...Hermaphrodite."The subtitles conveniently disappear at crucial moments. Even in Italian the voices do not match the sound.One of the roman dudes Encolpio (Martin Potter) finally got a real part as "Doctor Who" in1983.
A waste of time. Three friends get together for petty burglary jobs. They are pretty inept. One of them, Anthony (Owen Wilson), just got out of an mental institution but seems much more sane than the manic Dignan (Luke Wilson). Anthony falls in love with a motel maid, Inez.Personally, I though this was a disconnected movie wih a very slim plot. I didn't care for this at all.For what it's worth I thought Owen Wilson looked like a young Dennis Hopper with a broken nose in this film. It's the haircut that Wilson has in this film, a crew cut.
I can't believe a reviewer called this HD-DVD 'awesome'. First, it wouldn't play in my Toshiba HD-DVD player (it's always been buggy) then, after another copy was shipped out, it skipped chapter 3 EVERYTIME!!  What I did get to see of the picture quality was not very impressive, and the sound was just average.  I'm getting fed-up with HD-DVD and am glad I invested most of my money in Blu-ray
Creepy Crawlers=  They Nest!. Tracheotomy with a pen!  Can a movie go wrong with something like that?  The answer is yes.  For some reason they changed the title of the movie after it premired on the USA network.  It's really bad
This is a critique, not a synopsis... VCI's offering of The Chase is, as I understand, a superior transfer of this little known title. They have remastered the copy from the best surviving prints. There is a notice at the outset of the movie describing the techniques, materials, and film stock used for the restoration. It is well packaged, and includes a nicely printed liner booklet. All of this attention to detail begs just one question. Why bother?Although initially excited about seeing a movie that had escaped my orbit, the enthusiasm quickly waned by the end of the first reel. The characters in this movie are not simply "underdeveloped," they're non-existant. We know or learn very little about these people until the very end, and consequently care nothing about them. Bob Cummings, a fine actor whose career and accomplishments are widely unknown and vastly underrated, portrays the WWII veteran, Chuck Scott. Clearly uncomfortable with the material, Cummings acts as though he's having a tooth pulled throughout the movie. Peter Lorre's character, Gino,  is constructed with all the acumen of taking a Bentley to the McDonalds drive-thru, so poorly developed and written are his scenes and dialogue. Steve Cochran's Eddie Roman is acceptable only in that he actually has fewer lines than his hench-man, Lorre does. Michele Morgan's Lorna Roman, is unappealing and unbelievable as the thick-tongued French-immigrant gangster's moll.The story, or lack thereof is a hodge-podge so randomly executed we must simply accept a new set of circumstances and rules with each scene. Speaking of rules, as in the "rules of filmmaking and storytelling", this movie breaks far too many to be taken seriously. Our suspension of disbelief is violated instantly, and throughout the entire film. The plot leads us from one point to another as though we are in posession of the the shooting script. During the final reel, the filmmakers try to convince us that everything we have witnessed has been a dream or hallucination. Chuck's delusion, or the explanation of said event, is a perfect example of a broken rule. His experiences within this delusion are taking place parallel to, and concurrent with actions, characters, and events apart from his own. It is presented as though the screenwriter and director didn't want to bother with annoying trivialities like continuity. We are deprived of an ultimate confrontation and conclusion to the affairs, with the gangster's demise played out in a contrived fate that would be more appropriate in a hackneyed weekly serial...which is apparently all the time that was required to explain the actual plot of this movie.In keeping with the tone of the film, the liner notes and synopsis are a collection of uninformative vacuous thoughts and platitudes as nebulous and poorly conceived as the movie itself. The "author" reminds us that Michele Morgan received the Best Actress award for Symphonie Pastorale, at the 1946 Cannes Film Festival, as though the two performances had some relationship. However, he fails to mention that Ms Morgan had washed her hands of Hollywood after filming The Chase, returning to Paris for good. He also claims, "one way to suggest a dream-like atmosphere is to soften the glow or exaggerate the contrast and color, like the often ambiguous and dreamy paintings of Maxwell Parrish."  Huh...???!!!  I don't know who Maxwell Parrish is, but  famed American Illustrator, Maxfield Parrish painted colorful fantasy art, and nursery rhymes. He also informs us that throughout cinematic history, filmmakers have been unable to successfully produce dream-like movies. Apparently, somebody forgot to mention this to Val Lewton and Jacques Tournneur. Obviously, the author is as confused about film history as he is about art history.There are a few dark shots and set-ups in The Chase, with the most effective lighting, photography, and settings taking place inside Roman's estate. However, this is not some "little gem" of a film-noir classic. It is a disjointed, poorly written and badly told story on all levels. The only surprise here is seeing Cummings, Lorre, and Morgan, agreeing to act in this amateurish effort. Who knows, maybe the best stuff was left on the cutting room floor. It had all of the elements "on paper"... Likeable WWII veteran, mobster and beautiful unhappy wife, Peter Lorre as a heavy...Now imagine Edward D. Wood Jr. writing and directing it, and you have, The Chase.
Not up to Par. I couldn't wait to see this movie.  Knowing that it was a creation of Rob Zombie's I had the highest of hopes for it.  It fell very short of those hopes.  It started off decent and definitely creepy, then went so far off the path it wasn't funny.  We go from serial killers to cyborgs?  What was Rob Zombie thinking?  I love horror films, but this one was a HUGE waste of my time
HAAAAATED IT!. I hated this movie.  Not one character has a redeeming quality.  Mom is an aging hippie in denial who smokes pot and boffs rock stars half her age.  Rock star is  a self-centered self-important no talent.  Son is playing kissy face with an impossibly beautiful co-worker.  Daughter-in-law is playing kissy face with rock star and Mom!  The dialogue sounds written and the original music is atrocious.The only good thing I got out of this was the discovery of a T-Rex song that I was previously unaware of.
So bad it induced labor. The only good thing about this movie was my wife going into labor 2 hours later.  We must have fast forwarded 1/2 the movie, and it still leaves a bad taste in my mouth.  My wife enjoyed labor more than I enjoyed enduring the movie.  Be careful if it's not close to your due date . . .
An Anachronism. Having watched great movies in the Bible series such as Joseph, David, Abraham, Jacob, Moses and Samson and Delilah and other good ones pertaining to scriptures, I was looking forward to another fantastic and educative film. What a let down by this anachronism. How low can one go! This is a disappointing and misleading movie that perverts the word of God.If you do not believe in God, have never read the Bible, particularly Genesis but have heard of Noah from hearsay, perhaps this movie might be of some entertaining value, a mediocre one at that.If you are looking for a movie with an accurate account of Noah's ArK, don't aggravate yourself. Avoid this movie like a plague.
THE MOST HORRIBLE MOVIE, HONESTLY. The point I would like to make is this movie doesn't even deserve that 1 star I was forced to give it...and I shudder to think I HAD to rate it, because it deserves way way below a zero! I never laughed. Not once. I am serious. All I can remember thinking while watchiing this movie was "just keep on sitting, it HAS to get better." But it didn't. It just got worse, worse and worse! Stupid, childish humor can only be funny for the first few times you watch it, there was just an overload of that junk in this movie! There was no real redeeming qualilty to this movie, and I honestly can't understand how it made it into theaters. Final point to be made-do not waste an hour and a half of your life watching this movie, you will just feel stupid after it is over. You would be better off staring at the wall, I am dead serious
UGH! NO!. Statutory rape is NOT funny! Neither  is bad acting or pretentious scripts! (well, okay they are--but unintentionally)..Would have been sexy and funny IF:Oscar was 18.Oscar was not a pretentious ass.Oscar's stepmom was Lena Olin, and Oscar was played by Topher Grace.Gawd! Why can't I get paid to churn out mindless crap like this??? Yes, I could do this movie better. I would dump the steady cam, for starters.AAAH! End pretentious crap movies! just say NO
The worst werewolf movie ever made. I would've given this film 0 Stars if it would have let me. I've seen every werewolf movie from Naschy's Mexican lycanthropic romps to every installation of the Howling and I have NEVER seen a worse werewolf movie. Anyone who liked the special effects in this one would be impressed with the graphics from old Atari videogames -- seriously, it's that bad. And acting? Give oscars to the cast from Plan 9 from Outer Space and attack of the Killer Tomatoes compared with the performances in this piece of celluloid trash. No..it's not even good enough to be in the same category as trash. Let's see what else, oh yeah a plot? Nope, none to speak of here. The sex and nudity is the only reason I even finished it. Do yourself a favor and avoid this flick like rabies, or you'll find yourself wishing you had the last hour and a half of your life back
Hmmmm.... .....at the beginning of the film the death of some prominent business people made to look accidental gives the viewer the feel that the Berkeley character--young, on the move, up and rising PR star for a rental car company--is going to be a cutthroat aggressive bee-actch. What happens? She falls for a skuzzo who wasn't really invited to the office take over party and GOES WITH him to his other mistress's house. (WHAT!?!) The mistress catches them in her bed about to do the do and the mistress attacks them, causing Berkeley to ka-bong her on the head with the Maltese Falcon like sculpture, thus killing her. The skuzzo then goes on the shakedown because the murdered mistress is wife to the president of a company the rental car business is getting ready to merge with...which normally would make a mildly entertaining TV Movie of the Week, but Berkeley sleepwalks through half the movie and oogles like a frightened deer caught in headlights through the other half of the movie. See only if you're a true Berkeley fan. At least Showgirls was knowingly unserious and played for camp value...
SAMUEL JACKSON, A PHARMACOLOGICAL GENIUS. YEAH! SURE!. TALKING ABOUT A MISSCAST. SAMUEL JACKSON CAN PORTRAY A HITMAN, A PIMP OR A THIEF, BUT A PHARMACOLOGICAL GENIUS, YEAH, RIGHT
sum of all stars? zero!. Maybe no one noticed but towards the end of the movie when the Russian President and Jack Ryan are talking to each other through the computer, repeat is spelled "reapeat".  On top of that, the acting was horrible...this movie didn't take itself seriously enough.  Ben Affleck sucked as much as he did in this movie as he did in Pearl Harbor
Good try, but didn't do it for me. I do respect what they are trying to do in this movie, but it doesn't come to fruition in my opinion. It is definitely true that you will have to watch it at least twice to get it all, but I am not sure you will want to after the first viewing....I didn't. This is a movie that had great potential, but in my opinion it never reached it. You may disagree.I don't mind depth and intricacy in a movie plot, or even a little misdirection in order to keep it exciting (e.g. Sixth Sense), but I do mind confusion. And it was not just confusing, in the end, despite a nice attempt and maybe a few moments of drama, to me it was just plain boring. Alot of my boredom may just be attributable to the minimalist approach to this whole movie, nevertheless, it bored me. It relied to heavily on the story and the acting, neither of which were bad, but not nearly good enough to make up for the lack of visual interest in this movie.
A disappointment in a way... For some reason , or at least the way the album was introduced, one may assume that there is a lot here to enjoy. Unfortunately it is not the case. The album is more for FLOYD'S fans who are eager to have all the small details.Well, personaly I don't care that much about these details, all I want is the true staff, for that I would recommend to those who are hesitating, don't buy this DVD, buy the CD...or wait for the true Dark Side of the Moon
Movie is TOP - DVD is a FLOP!. This DVD gets only 2 stars because the 4:3 TV screen format of this DVD production is really ridiculous.But the movie is one of my favorites, number 4 on my all time best movies list.The feel of the movie is more like that of a typical 70's sci fi movie (like 'Andromeda') than of a 60's movie. Austere and unemotional (like Colossus himself), quietly and punctuously narrated, minimalistically acted and with minimal action - a movie for the brain, as befits a movie about a giant electronic brain taking over control of the world. I like the outdated look of the technology in the movie - black-and-green screens, LED displays, printout terminals etc. Really gets you the feel of the dawn of the computer age in the 60's. And captures- then reasonable-appearing - fears of computers surpassing human beings. ATTENTION! SPOILER! The movie has no happy end, the supercomputer maintains control of the earth in the end. Just as it is in D.F. Jones' novel 'Colossus' on which the movie is based. And that's another reason why I like the movie so much - one of the few movies WITHOUT a forseeable and boring happy ending. The absence of a happy ending is not the absence of an ending, by the way, contrary to what has been supposed by a previous reviewer.This movie almost has the quality of a Kubrick
LOL~!. If you want UNCUT ORIGINAL version, ALWAYS look for ORIGINAL LICENSED Production. NOT US Release. Its a foreign film, it should not be US version to begin with~! HELLO!!!?? Why settle for LESS with US Version where they edit and cut so many excellent scenes especially with Jackie's Fighting Scenes. And US Release ruins the speed and sound as well.I found HK Version to be MUCH MORE in enjoyable, and HIGHER in Quality. American Market always like to "Americanize" and "Control". Regional Code Regulation thing is one of the example to CONTROL the Market. Why not let everyone enjoy the same HK Original Release move the same way REST OF THE WORLD enjoys it ?? No one makes Hollywood American movies to "French version" or "Chinese Version" ~! This what Americans are doing~! Well, enjoy the cheap "American version" then~! LO
"Who would want to kill the sweetest ****** woman in the world?". I knew I was in trouble with FOUR BROTHERS when I saw that Josh Howard (of SPORTS NIGHT fame) was scowling hard, trying to be a tough Detroit cop. Not believable for a nanosecond. And then it got worse when Marky Mark said, "Why don't you two cops get some doughnuts and coffee?"The rest of the film veers along in that kind of lame and clichd rhythm. Almost every scene in this thing is a howler. And watching it, I remembered I hadn't forgiven Tyrese Gibson for the travesty that was 2 FAST 2 FURIOUS. Still, Tyrese is better than Garrett Hedlund, who looks like he's a refugee from THE OUTSIDERS.But the movie's not a total wash; after all, it's got a GREAT soundtrack
Here's the proper credit for Doom. Pathetic.  Almost as bad as Bloodrayne.  It would seem Andrzej Bartkowiak knew nothing of the game.  Altough I did not go into this expecting it to be "spot on" with the story-line of the game, they could have at least tried to make the attempt.  The creators of Doom the game deserved better than this movie
Sarah plain and tall  :Winter's End. Very dissapointed in the quality of this VHS tape.This third installment does not measure up to the first two. Production values very poor.It looks as if the copy I received was made from a copy, picture was not clear and sound was terrible. I am sending this tape back
Masterpiece? Yeah right!!. I truly am a fan of horror, even Italian horror. Esspecially since i'm Italian. I loved Dario Argento's work like Suspiria,Phenomena, Bird with the christal plumage. But come on deep red his masterpiece???!!!!We should all have guts to admit it, this movie is soooo DULL!!It drags on and on and on. And then the killer, it's hilarous!I even thought Phantom of the opera was beter than deep red, i really don't understand all the hype.If you want to see Dario's masterpiece check out Suspiria, tenebrea or bird with the crystal plumage!
bad movie. we saw this movie in Gym class and it is the worest movie any one has ever see
Very possibly the dumbest movie I have ever seen. I mean this is like "Plan 9" stupid! I'm baffled to see so many people on here liked it. I thought it looked real good from the previews but luckily I didn't see it in the theater, I rented it. And seriously I almost turned it off a couple of times but then it got to point where I just had to see how stupid it could actually get and let me tell you; the acid trip scene in the desert with the vision of Tom Waits takes the cake! I would have laughed out loud if I wasn't so jaw droppingly stunned by it. Another "great" scene is when Domino gets a house full of Mexicans with drawn guns to undraw them by giving one of them a lap dance. Hillarious! Especially since they show a picture of the real Domino at the end of the movie. Keira Knightley she was not! I don't know what third world country this woman gave up a career in modeling to become a bounty hunter in but I can't imagine this woman was ever sexy. Even in her early twenties.To me this movie is more of a joke than anything else. The acting is NOT good, the directing is NOT good, the cinamatography is NOT good, Knightley was horribly cast as Domino. The whole movie is laughable. Top 5 worst movies of all time.
insulting. There are GOOD B movies and wretched ones...this one is Wretched with a capital W......Almost ANYTHING with Casper in it other than "Starship Troopers" is usually horrible...this film seemed OK I mean it has Rod Steiger and Kim Catrall in it!!! I figured it would be a B movie and be "fun" but in the end its just BAAAAAD....Its not witty like Lost Boys nor fun like "John Carpenter's Vampires".....The film tries too hard to be funny at times and shlocky when it comes off very amatuerish. Simply this is just a real waste of money and time..
I Want My MTV!. If MTV was smart, and they used to be, along with funny, relevant, and entertaining (they even played music videos all the time!) It was on all day in my house, and you could always count on the VJs passing along some wacky facts, or artists dropping by who could actually speak coherently. Anyway, MTV could make their massive video catalog available to the public. You could browse online and choose the videos you wanted, pay $2-$3 each and MTV would either create a custom DVD for you and send it out, or you could download them and make your own DVDs. I would gladly pay to have several DVDs that contained only the videos I wanted. And there are about 100 I want, just off the top of my head.As it is, I am happy to watch my old and fading copies made back then and occasionally catch an old great on VH1 Classic, rather than have someone else pick out 10 videos, 4 of which I may want, the rest I don't. This one did nothing for me. Luckily it was a gift. I never would've bought it for myself
TMNT. I am very disappointed in TMNT: Fast Forward. The episodes are just boring. It's really a shame cause the 2003 series was such a brilliant series with great characters and story continuity. 4Kids really ruined TMNT with this horrible fast forward nonesense. I am all for trying new things, and I don't hate Fast forward for being too campy, after all I am a hardcore fan of the original 1987 series, but this is just painful to watch. I am not going to buy this DVD, I have seen all the episodes and none of them have any redeeming quality. I am saving my money for The Ninja Tribunal Season, which takes place after the forth season. I really hope 4Kids won't ruin the 2003 series for us fans by not releasing The Ninja Tribunal season, in favour of Fast forward. That would really be a shame!
A Travesty. King Kong is one of my very favorite movies, and I wish I could give this film 0 stars for making a travesty of a classic.  They update the story but only succeed in making the plot flimsy to the point of being ridicoulous. There is no depth to the characters, least of all Kong, whom Willis O'Brien endowed with traces of his own personality in the 1933 film. In the 2005 remake, Kong behaves like a real gorilla.In this version, Kong spends the entire time making eyes at Jessica Lange - and his eyes are really creepy, like those of a Disney cartoon character. Because there is no depth to Kong's character, you don't really sympathize with him when he dies, except in the broad sense that he is the victim of capitalism, etc. However, you don't respond to Kong as a character.  Whereas in Peter Jackson's film Kong is so much more than a special effect- he is truly REAL - in this version, Kong truly is nothing more than a special effect.The special effects are impressive enough, but were even more so in the 1933 version (and of course the 2005 remake), where they used an Ann Darrow puppet to show her interaction with Kong. Here, Jessica Lange spends all her time in the mechanical hand and we hardly ever see her in the context of Kong's whole body. Moreover, Kong's arms are too short to be a gorilla's and he moves too much like a human, even compared to the original. Thus, in the one area where the 1976 film could have trumped the 1933 film, it fails to do so and the effects are actually not as good as in the original.Also, the Skull Island sets are really stagy - with none of the depth supplied by the matte paintings in the original. On Skull Island, there is no prehistoric life as in the original, only a giant snake.  I guess Kong's fight with the snake is supposed to substitute for the T-Rex battle, a major tour de force in the original. I don't think so - it is like a caricature of the original sequence, horribly done.The death of Kong was unduly violent with way too much blood for my taste. It was truly disturbing. Of course, the substitution of the World Trade Center for the Empire State Building is not nearly as effective.Jessica Lange's performance is truly awful. She keeps rambling on to the ape, calling him a chauvinist pig (!) and asking for his horoscope sign. Of course, the fualt lies in the script, which asks the actors to deliver several bad lines, so bad you will find yourself laughing. Bridges and Grodin's characters are severly underdeveloped.I can't go into all the flaws of this remake.  Suffice it to say this version of King Kong only heightens my appreciation for Peter Jackson's remake, because this film shows how bad a remake can be. I avoided seeing this for a long time, and now I wish I hadn't. It just makes me want to see the 2005 version again, in order to rid myself of the memory of this awful remake. Avoid at all costs, you will regret it
Feast of a Violent and Disturbing Saints. I have seen "Feast of All Saints" twice and every time it has been harder to watch. I would not recommend this film especially if you cannot stomach violence and graphic images. Overall, it attempts to provide a history lesson, but if you are seeking knowledge of the quadroons & mulatto people of that era pick up a history book with historical facts
Philadelphia. Denzel Washington is probably my favorite actor. Even in that dog of a movie called THE MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE, he shone. Tom Hanks? Well, lemme quit hating the guy. This is a well-intentioned movie, Tom did a creditable job, and we had extreme close-ups with funny colors to camouflage the spots where he overreached. I was also pleasantly surprised to see Antonio Banderas fly in the face of his Latino studliness by playing a gay guy. A passionate one, though, since he's still a Latino, after all.Actually, this is a Hollywood "message movie," and you know what that means. It's about as subtle as Michael Moore. Those who agree with the message flock to be beaten about the head by it for two hours. Those who the filmmakers would like to see the movie, those who don't agree with the message, stay as far away from it as possible.There's a scene in the library where nobody wants to sit at the table with AIDS boy. The way they stared at him reminded me of "lao wei in China" experiences. Denzel's character was reminded of segregation, even though he's too young to remember it, and started to care about Tom Hanks' character.AIDS discrimination is bad. Actually, any discrimination at all is bad. And that's the movie's message. I agree with the message, but still. That's all we've got.As a totally irrelevant non-sequiter, if the name "Sam Francisco" means anything to you, you've seen subtle commentary on discrimination.I love a great courtroom drama. This one was merely good. With so much of an agenda to squeeze into a two-hour film, they had to take a few shortcuts here. Sad, ain't it? But even so, a well-intentioned film that I'm glad I saw. Once. Not twice. Once is enough, thank you.
Pretty silly 50's western. You can see why Anthony Mann - originally signed to direct - walked out on this film. The script is pretty silly and the characters uncompelling. Perhaps this film would be better described as a musical as Jimmy Stewart finds every excuse to sing while playing his accordion - yes really! A footnote in western film history
What a Letdown!. I love Jeff Goldblum, but he didn't carry this film. The film was ruined for me the second Julane Moore (yuck!) and the ridiculous, lame token Black daughter of Goldblum showed up no doubt to satisfy nauseating political correctness in Hollywood all at the expense of this bust of a film. It's obviously too much to ask for a white protagonist to actually have a white daughter. What a concept. It just added to the disbelief of the characters (stay Goldblum), the storyline, and the ultimate letdown of this much anticipated sequel. Jurassic Park III wasn't much better
Horrible DVD transfer. This is the WORST transfer of a movie (that is not a tape-to-tape before DVD bootleg) that I have ever seen.  Many scenes in the daylight show a jiggling reflected lights, or so it appears, and lines dance around with the sound.  It was so bad I thought it was in individual damaged DVD, until I read other reviews here and on IMDB.This is far worse than most cheapie transfers that are no longer owned but are in the public domain.  At least in those instances they usually have the excuse that the print they are working from is old and worn.  I have a much better video of Exodus on VHS tape in EP!And this movie is currently being offered at Amazon for $14.95.  Don't bother!  Tape it off TCM and you'll have a far higher quality visual record.As for the movie itself, despite good actors and one of the most wonderful music scores, it's very flat.  Kirk Douglas would have been a far better choice than Newman, who acts like he just came off a binge after a losing pool streak.  Nonetheless, it should not be sold with in lousy visual copies
How this movie got so many good reviews is beyond me. I like Sissy and Marissa but holy cow, this movie moved at a snails pace. I almost fell asleep waiting for the gun shot.  The story is so typical girl with two kids looking for some sap to help her out so she picks a naive high school grad.  pulls some smooth sex moves on the poor kid and gets his pee-pee all in a whirl and he becomes king kong and wants to protect her from her "horrible" estranged hubby, and play daddy to her brats. Its a no win situation, legally he's an "adult" so mom and dad can't forbid him from diddling with the tramp and unfortunatly he's in the wrong place at the wrong time and gets killed for no good reason.  And she ends up going back to her estranged hubbby and thinks what he did to get her back was soooo romantic.  The world is full of dumb c--ts and even dumber men.  Don't bother with this one
A pretty face does not a masterpiece make. Being a period movie afficionado, I had great hopes for this movie.  However, I regret to say...do not waste your money.  Jonathan Rhys-Meyers has been excellent in other movies I have seen, but his acting in this is so overblown and forced it is painful to watch, and I am not using this wording frivolously.  There were actually a couple of points during the movie where the acting was so pathetic I could not look at the screen...much like pretending to not notice when someone slips on the ice, just to save you both from the embarrassment.  Rhys-Meyers' good looks did nothing to take my attention from his terrible performance.Gretchen Mol's performance was a cardboard cutout version of her character, with a plastic smile plastered over her face during most of the movie.  Madeline Stowe's performance was acceptable as Rhys-Meyers' mother, but not up to her usual standards.  Jennifer Tilly gave her Aunt Fannie character a valiant try, but she is terribly miscast and could not seem to find it within herself to even produce tears during any of her apoplectic fits.I am SO disappointed in this movie.  Luckily, I rented it before buying it on Amazon and am thankful to have only lost the rental fee instead of purchasing it to sit unwatched on my DVD shelf until it turned to dust.  It may have made a decent drink coaster, however...
Very biased- A HUGE disappointment. When I purchased this DVD, I was hoping to get the complete picture- an unbiased presentation. From scratch I could sense what was to come. Bad presentation coupled with one sided propaganda forms the crux of this DVD. It is not well researched and very important issues have been completely omitted. What little was discussed appeared to be very tainted.I definitely did not expect National Geographic to come up with this kind of a DVD. I will definitely think TEN times before I purchase anything from them. Maybe they should just stick to wildlife/geography/ecology and leave history/religion/spirituality alone
Stick with Willy Wonka. I could barely get through the...um...er...reimagination...of the childern's classic - while the set design and special FX are state of the art, as usual for a Tim Burton film, the actual movie is hard to watch. Why? Depp's "performance" is chock full of ticks and mannerisms, off-putting, flat, self-absorbed, and finally, one-note. Rather than the quirky fun of the original 1972 Gene Wilder version, Burton's film is more horror than fantasy, often casually cruel and sadistic to the point of being far from family fare.  While deliberate on Burton's part, that doesn't make the final product any more watchable. It's one grim, dismal, downward spiral slog. Not much holidday fun, huh? As with most of Burton's other big, expensive failures, he knows how to CREATE a convincing world, but has no clue how to POPULATE it with characters and situations we identify with and/or could care less about.  The final result is a film that's like a fragile, hermetically sealed curio on the shelf - nice to look at from afar, but hard to get attached to, much less involved with. What a waste of millions of studio $$$
She can't handle the sword. The high points:1) A cute doe-eyed heroine2) Semi-logical plot and love-story sub-plot3) Stylish photography and sets in some scenesLow points:1)Uma with a few months practice looked a lot more convincing.  With 1.5billion Chinese and Japanese people they couldn't find someone that looked cute and know which end of the sword to hold?2) She's gets pummeled by the #2 female villan in midpoint of movie and then kills #1 male at the end. Not likely.3) Her main defense seems to be to try to run away from the bad guys.  What's with that?  In two (maybe 3) encounters with the bad guys she tries to outrun them and then collapses in exhaustion.  Then when they soon catch up she fights them and mostly gets HER butt kicked. Then by luck or stupidty on enemy part she ends up winning.4) The director misses an obvious opportunity to backlight her naked body through a white see through dress.  Cmon already!!5) The CGI is pretty lame and done on the cheap.  One obvious tracking shot was jumping all over the screen.  In the extras the director even mentioned how they mounted the camera to the top of a car.  What, they couldn't even afford to RENT a steadicam for a 1/2 day or some better software.I wouldn't buy it again.  Good thing it only cost me a little used
In Cold Blood. This is a made for TV movie and not the original film. Do not waste your money on this re-make. Buy the original that was released in 1967 and starred Robert Blake
Not Bruce's best movie. I really like Bruce Campbell and his movies like Army of Darkness. But this movie is not in the same league. First of all the plot is slow and boring. Bruce does not have the same rouge character that he is so good at. Instead the movie is filled with frankly depressing scenes of him in bed or limping around barely able to move. This really hampers the action aspects of the movie. The dialogue aspect is not much better.If you like Bruce, my advise is to get his other movies or try to get a hold of the TV episodes of  "Jack of all trades" episodes. It is a lot more fun and has the "real" Bruce
Brilliant... In a visual perspective, it's provocative, shocking, and highly disturbing to the point of it being too overwhelming for words...but overall, the movie creeped me out
hysterical mother is vindicated (yawn). Jodie Foster is excellent but there is no doubt that the daughter will be found on the plane at the end. The only mystery is in the details. No real suspense. I found the plot to be a little farfetched
Poor quality. Item arrived in timely manner, but item appeared used, DVD cases were chipped and broken only one DVD had plastic wrapping
dubbed 2000 series. If you are used to watching BTB of the BBC 1998 series you will be extremely disappointed. Bob and his gang's voice have changed & so is their favorite line to 'can we dig it'. There should be options for English,American English & others
great if you dig hallmark cards. i loved "my so-called life" and was expecting something good here, based on all these reviews. but the soap opera advertisements they stuck on the beginning of these DVDs were a bad omen. still, i hung in and hoped for the best. i was sitting there watching and really wondering "do people really relate to this stuff?" the characters on this show look like they're from JC penney catalogs, or ivory soap commercials. white bread, sanitary, vapid... thankfully all the people i know in real life are a million times more interesting than these fake people. this show makes me hope that i never have the bad fortune to make eyes with some guy in a parking lot and start dating him. the kids on this show are cute, but all kids are cute. nothing can save them or the adult characters or anyone from the extremely boring writing. i am SOOOOO glad that the world is nothing like how it's portrayed on this show. NEVER AGAIN!!
Do not expect a love story. Warning: It is not worthing If you like love story, forget it. Go for "Just a question of love" or "Latter Days". And If you're interested in nudity, well, you won't get much. Although you see a very and close shot of Jeremie's (?)juicy toy. However, the film is French. As any good French movie, it has to be strange. It seems the film and characters go nowhere, and by the end, you are sure that they went nowhere. I felt frustrated.You never really know what they are thinking or feeling, but that's okay, sometimes, neither we do. After the disappointment I can say that overall I like it because it makes you think. Both boys have problems concerning their inner feelings and you see neither of them are mature enough to speak out. And we adults can't do that either.But nevertheless, if you like uneasy stories and French movies. That's the one
name of this movie should have been  named  GEE" ZEERA. when i bought movie thought i would see more than one arab biased anti american news media......
Makes me appreciate Michael more. I like Moore, but don't doubt the "bias" of his films. Indeed, I have little doubt of some of his hypocrisy, i.e., some have suggested he's living pretty high on the hog, a contradiction to his rabid anti-corporate stance.I've always been amused at the reaction to "Fahrenheit 9/11" because of the records it broke, but also because of the films produced as a reaction to it (as if produced by some spoiled brats with little talent but support of those with money. Hmmm....) Fahrenheit was, frankly, pretty well done. (Recall that such pseudo-documentaries were done just a few years ago by Falwell's cronies trying to make, say, Ollie North look like a patriot and saint, rather than like the felon he is!)For cryin' out loud, Moore said he was making an anti-Bush film--not hard to do anyway. Get over it!As others pointed out, this film is the reaction of a spoiled brat. I had a drink with a guy who became a friend a few months ago. When I brought up Moore in passing, that guy said, "Oh, he just hates America." So that's become the battle cry of those, you know, who still think Sadam was responsible for 9/11, those--like that friend--who insist that the lack of WMDs in Iraq is ultimately either untrue or inconsequential. (!) And that battle cry is as meaningless as any of their other platitudes.Indeed, my nephew, a Republican activist, commented on the points in Fahrenheit that "took things completely out of context." But he could specify NONE which did so.So fans of this rubbish are running on these platitudes, articles of faith rather than on anything factual. That too causes me to appreciate Michael more.But using Dinesh D'Souza as a source of information and commentary? D'Souza's degree of ideology makes anything Moore does seem quite moderate really.If you don't like Moore's films, okay, don't watch 'em. But do yourself a favor and don't pay any attention to this diatribe.
I Don't See Why People Like This. I'm sorry, but I really don't! It's a style called Celtic Drama, which means it's a combination of stories w/o words and traditional Irish Dancing.I've never been a Michael Flatley person.Parts of this are traditional Irish dancing, but other's aren't anywhere near it! There are also long songs, sort of like a choir piece. I don't like those at all.If you want to see traditional Irish dancing, this is not your movie
THE MOST HUMORLESS FLICK I'VE EVER SEEN IN MY LIFE!. I caught this movie one night on IFC.  I've heard people mention it in conversations for years and so I thought I would check it out.  I sat through that lame piece of garbage and didn't laugh once, in fact I had trouble staying awake.  The so called "shocks" are tired and way outdated.  There's absolutley nothing shocking or indecent about this movie.  The "classic" scene where the fat teacher wants to identify the [...] she saw in the showers was pathetic.  When the two gym teachers suggest putting up wanted posters and keep laughing like idiots I just stared blankly at the television wondering what the hell was so funny.  What a waste of 90 minutes.  Nothing worse than a bunch of no talent Canadians trying to make a few bucks.  Lame on every level!
Not What I Was Expecting. Ladder 49 was not the type of film I expected-- I was hoping for a good, fast-paced action flick, which I got for about the first 5 minutes. The remainder of the 30 minutes that I watched was flashback to the rookie firefighter's first days at the station.Someone looking for drama and a story about the growth of a firefighter would probably like this movie. However, those looking for action should probably look elsewhere
Sad excuse for a movie.... One of those cases where everything goes wrong in the making of a movie: low budget, unispired performances (Alexis Denisof is particularly bad here), lack of decent screenplay for the actors to work upon, bad direction, despisable characters, cliched situations... How Kinski chose to act in this one?
Back to basics. Would the powers that be for heavens sake reissue the Stewart Granger version of "King Solomons Mines". He is Alan Quartermain personified and Deborah Kerr is a more than credible female lead. All else is dross. And while we are at it could we also have the same star casting in the fantastic "Prisoner Of Zenda". Stewart Granger like many of his contemporaries is under-represented in the DVD revolution.
I Wouldn't Hold My Breath If I Were You... I seem to remember a goofy date like this on the most recent Yes concert DVD, "Songs from Tsongas"...and that one took about a year and a half to actually show up...on the other hand, Young IS finally starting to release bits of that trumpeted archive set of his, so maybe this is a legit release (coming at some point, anyway)..
HILARIOUS!!. Regarding the intent of the American Idol competition, Simon Cowell has put it nicely and correctly on numerous occasions.  He constantly reminds, "This is a singing competition.  Not a dancing competition.  Not a beauty pageant.  Not an acting contest!"  Pretty correct if you ask me.Along comes DREAM GIRLS and it seems high time that the Academy Awards heeded Cowell's astute advice in the reverse.  Someone at the Oscars needs to wake up and realize that the Academy Awards is not a singing competition.  Instead it's all about the acting and, arguably, DREAM GIRLS offers the definitive case in point.To put it bluntly, Jennifer Hudson's acting performance was, for lack of a better description, hilarious.  The girl can't act and yet she toted away one of the preeminent Oscars of the year.  But don't take my word for it.  Virtually every serious movie critic, when considering DREAM GIRLS, noted what I have already stated.  They all agreed that Hudson's performance was amateurish at best and that she would, nonetheless, win because of her singing.Think about it.  The movie was nominated for more awards than any other film and came away virtually empty-handed.  Now why is that?  Quite simply it's because the movie fell flat and considerably short of the movies that ultimately won.  Most honest critics, as well, were quick to note that, had things gone the way they should have, Eddie Murphy would have won and not Hudson.  Some have even been so bold as to note that Murphy's singing is nearly as good as Hudson's.  I heartily agree.But, then, the Academy Awards continue their downhill slide toward being totally hilarious in their own right.  Anymore, movies seem to win more on the basis of PR and marketing campaigns than on actual merit.  And, as DREAM GIRLS and Hudson illustrate, sometimes it seems the Academy likes to promote a controversy as much as an actual success.Watch this one if you want a good laugh.  Other than that don't waste the time or the money.THE HORSEMAN
somewhat dissappointed. some of the movies that claim to be in color are black and white. not too many really good movies, but i guess you can't expect much for the price
Lost. Before I saw this movie I was warned that is was anti-Christian and that the writers of the screenplay didn't have a clue as to what following Christ is really all about.  After seeing the movie I am convinced of the latter but only somewhat of the former.Mandy Moore does a great job playing a legalistic, "church-lady" type named Hilary,  who goes beyond "witnessing" in her attempts at converting others by using crisis intervention tactics--like blocking the hallways with her and her friends, or attempting to kidnap the subject and throwing him/her into their van for treatment.  For Hilary, Christianity is all about behavior modification.  She lacks heart winds up with bitterness.  Her only hope at the end comes from her wheelchair bound brother, a nonbeliever, who offers to help her with her problems.  One can only assume that rather than correcting her misperceptions of Jesus, he will instead try to deprogram her of her faith.Hilary's nemesis, who she constantly tries to convert, is Cassandra, played by Eva Amurri.  Cassandra, a Jewish girl determined not to convert, brings to mind Matthew 13:19.  She has heard the Word and "understandeth it not" as a person who received the "seed" by the wayside.  She becomes a hero in the end for having a big heart, though she still chooses the earthly path rather than the spiritual one, thinking she only needs to rely on herself.Mary, played wonderfully by Jena Malone for her innocence, seems to turn against God a bit too easily when in trouble (see Matthew 13:21).  Blaming God when it was she who forgot to bring protection along seems very shortsighted for a girl with such strong willed faith.  But many young Christians do feel persecuted when they don't get what they pray for, a sign of spiritual immaturity.The problem with this movie is that no one has spiritual maturity, including the writers of the screenplay.  Even the most sinful pastor will answer "YES" when asked by a young gay teenager, banned from prom night, if Jesus still loves him.  This one doesn't know what to say.  There are no answers given to the audience of this film, most of whom are young people looking for answers.  So I will give a short one here.Saint Augustine said something that at first sounds irresponsible when not fully understood.  He said "Love God, and then do as you please."  What he meant is that when we really love Jesus intensely for who He is and what he sacrificed for us, our hearts will change.  Sinful behavior we used to commit no longer has the same appeal to us as before.  Being obedient to God brings us pleasure when we have true love and devotion to Christ.  We are still sinners but no longer by desire--not perfect but forgiven.  Would it have been so difficult to include just one character at a Christian school who mentions this?  The difficulty lies in finding screenwriters in Hollywood who have a clue about it.  Don't get me wrong.  All of the characters in this movie were essential!  But they forgot the most essential of all
Don't make the descent. Dean Cain stars as the marshall of  an underwater mining facility. He arrests some maniac Russian  who later gets out of prison and comes back to get Cain. There's another plot about people on the facility committing suicide but none of it really matters. If the plot sounds thin to base an entire movie on, you're right. There was no reason for this movie to be made, it's basically an ultra low budget rip off of Outland. Since it will cost the you the same at your video store, rent Outland
Springtime For Hitler. I think I understand what Camp is.  "The Damned" is a film taking upon itself the allegorical rise and fall of Nazi Germany in such an overindulgent manner that one cringes and giggles at the same time.  I guess Gay folks everywhere can blame Luchino Visconti the "great" director for making a laughing stock out of homosexuals in Nazi SS garb.  Mel Brooks realized in his film "The Producers" that Nazi's are damn funny, but not even Brook's vision could foresee the downfall of the Essenbeck family as the currents of early Nazi bloodshed swirls about.  The uniforms are Art Deco at its worst.  The young blonde, Aryan, cross-dressers are a bathhouse dream until they're lined up against the wall.  Rome may have had Caligula, but The Reich had blonde pedophiles. What a thrill to see Helmut Berger swishing about in Marlene Dietrich bodice and stockings.  I watched the whole thing and I'm going to end this review to take a shower
Check These Artist Instead. KRS ONE, Talib Kweli, 2pac, Mos Def, Obie Trice, Gangstarr, EPMD, Erick Sermon, Eazy E, Eric B. & Rakim, MC Lyte, NWA, Public Enemy, Mobb Deep, Lil Cease, Nas, Chino XL, DMX, Biggie, Kanye West, Wu Tang Clan, ONYX, Rakim, Redman, Royce Da 5'9, Warren G, Xzibit, Cypress Hill. All of these rappers and duos are wayy better than the (...) your hearing on the radio, BET, MTV, MTV2 or whatever station the world is pushing at your faces. im telling you rap first reached its downfall of pop rap category since 2000 when Big Pimpin and Back That Thang Up first came out. now its goota be put to a halt. is this the message we want america to hear and follow? hoes, money, women, guns, cars, ice, is this the message i want my kids to read and to make them thing this is ok and this is everything in the world? why cant these rappers rap about something more meaningful like how hard it was to grow up in the ghetto or racism or politics? Rap needs an uplift, expand your mind into good rap and you will go far
Even a great cast can't help a bomb. Wow, what a stinker! Kevin Kline, Harvey Keitel and Alan Rickman can't save this movie.  Poorly written, poorly directed, and terribly acted.  One would expect Rod Steiger to go over the top, but Danny Aiello is just as bad.  Stay away from this.  I paid about $2 for the DVD and felt I overpaid.  Hard to believe I wasted perfectly good electricity to witness this drivel.  Did I mention the movie was lousy
Not So Much Fun for Nerds. If you were one of the nerds in high school this movie will doubtless raise not so fond memories. Revenge of the Nerds has a few amusing moments (aka the talent show) but the genuine meanspiritness of the jocks in this movie inspired more than a full bullies. While the movie purports to be on the side of the nerds the characters are so stereotypical that you can't really identify with them. If you're looking for cheap laughs yeah I guess this movie is worth watching but if you are looking for a realistic portrayal of people labelled as nerds then look for the dvd of Freaks and Geeks
VERY anti-Christian. The movie has many none-too-subtle *VERY* anti-Christian elements, particularly in the typical Hollywierd portrayal of money grubbing "Christian" TV Evangelists and Christians themselves as stupid zombies; life as basically pointless.I am sick of Hollywood rubbish like this! So, if you're a Christian, stand firm -- DON'T BUY IT!!
Visual diappointment for a great format. Like several others, I agree that the Cinemascope version was well presented, but what a disappointment as far as the Todd-ao digital transfer! The original release I bought in 1999 gives a much clearer and brighter Todd-ao version that gives you a much better idea of what the original may have looked like.         I enjoyed seeing "The Miracle of Todd-ao" again, but similarly the realism that was present in the original was lost, either due to poor quality of stock or inabilty to be able to digitally correct and sharpen the image. (I find it hard to imagine that Fox couldn't resore it better).There was an apology printed on our Region 4 version.
Bad Audio. I was so disappointed with the audio.  I am not sure if the accent was such a very thick English accent or the audio was bad, but I couldn't understand what Miss Marple was saying,it sounded garbled.  The acting and scenery are wonderful, but because of this, I couldn't follow the movie and understand it. I tried to watch the same movie a second time, hoping to get it better, but I couldn't.  I haven't bothered with the other movies on the CD, because I couldn't even get through the first one.  I had been waiting excitedly for this set and now I wish I could get my money back.  It was so disappointing
Not Bad.... First of all I'd like to say this is not a great film It is a B movie but it is a very entertaining B movie. It is full of great performances Alexis Arquette has never been better. Scott Leet is perfect as Ray Frye The Convict who gets a second chance at life after spending seven years in the joint for Manslaughter . Now out of jail and back on the street Ray is looking to redeem himself somehow, while being endlessly hounded By Two cops (Mickey Rourke,Peter Green). Ray hooks up with Arquette who gives him a job and a place to live. There Ray meets and falls in love with Arquette's Lovely and lonely wife played by (Nina Ofenbok) Before you know it Ray is tangled in a web of murder and mystrey. They're are several Great Cameos, Ed Lauter , Christina Applegate And Balthazar Getty
No redeeming social value ... I'm sorry, I just can't get hot and bothered about Angela's Ashes.  No characters with any admirable qualities, endlessly wallowing in their own sense of despair.  Parents who can't be bothered to do something to provide their children with the bare essentials, but who can always find the money for booze or cigarettes.  The father, a low life, big mouthed, lazy good for nothing who drinks all the time, doesn't bother to provide for his family, but refuses to accept charity so that his children can eat.  A mother who would rather function as a prostitute to a filthy, degraded, disgusting relative than go out and do some work.  People talk in reviews here about this woman's great self-sacrifice, but I noticed that she never failed to have a cigarette hanging out of her mouth, though her kids were going hungry and having to walk through the overflow of a toilet just to get into their house.  I can't see any great self-sacrifice there - just laziness, lack of self-respect and self-indulgence.I can't see anything funny in this film, and certainly nothing noble in any of the characters.  Can't imagine what all the hoopla is about, or how anyone could consider such a tragic and infuriating situation, brought about by adults who refuse to be adults and take responsibility, funny in any way at all
Technical problems render this oater virtually unwatchable. This undistinguished oater is made much worse by technical problems.  It isn't a bad little western, and the two lead roles are played competently by Vera Miles, whose most famous role was Laurie Jorgensen in "The Searchers," and Sam Elliott, who was born to make westerns.  It had a good plot and some beautiful desert locations.Unfortunately, the film was not well shot.  None--and I mean not one--of the interior scenes is adequately lighted; you can barely make out dark shadows moving around against a black background.  The scenes in the Cactus Jail, which are key and set up the movie, might as well be taking place in a cave without even a candle for light.  Then there's the DVD which is full-frame and was mastered from an extremely distressed print of the film.  The DVD is blurry and shows every scratch, spot, and speck of dirt that 33 years of obscurity could inflict on the print.  Too bad.  Miles and Elliott deserved better.  Frankly, because of the technical issues, the film is probably not worth wasting 90 minutes on.
Heed The Warnings. One of the reasons I like buying on Amazon is because of these reviews.  Usually I can get a feeling about a movie by the reviews it receives....Unfortunately I bout this on sale as a "Previously Viewed" before I ever checked out the reviews.  The fact that they list on the cover that 2 of the writers nworked on Scary Movie naturally made me hink this had to be good because all of the Scary Movies have been roll on the floor funny.  This movies does have some funny parts to it, but not enough to really want t spend much on it.  The JayLo bit has been over done for some time before the movie so in the movie the giagantic rear end just comes across as silly nonsense....As with much of the movie...
terrible!. Still Smokin' is too bad for the first half,then it goes [down the drain].It becomes unfunny and uninteresting.The stand up is horrible.If you want Cheech and Chong doing their comedy routine buy one of their CD's instead of this film.If you're looking for a good Cheech and Chong movie check out "Up in Smoke" or "Nice Dreams"
Elizabeth I DVD. While viewing the DVD Elizabeth I, we noticed many imperfections requiring restarts and/or interruptions of our viewing. This is the first DVD that we have ever seen with imperfections.It was very distracting while trying to view this excellent movie
What happened?!?!?. This ill-conceived sequel to Stan Winston's impressive original, while certainly not an altogether "bad" film, will almost certainly disappoint those legions of devoted fans seeking more of the same.Director Jeff Burr has totally reinvented the creature's mythology and, as a result, has thrown a rather serious monkey wrench into what followers of the original film may expect. We are no longer faced with a simple demon conjured up to exact revenge for those who have been wronged. Here, the titular fiend arises harboring the soul of a boy who was viciously murdered for his extreme deformity. While I do respect the idea that Burr's heart may very well have been in the right place when he signed on for this project, he still made one crucial error. He approved a screenplay with characters that we, as viewers, never really connect with. Ami Dolenz and all the other teenage actors phone in their performances, reading their lines without any true conviction. The entire production reeks in mediocrity and came across way too saccharine for my tastes. There was no blood or suspense anywhere and, half the time, I felt as though I were watching a "TV Movie of the Week." Andrew Robinson does what he can with the role of Town Sheriff, but even his contributions were sadly wasted. And let's not forget George Clinton, Bill's brother. He shows up in a throw-away role as the town Mayor!I really do wish, in all honesty, that I could have given this a better rating. It's not all bad, as I said. But Stan Winston's original deserved so much better than this run-of-the-mill, by-the-numbers effort. For shame, Mr. Burr, for shame!
GET A VOICE BRITNEY. Even With great writers and backup bands, she still can't sing!!
Not a great movie!. I thought it was pretty bad. Hostel was better than this crap. I mean it was ok in some parts but I didn't expect much. It's not even scary. I can't wait to watch Hostel 2 when it comes out
Not as I Remember It, Where's Ramis?. I have been a fan of SCTV for a long time.  I used to watch it late a night with some other silly programs.  When this collection came to DVD and got great reviews in the papers I had to have it.  But having watched it I was disappointed.For viewers like me, this is not the ground-breaking show that used to be seen late night alongside other shows like Sha Na Na and The Hudson Brothers.  Nope.  This is what the show became after it was a success.  Harold Ramis is nowhere to be seen.  Reoccurring characters like Count Floyd are tired and stale.  Much of the humor centers around the move to a big network (this gets old fast).The prints are quite clear but they are too complete.  By that I mean that all of the station identification spots have been left in (sometimes three in a row for the longer commercial breaks).  In the end I was quite sorry I had made this purchase.  It is no wonder the ratings on NBC dropped as fast as they did.  If you are looking for the classic shows that made careers, these are not them.  But if your first experiences with SCTV were on NBC then this will be as you remember.  I will not be getting the other seasons but will wait to see if the original shows make it to DVD
A wild, wild gimmick. You want realism of the Old West? Try showing people frequently blowing big wads of snot out their nose and hawking green loogies onto the floor or into their sleeves because they didn't have tissues. Try having the actors and actresses go for a couple of months without washing their hair, and not brushing their teeth with toothpaste, so their hair is oily and their mouths are scuzzy and black.THAT would be realistic, but it's a LOT more repellant to television audiences than gratuitous profanity. So this "realistic" show has characters with clean, fluffy hair and pretty teeth spew garbage langauge constantly -- and sucker viewers and reviewers buy this as "realistic"!!! Every great writer of every age and era, be it Mark Twain, Owen Wister, William Shakespeare, or John Steinbeck, or any other storyteller whose works have survived for generations, told "realistic" stories of their era but who understood what realistic trivia to keep in, and what to leave out, in order to TELL THE STORY. That is WHY their work has remained timeless.Deadwood's writing shows a huge insecurity complex in choosing to rely on a gimmick (and a juvenile one at that) like over-the-top profanity. Whether or not the Calamity Janes of the time actually used the words "ignorant f****ng c***s" is something we will never know and is also absolutely irrelevant.There are an awful lot of sheeple in TV land
DO NOT BUY. This DVD is terrible, repeat clips and bloopers that aren't funny or that last too long.  I can't believe I didn't read the reviews before I bought it.  There is very little baseball on here and a few clips have been seen on AFV, so we've seen them 10 times.  Boring, boring, boring
Not worth it. Boring!  All this time is spent during the DVD talking about the John Fisher technique, but not really showing you anything specific.  Lots of great video shots of dogs romping about with their owners and shots of classes being conducted, all being voiced over about the 'great john fisher technique'.  Who cares!  I didn't order the video so that I could go look for a trainer who trains with this technique, I ordered it so that I could train my own dog.  So little instructional information was given and the video was so boring, me and my dogs fell asleep watching it.  What a waste
Not the real thing. If you saw the original Broadway cast of Fosse perform, you would realize how sad this video really is. If you want to see real Fosse choreography, rent or buy one of his movies.
fake "Dog Whisperer" - studious ignorance. Cesar Milan, the so-called 'dog whisperer', bases his training methods on a dog behavior model that is so out of date as to be archaic - from the dinosaur age. He teaches that dogs base all their behavior on their pack status, and that you need to use painful 'corrections' to convince them that you are Alpha. This idea hasn't the slightest shred of evidence going for it.Yes, dogs do have dominance roles, but that hasn't the slightest thing to do with problem behaviors. Dogs do 'bad' doggy behaviors because they work. Dog guards his food bowl? Dog wants to keep food and knows that growling keeps you away. Dog pulls on the leash? Dog wants to get somewhere faster and knows that pulling speeds things up. The dog doesn't care whether or not you're alpha; he only cares that what he's doing works to get him what he wants.Technically, Cesar's methods work. But they use force, fear, and pain to teach the dog, when you can teach the same things faster with the proper positive motivation and non-forceful techniques. I have three hyper, active, highly driven Border Collies, and they're all very obedient and mannerly. They don't haul me around the leash, nor do they leap at guests, nor do they ignore me when I tell them something. And I don't need to be 'Alpha' to get them that way; neither does anyone else.I strongly suggest that you don't buy this item. Good books to start with are Karen Pryor's 'Getting Started: Clicker Training for Dogs', Melissa Alexander's 'Click for Joy!' (also with a great problem solving section), and Jean Donaldson's 'The Culture Clash'. You can easily have a happy, obedient, well behaved dog without causing him fear and pain
Not even worth a rental. Unless your french and speak the language don't bother with ths drawn out boring movie. Many critics have praised this stale and boring excuse for a movie but don't take the rotton bait. Don't bite like a sucker fish, it's a complete waste of time. Not even worth a rental
Started OK, then Collapsed. 21 out of 100. Minotaur initally grabbed my attention. The movie was set in a remote village, and the characters, setting and acting had me hooked. I really liked the film until the youths were taken away to be sacrificed.Once at the "evil kingdom" and by the minotaur pit, the movie fell apart. The movie became cheesey, with near endless scenes of the evil bad guy sniffing gas from a skull. Yawn. Enough already. Bad acting. Over acting. No care for the characters. Etc.I thought this movie had a lot of potential with the setting and theme, but sadly it flopped. I've seen worse movies, but that doesn't mean I would recommend Minotaur. If you are looking for something off the shelf that you haven't heard of, but that is good sci-fi, try the Triangle, Firefly or Serenity.The Scifi has put out many, many quality movies, but sadly this is not one of them. One more comment: one reviewer compared Minotaur to Aliens. That is like comparing the Godfather to Ishtar, Gigli, Battlefield Earth, or Pee Wee's Big Adventure. I encourage you to watch both and judge for yourself.Total Score (out of 100) = 2110 (out of 50). Enjoyment. A rating based on my overall enjoyment of the film.3 (out of 10). Acting. How good was the acting?3 (out of 10). Immersion. Did the movie suck me into the story?4 (out of 10). Intangibles. Special effects. Movie pace. Is the movie forgettable, or something you will talk about and remember for weeks? Years?1 (out of 10). Must see. Is this movie worth seeing/renting?0 (out of 10). Must buy. Is this movie a must buy/purchase
Would've given it nil stars if I could've... Dated, derivative, self-indulgent & unintelligent.  This is truly bottom of the range stuff.  The acting, directing, soundtrack and script are all dire.  None of the characters are even remotely sympathetic, in fact I was hoping they'd die slowly and painfully.  I note that Billy Bob Thornton was both star and a scriptwriter - methinks his true nature is revealed in the script and the part he chose - an arrogant, amoral, misogynistic, self-important coward (with zero sense of humour).  Don't waste your time watching this drivel, it will leave you with a bad taste in your mouth that no amount of tequila can erase.
I was disappointed.... I've been a fan of Bruce Campbell for a long time, ever since seeing Army of Darkness and Brisco County Jr. actually. In the early nineties Bruce Campbell burst on to the scene with an original and fresh personae that was side-clutching, rolling on the floor hilarious at times. I remember being devastated when they stopped producing Brisco County, and then so excited when they announced Jack of All Trades. I didn't get to see the Jack series though as it wasn't carried in my area. I decided to rectify that last month and order the series as a kind of an early Christmas present to myself. Unfortunately I was sorely disappointed. I am not sure whether I would have found this series funny or entertaining a dozen years ago when it was released, but after watching the first two episodes I just didn't care to watch any more of them. I felt that the half hour format didn't permit any real character development or permit them to write any really interesting plots to build on the Wild, Wild West promise of the show. Or maybe it is just that I am older and my tastes have changed. But, for whatever reason, the show did not grab me at all and I don't see myself wasting any more time watching additional episodes. I love watching Bruce Campbell, but the magic of Brisco County, Jr. just didn't seem to be present in this series. If you are a real Bruce Campbell fan though you might go ahead and give this a try. Just because it fell flat for me doesn't mean it will for you. I think Bruce Campbell is a one-of-a-kind and maybe I just hit this on a bad day. Long live Bruce
Dissapointing Movie. A poor documentary. An attempt to make porn acceptable and very unsexy at that. A repulsive movie.Watch instead the recent made for TV series entitled Rome.  The series Rome is accurate and entertaining and without a doubt the best of its type ever made
Good Foundation. This dvd is very informative and well presented. After looking  at it for the first time i could not put down my ephiphone les paul custom
It's not a good thing. Unveils all the skeletons in Martha Stewart's closet.  The acting here is fairly competent, however I don't find Ms. Stewart very interesting so I can't recommend this.  Watch it for yourself and decide.  But remember, you won't find this dvd on the shelves of her beloved K-Mart
hahahhahahah... ...hahahahahha, boy what a retarded movie! This is the stupidest thing ever...what's that music? Everytime it go's in-sync with what the actors are doing it's so emberessingly bad I cant believe anyone would take it seriously. See the second one if you must...melinda clarke is hotter than shirlyn finn. :
Be Nice To People On Your Way Up. Don't bother.  Just don't bother.  It's sad to see
I wish I could go lower than this. This is horrendous movie. I will never claim it as the movie of my generation. It's one of the many reasons why I absolutely hate the "80's". The others are:Breakdancing, The Yuppie lifestyle,Power hungry businessmen/women, Women with manly handshakes, New Wave Music, and junk movies like this. I know that the main character is nothing less than a manipulator who is only concerned about himself, and what he can get out of life. He ridicules his friend because he's sick, and doesn't feel like driving Ferris around...especially in a Ferrari that mysteriously gets lost in the parking garage, so what am I left to believe I have to wonder if this is where Ice Cube got the inspiration for "It Was A Good Day". I don't care what decade it was, or what was cool back then, or now manipulating your friends is "NOT" I repeat"NOT" cool. I know with John and Johnette Q. Public this is something of a sexual relase. I could picture private parts of men and women everywhere getting soaking wet from this movie, and I find it so repulsive that everyone out there finds this funny.
weak. This movie was a weak effort by Capra, who directed it, and the star, Gary Cooper. It's a good story, just poorly directed (Capra can't hit a home run every time). I found the acting very wooden and the movie seemed to just drag on and on. And no extra features on the dvd, at least none to speak of
Read the book - it takes less time!. The Unbearable Lightness of Being was considered an unfilmable novel for a good reason: the point of Kundera's writing is not his plot - or even his characters - but his style.  For instances, his endless digressions about history, politics, and philosophy.  For the movie, we are left with nothing but plot and character.  OK, what is one to do?  That in itself wouldn't be so bad if I didn't watch the film with the constant thought: I could read the book in less time than it takes me to watch this movie.  This is a SLOW film.  It takes an hour-and-a-half story and takes three hours to tell it.  I can't recommend the film
Wolf's rain part I and part II. I bought I and II of this released Wolf's Rain because when I first read the reviews one of the reviewers claimed there was an alternate ending.  I am SOOOOOOOOOOOOO disappointed because now that I have the second part there is no alternate ending and I now see that that review has been deleted. I think Amazon handled this whole thing very poorly.  We depend on what they provide to help us make our buying choices
This movie fails!. 1,2, and 4 are best leave out 3. Why is the title named Jaws 3-D? Where are the 3-D glasses? I mean the effects are just horrible. I enjoy the rest of the series but this one is just boring. They should re-release this movie in theater with 3-D glasses and I would probably give this movie a good rating but for now this movie just sucks
Meh. Just meh. You can find most of these DVDs in one fell swoop on e-bay already if you use the search term "DVD lot" and you will end up paying about half the total cost. These are all Warner Bros snapcase DVDs, by the way. Yep, they come in those cases that drive everyone insane because they are cheap beyond a reasonable doubt. It wouldn't surprise me if half these titles are updated by Warner with new 2-disc special editions (in awesome packaging) in the next 2 years or so. Shop around, folks. These are the same movies you see countless times at your local pawn shop for half the cost here. There's nothing special here to be had, and chances are, you'll be paying for at least one title you don't want
Rent It......Maybe. I watched this because it has Big Gipp from the Goodie Mobb in it.  That is the high point, the movie is not very good.  If your a Goodie Mobb fan rent it just out of curiosity.  If not stay away from this one
THE WICKER MAN. Good photography and camera work! Writing was poor and I found the movie to be a great waste of good acting talent from good actors! Although the movie was meant to be a horror flick I personally don't like it when evil rules and the devil wins in the end. Other than that the constant negativity was occasionally well glossed over with some fine nudity. I will be giving my copy away. I probably should burn it
Don't waste your money!. Unfortunately I didn't read the reviews below before I bought this DVD.  It's a travesty of the DVD medium.  Perhaps Fox Lorber took the story of the movie too seriously:  they've produced a disk with the picture and sound quality of a bootlegged copy.  Don't waste your money on it
pretty worthless/disconnected. Quite disconnected from my point of view.  Hard to know what the heck is going on withour reading the VCR jacket and I'm not sure it was right!  Slapstick quality but just too disconnected.  No real story
Stupid. There was one scary moment in this movie--the quick scene showing the girl in the closet when she dies..now that was creepy. I then awaited more moments like that.  Nothing. nada. Lame.  Tries way too hard to be creepy and artsy and just landed up being dumb.  And that young boy what is up with that?? He's trying to be like the kid in the Sixth Sense (who was brilliant and totally believable).  This movie did not scare me.  And the idea of people being afraid to use VHS tapes after this? Come on.
Stupid... I'm going to make this review quick and to the point. I'm not going to include any synopsis or anything, I'm just gonna say this...This movie ended up in my Recommendations and when I read about it, it sounded kind of interesting despite all the negative reviews. This movie isn't disgusting, as some people have said it is...There is elements of nudity, sex, incest, s&m, and what have you...But it's not disgusting. The problem with the film is that it's dull. It's got a good cast including Isabelle Huppert (The Piano Teacher) and Louis Garrel (The Dreamers), but the film is just a boring mess. Even the sex scenes don't help it along. The plot is pretty stupid, I mean...This is really a waste of time.GRADE:
Buy the Rhino Version. This movie is my favorite movie. Ever. I feel terrible giving it two stars. But it gets 2 stars because I am comparing it to the Rhino version, which I also own. I also own the original VHS. I have watched this movie at least once a year since I was 8 except for about 6 years in middle school/HS. I can sit in class and watch it from memory in my head.BUY THE RHINO VERSION.If you can't find the Rhino version, this isn't half bad. Its just that that version is much better, and since I have been growing up with older copies, the new one's flaws, minor to the newcomer, are blinding to me. I also am physically unable to watch any of the "Special Edition" Star Wars because of those changes, if that gives a clue to my movie anality.BUY THE RHINO VERSION IF YOU CAN FIND IT.One complaint is that the VHS had this cool "glitter" effect in a couple of scenes involving energon and Unicron internals. It is present in the VHS, It came out wrong in the Rhino version, and was totally gone in the 20th. Thanks for deleting part of my childhood.In comparison to the Rhino version:The remaster is terrible. Mine seems to flicker and have strange artifacts. The colors are totally off. Hot Rod is basically magenta/pink instead of red and his orange is not orange like an orange, it is orange like a cheaply made basketball.Widescreen is fake. It is a cut fullscreen. I wish you weren't such a liar, Sony.Cover art: D-. No detail. Looks like whoever does the new show drew it in an afternoon or two. The matrix looks like a honeydew. It would have got an F but Prime is on there.Very few of the extras were worth it. I bought this for the remaster, hoping for some clean up and a restoration of the glitter effect, and they weren't there
Not impressed. I love Billy Blanks Lower Body and Ultimate Bootcamp dvds.  I tried his Ab Bootcamp, thinking it would be great too, but what a letdown.  I'm not sure why so many other reviewers liked it so much...maybe it's just me.His favorite move is standing and rotating the torso from side to side.  I felt it in the abs a little, but he keeps going back to it OVER AND OVER and it bothered my back. Also he makes some comment that your neck will stop hurting if you just suck it up and strengthen the neck muscles.  If you are pulling on your neck and using bad form that he teaches you, you can get hurt.Most of the video is done standing up.  He focuses more on the obliques (sides) than the rectus abdominus (front).  At first I liked the move where you rotate your hip up and bring your elbow down, isolating the obliques.  But I got bored of it after 10 minutes of the same thing.  He does crunches standing up too.  You stand in this hunched over squatting position (which I'm sure is bad for the back), put your hands behind your head, and contract your abs, pulling your head down (pulling on the neck).  I thought this was a lot of work for the rest of the body but I didn't feel it in my abs at all.  I prefer to do crunches on the floor, which uses more resistance since you're lifting the upper body against gravity.He does have some good floor moves in there at the end that I've never seen before.  It might be worth a rental to see those.As usual, Billy shows his lack of stretching knowledge.  His stretching routine usually involves swinging the arms like in Tai Chi...which really doesn't stretch anything.  I found it weird that he does a quad stretch and a hamstring stretch at the end of an Ab workout.  Wouldn't you expect an ab stretch?  Or a back stretch?This video is about 30 minutes.  It might seem short, but when you're targeting only 1 muscle group, that's a long time.  I thought my abs would be twice as sore compared to another dvd I have which is 15 mins, but the only thing that's sore is my back.  I guess I'll keep looking - I've heard good things about Gilad's Abs Workout
Too overrated. Now I'd actually give this movie 3.5 stars. But since so many people talk about being one of the greatest movies ever made I'm giving it a 1. The story was quite good in how it dealt with the American Dream and how a dysfunctional a family can be behind a seemingly perfect house. Kevin Spacey gave an excellent comedic performance as Lester Burnham, the one with the midlife crisis. Annette Benning's character Carolyne is Lester's obsessive-compulsive perfectionist wife who's role tells us the consequences of giving more importance to material things over family. But there were parts in the film which didn't make much sense. What's with Janie showing her breasts through the window at Ricky? How come Ricky stood naked in front of her during a conversation? There was no need for that. A girl her age especially would freak if a guy stood naked in front of her like that. But she seemed perfectly fine with it. Also Ricky's point about the plastic bag he filmed having beauty in how it freely danced in the wind is just another pathetic attempt at being artistic. This is apparently just another arthouse film that critics praise, making it seem better than it really is. Frankly it was also very dull and depressing.
preachy - but not in the way you'd imagine. I checked this out because I wanted to take a look at what the new Doctor Who people have been doing in the recent past.  The Second Coming isn't quite as cosmic, but it certainly engages us in some comparable flights of fancy. Steve Baxter (Christopher Eccleston) has an epiphany one night when he's out on the town with some mates. He reckons he's become the Son of God and he proceeds to turn night into day at Maine Road football ground in order to demonstrate his divinely-chosen status (a bit like David Icke, except with powers). His immediate friends take their time to come to terms with this and despite becoming the `new disciples' some of them - notably Judith his girlfriend (Lesley Sharp) - remain sceptical. Through the media he tells the world that they must come up with a `Third Testament'. It later transpires that if they do not, the end of the world will soon follow.What are this messiah's credentials? Well, he spends forty days in the wilderness which is Saddleworth Moor and he has no earthly father - it turns out that his dad is infertile and couldn't have fathered him. This tickled me. Did writer Russell T. Davis pass his GCSE in Religious Studies, do we think? I couldn't really work out whether the religious symbolism was unconsciously corny and nave or whether it aimed at giving us a laugh. I'd like to think the latter. Steve, curiously, isn't what we might describe as spiritual - certainly not religious. He swears all the time, boozes and although not quite loutish, is somewhat laddish. He's a laddish messiah. His disciples swear at him and he insults them back. (Message to southerners - we in the north are not all like this, despite the plethora of dramas which suggest otherwise: Preston Front, Our Friends in the North, etc. Writers do seem to have this desire to patronise us thus.)What's noticeable about the founders of the major world religions is that they managed to espouse some degree of religious wisdom. Steve, who just witters nonsensically to the crowds, seems to lack this facility. Is he meant to be devoid of wisdom? Are we asking too much of Russell T. Davis to place some in his mouth? Could he have done so had he wished? Presumably our writer would need to possess some himself! (Jury's out.) It turns out that the party piece belongs to the sceptical girlfriend who clearly becomes the mouthpiece for the programme's message.So what happens? Despite almost two hours of waiting for Judgement Day, with little action or plot development we eventually come to learn that our messiah is something of a damp squib. He ends up at the girlfriend's home where she feeds him a dish of spaghetti a la rat poison which he takes willingly but not before we discover that he is really just a sort of encapsulation or epitome of human religiosity. Enlightened humanity - Judith - finally comes to realise that she can and must live without him and she spits him out. They argue for a while before atheism wins out and Steve chomps down the poisoned pasta (after the two hours I found myself saying `bon appetit'). So we get the sermon, although it's a secular one which declares the futility of religious belief. But this messiah seemed to me to be almost devoid of any meaningful religious ideas anyway. You can't debunk what doesn't exist. Steve can't be a foil for atheism if he IS a kind of atheism. I suppose that we do end up questioning Russell T Davis's understanding of spirituality, not to say he should necessarily adhere to religion or spirituality, but perhaps to understand it to come degree. And yes, there is a naivety and a corniness which underpins all this third-form philosophy, typical of so many young people working within the arts.It's a pity that the message of the piece couldn't have been delivered within the actual context of the drama itself. What we have is a two hour TV play followed by a secular sermon, subtext puked out and all. We do have an epilogue, however, where our new-found heroine is hilariously transfigured at the supermarket. I do recommend The Second Coming for amusement, but for enlightenment you'd better have something else to hand.
Criterion now giving credit to Welles  poor (old)excuses. The Criterion Collection, a continuing series of important classic and contemporary films, is dedicated to gathering the greatest films from around the world and publishing them in editions that offer the highest technical quality and award-winning, original supplements.The foundation of the collection is the work of such(real) MASTERS of cinema as Renoir, Godard, Kurosawa, Cocteau, Fellini, Bergman, Tarkovsky, Hitchcock, Fuller, Lean, Kubrick, Lang, Sturges, Dreyer, Eisenstein, Ozu, Sirk, Bunuel, Powell and Pressburger.The Criterion Collection must feel embarrassed for wasting  a tremendous amount of time in this glorious package to glorify the most incompetent of all filmmakers. I did not watch any of the extras, but I hope you can find there those hilarious TV- clips from the 70s with Welles crying like a baby...."Oh...They only let me do the movie I wanted to make in Kane....
Just Plain Silly. Ahh, "Iron Eagle".  A classic of the 1980's Golan-Globus production mill.  With the current spate of historic/"current" military movies, it's sometimes good to see how Hollywood's come in trying to get the details right.  One can't do much better than using this flick as a baseline.  In case you aren't already familiar with this gem, Louis Gosset Jr. playing a reserve Air Force Colonel, and a teenage kid fly a mission inside an unnamed Arab country -OK I'll name it:  Libya- to rescue the kid's dad.  Pop gets shot-down when he's intercepted in international waters, but the US refuses to do anything more than diplomatic pressure.The kid and Lou Gosset meet up when the kid's challenged to race the local bully with his PLANE while the bully's using his dirt bike.  Suffice it to say he wins and impresses his babe; he doesn't get his slot at the USAF Academy, though. You gotta take the bad with good I guess.  When the words on Dad get back to the family, this kid uses his base "network" to get access to imagery, enemy air defense data, and two F16s carrying a B52's worth of ordinance.  All of this being done by his friends exploiting the dim bulbs who are their parents, no less.  (If only strike planning was this easy.)  Of course, the kid has flown training missions with his dad, and has a boatload of simulator time, so he's a natural to fly the mission.  He convinces Gosset to go along with him, and his two-ship is on the way.  The flying scenes are nothing spectacular, with obviously Israeli F16s playing the good guys, and Kfirs (modified Mirages) acting as MiGs.  Cockpit scenes are completely the imagination of the set designer; I'm guessing he never was anywhere near a real aircraft.  These are especially dated now as many computer flight sims are pretty darn accurate in cockpit, flight, and combat models.  Anyway, lots of explosions on the way in, Lou gets hit and aborts and our hero must press on alone-go figure.  He manages to talk with the evil dictator directly and get his dad on the runway for him to land (!) and pick him up.  More silliness ensues as he launches weapons on the ground, taxi's out and takesoff.  He kills the bad guy and heads home to find Lou punched out and was rescued.  Rather than the prison sentence for espionage, and theft of government property that Lou, the kid, his pals and the idiots they exploited on base should've got, he gets his slot at the Air Force Academy.  The end.Overall, I guess Lou's performance was fairly good, but everyone else performed at the grade-B level this flick is.  Note especially a very young Shawnee Smith as one of the kid's buds.  Worth seeing for laughs, and as a film version of a kid's pilot fantasy.
Snore. Don't let the cover fool you, this film isn't half as fun as you may hope it is. Maybe it's my own fault, but I was expecting something more like "Groove", or at least something interesting to watch. And it's not for my lack of knowledge of the bands, I often listen to Joy Division/New Order/Happy Mondays, and more from that scene. However, this seemed much more like the story of Tony Wilson and The Factory, than it did about the music, and almost came-off as a documentary. I almost stopped watching it out of boredom, but saw it through anyway. Now I wouldn't call this bad, it had it's good parts, just not many.
disgusting, pointless, and stupid!. I rented this movie at blockbuster when I thought it would be good but it sucked. I mean i bought the foreigner and that sucked as well. This movie was barely advertised he just comes up with more and more crap to sell. His older movies rocked meanwhile, this movie sucked out loud
It's about kids at a "musical camp" for wannabe performers. These are not your typical teens. They love Broadway musicals and want a life of singing and dancing on stage. So here they are at "Camp Ovation" honing their skills. One of the teachers is a song songwriter. Because he is also a "one hit wonder" he's an angry alcoholic. The other characters (teenagers) are a "fag hag", a cross dresser, a chubby girl who has her mouth wired shut, a bleached blonde who thinks too highly of herself and her meek sidekick and a rare straight boy at the camp who lacks self-esteem.There is a three good scenes that made this film worth watching but in general mediocre movie. If you like musicals, you will proberly like this but might bore most people.
I didn't like it.. Simply put, I didn't like it. Emma Thompson was too old to play a 19 year old. Not only did the movie leave out a/o change alot of what was written in the book the movie left out a/o changed the characters. So, once again I must say, I didn't like it..
it was egh. I gave it two stars because while I didn't hate it, it was dull and predictable.  I see beter plots on TV's Starsky and Hutch.  It probably wouldn't have been so bad if I didn't have to use subtitles; I found myself more interested in looking at the text than watching the movie.  I know, that's only my opinion, but I watch a lot of DVD's and I think I know what I like and don't like
SKIP THIS  THIS IS NOT J-HORROR. Oh man, this is really (...)!!!I rent this DVD,I REALLY, REALLY glad, I rented it didn't buy this Crap! I thought this series of GHOST stories come from J-Horrors. Would be real shocking and scary,Gory. That's what u expected from j-horror!!..It was looks like our TWILLIGT ZONE series was made for TV have silly special effects..Kind of slow pasted stories little silly suspense here and there..Just lame! Wasn't scary at all!. . Definitely SKIP this, It just wasting time and money, I was wondering another review from "THOM" Did he really SAW this movie or someone told him about it? ..He gave this movie 5 STARS????? LOL!! U TRIPPIN DUDE!!.B
Kundera was right to object. The movie doesn't at all reflect the original book story in its core concept. If I didn't read the book before I wouldn't be able to guess what is the movie trying to explain. I doubt anybody, based on the movie only, would be able to understand what happend in 1968 in the Czech republic and what was the consequence for the entire society
I worked on this dull "erotic vampire" film -- some "inside scoops"!. Alyssa Milano's mother (who is also her manager) has made a crusade of tracking down nudie pics of her daughter on the internet.  She's denounced such websites' "exploitation" on national TV, and has even developed a side business as a cybercop, lending her web-busting skills to other stars.  Milano's mother/manager could have saved herself the trouble had she instead steered her daughter away from doing this film.Embrace of the Vampire is softcore horror porn, and the source for many of those Milano skin pics.  After TV's Who's the Boss was canceled (but before Charmed returned Milano to star status) Milano was just another unemployed former child actress, so maybe this porn film seemed like a good career move at the time.Milano has stated in interviews that she wanted to demonstrate that she was not the goody-two-shoes girl she'd played in Who's the Boss.  In other words, she wanted to "grow" as an actress.  So she did Embrace of the Vampire, in which she goes topless in several scenes, engages in a lesbian romp with Charlotte Lewis, and participates in orgies with characters tonguing various parts of her nude body.Mission accomplished.Actually, Embrace of the Vampire uses Milano's virginal image from Who's the Boss by casting her as ... a virgin.  A virgin whose boobs are straining against her too-tight blouse and who undresses before her boyfriend (albeit asking him not to look), but still, a virgin.  A virgin who dreams of orgies and fondles lesbians and doesn't know why.Here's why: Milano is the reincarnation of Martin Kemp's true love.  Some 300 years ago, a pack of scantily clad vampresses turned Kemp into a vampire during a blood orgy.  Now that he's rediscovered Milano, he has three nights to rekindle her love for him.  If so, they will live forever as vampires.  If not, he dies and loses her forever.Why the sudden three-night deadline?  Why not.The plot and motivations are paper thin, as is typical of porn.  Milano wanders around campus, wondering why she's having so many sexual dreams, even daydreams.  Her boyfriend wanders about, wondering if she's so pure.  Kemp wanders about, seen by Milano but often not by others.  Lewis wanders about for some bisexual action.  Other collegiates wander about their parties and campus back alleys for some hetero action.  Amid all this wandering there's much carnal action, and more carnal dreaming.  Occasionally, Kemp kills someone for dissing Milano.  John Stanley (in his Creature Features movie guide) correctly refers to it as a "meandering, almost formless script."Kemp has the best lines.  Like many vampires, he agonizes and suffers a hyper-romantic vampire angst over a lost love.  His appearance is a touch effeminate (too much eyeliner), but it lends an appropriate sinister element to his character.  He is part romantic vampire, part bloodthirsty beast.  Lewis's small part is pointless to the "story."  All that's required is that she undress, and when she does, it was worth the wait.  Rachel True (The Craft) has an even smaller role, the fate of all the characters who keep their clothes on.All of the above three are more interesting, more charismatic, than Milano or her boyfriend.  At film's end, Kemp's tearful bloodthirsty angst, and Milano's tearful rediscovery of her love, the "tragic" star-crossed ending, and the Christian iconography, all mirror Coppola's Bram Stoker's Dracula (1992).  One senses that director Goursaud was trying to rise above her porn material.However, this is no poor woman's Bram Stoker's Dracula.  Milano is no Winona Ryder and Kemp is no Gary Oldman.  For that matter, none of the other talent on this film compare to their counterparts.  And the budget just isn't there.  The strength of low-budget horror is a gritty authenticity, which this film tries to hide rather than utilize.How low was the budget?  Listen, I was an extra on both Bram Stoker's Dracula and Embrace of the Vampire.  (In both instances, I kept my clothes on.)I worked one day on Embrace of the Vampire.  Don't look for me, I ended up on the cutting room floor, and extras are rarely mentioned in credits.  But let me tell you an "inside story" on the making of this film:We were shooting in a nightclub on the Sunset Strip.  The extras were divided into three camps: union, nonunion, and Modesto extras.  Union extras earn the most, especially once overtime kicks in, so they were wrapped after eight hours (they were only hired in the first place to fill a union quota).  This was during my nonunion days (I'm in SAG now), so I put in a full 14 hours, after which we were paid in cash and wrapped.  The Modesto extras were still working when we left.Now what, you may ask, is a Modesto extra?  I also wondered, and so I asked one.  I was told they were from an acting class in Modesto, California.  They had been bussed in to work on the film as part of a "class assignment."  In other words, they were PAYING to come to work.There's not a whole lot to learn about being an extra.  It's neither glamourous nor difficult.  And nonunion extra jobs for twentysomethings are VERY EASY to come by.  The lampposts in Los Angeles are covered with flyers seeking cattle, ehr, extras.  I did it for the cash, and because if you do it often enough, you increase your chances of getting into the union (which I did, after some 13 grueling months).NEVER PAY for the "chance" to be an extra, not in Los Angeles.  I made the mistake of volunteering to be an extra a few times, but wised up after a few months.  My guess is the producers of Embrace of the Vampire paid this acting teacher to bus down some cattle, and far less than even nonunion extras cost.  I know this teacher was getting paid by the students, and that they were not getting paid to be on the film.Another inside story: Someone stole a silver pin belonging to a crew member.  She was near tears because it had sentimental value.  Never leave anything of value lying around on a set.And some trivia: John Stanley says this film was "originally conceived as The Nosferatu Diaries," but on the set, we were told the working title was The Collector.Embrace of the Vampire is a decent time-killer ... barely.  If you're looking for horror, there are hundreds of better films.  Dozens of better vampire films.  Even many superior erotic vampire films -- Vampyres (British, 1975) comes to mind.But if you're looking for Milano nudies, this is the film to see.
5 stars for the show, 1 star for the DVD production. I am a big fan of the show, and was disappointed that for so long, only a few episodes were available to purchase, and those were only on VHS. I was really happy when I heard they're releasing the complete series on DVD... but if you ask me, these DVDs are worse than having nothing at all.The box advertises "complete, uncut" episodes and yet many episodes are missing scenes for no apparent reason. I can't imagine the reason for this. The DVD picture and sound quality are far worse than the VHS releases. How does that even happen? The episodes are also missing the introductions (which are different for each episode, depending on guest stars, etc)... left out for no reason. The DVDs also have no chapter stops whatsoever.How does this happen in the modern day entertainment industry? No one in charge of product quality, no one even attempting to release something up to DVD standards, yet they hired someone to delete scenes that aren't crucial to the plot? I just don't get it... did they think DVDs have very limited space, and they have to take any steps necessary to reduce the length of the show?The Little House series still appears on cable TV. You can literally get a much better quality product simply by taping the shows off of TV... this DVD release is a joke.It's a bit frustrating to see so many shows (including older shows and less popular ones) are having great DVD releases, with great quality video and sound, and actor commentary despite the show being made decades ago... and then to see that Little House is treated so poorly
Dreck 2. "The Ring Two" is a horror film that gets so bogged down in the minutiae of its storytelling that it simply forgets to be scary.  Naomi Watts and David Dreckman return as the mother and son who have recently fled to a remote section of Oregon in an attempt to escape the murderous clutches of Samara, the ghost of a young girl whom they encountered in the previous film.  However, like any specter worth her salt, Samara has managed to track the pair down and quickly begins her scheme of possessing the boy as a way of returning to the land of the living.This is an extraordinarily under-whelming thriller that is little more than a series of extremely mild shocks (if you even want to call them that) interrupted by long stretches of hopelessly dull exposition.  The story itself makes very little sense, and the climax is so blas and half-hearted that I couldn't be sure the movie had actually ended until the credits started rolling by.  "The Ring Two" has a few impressive special effects up its sleeve, but not nearly enough to relieve the tedium that afflicts so much of the movie.In a mere two installments, this series seems already to have run its course.  If this "Ring" comes a-callin`, don`t answer
Defective Copy. Swingtime is the one Astaire and Rogers musical which did not transferto DVD.  The picture "freezes" at several points early in the film.I have not had this experience with the other Astaire/Rogers DVDs and Iown all of them. Have any of the other owners of this DVD had this prob-lem
A horrid, not horror, film. I found this to be a horrid, not a horror, film.  This film is typical of today's horror movies: production values over the top and storyline and originality lost in the bottomless pit of the phantom zone.  The gimmicks, clichs, and the twisted ending are all part of the course in this movie: all meant to gross you out instead of mesmerizing you with intrigue and mystery.  The original and dated 13 Ghosts movie of 1960 has a far better chance of doing that than this over budgeted and poor excuse for a Hollywood bromide
Not for younger children. I bought this DVD for my third-grade twins who are having difficulty memorizing math facts, and don't quite understand the relation between these math facts and the real world.  I thought this DVD would be perfect, explaining basic math facts with humor and real life examples.  But their explanations are way over the heads of this age group.  In explaining the concept of "carrying over" while adding, for instance, here is what is said and written out on the screen:  "Carrying over means you take the digit in the tensplace of the digit place sum, and carry over that digit to the next digit place to the left in your addition problem.  You do this whenever the sum amount in the digit place is greater than nine."Yeah, *I* get it, but it is not the simplest way to present it to an elementary grade child.I'm not certain what grade level this series is for -- perhaps middle school and above? -- but definitely not for those just starting out
CUH-RAP. Some talented DVD editor should take the latest 3 movies, and cut out the dumb scenes (about 75% of each movie) and put them all together to make one decent movie
How To Make A Goth/Sci-Fi "Classic" (A 20-Step Guide). 1. Make sure you set your film in some sort of terrible alternate future where all people are slaves or unhappy or kept under sedation or something.2. Have every scene take place in the dark.  And your underworld must be lit by 15-watt bulbs.3. Clothe everyone in black leather, particularly capes.  This especially works for the villains, but in the interest of equal play the heroes can be edgy and wear black leather too.  If they're villains, shave their heads.  Give them sunglasses (for the dark!)4. Copying Terry Gilliam's masterpiece Brazil, throw something retro like brimmed fedoras into the wardrobe.5. Have a premise where our hero, a lone, semi-geeky guy, wakes up or somehow finds himself in a world he does not remember getting into.  He must clear his name of something, even if it's just getting off Pottery Barn's mailing list.6. Have a Mysterious Woman who may or may not be in cohoots with the bad guys, but who falls in love with our hero and wants to save him by the end of act II.7. Make damn sure she's sultry.  Though blondes are generally more popular these days in Hollywood, here dark brunettes work best.8. Have lots of issues that revolve around our brains being dicked with.  Throw in lots of tortured dialogue about alternative consciousnesses/universes/fuel supplies/sugar substitutes.9. This is very important: USE THE RHETORICAL LINE AT LEAST ONCE: "DO YOU KNOW WHAT WILL HAPPEN IF YOU [find the Kiber Crystal/try to rescue your love-interest/defy Dr. Morphface/turn on a bright light]?"  Indeed he (and we) don't.  This is supposed to get us all scared and anxious.10. Our hero should have had, if possible, a happy childhood that turned tragic.  Slaughtered parents work great here.  Of course, he doesn't remember any of it, at least at first.11. Populate your world with lots of machines with tubes, wires, cables, and ducts.  There also should be flashes of lightning that serve no purpose.12. Make sure your sets and costumes were "derived" from some black and white classic film from the 20s or 30s--Metropolis, Caligari, even Frankenstein will do nicely.  This is both to show you have a "legitimate pedigree" and to cover up the fact that you have no original ideas yourself.13. Make sure all the bad guys bite off their dialogue and sound mean.  This is how we know they are bad guys, since lately both sides have been wearing black leather.14. The guy gets the girl in the end and the sun comes out.  Really now, do we have to say this??? (However, through most of the movie we must believe the love will be unrequited.  The dame should have a troubled history, though you must keep it vague.)15. Throw in some cyborgs.  You gotta have cyborgs.16. Have sets that are about fifteen times larger than they need to be, but which are largely empty.17. There's always the authority figure who starts out in pursuit of our guy, but who by the end becomes convinced of his innocence and moves to his side.18. There was some vague, recent apocalyptic event that destroyed most of civilization.  But be brief here.  Our audience may get to wondering how one guy saving one girl will restore all of civilization, and you don't want them thinking about that.19. Include a sadomasochistic scene or two.  The current favorite is to strap the victim spread-eagled on a rotating mechanical device and stick him with needles.  This movie likes to stick them through the bone at the front of the skull, a really stupid place to insert a needle (but then, this screenwriter clearly isn't a brain surgeon).20. Always have a big shoot-em-up climax with lots of explosions, steam, smoke, distorting of the picture with computer tricks, and loud rock music.  This is how we resolve things when we have no idea what the hell we're talking about or how to end the movie.  We hope nobody notices.  Generally they don't.Follow this primer, and whatever you come up with will be called bold and visionary by people whose filmgoing history doesn't extend before 1995, and Roger "I don't wanna become critically irrelevant" Ebert
There Are Great Japanese Films Out There: This Is Not One Of Them!. I agree with one of the spotlight reviewers that violence is a genre and an art form in many Japanese films; but that is not an exclusively Japanese cinematic domain. I have watched this film three times now, and probably will never watch it again. The film has been described at length by many viewers, and both of the spotlight reviewers give very good descriptions of the film. [In fact they are both very good reviewers: especially Zack Davisson, of Osaka, Japan, whose opinions I value highly]. However, for me, a film has to capture my interest and hold it. Unfortunately, this film did not endear me to it, or hold my interest. I really did not think it was that good a film. And I DO understand Japanese cinema: I grew up with Japanese films; and they are amongst my favorite, if not entirely favorite films period!There are so many truly fantastic Japanese films out there, that to give this film 4 or 5 stars would do those other great cinematic masterpieces an injustice. I do not rate horror, action, sci-fi, drama or any other genres the same when reviewing. For example, I would not compare a 5 star film such as "Ikiru" or "Harakiri" the same as I would a 5 star film in the horror genre such as "Sleepy Hollow," [which is a 5 star film to me]. "Ikiru" and "Harakiri are in a league of their own. Yet, I also like "Sleepy Holow." Each genre is good in its own domain. As for "Ichi the Killer," many people that I know only know Japanese films through Takashi Miike. Mainly due to his film "Audition." Therefore, I would recommend that viewers seek out others whose films are very good, and that you may be interested in.One in particular would be Takeshi Kitano, in terms of contemporary Japanese directors, or Kiyoshi Kurosawa to name just two great modern directors. Their films are accessible, and truly fabulous. Also, you might want to check out another Takashi Miike film, "The Happiness of the Katakuris," which is a delightfully wicked film. Miike really took a dare in that film. And for those of you who are not really sure which Japanese films may or may not be good, you might want to check out MidnightEye.com, which gives several Japanese film highlights. This might help. My main reason for writing a review of this film is because many people today have only seen a small number of films from Japan, and think that this [violent themed films] is all the Japanese mass-market to America. And this is unfortunate, because there are many great delightful gems in Japanese cinema. However, this is not one of them.Moreover, this film seemed to me to be an attempt at being shocking, and far from it, it was more an excercise in banality. Although not to the degree I have seen in many American films, the film still left me with something less than desired. That is not to say that other reviewers do not have a valid opinion, or maybe saw something in the film itself that they themselves like. If these are the type of films you like, then you will find that there are many others like this on the market today. However, if you are seeking truly great Japanese films, I would advise you to look around, you might just find yourself amazed at what awaits you in those video stores.
Poorly done mocumentary. 24-Hour Party People is a mocumentary at the lowest rung (if Best In Show was not enough) that tries at many times to be funny but is mostly in poor taste. The British scene in the 1980's was influential and at the height of the 2nd Brit wave, and Michael Winterbottom could have exposed the goings-on in a much better way.My main issue with this film was it's attempts at being funny in a hip-Britster fashion that falls flat constantly since the issues occurring are very serious. The dialogue is difficult to follow especially since most of it is meaningless anyway, and the film never really follows it's premise as much as it should: the rise of Factory. I did really enjoy the Joy Division segments, though, even if exploiting Ian Curtis's death was slightly in poor taste.Unless you're a fan of the Brit explosion of the post-punk era, and an extreme fan at that, I could not recommend this film. It's not even greatly educational for music lovers and at times very difficult to get into.
First movie good, second movie bad. I wish they weren't listed together on Amazon except for the region 2 DVD, but I guess I have to rate them together. The point being that MK was easily 5 stars. MK Annihilation, well, that was so bad, I'm not even going to average 1 and 5 and give it a 3. I'll give it a 2.Mortal Kombat, the FIRST one, most notably starring Christopher Lambert as Rayden, was great. Watch it and party like it's 1995. It was a good story, it had good special effects, good, well acted characters, decent humor, it wasn't too gory for the little ones, and yes, a few little inside gags for the people who had played the games. Johnny Cage's 'friendship' move from the game MK2 when he defeats Scorpion, for instance, and it was totally great the way they fit in Liu Kang's bicycle kick in the fight with Reptile. Crafty. The people who haven't played the game will laugh at how inane it is without realizing it was actually taken right from the game, and the people who have played the game will snicker to themselves because they get the inside joke. And the ending is really very good. Few movies have decent endings. That was Mortal Kombat, the first movie. My rating: 5 stars out of 5.Now, as for Mortal Kombat Annihilation, I will tell you, coming from a fan of the GAMES (so my bias would be toward being more LIBERAL in my review), that if you watch this movie, chances are you will feel the urge to go out and perform a few 'fatalities'. This movie is the pinnicle of sequels that do not live up to the originals. While Mortal Kombat is one of the greatest in my opinion, this stinker is tied for dead last among everything I've ever seen along with a few others (examples of which include but are not limited to Scary Movie and Toxic Avenger 4). It comes about from one thing more than everything else. They tried to amalgamate every tiniest element in the games MK2 and MK3 into the movie somehow. What's wrong with that? Well, as the creators of the games got more money to develop them and program sizes got larger akin with computers as they expanded by Moore's Law, more characters were put into the game, for instance. Other things were added as well, but I'll get to that. In MK1 there were 7 playable characters, plus 2 'boss' characters and one secret one. In MK2 there were many more. In MK3 there were more still, and ultimate MK3, well, that was practically just an excuse for them to throw in every crazy character that they could think of. As the games expanded, they also had a wider variety of 'finishing moves' as well as moves in general; not just the 'fatalities' of the first game, but some stuff that got, well, downright silly, but that the creators of the game just threw in for variety. Like the 'animalities' and especially 'babalities'. And all this was for one particular goal. To provide a greater variety of possible gameplay for the GAMES. Nobody REALLY knew what the heck the story that went with it was, and nobody really cared. Sure, the creators TRIED to fit some sort of weak story in to connect all the crazy characters, but it was just too many darned characters, and people didn't play the game for the story that didn't make any sense, so it didn't matter anyway. They played because it was a neat game of strategy and you get to kill your oppnent when you win, but only if you know and properly perform the finishing moves, which made performing them properly a sort of victory dance. A chance to show off and say 'ah ha ha ha ha haaaa!' And what little story there is in the game originated from nothing more than the different endings that would come up when you won the game with different characters, a side effect of this being that the different resultant versions of the stories weren't even consistent with each other, since if one character defeats Shang Tsung or Shao Khan, then another must not have, and in the next game, if the writers wanted to continue the 'story', they had to pick one (Liu Kang), but all that other conflicting junk they've already established is still there. The fact was, when it came down to it, there WAS no intelligible story. The trouble is, this blasted movie tried to incorporate every stupid character that was part of the games, and even more obnoxiously, for each one to perform many if not all of the moves they had in the games. Which made for a REALLY boring movie since there were a lot of characters with a LOT of moves to get through, which took a LONG time when you added it all up, and didn't help at all to cover the fact that it STILL had NO INTELLIGIBLE STORY!!! The result was a totally stupid non-stop special effects clip that nobody in his right mind would care about because it still didn't make any sense and was obnoxious on its own accord anyway, and was in fact so bad, even Christopher Lambert wasn't willing to star in it as the thunder god Rayden, as he was in the first movie! And man oh man, I have to say, he made a good choice to avoid this monstrosity. He's got a reputation bigger than Bruce Campbell's as a king of B movies, so you know how bad it is if he wouldn't TOUCH this one. It seems rather appropriate to me. Hat's off to him for making the right choice on that count. So watch the first one. Mortal Kombat incorporated some junk from the game but in a good way, a funny way, a not-too-heavy-handed way, and they generated an actual story that wasn't part of the game, and a good one. And just for kicks, take a look at "Beowulf", starring Christopher Lambert. They totally ripped off the opening credit animation of the Mortal Kombat movie. Maybe just an inside gag for the presence of Lambert. I don't know. But skip this one. Because if you watch it, you will wish you hadn't. Simple as that. Mortal Kombat Annihilation, I'll say, gets negative 1 star. Negative 1 averaged with 5 is 2. Thus, I give the combined set a 2
Censored!. My boyfriend uploaded the cut scenes from the movie. Look up "Sunflower clip banned from Disney's Fantasia" and you can see the three scenes in full! And if they don't show up, email me for the links
This DVD doesn't work and Amazon won't  take it back. I bought this DVD along with one other. It has three discs and only after I tried a second DVD player did I discover that it skipped entire chapters. When I tried it on a new RCA portable DVD player, it would not work at all, just skipped around. It's trash and Amazon won't take it back because the original plastic wrap has been removed (which it has to be if you want to see it). What a stupid policy. And there's no way to contact anyone on their website. I'll buy all my DVDs from a store from now on
What's All the Fuss About?. The lead actor bore an uncanny resemblance to the real Edward R. Murrow, and there was a lot of realistic smoking for a movie set in the `50s, but otherwise I'd didn't understand all the adulation for what was to me a short, boring movie that seemed much longer.  Maybe I've just seen too many biopics lately
Valentine  (2001). Director:  Jamie BlanksCast:  Denise Richards, David Broeanaz, Marley Shelton, Jessica Capshaw, Jessica Cauffiel, Katherine Heigl, Hedy Burress, Fulvio Cecere.Running Time:  96 minutesRated R for strong horror violence, some sexuality and language."Valentine", the over-slasherized version of the excellent Tom Savage suspense novel, starts with a pre-teen valentine disco set in 1988. A bespectacled young boy heads on the dance floor looking for a young female to share a dance with. First he approaches Shelly (later played by Katherine Heigl) who embarrassingly rebuffs him. His charm doesn't seem to work with Lilly (Jessica Cauffer), Paige (Denise Richards) or Kate (Marley Shelton) either; they all send him packing quite arrogantly. His luck changes when Dorothy (Jessica Capshaw) actually acknowledges him and the twosome leave hand in hand. They are later caught kissing under a bench by a gang of bullies. In order to save her own self from persecution, Dorothy accuses the youngsters of attacking her and so the gang decides to take their own revenge. They cover him in red gooey stuff ("Carrie" anyone?), strip him, and chase him onto the dance floor where they proceed to beat him up.  Fast forward ten years and the girls are now women; no one is sure what happened to Jeremy (the bullied brat from earlier) as he disappeared after that dance. It's close to Valentine's Day (of course) and they each receive a card signed with a poetic threat to their lives. They soon realize to take them seriously when Shelly is found with her throat sliced. Before long a mysterious masked madman stalks each of them leaving Kate and her boyfriend Adam (David Boreanaz) to work out that she's next on the psycho's list.The acting is standard horror fare. Denise Richards once again shows us her amazing and wide-range acting talents: Those two large things attached to the front side of her body that we like to call "breasts." David Boreanaz gives a fair performance, but definitely shouldn't give up his day job on the WB's "Angel." Newcomer Marley Shelton can't do much with her underwritten role, and she comes off as extremely annoying and whiny for the most part. The rest of the acting is close to pitiful. Another problem with Valentine is that the characters are all so self indulgent and morally extracted that it's almost impossibility for them to win over the audience. In the beginning they're shown as mockers to any child that's unfortunate enough to be less pretty than their egotistical selves and actually possess a brain. This discrimination continues throughout the movie as they brush off the men who are trying to woo them out on a date, simply because they're not up to their high standards. How can anyone want such pompously arrogant characters to survive? In a typical slasher movie, the `final girl' is usually the shy reclusive type that the audience feels sympathetic towards, like Laurie Strode. These characters have no such power, leading you to believe that the world would be a better place without them anyway.  Director Jamie Banks ("Urban Legend") has proved that he has the potential to become a fair filmmaker; however this is his first feature failure. It's a shame that he couldn't have made more of the talented cast and competent budget, but in the end, Valentine just feels empty. A couple of talented cast members are not really enough to warrant the many obnoxious ones. Cupid certainly missed when he fired the arrow of fortune at this heart.  This one's destined to escape our memories in the not-too-distant future
How Does This Happen?. A movie like Monster-in-Law makes me ask: How? Why?How does a studio manage to convince Jane Fonda and Jennifer Lopez to participate in such a horrible movie? How does such a bad screenplay get approved? How does such an unfunny, uninspired movie get financed and made? Why would anyone with a modicum of talent and good taste make this? Why would they want their names attached to such a train wreck?Seriously, I want to know: How? Why
Four Dances? You get three. This DVD claims to teach you four dances: The waltz, foxtrot, social quickstep, and the tango. What they fail to mention however is that the instruction for the foxtrot and the social quickstep are exactly the same. The only difference between the two is the speed of the music playing in the background.The dances are very thoroughly taught, until you get to the tango. The waltz, which is probably the second hardest dance to learn, takes the most time to learn with it taking up probably forty-five minutes of the DVDs total play time. The quickstep and foxtrot, both the easiest dance to learn, take up about a half-hour each, and the tango, the hardest to learn, they zoom through in about fifteen minutes, as if they were afraid of running out of time on the dvd. The video is relatively low quality, and after a time, the voices of the instructors tend to get on your nerves.Pick this one up if you want to learn the basic steps, but that's about all you're going to get, and remember that it's three dances, not four. Once you've learned the foxtrot, you know the social quickstep
Batman - The Movie Review. But this for my kids and it was the most boring movie I have ever watched.The shows are more entertaining to watch then the movie
wtf sitll have not received. its been almost 3 months since i ordered this..stilll have not received they emailed and said itd be TWO MONTHS late because they RAN OUT..wtf.update: 5/21 emailed me again saying itd be atleast another month and a half. wtf. so mad. canceled order. been waiting MONTH
Duck Tape. If you see this movie heading your way, duck for cover.  Tape is a film of almost unimaginable cruelty.  Three very good actors, Ethan Hawke, Uma Thurman, and Robert Sean Leonard, (now seen on the excellent TV show, House), are trapped in a cheesy motel room for 83 minutes, more to the point, you are trapped in there with them.  This is the kind of film that aches for an obligatory car chase, frat house bikini contest, or helicopter crash.It's easy to affix the blame.  Stephen Belber wrote the play and adapted it for film.  (Note to Mr. Belber:  Unless you're Samuel Beckett, do not attempt a three-person, one-room play, it's almost impossible to do well.)  This horrific gaff would seem to explain it, but there's more.  The film was directed by Richard Linklater, who gave us Waking Life, (also featuring Ethan Hawke).  For those of you who have not seen Waking Life, let us simply say that, though it features splendidly original animation, the film is arguably the largest swamp-gas-filled-dirigible ever to cross the horizon.One can easily see why Mr. Linklater would be drawn to Mr. Belber's play, both Tape and Waking Life feature almost identical dialogue, it goes something like this:Why are we here?  What?  You know.  You mean now?  Yes, well, I think so.  What?  Stop kidding yourself, you know exactly what I mean.  No I don't, honestly.  What?  Oh for God's sake, if you won't do it for me, do it for them.  I'm not following you.  But don't you see it?  There are options, certainly.  What?  Would you like a beer?  How many do you have left?  Several, well, some, not as many as I thought I had, but enough to let you have one, depending on how badly you want one, do you want one?  What?  A beer.  Is that why we're here, to talk about beer?  No, of course not, it's what you might call polite conversation.  Oh well that's just fine, our friendship has been reduced to the point of polite conversation, we no longer talk about real things, honest things?  Great, now Mr. Smarty Pants wants to talk about real things, honest things, this is a very intriguing if not astounding turn of events.  What?  Since when are you interested in what's real, aren't you the one who spent years building a castle of lies, a fortress to protect you from feeling anything?  I'm sorry, why am I here?  Isn't that a question for you to answer?  Perhaps, but you did, after all, invite me.  What?For 83 minutes - and you never leave the room
Live maybe.  Nude, no. The title of this film is very deceiving & it's pretty clear that it was designed to lure people in.  I actually saw this movie way back in the early 90s.  I forgot all about it and got excited and bought it a few years back.  I thought it was a sure-fire to be wall-to-wall skin.  After all, it features 2 names (Dana Delany and Kim Cattral) who have shown no aversion to shedding their clothes in other movies.Well, I was way wrong.   There is MAYBE 10 seconds worth of nudity in the whole movie.   It's also supposed to be a comedy, but I didn't find it particularly humorous, either.For what it is, it's an OK movie.   It details what is basically a slumber party for a group of grown women.   Some of the dialogue about sex is cool - kind of like finding out what goes on in a women's locker room.  There's also some exploration of how being a lesbian might make life more "simple" than being straight.However, in the end, I found this to be a pretty dull film.   Most importantly, it does not deliver on what the title promises.  I would be far more forgiving if they had named this movie something else, but I do detest false-advertising
Just ONE point of view. This review will probably not be received with equanimity by most americans...The movie by frontline focuses heavily on the fact that China is putting in a LOT more goods thru walmart into USA at a MUCH cheaper price than can be manufactured by american companies, and that thousands of jobs are being lost etc..All admirable points and no doubt true.Before  we ask if "Walmart is good for/to America" in isolation, in the much vaunted/desired "GLOBAL" economy that has been vigorously pushed by the so called economically developed nations over the last century, shouldnt we ask "Has AMerica been good for/to the world 's economy" as a whole , in a Global/trans national view? considering yourself as a "global" citizen rather than just an American.Now all of a sudden, when the technological superiority has been evened out in consumer products, but the relative wealth level is still enormousl y lopsided, it is UNFAIR for those countries to sell cheaper?By that argument it would have been unfair to even colonize america from the point of view of the native Indians, or unfair to sell arms for INCREDIBLE amounts of raw materials/labour in extremely uneven exchanges over the past 60 years with all the 3rd world nations. Global economics ALSO has its cycle of evolutons, and I for one, am glad that extremely poor people for whom this is  is pretty much a survival issue are able to raise their living standard a little, as opposed to America, where the problem of the "poor" is..obesity. The real culprit here is the "Corporation culture" that the "developed" countries have created, with th result that the top 1% of the population in the USA control 90% of the wealth. this would have been a better DVD if it had not played upon the fears of a public in inflaming the "chinese are taking our jobs" model and focused on corporate greed, of which walmart is only a single example in the USA.I found the DVD amusing
Snow Queen. Bidget Fonda. Upon receipt of this dvd I was disappointed to find that it is unplayable outside of The USA and Canada Furthermore there are no versions obtainable from any source, that are compatable with European formats.I am pleased to report that Amazon resolved the problem with the minimum of fuss
Too basic even for a new mom. There are about 18 chapters of information on basic newborn baby care.  Each chapter is covered in brief one to three minute sessions and there's no depth in the information.  Each content just scratches the surface of newborn care without detail information.  If you've already read books or magazine articles on newborn baby care, this DVD is not worth the money.  If you have not ready anything about newborn care (books or magazine articles), maybe this DVD can get you started with basic information as a new mom.  I have found that some information differs with information found in newborn care books and magazines (and from prepared childbirth classes)
Henley Fizzles Solo. I love Don Henley but I love him with the Eagles.  In this show, once you get past the Nehru jacket, the orange hair &amp; the dark glasses, he barely tries to give anything resembling a performance.  He stands there looking smug, virtually saying to his audience 'don't I write great lyrics' and 'I'm a great singer, aren't I'.  The appallingly offhand version of The Heart Of The Matter has been swamped by the Eagles' Hell Freezes Over version.  What he does to his most famous song, Hotel California, beggars belief.  Those legendary gravel-lined vocal chords are no more than adequate.  And perhaps this is being petty, but the anonymous band are given two separate credits for a 'Musical Director' and a 'Band Leader', both of which, when Henley is in his rightful place with the Eagles, are handled by someone called G. Frey, without a credit
Watch your Cornhole, Bud. 12 Poor White, Black, and Hispanic trash teenagers convicted of minor offenses take a trip to "the slammer" to meet up with some convicts.The convicts goal is to scare the teenagers into cleaning up their act.If not, the teens will have to face rape, subservience, torture, degradation, and death on a daily basis at the hands of other convicts.The convicts get in the face of the teens and scare some sense into most of them.Their is a follow up done on both the convicts and teens ten years later.It turns out 3 teens/convicts died of AIDS related diseases, 2 of the convicts got out of prison, got busted for drugs in one case, sexual assault in the other.  Quite the role models, eh?If you have a troubled teen, you may want to have them watch this.If not though, I can't say this was entertaining.  I mean who wouldn't love an ignorant, muscle-bound, stinky-ass convict yelling at you at the top of his lungs about how he and his boys will be inserting something into your kiester if you choose to enter prison.Not for the kiddies
Cute story, but  Matt Dillon is all wrong  for romantic lead. Matt Dillon was seriously mis-cast in this film. He came across as an unlikable, hopelessly plebian, crotch-scratching &quot;dese, dem, and doze&quot; low-class slob, while the lovely Annabella Sciorra seemed urbane, literate, and softly spoken. One wonders how these two ever got together in the first place. For people who supposedly grew up in the same neighborhood, the speech patterns are noticably at odds, with Dillon's character coming out at the bottom. The premise was predictable, the main character unlikeable, and the ending unbelievable. The supporting cast, however, was superb, considering what they were given to work with. Vincent D'Onofrio is wonderful as the shy pharmacist, Sciorra is a beautiful and engaging ex-wife to Dillon, and Mary Louise Parker comes across as a much better match for Dillon's character than Sciorra. If you want a good romantic movie, see Happy Accidents instead. Review refers to the VHS Tape editio
Pretentious, boring, political, un-real. Thirteen year olds can be easily impressed by cheap tricks, "heartfelt" lyrics, and a lot of pretty lights. So it goes with some reviewers of this movie. This movie contains the unending internal reflections of about 6 or 7 different characters. These reflections never really go anywhere, never draw substantive conclusions. Primarily, there is just a lot of whining. THe only exception is the Sean Penn character until the end, when he whines at least as much as everybody else. "War is tough" is one of the main themes of this movie. Is that really a revelation?One thing you learn early on in acting or directing classes is to "play opposites," meaning put contrasting things in juxtaposition so that the contrast highlights both sides. An example is when a very evil character such as Richard III uses humor. "I'll have her - but not for long." THe fact that the guy is joking about killing his new bride makes him all the more evil to us. At the same time, perhaps we can't avoid laughing in spite of ourselves.OK, so this director had some of the same classes I did, but he has to use the technique over and over and over and over and over and ... until it starts seeming boring and banal. War scene, lots of dying. Oh look, a pretty butterfly! More blood and bullets. Oh gee, the light going through that leaf is beautiful! Use this trick once or twice and maybe it seems new to the uninitiated audience. Use it more than three times and you are asking for trouble. This director must use it 10-15 times. He turns it into a cliche. When the audience can predict when they are about to see the next opposite, you have overdone it.So what do we have so far? A bunch of whining character crying about war being bad and a bunch of contrast scenes. And really, that's pretty much it. The movie could have been cut in half with no loss because if there is one thing this movie is, It Is Redundant. It is spoon-feeding you the same message over and over and over again. Ouch, war hurts! Ew, mutilated bodies are yucky. Oh gosh, a little bird got hurt!!! We are so nasty! We must stop this war!!! (never mind the fact that thousands of little birds get eaten alive by cats every day)The director focuses on the yucky and inconvenient aspects of war - which I suppose would be briliant, except I think almost everybody on the planet already knows that wars are yucky and inconvenient. It's almost as if the author doesn't Believe we know, that he somehow thinks we missed it. And if only he reminds us at every possible repetitive opportunity, again and again and again, well, then maybe we will "get it" and start opposing wars, I guess. Never mind about Hitler and the 6 million jews. Never mind about Pearl Harbor. War is a yucky thing done by bad men, or nice whimpy men trapped in a situation by bad men. It has no meaning and there is nothing remotely noble about it. We were just wasting our time fighting the Nazis. The Nazis were just misunderstood! If they want to cook 6 million jews in the ovens, let them do it.An adult movie deals with realties and poses questions like, "how do I get myself to do something that I don't want to do, but that I know I should?" Making yourself do things that are not pleasant is one of the hallmarks of reaching adulthood. This movie takes a very adolescent perspective and asks, "if I whine enough, can I get out of my chores?"The dumbest scene in this movie is when the Jim Caveziel character is surrounded by Japanese and for no reason whatsoever, will not surrender. He stands there in the middle of about 40 Japanese soldiers and decides (after looking at some pretty leaves and butterlies) to raise his weapon so they will shoot him. The funny thing is, it's completely unnecessary: his comrades have already been warned. His death accomplishes nothing but relief for the audience - he can no longer utter his inane internal monologues.I think if you are a left-winger or have a thing for looking at the bodies of naked boys, you will love this movie. It's the kind of propaganda piece that a vacant, unquestioning mind will eat up. If your leanings are more adult, however, you may hate it. You'll wonder why the story is so one-sided, why nobody seems to believe in the causes they are fighting for, even though the Japanese did attack us, and the Germans did some naughty things too. None of that seems to matter to the storyteller."Why can't we all get along?" he cries, as the germans load another group of jews into the ovens and turn up the heat...A final note: if you want to see two really good war movies that make valid criticisms of the "war spirit" and how wars are conducted, see "Gallipoli" and/or "Breaker Morant." These movies are extremely effective in making their points without using cartoonish characters. The characters are real and the plots move the story foreward."The Thin Red Line" is what I would call "professed brilliance." A couple of simple tricks are used to try to impress the audience. But there is no real meat here. It's just a bunch of pointless whining. The poetry is poorly written and pretentious. And the characters are not real.
Here we go again, another unneccessary remake. Well, with 2001's "Planet of the Apes," we have yet another totally unneccesary remake.  No, not reimagining, a remake.Just another jumbled mess of a remake.  There's Mark Wahlberg stepping into the Heston role of the original film.  The film opens with Wahlberg in orbit somewhere, then he very quickly crash lands on the ape planet.  But if you want to go to the kitchen at this point to get something to eat, pause the DVD, because if you don't, you might miss Mark getting captured, taken to the ape city, and thrown in with the other human captives, who are all intelligent and capable of speech.  So there's no explanation as to why the humans didn't formulate plans to put up a formidable resistance to the apes, years ago.  In the original film, the humans were like animals, so there was the explanation in the original film.  The remake offers no explanation.  But it took Mark to rally the human masses in this film, and they eventually escaped and revolted, in some jumbled mess of a climax to the movie.  The whole movie is just a jumbled mess, complete with two-dimensional (two might be a little too generous) characters we don't feel for, or care about -- including Wahlberg's character.  And forget any character development, or any mysterious trek across a 'forbidden zone.'  Everything in Burton's remake happens in a flash, so fast, that you never even grasp what just happened while you're watching, and you really don't care that much about what just happened, because it probably wasn't much anyway.The "Planet of the Apes" franchise was not Tim Burton's intellectual property, so if it was his idea to make this remake, I'm guessing he had to get permission from the current copyright holder.  But my point here is a question: Does anybody in the entertainment industry ever say "no" to anybody else IN the industry anymore?  Did the copyright holder read the script of this remake before he gave it the greenlight?  All I'm saying is that I just don't get why the copyright holders, or the original creators of the franchise, just sit back and give these outside directors a blank check to do whatever they like, and let the franchise be brought down by these terrible remakes.  You would think that Heston wouldn't even want to appear in this, but he did.  Come on, the industry can't be this hard up for money.  I just don't get it
at least there were plenty of boobs. this movie was awfull.  supertroopers was awsome and beerfest was even better, so i suppose they can be forgiven for this cinematic abortion
Deceptive cover box: this is a pro-Dan Brown DVD, not an opposing view. Like most people, before I spend money on a DVD, I read all the cover descriptions first.The back cover starts with a breathless announcement about Dan Brown's book. Then it lists a series of questions by the book's detractors.Based on the cover description, I honestly thought this DVD was going to be a reasoned "second opinion" regarding the historical information that Dan Brown uses as part of his novel.I had no idea that the DVD was actually just a rehash of the same theories minus the mystery-thriller context. I'm guessing the marketers deliberately meant to ensnare people of faith into thinking they were purchasing an opposing view.This DVD should be called: "The Da Vinci Code," Part Deux
Body by IHOP. Brains by Crayola. Here's the "Awful Truth":That you would be willing to let this man, a raving, terminally obese, incoherent highschool dropout, who is to truth what a lead block smeared with ketchup is to cheesecake---that you would let this man literally plunge his hamburger-grease stained mitts into your skull, forming the mushy stuff of your brain into little foamy pink chunks of liberal pabulum.And that you would pay him money to render the service!Yes, you could watch all of the episodes in "The Awful Truth": you would, no doubt, feel smug and superior to all those unenlightened troglodytes who voted for Bush. You might giggle a bit, which is a common side-effect of a political lobotomy.But at the end of the day, it is far better that you take your lead from antiquity: when Oedipus realized his own version of the "Awful Truth"---that he had whacked Pa, gotten jiggy with Ma, and generally made an a** of himself---he stabbed out his own eyeballs.Might I recommend the white-hot iron pokers?JS
This Waiting Waiting Waiting is Tough. At the end of this film Gene Hackman's character, strung out thanks to his surveillance heavy lifestyle, finally snaps and pulls apart his house in search of a mythical bug. This scene concludes an examination of the psychological toll that surveillance takes not only on the listen-ee but also the listener. Hackman plays Harry Caul, a surveillance expert who is at the top of his field. He gets assigned a mysterious conversation that he has to piece together throughout the film. More interesting to me was to see all the little ways that his job affected his life. He staunchly defends privacy, even though it is his job to invade it. He refuses to open up to people because he is paranoid that anything he says will be used against him. I know that today it is very fashionable to criticize Bush and his wire tapping program but this film only piles on. The chilling affect we watch take place in the world of Harry Caul is a microcosm for what is happening in our world today. Simply because you are aware of Bush's spying ways causes you to engage in self-censorship every time you send an email or talk on a cell phone. Harry deals with the reality of his situation by descending into madness, and while that may not be healthy I'm not going to be the one to say that he is handling it the wrong way.While there are lessons here that deal with living in Bush's America, this still isn't a very good film. This is a much smaller scale than Coppola usually deals with and it doesn't seem to be a very good fit for him. The script was original and unpredictable. However, it was also slow and filled with nonsense. I watched the film twice and still don't have a firm grasp on what happened at the end. Also, the scene in which we visit Harry's twisted dream was a total miss for me. The purpose was to show just had mad he had gone. To me it looked like Coppola losing control of his script and inserting a scene which only served to take the viewers out of the film. Hackman gives a good performance which was the norm for him pre-"Unforgiven."  A dashing Harrison Ford is trotted out to remind us of just how old he has gotten. Still, this film falls flat.Most of the film involves Harry trying to figure out the entire conversation. The tools he is using look downright quaint compared to what we know Big Brother is using today. I liked the way this film reminded me of "Rear Window." As in that film we watch as a lonely man has his imagination run away from him. It is a theme that affects us in our daily lives. Every story we hear has holes and lies in it. We have to fill those holes and sort out the BS to come to a perceived reality. But what if we're wrong? Nobody likes being called paranoid and nobody likes to be asleep at the wheel. If for no other reasons watch this film to explore these ideas. Then think about whether your communication behavior is paranoid or ignorant, and whether your Ok with your cell phone coming with a built in bug. **1/2
some good stuff, but lots of uninspired episodes as well. Though I'm still a big South Park fan, I do think that the quality of the show has progressively declined over the past three seasons.  This season has its standouts, most notably the truly demented Christmas Critters episode, but it also has incredibly lame episodes like the dance off and election episodes.To make matters worse, Matt and Trey put next to no effort into providing any extras for fans who pony up top dollar for the dvd collections.  A show like the Simpsons not only has more episodes per season and sells for the same price but the people involved in the Simpsons go the extra mile to satisfy fans:  full episode commentaries with writers, producers, directors, voice actors, etc as well as deleted scenes and other special features.  Matt and Trey provide generally uninteresting "mini commentaries."  No doubt about it, the boys are just generally "phoning it in" at this point, seemingly caring only about continuing their franchise and maximizing their profits for as little effort as possible
Terrible. Neither my husband or i could get into the movie. I dont think i would ever watch this film again. It was not What it was made out to be
heinous. This is the most terrible, emotionally offensive film ever created. After watching this movie, my eyes began to bulge from my head and limbs began to fall off. Watch this movie if you like the feeling of having your organs ruptured.
All the bad things you heard and then some more. There is nothing good I can say about this movie.There is absolutely nothing remotely entertaining about it.If the main-characters didn't go by the names of Mario & Luigi, you'd be lost.Nothing here resembles the video-game it's based on, which isn't a bad thing neccessarily......except that nothing here resembles any kind of story.The acting is bad, perhaps on purpose......but who cares? It's not amusing in the slightest.The movie is boring. In 90 minutes, you'll want to gouge your eyes out."Super Mario Bros." -- the movie -- has been proven to damage brain-cells upon each viewing.In a Koopa-shell, don't waste your time on this movie. Don't even look at the cover. Don't even read this review. Just try and pretend this "movie" doesn't exist
Warning! Don't suffer through this unusually bad chick flick. I saw this movie with my wife two days ago. I am not a "chick flick" lover but I have seen a few chick flicks that I really enjoyed. Not this one. I have to admit that I suffered, and as it turned out, even my wife hated it. In addition, the auditorium was 2/3 full and still I only heard a few chuckles (the movie was supposed to be funny).The movie is about an upper class single mom and her girls. The mother, who is an over protective snob, and a pain in the rear end, is hard to believe as a character. The family is very liberal and sexually open minded. This combined with their upper class manners makes the characters difficult to relate to. The funny thing is that I don't think the family was supposed to be upper class (judging from what they were doing for a living).There are some cruel and unfunny jokes involving a mental therapy patient of Maggie (who is a therapist). I saw Borat, but the tasteless retardation jokes in Borat are obvious satire. The jokes involving the patient in "what about Bob" are funny, but not cruel. In this movie the "mental patient jokes" were humorless and just bad taste. Also Asians are portrayed in an insulting and "not funny" stereotypical way.The architect/engineer/analytical guy turns out to be the jerk, while the guitar playing musician turns out to be the good guy. How boringly Hollywoodish stereotypical is that?In summary, the movie was supposed to be a comedy about relationships, but I was bored, and it was difficult to relate to the characters. In addition the movie was annoying. Heed my warning, don't waste your time!
Liked this one the least...... maybe because I didn't like Porco. Everything was sub-par for me. Animation is definitely not as good as his later movies. Not enough weirdness, tried too much for the plot. Everything was just too ho-hum. As if he tried to carry the whole movie on Porco's shoulders. But once you got past the fact that everyone else was human and Porco was a pig there wasn't anything else there.
Was almost decent until..... they introduced the RED TAPE. Uhmmm that made the whole movie null and void for me. After that it just seemed like a very drawn out Veronica Mars "Halloween" episode.*SPOILERS*This film is about evil spirits who have a vendetta against pc's, cellphones, and PDA's. God forbid you own either or else you will be visited  by one of these beings. Forget about being killed on the spot. It just makes you so depressed you want to commit suicide or better yet you turn into what looks like remnants of an ashtray. Oh but wait, theres more you can keep the spirits at bay w/ red electrical tape. Sounds preposterous right?! Well it is.To sum up, this movie was a hot "thrown together at the last minute" mess.
Is this for real?. Has anyone heard of this DVD release?It sounds very intriguing though I doubt its validity. Why does the release date state December 31st 2025???? Does this mean it is not real and/or will never come out
Disappointed. Very disappointed. This DVD is nothing but collection of video of Sadhus. If Origin of Yoga is the subject, Yoga is much older than Buddha and is discussed in ancient scriptures of South Asia, which could have been shown together with details from Patanjali's book or from famous "Autobiography of a Yogi". If Spirituality is the subject, Sadhus shown in the video are too ordinary to talk about spirituality. There are respected experts in India on Yoga such as Baba Ramdev, who has tought Yoga to millions ( yes, millions ) and on Spirituality such as any of Shankaracharya or Sri Ravishankar. I found this DVD to be nothing but superficial work on naked sadhus.
if u had a zombie living in your closet, it'd probably make more sense then this movie. I did watch Resident Evil: Apocalypse back when it was in theaters & I rather enjoyed it! this movie, I just got to today & found myself wondering what the hell happened. the movie is just so much stupider then the second one. I found myself laughing at parts where we're "supposed to be scared". the acting is just not that good, it's corny as hell. hasn't anyone in this film ever heard of a zombie before? if a zombie was coming at you, would you lower your weapon or blast it apart? like, what are they doing? I got so mad at this film cause it's so stupid. why do the characters have to be so dumb? I'll blame the writers, the director's for this. Resident Evil is not worth your time or money. I found the second one more enjoyable for some reason. so please, look elsewhere. I'd be more entertained by a fish swimming in circles.
My Least Favorite Star Trek Movie. First, let me give the pluses.  This movie was a bridge between the Star Trek casts.  It also hit science fiction at its best with the Nexus utopia, shown to be pleasant but not the best.  Malcolm McDowell was a good villain, though not at Alex DeLarge (A Clockwork Orange) proportions.The strength of each of the Star Trek incarnations is a great ensemble.  There is some heirarchy, but you still have a team feeling.  This movie does not develop either the original or the Next Generation ensembles.  The focus is only on three characters:  Captain Kirk (William Shatner), Captain Picard (Patrick Stewart), and Guinan (Whoopi Goldberg), who took the mentor role in this story.  There are only short appearances from the original cast, and only enough interaction of the Next Generation cast to show they're there.There were other ways one could have bridged the gap that could have been better and more satisfying
Dang it. So I go to the video store, looking for some Italian gore movies.  I come across Torso.  I remember hearing about it, so I buy it used (the slip thing with the covers was missing, with Torso simply written on the front in red, so it was real cheap).  I go home, put it in the DVD player, and guess what comes on?  This awful piece of TV movie garbage.  It starts stupid, it ends stupid, it lacks a point, intresting writing, original (or at least different) direction, and sub-par acting.  I was mad, and the store only gave me 1/4 of what I paid for it.  To quote Hank Hill: &quot;Dang it&quot;.  Truer words were never spoken
Maybe the Goblin King should get out more... If you pan a comedy DVD because you "never heard of Paul Rodriguez, Norm Macdonald, or Richard Belzer", well...maybe the problem isn't the product. If you know comedy, you'll know these names. If you think the comedy spectrum runs from Carrot Top to Jeff Foxworthy, well...enjoy that vanilla ice cream.That said, you're getting what you pay for here - a machine gun riff through early material (the photos on the cover are a tipoff) by people who for the most part do better work elsewhere. Consider it a museum piece; a Time-Life collection of clips assembled for convenience. For completists; the curious might want to wait for a cheap used copy
this movie was dumb with a capital D and a capital S. I thought this movie was gonna be awesome when I looked at the cover, but I started watching it and realized it wasn't live-action. It was all a bunch of stupid cartoons, and cartoons are dumb. I HATE CARTOONS. It was way too short and didn't make any sense. Plus, it was a cartoon. what a lousy flick. Go get Dragonheart Instead. That movie at least has Dragons. Mogollon
BEWARE OF EXTRA STUFF. I am a fan of WWII movies. I was looking forward to the arrival of this two disk set. The Film is of course magnificent. I was looking forware to the addition stuff that now comes with DVDs, commentary, interviews, making of films, featurettes, etc. Afterall, there are lots of historians and others who will add to the filmit self. I was wrong. the commentaries are so bad I could hardly make myself finish them. Neither commentaters was prepared. The other matterial was also very poorly done as commpared to what is available on the History Chan and other sources.
an disappointed violin lover. I was so excited to receive this DVD. However, after I have viewed it, the only words I can say are "extremely disappointed". There are many players in the black and white film,some of them are talking not playing, and they only show part of the piece for what they were playing. The entire film is a waste of time.  When I requested to return it, they wanted me to pay for the postage.  This is the biggest disappointment I ever had from purchasign through Amozon.
Queensryche is washed up!. Although I too am a die hard 'ryche fan, I missed this DVD in my collection and just picked it up.  While not going into the Degarmo argument that the band isn't same without him (it's totally not), the music was flat and Geoff seemed to lose some of his top end.  It is hard to explain that you want to feel the energy from the music and the band, but it just isn't there.The problem is that the pulse of Mindcrime was just so good, this really pales in comparison.  It is painful for me to watch this.  It is like a boxer that has been in the ring too long.  Pick up a used copy of Livecrime and buckle in and enjoy the ride.My copy of Evolution just got donated to goodwill.
Damaged. I hear this is a good movie, but can't play it as the DVD is visibly damaged.  So what about Quality control?  This disc should never have gotten out the door, but the odd thing is, I ordered 2 DVD's from Amazon - different titles, both damaged.  Are you guys buying 2nds and pawning them off on us?  "F
I couldn't have been more disappointed. Spend your money on one of Leary's performances, not this painfully unfunny waste of 90 minutes.  If you've ever watched a comedian struggle mightily to be funny and fail, you know the sort of discomfort I felt when watching these no-names flail on stage. It's telling that the only names of consequence--Stewart and Leary's cousin O'Brien--literally phoned it in. A typically awkward detail: the director cuts away to Keifer Sutherland reaction shots maybe a dozen times, like he's the President at the Lincoln Center Honors or something. It's utterly bizarre. Leary deserved better. I spent the whole time wishing I were watching him do standup--instead of watching him watch his inferiors. His brief closing remarks are amusing enough, but it's too little too late.
What a let-down!. I have seen this twice through now & have concluded that the best places to experience Samuel Beckett's quintessential words are on the printed page or on obscure stages (like San Quentin prison).Most of the productions in this package seek only to bring attention to themselves (the single exception being John Hurt & Atom Egoyan's perfect Krapp's Last Tape) - they are for the most part overdirected & overacted to the hilt.
She can't handle the sword. The high points:1) A cute doe-eyed heroine2) Semi-logical plot and love-story sub-plot3) Stylish photography and sets in some scenesLow points:1)Uma with a few months practice looked a lot more convincing.  With 1.5billion Chinese and Japanese people they couldn't find someone that looked cute and know which end of the sword to hold?2) She's gets pummeled by the #2 female villan in midpoint of movie and then kills #1 male at the end. Not likely.3) Her main defense seems to be to try to run away from the bad guys.  What's with that?  In two (maybe 3) encounters with the bad guys she tries to outrun them and then collapses in exhaustion.  Then when they soon catch up she fights them and mostly gets HER butt kicked. Then by luck or stupidty on enemy part she ends up winning.4) The director misses an obvious opportunity to backlight her naked body through a white see through dress.  Cmon already!!5) The CGI is pretty lame and done on the cheap.  One obvious tracking shot was jumping all over the screen.  In the extras the director even mentioned how they mounted the camera to the top of a car.  What, they couldn't even afford to RENT a steadicam for a 1/2 day or some better software.I wouldn't buy it again.  Good thing it only cost me a little used
SUCKS!. Unless you enjoy movies that are not funny, not scary, and have the worst actors this side of rodeo clowns, DO NOT WATCH this series of horrible flicks.  Putrid!  Not even "so-bad-it's-funny". Absolutely the worst films in the history of mankind!  Heed my warning!  SUCKS!!
ugghhh!  run away!. OK, Just so all the cards are on the table: I bought this dvd hoping to pick up some interesting moves for my husband.  I'm not a guy, and have no experience with strippers, to speak of, so maybe this is completely amazing stripping and I'm just missing something.  But I thought this was unbelievably cheesy (can you say - sequined American flag costume?), with what seemed like (badly aged) amateurs.  And in many of the clips, it seems like footage from some sort of stripping contest, and shows all the members of the audience as they participate - believe me, I was not in this to watch chunky, gawking, dirty old men fondle some scantily clad girl with stringy hair who hasn't kept herself up.  The contests are often borderline revolting (and not in a "wow, that's sexy and kinky" kind of way), and boring at best.  The parts of the dvd that aren't the competition are only slightly better.  The girl who's hosting seems scripted, unnatural and uncomfortable - she made me want to say, "This clearly isn't working for you - why don't you go home to your mother, take some classes and become a biologist or something."  Anyway, if you're looking for usable material, look elsewhere.  And although I'm not a guy, I would think the guys could do better, too
ALL THE TRUTH. IN 1998 Clinton said there were weapons of mass destruction.Terrorist are americas greatest threat.  Clinton swept the first bombing OF WTC under the rug...The CIA/intelligence failed the american people numnerous times.  America fights terrorist who  are the true infidels.  They will kill, behead, drag our bodies down streets every chance they can........Americans, many are in total denial of how serious/evil terriorst in  Iraq, Iran, Syria and other countries are.It is amazing how Americans can have such different views on our greatest enemies.   TERRORIST
Too fast. I have always like Denise Austin, however; this was tape was way too fast for a beginner.  I thought it was for beginner and on up.  Denise went way to fast and she did not explain the poses at all.  I will not be using this tape.  I was disappointed because normally I love her videotapes and her.
Not what I expected. I am sure some people would find this DVD useful, but it wasn't at all what I expected.  This may be attributed to my not being familiar with yoga, and have nothing to do with this particular DVD, but I wasn't even able to watch the entire thing
Not a sleeper. I now know why I had not heard much about this movie.  Only buy it if you like Broadway musicals because it is not your typical Doris Day movie.  I feel like I am watching parts of Monty Python and the Holy Grail when the prince says "I just want to sing"
Lemmings, I Think Not!. Why is it that studios think they know what we like, and even if we don't like, they know best and we should follow as "Lemmings" right over the cliff's edge. This is a classic movie and deserves to be released in it's original movie-release ratio, in other words, WIDESCREEN. I can deal with "Colorization" by turning off the color (If I so desire), but with Pan & Scan treatment of a movie, the only other alternative is to not buy the P&S version. I choose the latter. I still have a laser-disc copied to VHS version that is in it's original aspect ratio, and I will just have to dig this out of the closet. I have a brand new(Bought 3yrs ago)VHS player still in the box, just for this purpose. Wake up Hollywood, don't be a bunch of schmucks, make P&S disappear forever!!! CG13
avoid if you love movies. There's nothing illegal about this offering, since all of the films are in the public domain, but it is VERY sleazy.  The publishers have effectively stolen the hard work and expenses of the man who brought these films to video -- David Shepherd, who releases his films through Image Entertainment.  Supporting this kind of PD "bootleg" will severely diminish the chances of other rare films being restored for DVD.Waldo
spare me............ Michael burned up an the doc blew up in Halloween 2, end of story, end of franchise. Money hungry producers and writers need to get a brain and think of something new. The mask is even horrible in this so called film. Rest in peace Mr Plesance, I hope God let you through the pearly gates after making such horrible sequels. Currently Rob Zombie is remaking the original Halloween, what a travisty. What next, Alice Cooper remaking Jaws or Ted Nugent remaking The Godfather. Leave classics alone
Movie sucks. Movie Boring...Story Drags...barely any action...if story drags should have atleast good story to keep interest but it had nothing...booo
The Worst Movie ever?. After having seen many Gene Wilder movies as a child and recalling they generally were funny I acquired a few of them recently for my collection. While "See no evil Hear no evil" generally disappointed it certainly had its moments - unfortunately the same cannot be said about this movie. It was poorly acted, slapstick, pie-throwing humour which anyone with more than 6 years in school would find utterly depressing.There were not even 3 partly amusing scenes or jokes and the continued return to the movie director beating up his assistant while his management team sweet talked him was among the absolute low points. It is not clear to me who the target audience was for this movie when it was created - and an excuse could be if it was meant for 3-7 year olds... otherwise humour has certainly changed since these days...If the scale made it possible to give negative number of stars this would have been a prime candidate. Dont see it .. even if someone offers you money to do so
Ricky Martin Unplugged. I returned this product to you as it was all in Spainish.  It wasn't asvertized as so.  All other purchases I've made from you get 5 Stars!  I'm a very satisfied customer
Not Worth Your Time. The only good thing about this movie is the plot.  From there it goes downhill.  The script needs to be rewritten to add some sophistication to it.  The acting is marginal except for the actor that plays Justin.  If the script were rewritten then I think the acting would be better, maybe
This movie sucked.... I was so disappointed in this film. The only reason I gave it 2 stars is because of the heart and soul Terrance Howard put into his acting. I love Terrance, he is an outstanding actor but seeing him playing a pimp was just embarrassing. He did an excellent job with the acting but I would have much rather seen him portraying Marvin Gaye. Call me naive but is pimping still actually going on in Memphis, Tennessee in this day and time? And did Terrance Howard give Ludacris' character a cassette tape to listen to? Not a CD, a tape. I probably would have flushed it down the toilet too. And the hook to that song, "You know it's hard out here for a pimp." Ya think? With prostitution being illegal in the state of Tennessee and all. I found myself cringing and sliding down in my seat in the theatre when she began to sing because I was so embarrassed. Don't get me wrong, I love my black people but sometimes when we get a chance to make a major motion picture we just don't quite bring it, do we? "The Cookout" "How High?" "Girl 6" "Woo" "Kingdom Come" Now we can add "Hustle and Flow" to the list. I'm glad Terrance Howard redeemed himself in "Crash." Do yourself a favor and pass on this one.
Did You All Miss the Boat?. After viewing the 7 Faces of Dr. Lao I must agree with the March 10th, 2000 reviewer who states strongly that this is just a solid "B" film.When I was growing up I spent many hours in movie theaters watching Fantasy and Sci-Fi films.  George Pal movies were always among my favorites and still are.  To make statements that the 7 Faces of Dr. Lao was George Pal's greatest film is unfounded.  Have these people ever watched the Time Machine or  War of the Worlds?   If we are talking about great Fantasy or Sci-Fi movies, which George Pal should be remembered for, then you don't get much better than these two.The only credit to this film is the scene where Dr. Lao shows the town's people the movie clips of the Roman city being destroyed by a vocanic eruption.  The eruption scenes are taken from another George Pal classic fantasty film, Atlantis the Lost Continent.  Now there is a great film to entertain the children.  The only problem with Atlantis the Lost Continent is that for some unknown reason it has not yet been released on DVD.  For those of us out there that still enjoy great fantasy films from the past, drop the studio a line and lets get this one on the market
Not surprising that there weren't any more after this one. This time, teen agent Cody Banks (Frankie Muniz) is on the trail of a former spy instructor who has gone rogue with the intention of using a mind control microchip to create world-wide chaos.The first film had its moments but was generally a pretty mediocre affair.  This sequel is painfully uninspired and over-the-top without being very funny.  The beginning sequence that introduces Camp Woody, the school for young spies, is amusing, and Anthony Anderson is funny.  Nothing else quite works.
Not what I expected. This movie lacked the luster I expect from Robert Duvall. It was an endless journey into boredom, at least for me
Eeeeu - Not Miss Marple - go for the old series. It's difficult to understand how Ms. McEwan, who so perfectly personified Lucia in the Mapp & Lucia series, could be so mis-directed as Jane Marple. It would help if her prevelent expression were not a simpering smile with always a twinkle in her eye. Miss Marple believed in Evil, and as portrayed by Joan Hickson in the 1980s BBC series this was never in doubt, and that series stands head and shoulders above the new offering. Take a comparative look at the old and new versions of 'The 4:50 From Paddington' and note the new version's salient characterstics are glitz, a dumbed-down story line, and modern actors in historical drag. It's ENTERTAINMENT but it isn't Miss Marple. Go for the gold, buy the old
Didn't Emanuelle used to involve mostly eroticism?. If you want erotica then this isn't the Emanuelle film for you.  Yes, there are a couple of so-so love scenes, but the one lesbian scene is pratically non-existent, and the obvious focus of this one is the blood and gore content.  I expected more erotic content, and instead got mostly gruesome scenes that I didn't particularly expect.  Remember that scene in &quot;Tarzan the Ape Man&quot; where a nude Bo Derek was tied up and bathed by native women?  That scene was erotic.  Nothing like that one this video
I'm Godzilla and you're Tokyo. That is the only good line in this entire movie, in part because it describes the relationship between the movie and you, the gentle viewer.  You would think this film might be good, just due to the eclectic list of actors (Jack Warden!  Christopher Walken!  Treat Williams!  That guy from "Hudsucker Proxy"!).  But you would be so, so wrong."Things to Do in Denver When You're Dead" badly wants to be "Reservoir Dogs" or "Pulp Fiction."  Indeed, you can compare this movie to "Reservoir Dogs" on a macro level, like the screenwriter obviously did.  Getting some criminals together at some dive restaurant and assembling a gang for a job?  Check.  Job goes wrong in the middle of the movie?  Check.  Crazy guy on the crew?  Check.  The team has to deal with the consequences of their failure?  Check.  Hey, all that the writer forgot to check off on his list was interesting dialogue, plot, and some sense of style.  The screenplay lies there like some dude that got whacked, and completely wastes the talent of the cast.  The dialogue and pacing are atrocious, but who needs pacing when you never get anywhere plotwise?For a movie that references the city of Denver in the title, this movie has less of a sense of place than a TV sitcom.  You never get the feeling you're in Denver, or anywhere in particular for that matter.  Even the expensive yet pointless crane shot in the very first scene (a warning sign from frame 1 of this garbage) doesn't provide any kind of "Denverness" to this movie.This is by far the worst of the Tarantino clones of the 90s.  Truly awful in every way, it is a film to be avoided at all costs.  If you're in the video store on Friday night and this is all that's left, it's a sign that you should turn off the TV that night and go to the pub instead
garbage. I think producer Mo Ramchandani should be commended for his integrity in honestly reviewing his own film.  This is rare in an industry that is proliferated with bald old men who are more interested in turning a profit than producing a good film.  This was by far the worst film i have ever seen, i urge anybody on this page not to waste their time.  Director Sean Mcginly should have been fired on the first day of shooting and replaced with anyone, even a farm animal, and then maybe the psycholgical complexities of suicide would have been better explored.  I look forward to more from producer Mo Ramchandani, its clear he's not going to make teh smae mistake twice!!!!
The Borrowers. I really liked this movie.  I thought it was very funny.  It also had 2 cast members who where later in the 2nd Harry Potter movie.  Tom Felton (a very young Tom) and the guy who played Mr. Weasley.  He was the exterminator.  There was one part that I thought was falling down funny.  I won't say what it was but it had to do with Tom Felton. He must have been about 7 or 8 years old in this movie.  His name was Peagreen Clock
0.5 STARS: Gross and terrible. Why would anyone want to watch a movie about rats is beyond me.  Rats, rats and more rats is what "Graveyard Shift" is all about and for that reason alone, I can honestly say this movie sucks.  But, aside from that, the acting is terrible and the plot is pathetic and stupid.  It is difficult to sympathize with any of the characters especially that boss guy who is a real jerk for sure.The idea of this huge killer rat is kind of lame in my opinion.  The movie is entirely ineffective as a horror movie as there is absolutely nothing scary about it whatsoever...you might want to vommit after seeing the movie, but you won't be scared.  Do yourself a favor and do not buy this trash unless you like rats, rat blood and guts, terrible acting and a terrible story.
Good, but not something to watch mutliple times. The movie is cool because it offers different surfing than normally seen in surf movies, but I buy surf films to watch over and over. Which I would not do with this movie. Just not enough action.
Nick and Jessica were Morons. She sings and acts like a airhead, he acts like the sams sort of idiots who fight in the Professional Wrestkers league...From the moment these two were married in 2002, the press and the talk shows were all over them like vultures flying over a carcass.   So the silly fools did this stupid reality show for MTV, destroying whatever change they might have had in a life together and filmed every aspect of their lives in front of a camera, Now today big surprise, Simpson and Lachly are getting divorsed.  The silly fools asked for it and in the end, it led to heart break
Ugh...this one is just bad!. Wow, what a disappointment. Great actors with a god-awful script from a fantastic book. I loved the book so much, I just couldn't wait to see the movie and I missed it theaters so I watched it this weekend from Netflix. What can I say? It's BORING! I'm not a huge fan of Tom Hanks, especially with this mullet-esque hair (it's ok to hate me), but I love Iam McCellan and Jean Reno, but these great actors just couldn't save this movie. And Sofie Neveau was SO much more interesting in the book. Don't waste your time on this one
5 Stars for the Series 1 Star For the Defective DVD. 1st, let me say that I LOVE (LOVE!!!!) the JLU seasons...and, I was VERY excited when I found out that these episodes were coming to DVD.  To my great disappointment, I found that Disc 3 (the one with Aquaman on the cover of the disc) would not play in ANY of my DVD players, including my computer DVD player.  I returned the item to Amazon, and Amazon replaced it in a flash.  Again, Disc 3 would not play in my computer DVD player, and it took several times of ejecting and reinserting the DVD into my standard DVD player to even start the disc.  I returned (sadly) the item again to Amazon who said that they have been experiencing numerous problems with this DVD edition.  So, sadly my wait continues....buyer beware.  I can understand a problem with one disc from one order...but to experience the SAME problem with the SAME disc from two different orders...that to me spells defective disc for all.  Anyone else out there have a problem with Disc 3 not playing???
What were they thinking?. Yeah - it's a bummer that they didn't include Hearts of Darkness, but putting Redux and the original together was irresistable (although I much prefer the original).I was ENRAGED that some idiot decided to put half of each movie on 1 disc, instead of the original on one and Redux on the other.All I can say is - WTF!!!If you prefer to sit back to enjoy films in their entirety, do yourself a favor and don't buy The Complete Dossier.It's such a shame too, the packaging was insanely cool
The Dixie Chicks were right. To paraphrase the maker "...regardless of nationality, religion or race, we can not bury our heads in the sand and ignore the type of gross inhumanities that have been committed in CHINA for decades. No matter how horrifying it is to watch, we need to see the truth in its entirety to fully comprehend and acknowledge what is essentially an ASIAN holocaust."Tibet is just the tip of the iceberg:"In Tibet, hundreds of Tibetans have been incarcerated for peacefully expressing their political and religious beliefs. Conditions in prisons are reported to be dismal, with numerous accounts of torture and ill-treatment. In particular, PRC law enforcement officials have perpetrated violent acts against Tibetan women in detention centers and prisons. Buddhist nuns and lay women have been subject to torture or violent, degrading and inhuman treatment, including assault, rape and sexual abuse. In June 1994, one Tibetan nun died while in custody, reportedly as a result of a beating by guards. PRC authorities also have severely restricted religious practice; out of the 6,000 Buddhist monasteries that were destroyed by the PRC since its 1949 invasion of Tibet, only a few hundred have been rebuilt.PRC policies, including population transfers of hundreds of thousands of Chinese into Tibet, threaten to make Tibetans a minority in their own land and to destroy Tibetans' distinct national, religious and cultural identity."Ok, so using your typical Republican logic, we should be invading China. Why aren't we? Instead we are trading with them, Republicans are supporting it, and they bash anyone who is against what made it all possible, namely the WTO.We now trade with Communists. Isn't that a hoot! A couple of short decades ago we were fighting Communism in the same region, and 50,000 of our troops died for yet another lie. You should be ashamed.The longer I live, the more I see that political parties in the US and makers of dreck such as this are more on the side of big business and the oil soaked rich than they are on the side of any "people", including Iraqis.Quit parading Iraqi victims of Saddam (we were his best friends when he was gassing the Kurds, remember? - we responded by giving him more money) in the name of your sick game of supporting the super-rich in their exploitation of this region.
I love Asia Argento...but absolutely HATED this movie. First let me say that this movie DOES, indeed, have subtitles.  Unfortunately, this is just one of those annoying DVDs where you actually have to turn them on with your remote.I personally think that Asia Argento is sexy in a very skanky sort of way.  I shouldn't like her as much as I do, but I do anyway.  I think she's gorgeous and her pelvic tattoo is amazing.  I also think she usually has great taste in the projects she takes on in Europe, but her American films leave a lot to be desired.  Unfortunately, this is NOT one of her great European movies.  In fact, I think the other reviewers who refered to this movie as "pretentious" were being way too kind.While I admire what Asia was wanting to do with this movie, it comes across as more of a  PRETENTIOUS ( I couldn't think of a better word) teenage-goth-girl-sex-fantasy.  It's a low budget DV feature done in a pseudo-Dogma 95 style.  Translated that means the script is very minimal and the production values aren't all that great.  Some would have you believe this is for "artistic" effect.  Personally, I think that's a bunch of crap.  The teenage-goth-girl-sex-fantasy aspect gets REALLY old after about 5 minutes.  The lack of an interesting plot doesn't even make the more superficial T&A aspects worth watching.  (AND I LOVE MY T&A!!!!!!!)Besides the nudity, I think the only other aspect of this film I liked was the jab they took at director Gus Van Sant, refering to a fictional version of Cleopatra he would direct.  (I've heard the Italians don't like Gus or his movies.)My personal recommendation is not to waste your time with this movie.  If you  must watch this film, borrow a copy from a friend.  If none of your friends own it, or you don't have any friends, rent a copy.  If you are so absolutely obsessed with seeing this movie, to the point you just have to buy a copy, get one from Amazon Marketplace.  Don't pay more than $5 or $6 for it, it's 90 minutes of your life you will never get back again.
Did not receive it. The supplier {digital eyes} told it was available any more & they where going to tell Amazon  to give me cridit for the above item,but I have not heard anything from you ;can we resolve this matter ASAP,Thank You ,To
Predictable 'Thriller' without much Suspense. A KILLER WITHIN is an obviously low budget Indie film by director Brad Keller and new writers Chris and William Peirson.  The primary problem with this murder 'mystery/thriller/crime' film is that the writing and acting and directing is such that within the first few minutes of this movie you can figure out not only what is going to happen but who is the perpetrator!Terrill Addison (C. Thomas Howell) is a wealthy lawyer, Harvard graduate first in his class, ex-District Attorney with fancy wife, house, income, child, and a weird fantasy life with his alcoholic, tramp-like blowsy wife Becky (Sean Young).  His partner Sam (Ben Browder) has always been Terrill's second: second best at Harvard, lesser member of the firm, unable to father children, etc.  Sam's wife Sarah (Dedee Pfeiffer, unable to have children, devotes her life to taking care of Terrill and Becky's 4-year-old son....One night Becky is found murdered and her son in a coma.  Coincidentally with this is the information that one Sonny Bruton (Mark Hanson) has been released from a life sentence for murders, a sentence tried by Terrill.  AND the only person who knows the whereabouts of Sonny is another enemy of Terrill's, one Vargas (Giancarlo Esposito) whose job as a cop was destroyed by Terrill some years back.Well, after some fancy footwork, Terrill re-bonds with Vargas and they explore the murder that the local police have suggested was perpetrated by Terrill himself.  After a spree of exploring the Barrio, confronting all manner of odd people and circumstances, the primary suspect Sonny is electrocuted in a swimming pool absenting him as the possible murderer, Terrill learns new facts about his partner, etc.  Just when the crime is finally 'solved' the writers insert a spoiler that ends the movie with doubt as to the true murderer and opens the gate for the dreaded possibility of a sequel.The acting is acceptable (and in some cases very fine) and the locations are well captured.  One unnecessary intrusion in this film is the musical score, so obviously created on synthesizer keyboards trying to mimic an full orchestra, a sound that stops only long enough for intervention of Beethoven's 'Moonlight Sonata' that makes no sense, but continues to cover the dialogue to the same degree as the keyboards stuff.This is a rainy night popcorn movie to have on while you relax to forget the realities of the day.  There are some touches of good film making buried here: finding them is a better detective game than the script provides.  Grady Harp, March 0
Avoid this One and save your time and money. "Midway" was the decisive naval engagement of the Second World War -- decided by a handful of bombs hitting the Japanese carriers over a period of a few minutes.  It is a riveting story that has been well told in several movies and innumerable books.Not here.  Relying upon outtakes from "Tora Tora Tora" (and the wonderful Japanese cast of that film) what we have here is a pedestrian outing that should be avoided at all costs.  Quite honestly?  The best version of the battle of Midway was Steven Spielberg's original "Star Wars" (before it had Roman numberals _
let's make this short and sweet... This is one of the most boring movies I have ever seen.  I knew from the very beginning of the movie that there was no way I was going to be able to stay awake through the whole thing.  I was right; I fell asleep about fifteen minutes into it.  Recently, I was offered the chance to watch it again.  I thought, "OK, I didn't see the whole thing, it might have gotten better, so I'll give it another chance." ... Bad mistake.  This little tale about a horse race across a vast desert did nothing to hold my interest for very long.  Hidalgo is the name of the horse.  So what?  That's about as boring as this movie.  So why the 1-star markup? Cause the main character is played by Viggo Mortensen, of Aragorn fame in the smash movie series The Lord of the Rings- and I do like Viggo.  I did not, however, like this movie.  It's kind of fitting it should be set in a desert- cause that's exactly where this movie should be buried, never to bore another wave of audiences again.  If you find yourself overworked and in need of a nice long nap, watch Hidalgo; you'll be out in no time
Spinal Tap goes folk... 'A Mighty Wind' seems to be 'This is Spinal Tap' done in a folk medium. Unfortunately, the gags and cliches in this film seem to be lifted, as another reviewer stated, from most of Christopher Guest's previous efforts. To put it mildly, halfway through the film I was half-asleep and wishing a dwarf would crush Stonehenge
One of the worst. I'm very very sorry to say this, but this is one of the WORST films I had ever seen!! This film's only about 1 hr long, and it shows Beethoven who is writing music and stuff in somebody's home while a kid who lives in that house complains to the composer. Of course, Beethoven composed many piecies. But in this film, it only shows ONE concert which he conducts Symphony No. 9! And after that, the film's over!! It's the worst! So DON'T BUY IT!
Without Marvin, not worth it... I've been waiting for this title to become available on dvd because it's been impossible to find on VHS.  SAVE YOUR MONEY.  They seem to have dumped the original soundtrack.  It's not there. The movie opens with Marvin Gaye's wonderful voice  drowned out by someone else singing over him.  That was it for me.   What made the film exceptional for the time period was Marvin Gaye's masterful soundtrack.  I couldn't believe what had been done.  Truly disappointing.  If you don't mind this oversight, you'll love this dvd. If you're looking for the original soundtrack to this film, save your money
Too many cooks stirring the soup. Short Cuts (Robert Altman, 1992)There's a chap you may have heard of by the name of Joe Frank. He does wonderful, hysterically strange radio dramas that will leave you bug-eyed in fascination at the sheer weirdness of the characters therein. Frank is a master at what he does.There's another chap you may have heard of by the name of Raymond Carver. He wrote wonderful, hysterically strange short stories (and the occasional poem) that will leave you bug-eyed in fascination at the sheer weirdness of the characters within. Carver, too, was a master at what he did.Then there is Robert Altman, who decided to take a number of the short stories in Carver's watershed book, Cathedral, and turn them into a three-hour film. The result is Short Cuts. It is neither wonderful nor hysterically strange, and while it has echoes of both the Carver stories on which it is based and the ludicrous extremes of Joe Frank, it cannot claim to achieve the mastery of either of them.I mention Joe Frank because there are certain scenes in the movie, the occasional moment, that remind me of Frank's work. Altman is capable of achieving with visual techniques what Frank achieves with his dialogue-- the ability to make the viewer wonder what sort of insane mind could possibly put this sort of thing together. But where Frank does it on a constant basis, these moments are all too rare in Short Cuts. The rest of this far, far too long flick consists of a number of very, very good actors going through their paces in a stangely listless manor, talking a lot and not actually doing all that much. There are a few very good performances (Jack Lemmon, in a small role, stands out), but the net effect of putting together this many fantastic actors in one film is to dilute the whole.Even if everyone here gave top-notch performances, however, it still wouldn't help. The movie just wanders, never settling on a single storyline long enough to do it justice (the obvious comparison here is to Pulp Fiction, which does that trick so well), cutting from storyline to storyline as fast and loose as Romero's Dawn of the Dead cuts between camera angles. While some of this movie is undeniably fascinating, and it's competently put together, it could have been so much better than it actually is. *
Not worth watching. All "style" and no substance. Even the dance number with John Travolta & Uma Thurman was lackluster. And would Cedric The "Entertainer" please go away? I've never seen anything with him in it that was any good. I should have known just by his presence in the movie it was going to be a dud. I think Christina Milian's voice is good but not so great to make such a fuss over.
Shoot me ... shoot me now. This was arguably the longest 2 hours I have spent in my entire life ... it felt like much more ... I found myself more than a little angry with the overkill leadup to what could have been a compelling story.  The punch line took way too long to get to ... and when it came, it just wasn't enough to convince me it was worth the wait.  With each pregnant pause between dialogue (and guitar strings), I was sure I'd be getting up to leave ... I suspect the invested time (hours and hours it seemed) precluded me from doing so.  I wanted that punch line ... then, finally, it came ... and it went.This one had a ton of potential but it just didn't work for me
BAD Seller. We found out too late that this was a bootlegged copy -- Buyer Beware
Cate, oh my............... To borrow from a previous reviewer:  A movie to kill an evening with if you have one that really needs murdering.
What was that?. I didn't understand it, don't know what it's about and frankly i don't care. what are people thinking when they make tripe like this. what a waste
Low ranking but hold on. Gee, it was until I watched this movie when I became able to understand why some reviewers get so angry at some movies or novels. I had never seen characters as stupid, immature and obnoxious as the ones from this product. I've been open minded to several movies -you can see it in my reviews- but this one was too much, and this time I do agree with all reviewers who have disliked this product for the same reason I just mentioned. Do you think we are exaggerating? Check just two small pieces:-In one scene, a girl and her dad found a town buried by an earthquake. She insisted on hearing some music from the ground, so his dad went to search to look for people to help, but then she asked her dad why he went when there's nobody, and keept bothering all along. Did she have X-rays to see underground? Anyway, this perfectly rich-spoiled-brat would definitively win -if existed- the Jerk Nobel prize and graduate with top honors from PhD jerk studies from Harvard.-In another scene, the California's governor's top assistant gets her couple throwing a fir over the phone and calling her repeatedly about why they don't have children (or else, I don't care) while the earthquakes eat California and Washington.The movie starts with a big array of people acting up and demanding attention for themselves while caring nothing whatsoever about other people's problems, no matter there's an emergency state. The classical monsters like vampires, dragons, demons and the like are nothing compared with the stuff you see in this movie. Later on, as anybody can image, everybody is asking forgiveness and telling how much they actually loved each other, over and over all along the movie. I like emotions in movies for sure, but this was plain disgusting to me..specially for 3 hours! But if this is the type of scenes you like, you'll get tons of it in here! And you'll rank it 5 starts! As for me, I really thank the ones who invented the DVDs which allow speeding movies up so I don't need to put up with so much baloney as I would with the old VHS. Today we can see only what we want from a movie. Well, let's pass to the interesting parts.This movie seems to be a reply to the current anti-fear-mongering wave I've noticed lately. This wave is led by Conservative (or the like) people. The top example could be Michael Crichton's (creator of Jurassic Park, ER, Rising Sun, Sphere, etc) latest novel "State of Fear" and his web site where he displays a big deal of arguments and critics against all the media that keep the whole world under constant fear about everything. But this movie shows the government risking millions of people in order to avoid general panic. So, the government initially rejects the fear-mongers who predict huge catastrophes. This is interesting but it's still a movie and what I've read from Michael Crichton and others is likely to be real. At least the movie writers seem to have done some decent research. Moreover they did well in presenting all predictions and solutions in the movie as speculations. It was actually interesting hearing the scientific arguments of Dr. Hill who sees the problems and solutions. That may have been good hard science fiction.Unfortunately these interesting aspects were far from the movie's core, which was emotions and more wild emotions with lots of people caring and caring....no matter they oppose actual solutions...all the time. You'll see that some people get to be evacuated and then the president (so charmingly caring) wants to let them go back home immediately but Dr. Hill has to convince him to wait ridiculous 24 hrs to make things sure. This was too off real world as well.Regarding the special effects, some people didn't like them but I did. If this is what you're looking for I strongly advise you to speed the movie all the time without action scenes, which in fact are not many. You can tell this was made for TV in several scenes. Some people thought that it was too long as a movie, but once again, it all depends on what you like. If you like emotions and special effects, this shouldn't matter to you, other wise keep away from wasting your time with this thing
WORST FILM EVER. I have seen many pathetic films in my life. This topped them. Did I rate one star? Sorry- I meant negative 11 stars. It was the absolute worst movie I have ever seen in my entire life. It was a total waste of three hours when I could have been sleeping. There was no point. The script and storyline were pathetic. The gore was overdone- too much blood, killing, and the like. It was totally historically inaccurate, and the Civil War scenes were so grossly unrealistic that it was laughable. All Civil War veterans are rolling over in their graves. Any scene that was supposed to be touching was pathetic. One of the abolsute bombs was when Clint Eastwood fires off a canon twice with his cigar- yet he does not even load it- either time. And somehow, without even aiming the canon, he knocks his 'friend' off his horse.The movie is a failure. F-A-I-L-U-R-E. Crappy. Junky. Just plain DUMB. STUPID. PATHETIC.I am not going to waste any more words on it. Just....whatever you do....save your money. Don't buy it. It's not worth 50 cents
If you like the back of William Hurt's head... The only good thing in this movie was Ms. Howard's performance, she is innocent and believable.   I can't understand how good actors like Weaver, Hurt, and Phoenix would let themselves be wasted on this. The 'plain' dialogue among the 'elders' is painfully numbing, choppy, and stilted.  And the directing drove me crazy, especially since M. Night...insists on filming group scenes as is he was just passing through, or following them without ever bothering with close-ups. These scenes make me feel like they were done by an amateur filmmaker with a his first video camera.   If you like the back of William Hurt's head, you'll get plenty of it in this film, the camera seems to avoid his face like the plague; which is too bad, since when he finally has a good speech, we are deprived of the anger I imagine was in his eyes.  I agree with others, I would have worked better as a 30 minute Twilight Zone episode.  Rent it first before you buy, and save some money for a classic thriller, like Psycho
what am i missing?!. I must be missing something, i bought this movie... when i watched it i fell asleep, its boring as hell trust me im a true horror fan and a gore-fiend, this movie was NOTHING, the only gore was when this guy cut some lady in the heart and it looked so fake.... the ONLY scary part was the end with this witch, is everyone high but me? this movie sucked! boring as hell.. 2 stars
ewhh. This movie was just nasty.  A couple of descent parts, but other than that it was just low-class nasty... and I got it for free!!!!  It wasn't even worth it free
Mediocre is good?. I was very disappointed after reading all the glowing reviews for this movie and then watching your average "bad guys on the run" movie.  Gee, Billy Bob Thornton plays a crazy bad guy who shoots people and he doesn't like cops at all; he even uses bad language!  A friend was watching it with me and he thought I was watching the Lifetime channel. This movie just plodded along down cliche boulevard
Hard to make it through... I hope I can give a fair rating here, but as one member who loves to watch LDS films of all types, this one is a big let-down. I normally will sit through any movie to see if it gets good. This one was just overkill that was not even funny. I initially sqeezed a few laughs out in the beginning but then it looked like "nursury" comedy if you know what I mean. I turned it off after the whole overdrawn toilet scene with the wedding-gown-infomercial-in-a-movie
Skip this. This show is produced due to the highly successful of swordman II. However, it has a lousy plot. It continued from the 2nd episode saying Brigitte Lin is not dead and his (her?) concubine come and find him (her?). Any way, it really has no story plot at all. Just some nice fighting moves and trying to pass off as a movie. Skip this. Worst of the trilogy
This is just terrible. I cant even watch this movie. I love yu yu hakusho but the bad voice acting kills me. I tried watching this movie I really did...about 25 min of it and I felt like I was going do die. Maybe one day before I die I might watch this of if somehow my cable goes out and someone takes all of tmy dvds but this one I will try to watch it again. I am very dissapointed. I am sure it's a great movie and all dont get me wrong I just cant seem to watch i
Zzzzzzzzzzzz. Let me just preface my review with the fact that some of my favorite movies are incredibly slow and even "boring" to my friends.  So it isn't the glacial pace of this movie that so bothered me.  It isn't the unresolved ending that bothered me.  It wasn't the violence (in short bursts.)  It wasn't the acting (the acting was pretty good actually).  But as a whole this movie was simply a tremendous failure.  I didn't care who was sending the tapes and I didn't care what would happen with the main characters.  They were unrelatable on just about any level.  This movie is the kind where you will see a remotely interesting twist in the plot about 3/4's of the way in and you'll think, "wow I wonder where the story will go next".  And then it doesn't.  That was it.  Very disappointing.  I don't mind excruciatingly slow films as long as there's SOME kinda payoff in the end.  I really don't understand all the acclaim that this movie got.  As a "suspense" movie or as an "art" film it fails pretty miserably.  The premise was a good idea that went nowhere...slowly.  Viewer beware.
Ranks up there with the worst action movies. This movie had some good potental in the opening, after that, it looses all grip on everything, the plot of the movie is based on a new JSF style creation fighter FA-37, and a new VTO&L controlled artificially by a "AI", one thing leads to another the "AI" goes haywire during a lighting storm, it starts acting on it's own to destroy "threats" one thing leads to another their in Tajikistan setting off dirty nuclear weapons, north korea, russia for absoulutly no reason breaking numerus international laws, at one point in the movie, the star of the movie "falon 1" helps destroy intercepting fighters with the "AI" whois hes ment to track down breaking a bunch of laws himself, and is treated like a hero at the end.It's a backwards movie, don't watch it, please don't
One double cross too many... Mamet does not write reality in my opinion. You hear some of the quotes and you tend to think: "Who talks like that?"However, it is intriguing to hear it come from this ensemble cast. With an inferior cast (like the one in Spanish Prisoner, which I still liked the first time I saw it) it would have been wasted, but the three leads (Gene Hackman, Delroy Lindo and Danny DeVito) give it a crisp take that I found to be refreshing (even if the script was contrived).Joe Moore is an old master thief who thought he did his last job (I guess he doesn't realize the "rule" that a last job for a thief usually involves killing your boss in a double cross), but is lured into another one by Mobster Bergman. He has a crew, including long term partners Bobby Blane (Delroy Lindo), Pinky (Ricky Jay) and wife Fran (Rebbecca Pidgeon). Their job this time around is the robbing of a shipment leaving an undisclosed airport bound for Switzerland. However, there is a problem. Bergman wants his nephew Jimmy Silk (Rockwell) involved, maybe to get his feet wet, or to watch that they are not doublecrossed. He is reckless and without patience. He is not eager to learn and thinks he is wise beyond his years, but he is not as stupid as he appears to be. This wildcard is the reason that the crew begin their double crosses.Mamet intrigued us with his take on the con-world with his excellent House of Games. He also did a very good job with The Spanish Prisoner. But this plot seems to be tired, especially since I saw "The Score" with Robert DeNiro and Ed Norton a month earlier. They have similar plotlines and while Heist is superior in terms of Dialogue, the Score had more of a payoff and better pacing. There are also things about the movie that bother me. The first is the yet again Hollywood obsession about placing a young woman with an old guy. Yes, Hackman doesn't always look his years, but he's past 70 and Pidgeon looks more like his daughter. It's creepy to see them together. The other is that Joe Moore is a skilled thief who must have spent decades as a thief. He has nothing to show for it. I don't think so...Sam Rockwell also does a good job. He is the straight man, he is the observer and is always overshadowed by the leads but he does hold his own. The disappointing characters are Pinky (they double cross their mobster boss and he doesn't run?) and Fran. They also bothered me in the Spanish Prisoner. Their static talk drive me up the wall and the last thing Ricky Jay looks like is a thief of any sort.As in House of Games and Spanish Prisoner, there are twists and turns everywhere, but many of them are fairly predictable. There are no "ooohs" and "aaahs" from the audience as if they are fooled. Maybe we are just too use to seeing Mamet films that the shock of a double cross wore off a long time ago. Without this surprise factor, the Heist becomes a flat film with no real interest....Rating: C
Zuh DRAST voo chee. I couldn't get past the first five minutes of this. Pfeiffer's Russian accent was so horrible, and her lines so bad, I decided to watch Rocky the Flying Squirrel instead, so I could hear Natasha and Boris have an intelligent conversation
A B-movie that defines the B-movie world. Please, please, please reconsider purchacing this movie new unless you absloutly must have it in your collection.  This thing is absloutly horrid and the only two redeeming things are the Harryhausen animations and Ms. Welch in that furry bikini of hers.  Personally I find it amazing that cavewomen could keep their hair so clean and styled here but that's just me.  Now as to the best time to view it?  Best when under the influence of a pint of fine whiskey and in the company of good friends that want something to make fun of for a short period of time
slow, dull, incomprehensible. won't attempt to review the plot. other reviewers seem to understand it and i don't.  if you like slow, dull, incomprehensible japanese horror films, this is for you.  much too much unfathomable exposition between the moments of real horror, which, though well done, are few and far between.  the ending is even more bewildering than the rest, and that is saying something
Poor. I was not impressed at all with this video. The women who do the various facial exercies do not even smile and scared my son the first few times watching it.It is poor quality, no originality and there is nothing I see that is going to help at all that I already do not do with my son.
Totally silly. Had a huge crush on Deven when I was little.  Silly little movie with very little plot.  But Brought back found memories.
No good!. This DVD-box needs to be re-released. one episode has been cut up - how could this happen
Painfully Bad. A thin soup of potty humor, fart jokes, and juvenile cheap laughs. You know something is terribly wrong when you are halfway through a comedy and you haven't even cracked a smile.Good gawd, Dustin Hoffman sitting on the toilet?Robert DeNiro breastfeading a baby?Foreskin dropped into a fondue pot?Wow, a movie that hurt to watch.It wasn't even worth renting for free from the public library.
What happened to my review?. Amazon, I took the time to write a review for this almost 2 weeks ago and have yet to see it posted.  If it will not be posted please at least let me know why.  Thank you
the Worst Action movie I've ever seen. I guess success turned around for Sam Raimi in 2002 & 2004 with the two Spider-Man films, but first he created this "V" like character in this garage of a movie, I liked "V for Vendetta" but not this "Darkman" if want to see a badly burned viligante in a mask see "V for Vendetta" don't see "Darkman
Angel - Season Two (Slim Set). The problem with this DVD is that it does not play in NZ so it is useless, can I send it back
Garbage Movie.. 0 Stars. 1st. off being a very big Martial Arts fan this movie doesn't even come in the same category as a Martial Arts Movie, the reason it hasn't been released so far is because the Movie Sucked Big Time. Conan Lee was in this movie which is the reason I went to see it when it 1st. came out and he gets killed within 10minutes of the movie. So don't even waste your time or money to buy this. I had to give this 1 star because it doesn't have a 0-Star rating
YAWWWWN!!!. Season 3 explemlifies the worst problems with this series.Enterprise's best attributes are:1)The production2)The acting3)The dialog4)The special effectsBut this series lacks in the three most important areas Star Trek is famous for-writing,pace and classic characters.A one hour episode of this series tends to pass at a snail's pace and the characters never really develope beyond a non dimentional cartoon setting.And this season was really the end-a lame plot that was extended over a whole season because the writers had no new ideas.And people complained about  ST-TNG being PC?THIS IS PC!!!'Enterprise' premiered after 9/11 and took no political or socially relevant risks.Token black,asian and Vulcan's-Star Trek with all the relevence taken out.In fact elements of this season seem to express that all out war is okay even if no other options have been explored.'Enterprise',at best is a below average sci-fi/adventure series and does not have the same spark and humanity that made even the best of DS9 so enjoyable.If one wants to see good Star Trek shows go watch the classic series,the brilliant Next Generation or Voyager.Don't suck on this melon
Interesting Script - Poor Acting. Fresh Horses, on paper, would have seemed to have been a perfect hit script. You had Molly Ringwald, with her porcelain skin and delicately curly red-blonde hair. You had Andrew McCarthy with his boyish charm but also the male strength beginning to come through. You had a romantic triangle. You had the "class divide". The Brat Pack was loved by millions. How could this fail?The problem really does seem to come down to the actors themselves. There's very little "energy" at all to this story which is supposedly about passion overcoming logic. Molly is a 16 yr old girl in rural Kentucky. When her stepfather begins fondling her, and her mother does little to help, Molly tries for the only escape she can find - marrying the older bad-man-in-town, Viggo Mortensen. She claims she never slept with Viggo - only used him for escape. Then Viggo's father began fondling her, and now she wants out of this house as well.To get momentary relief from her homelife, she hangs out at a friend's home, which is a 24 hour party. Here she runs into Andrew. Andrew is a very serious student who has just gotten engaged to his high-class, wealthy girlfriend. The girlfriend rambles on and on about china patterns, having children and living the perfect life. Andrew goes with the flow until he sees Molly - and is instantly in lust. Molly leads him to believe she's 20, single, and interested in him. It takes maybe 3 days before he's sleeping with her. To his credit, he does tell his fiancee promptly, and breaks off the engagement.You'd think everything was wonderful now, right? However, Andrew learns from friends about Molly's lies. He decides to keep seeing her anyway. However, he doesn't want to introduce her to his family, and has no intention of marrying her. He says he loves her - but his feelings seem to be more related to sex. At one point he even gives her a wad of cash to buy her off.There's a telling scene near the end when Andrew thinks Molly has been publicly stripped by her husband. Andrew storms off to their house to have a talk with Viggo. Andrew is deliberately rude - laughing at Viggo's artwork and putting him down. But it's Viggo who is the calm one here. When Molly shows up, Viggo points out that Molly's been doing all this lying and scheming so that Andrew would be a Knight in Shining Armor and ride off with her. He asks Andrew - if you're saying I'm not good enough for her - it seems that you think you're too good for her, right? Andrew finds himself agreeing - that he won't take on Molly himself. He wants to get Molly away from Viggo, but then is going to abandon her to her own means. How could he figure that Molly would be better off with nobody at all, vs with Viggo?Fast forward to a year later, and Molly has in fact found herself a "wealthy college boy" to take care of her and is taking classes again. She's happy, and Andrew is sad. I suppose you have to give them credit for a not-typical Hollywood ending to the story.The landscapes are often gorgeous, and the various details of high class, low class, city, country are all played nicely against each other. So the problem really comes down to the main actors. Molly and Andrew maybe have gotten too used to playing ensemble roles where each person just has to be a stereotype without a lot of depth. You really get a sense of shallowness when you're watching this movie. Andrew has an entire life including a long-term romance, that he's set in. In just 3 days he's thrown it all away for Molly - but you never get any real sense that he cares about her. Molly was supposedly taking some quite desperate steps to find safety in her life - including seducing and lying to Andrew in order to convince him to rescue her - but she never seems to care much either.Intriguingly, only 2 people really seem to have depth in this movie. One is Ben Stiller, Andrew's best friend. It's ironic because Ben's character IS shallow and cares more for himself than for those around him. Even so, Ben really seems authentic as someone who isn't used to having to worry about others - but who really does try his best, many times, to get Andrew to wake up to reality. The other is Viggo Mortensen. You only glimpse Viggo once until the end of the movie - he's just referred to as a "rough guy" who has done many bad things. When you actually encounter Viggo (after Andrew has in essence broken into his house to confront him) you're prepared for the worst. However, Viggo is very patient, very well spoken, and quite intelligent in his commentary. He doesn't thrash Andrew for sleeping with his wife. Instead, he lays out the situation and makes both Andrew and Molly face their failings. Molly deliberately lied and used Andrew as a tool of getting a better life. Andrew, for his part, knew he'd never actually rescue Molly but led her on repeatedly to have time with her.Some have said this is the worst movie ever. Many sections of it can be very painful to watch. However, I do find glimmers of meaning - especially in the ending discussion with Viggo. Even there, though, you would think this would be a moment of great soul searching for Andrew and Molly. Instead, both seem to think, "Yeah, I guess that's true. Oh well, see ya." I don't mind gloomy movies at all - in fact I really appreciate them sometimes. However, if a movie has no depth of character or quality acting, it just makes the whole experience fall flat.
Unsuitable for European DVD players. Unfortunately this MS collection is not compatible with European DVD players.  The cover of the DVD actually tells you this as well as that it is 'not for sale or rent outside the US and Canada'.  Save yourself a lot of trouble and don't buy this if you are from the EU!
These are the worst ever!. Just show the real machines working, forget all the goofy narration that is annoying to adults and doesn't even hold my son's interest. He much prefers the Fred Levine series or the I Love CAT Machines series
Don't get me started!!. Bro, seriously, how can anyone give this movie higher than one star? The only reason it got one star from me is that i can't give it negative 2 stars. I wont bore you with details like this movie bored me but i will say just save your money. Don't even rent this, if you really want to see it try to download it you will be glad you saved your money. To this very day this is still the absolutely worst movie i have ever seen in my life, not just horror movie the worst movie period
I Love Will.... BUT, do not buy this.  I did not take the advise of the other reviews and bought it anyway, thinking they did not understand his comedic genious.  I am such a fool.  His first "Best of" is fantastic!  This was just more of the first disk (honestly, half of the disk was more of the same skits!!)  and a rather failed attempt to give you more cow bell.  I hate to write a bad review, but save your money and your time.
Boring. Highly acclaimed. That, I knew. I watched the first 30 minutes, which is 1/4 of the movie, before I decided to hang it up. New lady moves into a conservative French town and opens a chocolate shop. This upsets the local church, even before she begins unleashing secret desires and so forth with her sinful chocolate. Okay. Can you really carry 2 hours with this single plot? Nope. This one's boring.
Blindsided by the gay "Swan Lake". I was shocked to see Tchaikovsky's classic danced exclusively by males.  One reviewer felt that the result was a "human"-- not merely  "romantic"-- ballet.  I saw it as a travesty of Swan Lake.  We all know that gays have contributed much to ballet, but Nureyev danced with Fonteyn in the pas de deux from Le Corsaire.  A gay agenda should not trump artistic integrity.  The superb pas de deux by Yulia Makhalina and Igor Zelensky in the other selection from Swan Lake did not remove the bad taste left by Adam Cooper and Scott Ambler
Heavy-handed, Predictable, and Not Funny. I did not much enjoy this film, and I didn't find it very clever or funny.It's true, as other amazon reviewers have noted, that Citizen Ruth stereotypes both sides of the abortion issue. Does that make it an intelligent and even-handed comic treatment of a complex topic? No, indeed.Along the way, it also stereotypes poor people, middle class people, teenagers, drug addicts, Christians, and Vietnam veterans. That doesn't make it funny, though, because the satire is so heavy-handed and predictable. Simply tackling an important social topic, like abortion, isn't going to give a film the heft to generate either drama or humor. In my opinion, the film's pretentious take on a big issue just makes it creepy. There were too many close-ups of earnest, wide-pored, and angry faces. And Burt Reynolds as the national leader of the anti-abortion crowd was just peculiar. What was he doing in this film? And what are we supposed to make of his relationship with the young Eric?Laura Dern is a talented actress, and she does a creditable job with this part -- which because it straddles genres was a challenging one. But her talent couldn't redeem this film for me
Because No Stars is not an Option. I've developed an interest in the movies of Ed Wood of late. They are so poorly done that they tend to be funny. When I learned of this Ed Wood movie that I didn't have, I ordered it. That was a mistake. It seems that the movies is nothing more than an excuse to get girls to strip.The premise is that he invites models over for "auditions" he then gets them to strip in order to evaluate his new line of see through clothing. Through the day, more and more show up until the orgy gets into full swing. There is no more story to it than that. At least there was no more story that I was able to sit through.At one time, I did not believe that there was a more boring or worse movie than GLEN OR GLENDA. I was wrong. This one is.I you want soft core porn, I am sure there are better productions out there. If you want a movie for entertainment, this isn't it.If 0 stars had been a choice, I would have taken it, unless there was something lower.
"Must-not-see TV". Okay, so my brother got me season one of "How I Met Your Mother" for Christmas, and swore it was the best comedy on TV.  I was willing to give it a shot; I'm somewhat of a Jason Segal fan from his Freaks and Geeks turn and we all know how funny Neil Patrick Harris can be (witness his scene stealing performance in Harold and Kumar Go to White Castle).  So I had reason to expect an enjoyable program.So what's the verdict?When I was 17, I had an infected wisdom tooth pulled out and my mouth swelled and oozed pus for a week. I could only eat Gerber's baby food and fluids.  All in all, it was the most crappy experience ever.Until I watched "How I Met Your Mother."If we lived in Ancient Rome, I was Emperor Commodos and I was watching this in the Colisseum...I would have given thumbs down to the whole proceeding with the hope that gladiators would come in wielding maces and destroy the bar and the apartment sets, where 99% of the show seems to take place.  However, had this show really existed way back then, the Roman Empire would have collapsed a lot sooner than it did.Evidently, Some mad scientist pinpricked Jimmy Fallon's pinky, fertilized an egg with his DNA and out popped a fully-formed Josh Radnor, the lead actor of this show. Cloning Dolly the sheep was bad enough, but this is an affront to all ethics and morals, let alone good taste.  One small step for man, one giant leap BACKWARDS as far as comedy is concerned.The uninspired, trite, and obvious comedy writing doesn't help, but it might have been surviveable had the characterizations been at all passable. But it is impossible for me to relate to these people. Self-absorbed narcissism was funny on Seinfeld because that was an irreverant and funny show, nobody was meant to like those characters.  But here, I would never want to be associated with these people in real life, let alone watch caricatures of them on TV.  It's Seinfeld without the humor.  And in case you were wondering, the humor was about 99.99999% of Seinfeld.  So what that means is that HIMYM is .00001% as funny.Apparently, I am the lone dissenting opinion on this show, since every other Amazon reviewer raves about it.  I'm okay with that.  After all, Aristotle was ostracized for being the only person who thought the world was round. Not to say that I'm much like Aristotle--I don't wear togas
Kind of loses steam very quickly. Even though it's used by a lot of reviewers, I have to use it too. The opening scene has John Travolta staring into the camera delivering a monologue about how Hollywood creates **** lately. He mentions that it would be great if the bad guy got away in the end, then later in the film he talks about Harry Houdini and misdirection. Oddly, this film was produced by Joel Silver, who I can list as a creator, or at least a deliverer, of said Hollywood ****. There's only 3 reasons really to watch this film, none of which have anything to do with the story, which shows you just how the film is.Stan is a talented hacker who's been down on his luck since being released from jail. Dead end job, unkempt trailer and denied rights to see his daughter. Well, an opportunity comes when a woman, Ginger, offers him money to meet with a man. That man, Gabriel, is incredibly wealthy and will pay him 10 million dollars to create a computer virus that'll net him near 10 billion dollars. Of course, it doesn't help that the feds are after both of themThose 3 reasons? Well, the first is an incredibly awesome looking shot where we get a 180 slow motion pan (it is NOT a full 360) after an explosion goes off and we see it's aftermath. While the full version of the X-Men Last Stand shot found in the special features looks better, this is just as great. The other is at the end where a helicopter flies a bus all over the city and smacking into buildings while the 3rd is of course a nude sunbathing Halle Berry which apparently she was paid a handsome sum of money for each breast shown. However, that's kind of where the good parts end.The biggest problem is that it's an action movie based on the lowest common denominator. It's super-stylized and sleek and has some pretty big sequences but that's it. Some action films like Die Hard inexplicably hold up on repeated viewings. Here, after the first watch, you've probably experienced all you're going to see. They add in the daughter subplot which isn't as developed as it should be but it did resonate with me. The film does have its fan but it's hard for me to like something so....plastic.Should you buy it? I doubt it, unless you want a show-off disc for your home theatre, something that other films do infinitely better
Awful. I wanted this movie to be good, but boy was I disappointed.  I've seen home movies with more acting, plot and feelings. Parker Posey should be embarrassed that she was in it.  Save your money. The one guy is kind of hot so if you're looking for a butt shot, rent it and fast forward.
Not for Children....Features an Grannie Sex Kitten. This review is for those of you who may be parents, looking for films with clean fun and family values....please look elsewhere, because this is not it!Technical feats aside, this Klump family is rude and crude.  The dad mostly rants and talks down to everyone.  And the Grandma only knows how to talk about sex and erections, and ends up dropping her robe for a "stripper," in trying to initiate sex with him, though she is supposedly happily married. This is just one of many objectionable content scenes.I cringed a lot seeing this, and should have just dumped it, but hoped it would get better... I really can't imagine showing this to my children, or anyone.  It's not family friendly, and not that funny.  I just wanted to warn concerned parents.
Great movie, Bad DVD!. I had rented this movie on VHS awhile back and thought that even with it's slightly &quot;B rated&quot; style it was a very good movie for the genre. Good acting, great special effects, and a top notch storyline make this a classic in my collection. I have purchased the DVD through several online vendors and have yet to find one that will play in any of my DVD players or computers. I highly recomend this film, but suggest the VHS version
Poor Jayne, What A Waste!. The Las Vegas Hillbillies is a terrible bad movie which stars Jayne Mansfield, Mamie Van Buren and Ferlin Huskey. It appears to be a low budget film due to the photography, acting and settings. If you are a Jayne or Mamie fan, you will find yourself fastforwarding to their scenes only. One highlight of the film is Ferlin Husky's dream sequence of Jayne singing "That Makes It." Air time of Jayne is very small. Trivia: the Siamese cat in the film, which Jayne is holding, belonged to Jayne's friend May Mann.
goth stage performances have rights too. I find it hard to articulate how bad this movie is.  Its protagonists are kind of like people from a goth club who never break performance role, the lead character a pro domme who's a little cheeze even for on the clock.   I wouldn't be surprised if there's some people like that in the world-- you meet some people really into, say, the Rockabilly scene, who never stop acting like err, Rockabilly people.  But you wouldn't really want to defend their civil rights, not a whole lot anyway.   So when our heros  run up against the dastardly religious fanatics who want to shut them down, you almost want to root for the fundies.That says a lot for me personally, since I do stay up late sometimes wishing SM people like us had a civil rights movement backing us up, and I'd love a good sexploitation, overcoming the bad guys kind of feel good movie.  And to be honest from the tone of the movie and misc. interviews with the producer of this film, I think it was really intended to be symptathetic to SM people, that he's trying to make an analogy between us and gay people thirty years ago.Maybe what upsets me about this most is we as SM people probably suffer more from an ability to to visualize the ordinary and actual details of our lives in culture, almost as much as the occasional Spanner trial kind of repression.  Maybe someday our culture will be strong enough that this kind of surreal romp full of semi-offensive stereotypes (our domme was once a young girl, who had feelings...these are awakened by screwing a vanilla man), will read as fun kitsch.   But it doesn't now.And I give this a 2 because our cinema is so bad that this and Exit to Eden make the top tier.
Mansfield Park. Anyone basing their understanding of this Austen novel on this movie alone will be misled.  Perhaps the director or producer wanted to make the film "relevant" to today's "hip" audiences (which don't understand anything sophisticated).  While the film was helpful to me in establishing the characters prior to my reading the book itself, I found that the novel has none of the raciness or even some of the scenes that are found in this film.  As is often the case, viewers will find that "the book is much better than the movie."  The acting is fine, but what the actors are asked to act is not faithful to how the real story unfolds.
Why ?. It's not actualy porn and it's not actualy an entertaining movie. I must have missed the point. No story line, no romance, no reach around. I usually have good things to say but this was a poor investment
I feel Sorry For Pierce Brosnan. Pierce Brosnan last performance as James Bond will ultimately be described as a joke. This movie is not that bad, but its hard for anyone over nine to take this movie serious. Ice castle? Invisible cars? The endless puns? Madonna as a fencing instructor? Need I say more? The director turned Brosnan's Bond into a cartoon character without Connery's sophistication, Dalton's hard approach, or Moore's humor. Its really sad, but its a hard fact that Brosnan best outing as Bond was his first in "Goldeneye". Let's just hope the new Bond (the brilliant actor Daniel Craig) will NOT allow the writers to reduce his Bond into a sad joke
Will Denis Leary ever figure out he can't act... Well the title kind of says it all. Dull,ugly,boring men in a dull,ugly boring movie. Also the most unreallistic sexual pairing in the world. Stunningly beautiful Elizabeth Hurley with ugly, skinny, beaked nosed  Denis Leary.Steve Buscemi is comical as usual and adds the only bright spot to the film.
Muffled vocals ruin an otherwise enjoyable concert. The line up of 60's and 70's soulsters is interesting - an eclectic mixture of the well known and the not so famous. The backing orchestration and vocals are excellent. However, everything unravels when the lead vocals commence. The singers all sound as if there was a curtain between them and the microphone when the recordings were made.   It is not just a matter of 60 year old vocal chords being weaker than 20 year old. It is not the obvious lack of proper balance between the audience noise and the music.  The simple problem is that the vocals were not mixed at the correct volume. I can understand such a problem with a 1960 concert. This is a 2003 production!  I am perplexed
Widescreen Or HD Blueray ?. i have to say i love this movie very well done.but after all these years of it's release why? has it not been put in widescreen format or updated on HD or Blueray or a new 2 disc DVD set the laser dics version is in widescreen format someone needs to get this out in the newer formats so we can really injoy this movie..
A great film given the basest possible DVD treatment from Fox Lorber. Most of those who were lucky enough to see this stunning Srdjan Dragojevic film at select film festivals in the U.S. have not forgotten its clarity, its anger, and its power.  The movie was passed up for theatrical distribution, although it was readily available on VHS and now on DVD from Fox Lorber.This DVD is a bust in every thinkable way, although Fox Lorber was obviously aiming very low.  The phrase "bare-bones" is usually used to describe discs that are given rudimentary, dismissive releases, lacking supplements that more presumably marketable titles might warrant.  This DVD does contain a trailer, but the trailer, sadly, looks better than the feature.  "Bare-bones" would have been fine, but watching this disc is torture.It's obviously a quickie transfer from the VHS -- I could have produced a better amateur transfer -- with a loud hiss tainting the soundtrack throughout, poor audio balance (with dialogue pulsing between speakers in an artificial echo) poor contrast, a muddy, dark image, burnt-in subtitles, and so forth.  Fox Lorber were long the scourge of the art-film DVD market, and their soulless neglect of their titles has never been more apparent than in this disc.  New Yorker and Wellspring (formerly Winstar) are guilty of similar offenses
The fruits of Comte. While living in Rio I once asked my Marine Corps buddy Paul Y- why he thought Brazil never could get ahead.  He pondered for a moment then said: "Brazil is the only country that respects sociologists."  I didn't fully appreciate what he meant until I saw Bus 174, a film loaded with the blatherings of sociologists and social workers explaining the root causes of why a glue-sniffing, cocaine-snorting, fugitive thief named Sandro shot and killed an innocent girl on a Rio bus in a botched holdup.Then I understood.  When you've got a Constitution that says no one under 18 can be held criminally liable for anything (Article 228), you come to realize that you're in the grips of a sociological experiment gone horribly, horribly awry, that you're living in a nightmare of supremely stupid paternalistic sixties' utopianism, in a society with prescriptions for social problems wholly unconnected to reality or actual human behavior.  Watch this film and you'll see this ethos in its full twisted glory, from a bogus examination of root causes, to dimestore Freudian psychology, to neo-Marxist analysis.  Ironically, it's that last analysis that really has any traction.  Poor kids got to eat too, and if they steal to get food, it's at least understandable (c.f. Prov. 6:30).  When you steal to buy cocaine, however, then my compassion ends, as does the compassion of most people who are grounded in reality and common sense.In short, look for a lot of handwringing about why a young man would go nuts and kill a hostage, interspersed with victim, relative and police testimonials that are interesting and sometimes informative.  The incompetence of the police in the situation is staggering.  They must have had 50 chances for a perfect head shot and never took it.  What a disgrace for all concerned.  As for the fact that the cops who suffocated Sandro beat the rap, well that's why jury nullification was invented.Since we're on this same general subject, may I share a true confession with you?  First, some background.  I was an observer to the precursor to the Candelaria Massacre.  Because I didn't have a car at the time, twice a week I walked from Ilha das Cobras through Praca Pio X (where the Candelaria Church is located) to get to the...well, to get to a building located on Av. Presidente Roosevelt.  On July 23, 1993, I happened to be walking through Pio X in the afternoon and saw the commotion as the cops rounded up a bunch of kids while others taunted the cops and threw rocks at the patty wagon.  That of course was the genesis of the cops' determination for payback later that night.  My confession: before the massacre walking through Pio X scared the hell out of me because of all the street kids, one of whom I once saw stealing an old man's watch off his wrist.  Walking through Pio X after the massacre, I never feared for my safety again.  Infer from my confession what you will.
Deeply Embarrassing. My children and I are great fans of the Alice In Wonderland interpretation starring Tina Majorino and so we looked forward to seeing what we thought would be an equally interesting Looking Glass.  Unfortunately this effort is embarrassingly inept, and repeats - but without the charm - many of the episodes present in the previous story.  My nearly-nine-year-old daughter succinctly captured the true awfulness of this presentation when she said, "it's just boring.
Does Amazon evan watch their movies. what the hell is this!!!Don't see this movie at all.I don't know what these people are on    ,but don't believe their lies.the story goes when this kid and his mental girlfriend are in a motercycle accident and the kid's girlfriend dies so he brings her back with 2-4-5 trixon.get this know the zombies eat flesh(you heard me,"flesh"not brains but "flesh").if you own this movie take it out to the back yard and eighther shoot it with a BB gun or burn it
No information, no pictures. The film shows no action, except a disgusting performance of cutting apart a dead body, and you ask yourself, in what relation to the subject of the film this stands. (Sorry, forgot the 3-second-sceen of a naked young man) Just the head of 17-year-old lads, who wonder why they got infected, when they work as prostitute,  explaning in detail what they are to do in this job and where you can find them in Prag. (Like advertising) You are provided with not the least background information about their education, why they left their home town, why they have no normal job. I would wonder what politics think and do  about the youth in the new EC-country, what young people get told about the danger of deceases at school, and what other chances they have in life
Waste Of Talent!. The movie did have some funny parts, but was not up to Mel Brooks standards.  Young Frankenstein, it was not.  Not a movie for children under 18.  Simply one of those movies where great talent was wasted
This Is Not A Good Thai Horror Film: Very Disappointing!. I will be the first to admit that I was expecting this film to be a little better than it was. Having seen the film "Nang Nak," directed by Nonzee Nimibutr, and starring Initra Jaroenpura as Nak, and Winai Kraibutr as Mak, I guess I expected a little too much from this film. I do not wish to discourage other viewers from viewing the film; however, it just is not a very good film. I can understand the viewers below giving it one star. It should have been better. For those who are not familiar with this legendary ghost story; Mae Nak Phrakhanong is one of the most familiar folklore legends to come out of Thailand. And if you have seen the 1999 film, the story is a very sad one.In the 1999 film, "Nang Nak," which took place in the 19th-century, Nak and her baby have died while the husband Mak was off to war. When he returned, he resumed his life with his family, unaware that his loved ones were dead. Therefore, the villagers tried to warn Mak that his wife and child were dead. Buddhist monks and others interfered to help Mak, however, he refused to listen. That is until one day he discovered while looking between his legs [part of seeing a ghost in Thai legend] that he uncovered the truth. Nak's love for Mak was great, and she tried to reach out to Mak. Meanwhile her body was given a formal Buddhist ritual which finally put her and child to rest. At least in theory. Fast forward to the 21st-century and Mae Nak is still not at rest.I will not give out spoilers to the film as it is pretty much a new release here in the west, and many have not seen the film. The story is set Bangkok, and two young newlyweds, Mak (Siwat Chotchaicharin) and Nak (Pataratida Pacharawirapong) have settled into a new home, which bring both of them into contact with the ghost Mae Nak. They have also acquired an old antique brooch [purchased by Mak]. This brooch has a connection to Mae Nak [no spoilers] The spirit of Mae Nak (Portnip Papanai) however is not at rest, and there are certain interactions she makes between these two newlyweds. I don't wish to give out too much which will ruin the film for you, however, this film is a huge disappointment. Especially considering that it is a Tartan Release. This is not a scary film, however, horror is a genre that each of us see differently. I recommend that you rent the film first. However, be prepared to be disappointed. [Stars: 1.5]
How can you write a review for something that's not out?. How can you rate something that hasn't been released?  Especially since Lionsgate RUINED Season 5 by releasing the shortened syndicated versions while still writing on the box "The Complete 5th Season".  Debbie Harry is credited on the box while her scene was omitted.  This along with many others...They completely ruined the boxed set by issuing shortened, crappy syndicated episodes.  This is coming from a huge W&G fan, or should I say K&J fan
Forget "Slither," Seek out "Night of the Creeps". Night of the Creeps rules all.  Slither is basically a somewhat higher-budgeted rip off.  Slugs, zombies, aliens...play by play rip.  Night of the Creeps was able to accomplish SO much more with So much less.  Plus it had Tom Atkins. See "Creeps" and you'll see what I mean
Not what it seems. Skateboarding could really do without self conscious myth making like this. One part that really got me mad was the film maker saying "These guys were making history every single day!" or something to that effect. Who are the egotistical ones, the filmakers there to get rich and famous or the skaters who made their own decks and skated curbs in the rain for the enjoyment of it? I eventually flicked channels half way through the movie after a piece of dubious editing.Stuff like this gets in the way of skateboarding
Great Information, Poorly Presented. I bought this film after being fascinated with What The Bleep Do We Know.The problem with this one is that Dr. Tiller assumes his audience has a background in physics..I am showing my own ignornance in giving it one star...But I couldn't follow the dang thing even though I knew the information was true and vital...If you're a dummy like me, stick with "Bleep"..Jack Schlatte
Alone in the rack... ...is what this movie is because it will forever sit on the DVD rack and never be bought.  I had to buy this movie when it first came out simply because I liked the game, and I thought it was going to be about the game, but boy was I ever wrong.  The only real similarities were the name of the main character.  I deeply regret having bought this piece of crapp, it is so horrible that I for once have nothing good to say about it.  I would give it a rating of zero if I could, it is by far the worst movie I have ever seen.  The first time (yeah it took me a couple of tries to watch it in its entirety), I tried watching it I had some friends over.  From the begining we could tell this movie was lame, nothing made sense and it was just utterly ridiculous.  We started joking around making fun of it, lost interest immediately, and then I was the laughing stock for having bought it.  So after a few months it was just sitting in my shelf, and I figured since I paid $20 for it I may as well watch it at least once.  Let me tell you that was the most painful and wasteful hour and a half of my life.  The only reason I am taking the time to review it is to let you people know how spectacularly awful it is. Stay clear from this pile of garbage
Ok... The new &quot;Christy&quot; was ok. But the original cast with Kelly Martin and Tyn Daly will alway be Christy and Miss Alice. I just thought that the girl they got to play Christy was so bland and calm when the Character was actually a little more fiesty. But that wasn't even my main problem with it. My problem was that they had replaced all the character's which is fine, but if your going to do that. Then replace all that characters. Dr.Mcneil is played by that same actor that was in the telvision series. He had chemistry with Kelly Martin. You knew those two. They had no history with him and &quot;NEW CHRISTY&quot;. It just didn't seem right to have him played by the same man and everyhting around him different. I might have enjoyed it more if they had gotten a different actor b/c then I wouldn't thought through the whole thing, NO THIS WRONG. We watched the series as him and Kelly battled and domewhat flirted and You were so upset when they left you hanging. But to add new people and then keep him. Just wasn't right..
Beware the Fog...literally. "The Fog" is a fairly typical representative of a John Carpenter movie. It certainly has its moments, yet it leaves the viewer with an unmistakable feeling of "what might have been." In this sense it reminds me a bit of Michael Mann's 1985 version of F. Paul Wilson's "The Keep", another fascinating yet flawed horror movie which I watch over and over again in the vain hopes of discovering that it is actually good.Stripped to the bone, "The Fog" is the story of a small New England fishing town which is about to celebrate its centennial (or bicentennial....or anniversary of some type). On the eve of this occasion the local priest, a drunken sot played by Hal Holbrook, discovers that the town - like all horror movie small towns - has a terrible secret linked to its founding. This discovery coincides with the appearance of a nasty fog off the coast which tends to leave dead people in its wake, and is moving towards the town. Various characters in the town, including a local beer-guzzler (Tom Atkins) a nubile hitch-hiker (Jamie Lee Curtis) a radio deejay (Adrienne Barbeau) and so on, are all isolated by the fog and soon discover what is inside it, and how it is related to the "terrible secret", an old sin for which the modern-day townsfolk mist pay.As you can see, while the idea is not exactly new it is pretty cool, and when I popped "The Fog" into my ancient DVD player recently I did so after a hiatus of many years, with the hope that my earlier judgement on the film was wrong. In this I was disappointed. Like "The Keep", "The Fog" never gets any better; unlike "The Keep" it actually gets worse.On paper this should not have happened. Besides Carpenter, who was coming off well-received efforts like "Assault on Precinct 13" and "Halloween" there is an impressive cast of actors which actually reunites a good bit of the original "Halloween" crew. Besides Carptenter and Jamie Lee Curtis, there is also the girl who played Annie (Michael's first onscreen victim), as well as the guy who played the Sheriff in both H and H-2. Replacing the ubiquitous Donald Pleasance is Hal Halbrook, and the venerable John Houseman makes an appearance in the film's opening as a creepy, storytellin' sea captain. Even Janet Leigh is involved, as the bitchy yet rather likable wife of a Fog victim. Ironically, tis is part of the film's problem, and it has many.First off, there are far too many characters. The film is cluttered with them and for some reason Carpenter disobeyed the standard horror movie order of whittling them down as the film progresses. Most of the victims are throwaways in no way integral to the plot, and nearly everybody introduced at the beginning is still walking around at the end. We needed more killings, not less.Second, the performances. This movie has good actors, but the dialogue is at best inconsistent and at worst embarrassingly stupid. The worst of it is ladeled onto Adrienne Barbeau, who gets to repeat idiocies like, "My son is trapped! Trapped by the fog!" and "Look out, into the darkness....and beware of the fog!" Gag.Third, the villain(s). Carptenter achieved some neatly creepy atmosphere at the beginning of the film, but he never delivers on it: there is no real payoff. This is because he couldn't seem to decide whether it was the fog itself or what was IN the fog was the actual "baddie" of the film. The result is that no one antagonist ever really emerges. "The Fog" might as well be a run o' the mill flood - faceless and impersonal.The movie does have its moments -- the creepy opening, the moments of atmospheric horror at sea, and the excellent cinematography, which is used to particular effect on the creepy fog-dwellers. But in the end these fail to outweigh the movie's many flaws.As of today, I still regard Carptenter as the most wildly inconsistent director out there. On the one hand he gave us P-13, Halloween, Escape from New York, and The Thing, all classics (cult or otherwise). On the other hand he also gave us crap like Prince of Darkness and the unwatchable Ghosts of Mars. In between there are the fun but flawed outings like They Live and In the Mouth of Madness. I would like to say that The Fog falls in this last category, but I really can't. It just isn't very good, and that's the sad fact of it. Bottom line? Beware The Fog.
out with the new and in with the old. man i wish they would make the round house for dvd , now that was the show right there that tought me everything i needed to know growing up
GOD . FORGIVE . THEM . FOR . THEIR . COVER . ART. Since this is one of my top four all-time favorite films and I love films passionately, I am ABSOLUTELY beside myself in fury and anger at the HORRIBLE packaging on this magnificent film. I could forgive the lack of extras. I know A LOT of people working for these international movie conglomerates don't give a damn about the Classics (or even movies in general, really). But the lack of thought that went into the packaging of this truly great, PERFECT, scene-by-scene-, shot-by-shot, movie is STAGGERING. Not only do they include a throwaway line of dialog in the middle of the images, not only do they clutter it up with a bunch of extras from a scene in the boxing ring... they picture the villianess, not the heroine, with the hero ! Where is the original poster art !!!!! THe insert art !!! The half sheet art !!! The reissue art !!! There . isnt . even . a . booklet . . or . flyer . inside . NOTHING ! This looks like a release that belongs in the cheapie bin with the public domain stuff . Columbia Pictures.. I am shouting . At . YOU
This filmis shot too too dark. I love Ford harrison movies and this is not a bad story but the film is shot in such dark showdy lighthing by the cinematographer that it is unwatchable that it ruins the film and all the acting, directing and writing in it.
hehe .. ooooh. Pinocchio       -     24.50101 Dalmatians  -     19.99Mulan           -     22.49Hercules        -     22.49Peter Pan       -     29.99Lion King .. not LKII 22.49Lady and the Tramp    24.00Jungle Book     -     22.99Little Mermaid  -     18.99Grand Total:    -     207.93All of them are special editions and I've not the listed reduced private seller price, thats the straight up corporate sham price. I regularly shop for awards/trophys and I couldn't imagine a pretty case with plate gold finish costing more than 80 bucks thats 287.93 You could still take your sweetheart to the movies and Benigans for some baked potato soup for this inflated price. I'm not sure .. But I don't THINK this case is platinum, makes you look any younger, make you fly or will help you sleep better so .. I think I've made my point
No Review. I returned this item because it was the wrong DVD and ordered "The Iceman" a different DVD
DVD High Wind in Jamaica. Had to send this back as not compatible with my DVD player.
Wish I could give this 0 or .5 stars .. horrible job DreamWorks. Actually, I wish Amazon would allow for two ratings ... one for the movie itself, and one for the DVD.  Fantastic movie, horrendous DVD transfer by DreamWorks.  As has been stated by everyone here, the way DreamWorks has handled this movie is shameful and beyond disappointing.Do NOT buy this DVD ... it simply is not worth parting with your hard earned cash.  Either rent it or find a away to watch the newly released Australian or UK releases (~March 2006) which have DD 5.1 and DTS 5.1 English voice-over tracks
I Didn't Get It. Some interesting dialogue sprinkled about within a mostly nonsensical, dull, and slow plot.  Also, the whole thing is in Swedish with hard to read English subtitles.  Blah.  The film critics will love this one because it gives them bizarre, convoluted material upon which to ponder self-importantly.  It's really not worth pondering, though.
Good luck being granted a second date if you took her to this on your FIRST date. I gave two stars to this movie for exactly two benefits I gained from watching it.  These benefits are illustrated by the next two paragraphs.There is absolutely beautiful cinematography.  Depictions of Provence, a region of France adjacent to both the Mediterranean Sea and Italy, were bountiful and beautiful.  Director Ridley Scott's showcasing of the scenes representing Provence is enough to make one consider clicking the "complete order" button for a 14-day European vacation extravaganza.That catchy little tune by Alizee, "Moi Lolita", made a brief appearance in the movie which catapulted the song back into my consciousness.  The song, of course, is one of many attempts by the media to capitalize on the cultural sensation of Vladimir Nabokov's controversial novel, "Lolita", but that is another story entirely.*plot summation information below*The essence of the story is the tired clich of greedy, amoral pig finding meaning, love, and purpose via the simple equation of:  abandoned family estate + attractive native love interest + beautiful French countryside = happiness.  Max (Russell Crowe) is a wildly successful but unscrupulous power broker, who never met a market he didn't want to manipulate.  Following a particularly successful business adventure, his assistant clues him in to the possibility that he is at risk of being investigated by the trade regulatory commission.  As a partial solution, she and his superiors recommend that he take a temporary leave of absence from the company, preferably out of the country, until the heat dies down.  As luck would have it, Max's uncle recently died in Provence, and since he left no will, the winery previously under his care is automatically bequeathed to Max, as he is the closest known relative.*end plot summation information*Many have complained about the sheer predictability of the plot, and that is definitely a negative aspect of this film, but not necessarily a terminal one.  What did kill my enjoyment of the film is the utterly nonsensical editing.  Scenes flash by without any semblance of explanation.  Cut to a conversation, seemingly for no reason at all, explain nothing, and then cut do the next scene just as one is beginning to soak up the scenery.  Include several characters in scenes without any actual suggested or implied reason for their placement there.  Speed up the action in one or two semi-montage scenes in the vein of a physical-comedy film, with no pre- or post-scene comedic introduction or resolution.  Finally, splice in a post-"fin" scene which could only be described as surreal.In essence, this movie was 200 mini-films spliced into one.  At least, that's the impression I got, and it totally destroyed my suspension of disbelief.  There are other negatives:  the lame stereotyping (of secretaries, of Americans, of European humor), plots that go nowhere ("good"/"bad" wine secret "conspiracy"), and humor attempts which can only be labeled as "wince-inducing", among many, many other detrimental attributes.Not even worth renting, unless your friend has already rented it, AND you have cleaned all the gunk you could reasonably be expected to clean out of your fingernails already.Romantic comedy lovers:  this is neither romantic nor funny, so if you just HAVE to see the handsome Russell Crowe or the beautiful Marion Cotillard, buy a poster instead."Gladiator" or "Black Hawk Down" fans:  no, even with the breakneck editing, it is still not an action movie.Scenery fans:  turn off the audio, fast-forward to the "scenery" scenes, and keep the Semillon flowing...I would recommend three bottles per person
Stick with an Original. Why American production make HK movies look so cheap? First of all, they cut off so much scene, second of all ruin it by making look acting so dumb by English Dubb. For ANY of HK movies, ALWAYS stick with ORIGINAL LICENSED HK RELEASE. Be careful with cheap imports, boots though
if this one could be a perfect spy, then. every con artist could be a better spy than this perfect spy.a guy came from a con artist parent, at first looked smart when he was young, then after he completely became a grown man, he seemed to lose all the wits and merits and turned out to be a stupid and naive so-called spy. well, le carre's novels were all like this, all the english intelligence organizations were nothing but wimpy, dim-wit in the game of the cold war. the worst of this mini series was that only the guy who played the perfect spy aging from volumne one to volume 2, but all the years his father, his father's peers, his superior, his controller, none of them ever looked older. nothing changed actually. this was very bad adaptation from a very bad novel. i just don't and can't understand what in the world that any sane reader would have found le carre's spy novels intriguing, nor could i understand how and why in the world his novels would inspire the movie producers to adapt his novels into lame, bore-to-death, dreary and long movies one after another, again and again. espionage like this, in this way? by god, indeed was nothing just child play, don't you think
The box set is only a gimmick. Save your money and buy the DVDs individually. Please note: I am giving a 1-star rating to the overall "Seinfeld Limited Edition Gift Set (Seasons 1-3 with Original Script, Salt & Pepper Shakers, and Playing Cards)." The episodes themselves are great 5-star affairs.I just wanted to give a heads-up to prospective buyers that this box set is a bit of a letdown. The salt and pepper shakers are miniatures that stand about three inches tall, the so-called "original script" is a cheap miniature photocopy of a script (and is hardly legible), and as for it being signed, well, think again. It is not literally signed. What you really get is a photocopy of Larry David's signature on a small and useless photocopy of a script, with photocopies of illegible scribings by David throughout the script. If you want a signed script, I'd suggest looking elsewhere for one that is literally signed in-person and has a Certificate of Authenticity. And the playing cards are small and useless as well.I know this box set is very attractive. Obviously, that's why I bought it myself. But it really is quite a disappointment once you open it up. I recommend buying the DVDs for seasons 1-3 individually. You will save about thirty bucks.
Good thriller, lousy DVD. Bravo MGM; you've managed yet again to screw up a great movie with a terrible DVD. -It's actually an ORION picture, and I'd hoped that they would've cared more about its appearance, but no such luck. Of my 100+ DVDs, this is one of the worst looking with dull colors and a fuzzy image. (Let's hope they're more careful with their upcoming Woody Allen ORION collection.) This is a rather oldfashioned straight-ahead action suspenser like they just don't make them anymore in Hollywood, but it's difficult to be thrilled about that when you know you can enjoy a much sharper version on TV. Hackman, Heard, Cassidy and Jones lead a good cast, but in order to see them clearly we desperately need a remastering of this otherwise wonderful movie. Until then, avoid like the plague
just the "new" metallica. I remember when Metallic a said they would never make a video.  Just get Kill em all, Ride the lightning and Master of puppets.  This was metallica.  They died with Cliff Burton.  RIP Metallica
Terrible dvd. DON'T BUY... It is terrible as a matter of fact two of the DVD's in the collection are the same..A total let down and I can't believe they are selling the DVD like this.A total waste of money..
Awful. Don't make the mistake and buy/rent this movie based on all the 5-star reviews.  This movie is lousy.  It is not funny, but stupid. Do you enjoy movies where the actors talk at you as if you and they were face-to-face? I don't. The comedy is forced (with some interludes that are unrelated to the movie). And then they throw the AIDs theme in there, but they treat AIDs as if it were a joke. Don't waste your money.  Don't waste your time
Lots of Negative Energy. Sounds like a man with a chip on his shoulder. A lot of pent up anger. Hardly a spiritual place to be. Jesus was innoncent too, Michael.
Anthropophagus: The Grim Reaper. One has to admire the career of cult director Joe D'Amato. He's made everything from action, drama, comedy, westerns, horror and even porn. And porn/horror.According to the IMDb Joe D'Amato has 198 films credited as director and with all the names he used I wouldn't be surprised if he had more.Anthropophagus: The Grim Reaper was directed by Joe D'Amato and written by and starring cult actor George Eastman.The Grim Reaper has become quite infamous for the gore scenes and in particular the fetus ripping scene, all which I will touch upon later on.Fans are in the middle on this one. Some see it as slow and boring, others as a really scary flick.I normally like movies like this that move at a slow pace, but this time it just didn't work.The slow pace worked great in D'Amato's Beyond the Darkness. The movie was weird and disturbing and that is what kept it from being boring. But here things in my opinion didn't work as well.The first hour is painfully boring. What Joe D'Amato was aiming for was a feeling of dread, which just didn't seem to work like it did in Beyond the Darkness.The characters also were quite boring. Had they been interesting than maybe what D'Amato was going for would have worked. The cast though is excellent.Serena Grandi who is known as the Italian Dolly Parton is one of the stars as I mentioned George Eastman (this guy is great). And Tisa Farrow, yes Mia Farrow's sister.But 3 good actors still doesn't make this movie rise above. Had the characters been good well I think what Joe D. was going for would have worked better.As for the gore it's really not that much, the final gore scene is quite graphic, but the rest wasn't much.The late 70s the gore films really began and the 80s it blew up and Italy capitalized on that. But The Grim Reaper really isn't the gore movie it's made out to be and even the fetus-ripping scene isn't a big deal like it's made out to.That's not something we see a lot of in film so I understand why people talk about it.I just never felt the dread D'Amato was going for. Eastman like always is great, but really not used to his potential. The guy is 6'9! But he wasn't as intimidating as he should have been.Fans of Italian cinema and of Joe D'Amato might wanna check this out. Despite my feelings I understand why some love it.I felt the tension built up didn't work, but if you watch it and think it does this movie will deliver.Regardless of how I felt I'm still a fan of Joe D'Amato and will always buy his flicks.
"So-So, but falls short!". I found this installment on 'Waverly Hills' to be fair but not really that great!  The photos of "Ghosts", "Shadow People", and "Orbs" are very poor and hard to define.  This DVD is more a historical documentary on the history of Waverly, not so much the "Hauntings".
Best seen with low expectations. A strong sense of place was one of the many strengths of Matthieu Kassovitz's under-rated crowd-pleaser 'The Crimson Rivers,' one of the best French thrillers in years, but, despite including dying steel towns, artificial lakes, monasteries and even the Maginot Line among its locations, it's one of the many things missing from its in-name-only sequel. Other notable absences include confident direction, decent plotting, concise characterisation and a real sense of conviction in its larger than life premise, not to mention almost anybody associated with the original.With only Jean Reno returning and Luc Besson providing the very uninspired script, my expectations for this were extremely low but, in all fairness, it wasn't as bad as I expected. But then, it wasn't very good either - just relentlessly average, predictable and forgettable. None of the class or style of the first one, weak TV-show characterisation (right down to the terrible 'end on a joke' cop show clich) and an old hat religious conspiracy plot that rehashes a few elements of the original (chasing super-strong hooded figures, Nazi conspiracies, etc) to little effect. The writing is pretty lazy and the ending straight out of Raiders of the Lost Ark without the supernatural effects, but if you pitch your expectations low it passes the time. But it's very easy to see why Kassovitz, Vincent Cassel and composer Bruno Coulais didn't come back for this one: I'm willing to bet that if anyone else but Bresson wrote it, Reno would have skipped it too.A good package of extras are included, but you need to pitch your expectations low for the film itself
Dishonest with its material. A basically dishonest movie, lacking the courage of its convictions. This oscar-winning movie is in favor of illegal abortion, adultery, law breaking, disobedience of authority, yet it is shot in soft focus, like a Capra, feel-good movie!. The constant references to Dickens are more wishful than actual; old Charles would most likely be against all the values this film celebrate
Not Worth It!. One has to wonder if she really wasn't mad . . in her unfathomable feeling for her less than stellar husband.  He was able to find water cooled by ice some 500 years ago, and as soon as he started drinking glass after glass of it, one knew that there was something in that water that would do him in.  And seeing the Spanish nobles so anxious to take the crown from their legitimate Queen made no sense . . . there were too many unanswered questions, and too obvious shifts in plot to make this anything more than a pleasant view of early sixteenth century fashions and mores.  It was not a very good story, not very good history either, and I would not recommend it
purchased. Hi,I have not receive my item yat.Thanks
Be Warned!. I'm not going to give away any spoilers here, the reviews below will all tell you everything you want to know about plot etc... But they also seem to be trying to acknowledge it as a dark intellectual film, that veers toward Cronenberg or Lynchian in style.Do not listen to them, this film is shoddy as hell, it's like a bad student project that was just allowed to run and run, the pacing is so slow it kills any drama you could pull out of the story, there are no inciting incidents to spur the characters on and certainly no turning points in any of the acts, the story could've worked as a half hour episode of The Twilight Zone, but the whole piece plays like a monotonous monologue by some annoying guest at a party you've be trying to get away from all night. There's no thrill or chills here and certainly no brain food to chew over. The fact that the film looks like it was shot on a Sony Handycam only adds insult to injury.If you must see this film, rent it, you'll thank me for it later. I'm donating my copy to my film school as a lesson in what not to do to create a psychological horror
Lo de menos es el disfraz. Por qu se le ocurri a Tim Burton hacer un remake de este clsico? El resultado no puede ser peor...Slo fui a verla porque sale Tim. Que vestido de primate resultes igual de atractivo y apasionado que siempre es lo nico que vale la pena de toda la historia.Tus ojos siguen emitiendo fuego.Qu no se apague nunca!You Are The Best!
Should have been a rental. I was disappointed after the first 30 minutes and realized this was a bad knock off between "The Gospel" and "The Fighting Temptations".  I would not recommend purchasing.  You are better off renting
stupid liberal movie. right off the bat, JJ runs into an indian in the middle of nowhere, the indian has is gun JJ doesnt, oh boy the tension fills the air, no wait, for the FIRST TIME EVER, the indian turns and rides away, does NOT kill the white man, who is all alone on the Indians land, trying to catch HIS fish.     liberal revisionist trying to make the indian look like he is better than the white man, and oh smarter also, for just after that, JJ is trying to get a fire going "but" does this under a tree that has snow all over it, he gets the fire going and oh darn!  snow fell on it!  dumb white man!If this movie didnt have superstar Robert Redford in it, would of been just another dumb movie, like that idiot Timmy that made Grizzly Man.An Indian that lets a white man live all out in the middle of nowhere, LOL!  yes the white man stole the land, yes the white man did this that and everything else to the indians.   But its not like they were angels, they fought with each other just like the rest of the world has always done throught history.   to deny that, is just plain stupid.The 1970's, marks the turning point the liberals took over Hollyweird.  Clint Eastwood never would of made this move in the 1960's, or ever.
if this is "great," no wonder the french are exterminating themselves. The total absence of normative values makes for tedium, and revulsion, not for greatness.Nor even, for that matter, for titillation.When even father/daughter incest is treated as a matter of callous indifference, it becomes easy to see why the French are exterminating themselves, by refusing to reproduce themselves. At the fertility rate of 1.4 children per family, the French nation will be gone in another few generations. This movie will help the viewer see why.Sociologically and philosphically interesting, in that it epitomizes the banality of evil, and demonstrates the futility of putting lipstick on a pig. Secularism is devoid of soul, and offers nothing to live for, nothing to live by.
This movie is why Fairy tales should not be revisited. Fairy tales are written the way that they are written for a reason.  And when greedy producers and actors and directors realize this maybe the world will be a better place.  The characters in Fairy Tales aren't suppose to grow up. They are written for certain age groups and are moral lessons about concequences in life and how she/he's life will change depending on which choices that one will make and direction she/he follows
Kicking and Screaming...the whole movie!. Unless you think it's funny to watch a grown man scream at little children for an entire movie, I wouldn't recommend this
Awful. Don't make the mistake and buy/rent this movie based on all the 5-star reviews.  This movie is lousy.  It is not funny, but stupid. Do you enjoy movies where the actors talk at you as if you and they were face-to-face? I don't. The comedy is forced (with some interludes that are unrelated to the movie). And then they throw the AIDs theme in there, but they treat AIDs as if it were a joke. Don't waste your money.  Don't waste your time
Do Musicians have a conscience....?. Following Live 8 i have to wonder if Live Aid justifies the euphoria that followed it. Most people if honest would say that on the whole musically it was pretty bland and as for achieving its aims-well that's debatable. What it did manage to do was make Bob Geldof whom no matter how honourable his motive were done quite nicely out of it thank you. Before this his career was on the skids and now he is a household name, knighted by the monarchy and very,very rich. The same with U2 pushed them into the statosphere and made Bono think he is some sort of latter day prophet. Same with Queen pushed them into mega-stardom. So do musicians have a conscience or was it the chance to get maximum worldwide publicity, push their latest album all for fifteen minutes of stage time. Sounds pretty good to me. One can't help wonder that they could all give there royalties for the past year and wipe out the third world debt without coming on stage and screaming 'give me your money'. There was a shot(deleted of course) where backstage the good and the great were dining on expensive food and wine whilst up on stage was a backdrop of the starving. Another example of there hyprocrisy. Madonna singing 'imagine' on her latest tour '..imagine-no prosessions..yeah right! I can't help but think for all there posturing there was an eye on global exposure and a chance to feel good about themselves when they went back to their mansion and who would dispute that McCartneys version of 'let it be' was stomach churning? Face it the only musician (Peter Green ex-fleetwood mac) who wanted to give everything away to charity got certified. Proves a point
This is not what it seems. One reviewer wrote the review about the "Super Ants"....this is not that movie.This movie staring Dean Cain bites big time, unless you like movies about chases....there are several car chases, car chasing man, man chasing man, helicopter chasing car....Get the point?The plot is strained through out the movie in dribbles... if you can make it through the endless sceens showing actors walking around doing nothing,walking or staring blankly (probably wondering if this movie will ever be over).*** Fast forward special**
Good info, bad production!. I had to stop the DVD about 15 min into it.The information seems to be extremely interesting as I have been working on this thought process for years. I anxiously waited for the DVD to arrive to see what the author had to say about this topic. Unfortunately, the audio and visual quality of the material was too distracting from the presentation. I was expecting something like a Discovery or History Channel type production with images and historical facts to backup the presented material.Instead, the "music" is horrible, too loud, and it's hard to undertand what the author is saying in places, and the images are a constant collage of the author walking through museums and other places overlayed with images of artifacts to the point of sheer boredoom. There seems to be no purpose of the images other than to fill the screen with something. They may mean something in the author's mind, but how about explaining them to us. After 15 min of this, I had all I could take. I plan to send this back and order the book instead.I think the content is going to be good. But the production needs a complete rework, better yet, just make an audio CD with no music or at least dead quiet while the author is speaking! If you can get past the distractions, you might enjoy this DVD.
I have not yet received the DVD. I have not yet received the DVD, and I contacted the customer's service last month. They sent me a new shipment, but I am still waiting for it
SEX SEX SEX. This lurid, sex-gorged nudy has nothing to do with the Nicolas Cage thriller; instead it's more a soft porn peep show.  The characters who are not likeable in the least do stupid thing after stupid thing, and what's worse, seem bored doing it.  Johnathon Schaech and Lori Heuring, who are usually adept in their performances, are tepid and listless in this inane story about an aspiring politician, his nympho wife and a threesome that gets them into all sorts of trouble.  Poor Bruce Davison who is so good in KINGDOM HOSPITAL is lost in the role of Heurings judicial aspiring father, and the twist ending is unresolved so we've actually had no reason to want anything good to happen to anyone.  A waste of celluloid
This film is disgusting. If you want to watch a movie where young boys (unattractive teenage boys, ladies) sit in bath tubs, with no attempt to hide their private parts with bubbles.  All the while they curse back and forth at each other in such a harsh British accent, that all one can understand is the foul language; then this film is for you.Half way through, I took out my sharp compass and scrapped the word "Disgusting" across the DVD, so I could never make the same mistake of watching this rubbish again.  I'm U.S. Navy (Retired).  And I have never, ever, heard such needless foul language even from drunken sailors, as is in this film.
I don't understand all the 5 star reviews. I'll try to keep this review free of plot spoilers.I loved LFN seasons 1, 2, 3.  I never watched them on TV originally, but I have the DVDs.  I was looking forward to season 4 in a big way.I watched season 4 in a relatively short time period (about a week) and often found myself wondering "Why?".  The first 6 or so episodes of this season were, frankly, boring.  Suddenly, things got interesting for a while and things picked up a bit for several episodes and my hopes were restored.The 2nd half of the season turned into a hodge podge of random missions, mostly unrelated, and then, suddenly, the last few episodes where the power of the characters and pretty much everything we have come to believe about the characters is turned upside down.  I found these changes too inconsistent to swallow after seasons 1-3.  At least most of the acting and dialog around these changes was believable, even if the changes themselves were not.This season is worth buying to have the complete set, and yes, I will buy season 5 to see where things ultimately will land, but I'm not expecting too much.P.S. One very good thing about this season is the sub-plot about Birkoff.  The actor who plays Birkoff does a terrific job in this season
Liked this one the least...... maybe because I didn't like Porco. Everything was sub-par for me. Animation is definitely not as good as his later movies. Not enough weirdness, tried too much for the plot. Everything was just too ho-hum. As if he tried to carry the whole movie on Porco's shoulders. But once you got past the fact that everyone else was human and Porco was a pig there wasn't anything else there.
Confused Identification. Late at night a car goes off the highway and over a cliff. Mrs. Merrick survives, her husband has amnesia. The story begins to tell their history. Their trip to San Francisco brings back memories. But something seems to be wrong, somehow. Dan gets a shock when a hotel manager wishes his absent wife well! Dan starts to ease back into his job. He tracks down an invoice, and finds it was for a private investigator! This PI mailed (?) the negatives just before the car accident. Dan's wife was having an affair with a "Jack Stanton"; he has resigned and then disappeared. Dan follows his wife to a ship wreck on the site of a future development. When the PI contacts Dan, they follow Dan's wife to a hotel, then "Jack Stanton" leaves and they follow him to a road in the woods. Shots are fired, and they chase this car. Something is wrong!At night Dan sees the red car arrive at his home. Then he gets a shock after "Jack Stanton" enters his room. Dan gets details of what happened before the accident. His wife tells him they must pack and leave that night. But he gets a call from Jenny, who says she will call the police if he doesn't come over for a personal talk. Now the story becomes even more convoluted after Jenny is found dead. PI Gus Klein shows up to aid in the resolution to this story. But another surprise occurs to finish this story with a poetic ending. [I didn't find this story believable.] The moral is to call the police when you have reasonable suspicion about a crime.
A great show destroyed in its U.S. release. I saw this show on the original UK DVD release, where there was NO LAUGH TRACK!!!  This show is brilliant, but it's not meant to have an audience laughing along with it.  The laugh track completely destroys the entire atmosphere of the show and is altogether distracting and annoying.Don't buy the U.S. release.  Buy the UK release and watch it on a computer or a region free DVD player
Quality of transfers is disappointing - trash along with just o.k. transfers - most can be found in better quality elsewhere. 50 westerns, seems like a bargain?!  Well... maybe, depending on your tolerance for sub-par film transfers.  There are some great films here to be sure, but at least a third are pretty bad transfers, and the rest are mostly just marginal at best. Virtually all of the more commonly available films offered here can be found in significantly better quality elsewhere.Virtually all of the half dozen or so of the films from the 1960's are total trash - you can not watch these without getting a headache - totally unwatchable!!!  For example, check out "The Grand Duel" starring Lee Van Cleef in the sixties - a totally washed out, blurry disaster, probably one of the very worst film transfers I have ever seen on DVD (note: a much better film transfer of this movie is available on the Platinum issued Lee Van Cleef DVD).  On the other hand, in this collection you get an early 1940's era film like Howard Hughes' "The Outlaw" in near pristine condition.  Most of the other films in this collection fall somewhere in between quality wise.But, you should be aware that in most cases these same films can be found in significantly better quality in other generally superior DVD collections - see my other Amazon reviews for several examples. Check out "Tough Guys of the West" for a much better collection of 20 similar B-Westerns or check out any of the Platinum issued DVDs included in "The Great American Western" series.Included in this collection are several commonly found Roy Rogers and Gene Autry films - however, these are mostly just copies from fuzzy VHS and as a result most of them have a slight out of focus look to them - you get used to it after awhile and you can watch them o.k., but just be warned that the quality is somewhat lower than your average VHS tape.  I have found that the Madacy or Platinum issued Roy Rogers films are generally as good and in some cases better film transfers than what you find in this collection (see my review for the Madacy issued Roy Rogers DVDs).  Also, you might want to check out the Roan Group issued DVDs for some other Roy Rogers titles not included here in this collection (see my review for more details on those great DVDs).And then you have the Tex Ritter and Bob Steele films - these appear to be actually mastered from original 16mm or 35mm film - the only problem is that they tend to have a lot of scratches and splices at certain points.  In one Tex Ritter film the soundtrack gets out of synch with the action and talking for about 20 minutes.  But even so, you do get a reasonably sharp image direct from film instead of a third rate, fuzzy VHS copy.  And often these films run for quite a long time without any problems and when problems do pop up it's only for a minute or two - in other words, you can mostly enjoy the films without eye strain.  Even so, I will warn you that these particular early Bob Steele and Tex Ritter films are not really that great even considering the time period and the genre.  Both Tex and Bob have made better films than the ones offered in this collection - these are mostly just "o.k." performances - nothing great.If you like Bob Steele you should check out a superior performance in the film credited to Roy Rogers, "The Carson City Kid" which is included in this collection.  This is an early Roy Rogers (pre-Dale Evans) film which co-stars Bob Steele.  "Carson City Kid" is very enjoyable, but again, as noted above, the transfer of the Roy Rogers films here are not very sharp (the one put out by Madacy, for example, while still not perfect, is far better than the transfer included in this collection, while the one issued by Platinum easily has the best best picture of all, but that soundtrack is easily the worst!  So, take your pick!) - but, in any case, my point is that Bob Steele's performance as the bad guy in this film is much better than the other earlier films he stars in that are included in this collection."Vengence Valley" with Burt Lancaster is in color and a great movie, but the image here is not very sharp and the color is severely faded out as if copied from a VHS copy someone left on the dashboard of the car a bit too long!  I have the version issued by Platinum and it is nearly perfect with pretty good color and very sharp looking. Get the Platinum version and avoid the one in this collection!"The Kansan" and "Abilene Town" are both really great movies, but here they are both particularly fuzzy looking - again, another case of bad transfers from VHS?  "Abilene Town", for example, can be found in much, much better quality on the "Tough Guys of the West" DVD collection (see my review for "Tough Guys of the West").  "The Kansan" is also available on Alpha Video and while Alpha has a very mixed track record for some of these films, their version in this case is much better than the one in this collection - see my Amazon review).The early John Wayne films are also a mixed bag - most are fuzzy looking, but some might actually be from film instead of VHS copies - it's hard to tell.  "McLintock" from 1963 is basically trash in this collection - very fuzzy and very faded color. Please also note that "McLintock" is being released very shortly (or has been released by the time you read this) by the John Wayne estate on DVD - you will probably want get that one!Better film transfers of some of these early Lone Star Production John Wayne films (at least not any worse and in some cases significantly better) can found on the Roan Group DVD, "The Early Years Collection." I have a much better, near perfect DVD transfer of "Angel and the Bad Man" (from Good Times) compared to the fuzzy version you find in this set.A couple of other films are rare in that I have never seen them offered on DVD before, so you might need to get this set for those.  "Billy the Kid Trapped" and "Arizona Stagecoach" for instance are ones I had never seen before on DVD - I found both to be very enjoyable and are from film transfers, but again with a lot of splices and scratches at various points - but still very enjoyable and very watchable.  I don't think any of the Tex Ritter films are available elsewhere.  The same Bob Steele films in this collection are also offered on Alpha Video DVDs, but I don't know if they are in any better condition on Alpha than what you find here in this collection, but my guess is you would likely be better off with the Alpha versions.So, the bottom line is that you should get this if;(1) You need a good copy of "The Outlaw" - it's the only film here that is in pristine condition.(2) You need to have the few films that only appear in this DVD collection and nowhere else.(3) You don't want to spend a lot of money, and don't care about quality, yet you want to sample a lot of early B-Westerns to get some idea of what the genre looks like. Actually, on second thought, you would be far, far better off in getting the 10 DVD 20 movie collection "Tough Guys of the West" if that is your goal.  That collection gives you a much better bargain in terms of quality than the "50 Western Classics."Here's another tip for you.  If you are looking at B-Westerns for the first time you might want to check out the Hopalong Cassidy films offered by Platinium - there are 40 films total on 5 DVD volumes that you can get really cheap!  Some vendors sell these for less than two dollars a disc (each disc has 5 films on it)!  Do the math - with shipping you are looking at about $1 per film.  And they are in absolute pristine condition!  Check it out - the Hopalong Cassidy films are among the very best B-Westerns ever made.  The Red Ryder series is also available on DVD issued by VCI and I have seen most of them - they are great films with pretty good film transfers - you will not be disappointed in those.Here is the complete list of films in this set:John Wayne:Angel and the BadmanBlue SteelMcLintockSagebush TrailHell TownRoy Rogers:The Carson City KidColoradoYoung Bill HickokIn Old CalienteRough Riders Round-UpSheriff of TombstoneMy Pal TriggerCowboy and the SenoritaBells of San AngeloUnder California StarsTex Ritter:Rollin PlainsSing Cowboy SingThe Mystery of the Hooded HorsemanArizona DaysSong of the GringoSpringtime in the RockiesGene Autry:Round-Up Time in TexasMan of the FrontierRiders of the Whistling PinesBob Steele:Paroled To DieThe Oklahoma CycloneBruce Bennett:Daniel Boone, Trail BlazerVengeance Valley starring Burt LancasterBilly the Kid Trapped starring Buster CrabbeKentucky Rifle starring Chill WillsPainted Desert starring George O'BrienIt Can Be Done Amigo starring Jack PalanceGone with the West starring James CaanThe Outlaw starring Jane RussellWhite Comanche starring Joseph CottonPhantom Rancher starring Ken MaynardThe Grand Duel starring Lee Van CleefMohawk starring Neville BrandAbilene Town and 7th Cavalry starring Randolph ScottArizona Stagecoach starring Ray "Crash" CorriganBroadway to Cheyenne starring Rex BellThe Santa Fe Trail starring Errol FlynnAmerican Empire starring Richard DixThe Kansan starring Richard DixGunfight at Red Sands starring Richard HarrisonStagecoach to Denver starring Robert BlakeThe Sundowners starring Robert PrestonChina 9, Liberty 37 starring Warren OatesJudge Priest starring Will Rogers
Weak - Below Average. I was expecting more and got less. Pretty slow and boring. Not a keeper
Only watch it if you are a fan of the show. The TV show Are You Being Served? has to be one of my all time favorites, and I believe it truly is the funniest British comedy ever on TV.  However, the movie was lacking.As I first started watching this movie, while they were still in the shop, I noticed that something was lacking, that something about it felt empty.  It was the lack of a laugh track.  Now, in all honesty, most of the time I prefer there not be a laugh track, but in Are You Being Served, a laugh track is essential.  Without the laugh track, the comedic timing of the show was thrown off from the start.Then, as they get into the movie, the jokes aren't new, and the conflict is predictable and leaves you yearning for it to be over.If you are a huge fan of AYBS and want to have the complete collection, that is the only reason I would suggest buying this.  It is the only reason I bought it, and the only value I see in it.  There is definitely little (if any) entertainment value
just because. i recorded the live aid concert on vhs. & I mean i was up at six am to catch it when it started in australia. inxs was the bomb. & I would have bought this disc if they included "oz for africa' on it too. that was during the "listen like thieves" era (actually BEFORE the cd was released) not to mention a plethra of incredible talent all of which i'd love to have on dvd.& then to know that 85 other songs are missing from the dvd (of which i'm pretty sure i have on vhs still) it just kills me that someone sat down & decided what "the masses" would have liked to see. I'd be happier if someone just came out & said that they couldn't get the copyrights to the stuff. ok, i'm done with my ranting, thanks for the heads up. I won't be buying this until they include EVERYTHING damn it
not even Rammstein could save this movie. The first 3 minutes is all you that you need to see. It shows a spy being chased into a Rammstein concert where it shows them playing the song Feur Frei! After that the movie just sucks, it has a bad plot and bad acting
Soory at best I can only give it a 2 star. Beautiful women, I'm sure in my teen yeras and early early twenties this cauld have excited me, But all of the "Peach" DVDproductions that I've seen are the same and none rate high with me. Just seeing a Gal strip that is just a OK stripper after you've been around the world with many women, these don't excite a seasoned guy much
Beware, Ono promo video... I love the music on this DVD.  It's wonderful to hear many of John's best solo works in 5.1 surround; BUT that's where the praise for this release ends.  While some of the video is inoffensive, most of it is simply political and personal Ono promotional propaganda.  I felt as it she was in the room picking my pocket.  And what she did to the "Happy Christmas" video is a crime!  I'll never be able to listen to it again without images of dead babies coming to mind.  Yes, Lennon was a peace activist. I get it!  But give it a rest Yoko.  My advice is to either pass on this DVD (and buy the CD) or turn the cr@ppy video off while listening to the beautiful 5.1 mix
Not recommended by us. Our daughter has weak muscles and I wanted some workout videos we could do as a family to supplement her physical therapy. I saw all the good reviews and thought this would work for us especially since our girls love bears.  NOT!  It did not keep their attention and as adults the movie was a tad annoying to us.
Not for Beginners. This stability ball workout is definitely a more advanced routine and is not for beginners.  This was the first stability ball DVD that I purchased and became quickly frustrated with the routine due to the level.  If you are a beginner, I would recommend Leslie Sansone's You can do Stability Ball training.  If you are a beginner or more advanced, I would recommend Denise Austin's Shrink the Female Fat Zone or the QuickFix Stability Ball training.  My all time favorite DVD for the stability ball is Denise Austin.  This is by far my least favorite.
I've seen it all before...... this tour did nothing for me.  I won't lie when I say the visuals were appealing to look at, with britney in her cute clothes and stage sets, but she TOTALLY rips off janet jackson with her dancing, style of dress and so forth, so I don't understand why little teenagers like her and won't give ms. jackson the time of day when she's the one who did it better than her. I got a sense of deja vu when I watched bits of this show, I felt that she purposely stole elements from the janet, velvet rope and all for you tours such as the costumes! Janet's All For You Tour, Madonna's Drowned World Tour and even Michael Jackson's 30th Anniversary concert were far more entertaining in 2001, and way more superior than this garbage.  This garbage just goes to show that young & pretty stars are given more attention than those who actually have more talent that shines even without all the special effects in the world
Masterworks of the German Horror Cinema. The box set made by IMAGE (not ELITE) does not have all of the technical  problems that Paul Kesler wrote of in his review
fun, but absolutely pointless... I was a fan of House(the first of the series) and so purchased the combo DVD set of House and House 2.  I watched both movies with a friend recently and we decided that while House is pretty good, House 2 is definitely the kind of movie you waste an hour and a half on.  It is really quite dumb, but some of the creatures(i.e. "catter-dog" as I like to call him) are kind of fun to see.  I would suggest skipping the second House unless you just want to watch a movie to see how dumb a sequel can really be;-
Boring. I bought this movie after reading the rave reviews on this site.  I have to say I was highly disappointed.  Although the 2 main characters are very likeable and their acting is good, the disco-type music in this so-called scary movie was just annoying.  I also found the 'love-scene type' music very inappropriate.  The type of music they used just made me hate the movie even more.  I was hoping for a 'haunted house' theme in this movie and it just didn't deliver.  I will give this movie 2 stars because I liked the 2 main characters.  There are no gruesome murders or anything like that in this film
Zone. "U.S. and Canada only"So no need to market it to me in Europe
hate it. i fell asleep watching it, it's horrible. i do not recommend it, not worth watchin
Disaster at Sea. It takes better than two hours to find out if the faux legendary pianist 1900 will go down with the Virginian when it is blown up at sea after being taken out of service.  And it is two completely wasted hours.  Hard to say what is most annoying -- the omnipresent voiceover, the philosophical twaddle that rationalizes why he never leaves the ship, the philosophical twaddle when he almost leaves the ship, the bad acting, the farcical piano duel with Jelly Roll Morton, the fleeting love story with a young passenger who looks like Amelia Earhart confused about why she's on a ship instead of her plane. The movie is splendidly photographed -- give it that much.  I watched it because of the director's earlier Cinema Paradiso.  He is a far better cinematic teller of memoirs than of fables.
Ignorance is Bliss. It's quite amusing listening to Western audiences view this film as some sort of factual documentary on Iranian culture.  A dramatized production, based on a one-sided book which in itself is dramatized with inconsistencies.  This must be what passes for cultural education these days.I suppose the Westerners whom have gone to Iran and come back speaking of beauty and the warmth of the people obviously are suffering from a delusional disorder.  And the ones whom probably haven't stepped foot outside of their own backyard and rely on the news and Hollywood movies as their cultural guides are the authority.These are the same people who believe the president of Iran stated "Israel will be wiped off the map".  With a little research, they would see that this was a gross dramatization, aimed towards the truly naive.  But maybe those people don't care for the truth.  I guess it's true what they say; Ignorance is bliss
weird translation. as I remember when i watched the original chinese version, although it wasnt any big deal but I did like it as I remember, but this version is totally destroy that feeling, something about the translation is just bad to the core makes the movie like a piece of crap, especially some sound effect. Why don't they put the original track in it I hard can understand. if u can find some asian version and rewatch it u would agree with me. it worth my 3 stars with the original trac
Horrible..... Almost everything in this movie is a lie.... Although somethings in the movie happened almost all of it didn't happen the way the movie potrays.. This movie should be outlawed for its unrealistic potral of some of the most respected gangsters in American history..
The pros- Sam Elliot singing and more extras than I thought. The cons- everything else. What's going on here? All year, I've seen dozens of family movies, new and old. Of those I've seen, only two have been worth mentioning. They're actually incredible movies: The Cat Returns and Balto. Going into any family movie now though, I'm not expecting much. Barnyard didn't help that mind set. I'd like to tell you that I was disappointed by it, but it's exactly what I was expecting it to be. For the most part at least. I didn't expect it to rip off The Lion King, that's for sure. There's not a whole lot to Barnyard really, which is bad to say since the first trailers I saw for it almost 2 years ago made it seem like it'd be a cool lil' movie. Originally called Boy Tipping, it looked like a movie about farm animals getting back at humans who tease them on a regular basis. What happened? Well, considering how the final product turned out, I can't blame them for not showing much in trailers, since, like another bad recent family movie- Happy Feet, things get so boring that it's not worth mentioning. Now, don't think I'm some kid movie hater, because I'm not. Not one bit. But I can't see how anyone without vision or hearing problems can enjoy Barnyard. Why did this thing even get A-list actors to provide the voices? Man I hope Kevin James gets some good roles soon...We start out by meeting the crew of the farm, which is held together quite well by Ben the cow. He's a tall, dark and beefy bovine who takes out the coyotes who try to feast on the farm folk, and has never let a single animal get harmed under his watch. His son, Otis, doesn't seem like he could care much, since he's a young cow just looking to party and have a good time. He and his buddies skip out on a farm meeting just to go hill surfing. One night though, Ben is overwhelmed by coyotes, and passes away, right before his son. Otis is elected the new head of the farm, but thinks he can't handle it, so he goes about his care free ways, and the entire farm turns into one constant party. They even invite pizza delivery guys to the barn (isn't that sick if the cows and pigs are eating pepperoni though?), not caring too much if they get caught. Heck, when the farmer checks in on them and sees them throwing a huge party, they knock him out several times in order to fix everything. This makes up most of the middle of Barnyard, and it's pretty boring with few jokes that anyone will get much out of. Only later on when most of the chickens are held hostage, does Otis do the right thing and head out to save them, as well as deal with the coyotes like his dad before him.You could take out the entire second portion of Barnyard, and get the same results. The same jokes are used over and over to the point where you can think up a better one before it's even delivered. I kept falling asleep after the opening due to the lack of anything important or funny happening. Even the big musical numbers were dull. You'd think a rat with sunglasses singing Shaggy's "Boombastic" would be great, and I'm sure it would be, just not here. The only moment from the movie that sticks out in my mind is one that almost doesn't even fit in the movie. When Ben's taking out some coyotes, he's holding a guitar, and plays "I Won't Back Down" by Tom Petty. But given that it's Sam Elliot singing, with his signature deep voice, it's an even more beautiful rendition of the song. It's so great that being in this movie almost holds it down and makes me wonder if it should've even been put here in the first place. I guess mentioning the Lion King rip off bit is worth going into a little more here too. A lot of people claimed that Barnyard took what The Lion King had for the main plot point where Otis didn't want the responsibility of being the head of the farm. A minor thing that could be compared to many movies, sure. But the fact that he also doesn't want to because he makes an agreement with the head coyote (who strongly resembles Scar) seals the deal. Honestly, you're better off showing your kids The Lion King again. I also really do feel sorry for Kevin James being stuck in another lousy movie. After seeing his incredible stand up special, Sweat the Small Stuff, a few years ago, I knew the guy was awesome. His tv series is great too, but his lack of any good movie role choices, as far as I've seen at least, has me worried that he could be fading before he becomes a really big name like he should be.The picture transfer looks like it was taken from a decent VHS copy. Most CG movies made these days get a great transfer to dvd, but I Barnyard manages to fail in this department as well. Lots of out of focus scenes, fuzz and even some aliasing plague the print. The sound's nice and loud though, and those musical numbers sound great (at least, in the technical sense). Lots of use of surround here for about half the movie, which is more than most animated flicks these days.I remember commercials boasting that the special features were cool. But yet, once again, things just don't go like the advertisements would lead you to believe. The commentary being such a mess wasn't a good sign for how the other extras on the disc would be. It features Oedekerk, Marshal and "The Barnyard Crew", and is all over the place with people talking over each other. Someone could get a headache 15 minutes into this thing. They talk about some technical aspects, little in-jokes and the like, but never anything that interesting, as I've come to expect from Oedekerk. Boogying in the Barn is your standard featurette fare focusing on the band who made the original songs for Barnyard, North Mississippi All-stars. They seem pretty bored about the whole experience, even during the studio footage. Utter Talent is another short featurette that covers the voice actors, big or small. It's kinda sad to see the director praise some of the actors so much when most of them barely had 10  lines, namely Wanda Sykes and Andie MacDowell. Ironically enough, these two get tons of time during this extra, much more than they got in the movie. On top of this, I didn't even know Courtney Cox did the voice of the main female cow, and in seeing that, it feels like a waste of a big name actress. 'seems like she was expecting the movie to do better than it did. Keeping in the short featurette streak is An Animator's Life, probably the most boring of the bunch. The animators are stiff and keep showing differences between character designs that don't look that different. Having been interested in animation and character design for a long time, I didn't think I'd be saying that looking at something like this could be so boring. At least Method Acting With Kevin James ups things slightly- it's just footage of him on a farm with some cows, trying to act like them/gain inspiration from them. We also get about 10 minutes of deleted scenes with optional commentary. They wouldn't have helped the movie if they were left in, and are either in demi-complete animated or story board form. The Nick On-Air campaign is a series of little clips totaling 6 minutes, and are mostly trailers, but I guess exclusive to Nickelodeon. A lot of this footage is repeated from the previous featurettes, unfortunately. There are also the usual trailers, previews, a trailer for the game, music videos, and some DVD-ROM features (mostly games).Before this year, I wasn't heartless or anything regarding family movies. But after seeing many disasters, and now Barnyard, I could end up being that way unless something fresh graces my dvd player. Some other bad news I just found out, is that there's going to be a Barnyard tv series. Kevin James is left out of it, but I see that Wanda Sykes has signed on. I guess another lousy animated movie claims another victim into going for roles just to get a quick buck. Do yourself a favor and watch something else, or go do some kind of family activity instead. One that doesn't involve Barnyard. I haven't seen Open Season yet, but I can pretty much promise it's better than this
"O" Please!!!!!!!. For me this movie is a painfull thing to watch. I wish that I could give this 0 stars. The infamous fake "O" scene kind of recked true intamacy for me. It may be true that women do this but it is one of the worst kind of lie imaginable.One of the truths for us guys is that when we are cuddiling with a woman we fanasise that we are with the first girl we fell in love with.Just FYI.
How could anybody enjoy this?. "Problem Child" has made my top ten worst movies list.  How could anybody enjoy it?"Problem Child" paved the way for Little Monster movies.  In its footsteps would come "Clifford," "The Good Son" and more recently, "Are We There Yet?"  In this genre, children are little sadistic monsters who stop just short of killing their adult supervisors and cackle maniacally.  Usually, these movies are billed as "comedies."  In this one, this kid could have a tea party with Damien from "The Omen" and Samarra from "The Ring."  He's not funny, he's not charming or cute; he's a scary little creature.Plus, are we supposed to think it's funny that his idol is a serial killer?  That he writes letters to him?  That the serial killer comes to visit and "takes him away," therefore putting him in danger?  That the father proves himself at the end by battling the killer and rescuing the kid?Horrible, cringe-inducing stuff.  The filmmakers should have had a long discussion before making "Problem Child.
Very Bad. The DVD is poorly edited and insulting to anyone keenlyinterested in trad. blues/Robert Johnson/ and modern bluesinterpretors.  The viewer is presented with only tiny segments of actual performers playing.  5 minutes listening to some psuedo intellectual bilge followed by 2 minutes of part of a song. Keb Mo and G. Love get their performances butchered into 40 second-two minute clips.  This DVD is like AM radio-you never get a full song from anybody.  Forget this and get &quot;Can't You Hear the Wind Howl&quot;
No Show. Boring and not much insight. Just a rap film, nothing about the true  culture of hip-hop. Some decent preformances, but if you want to really get  the real, check out Rhyme &amp; Reason
very, very disappointing... and bad. The first film in this trilogy, Koyaanisqatsi, is a classic.The second, Powaqatsi, is not as good but still worth watching.Naqoyaqaatsi, to quote some other reviewers, is just 'a mishmash of computer-treated footage, signifying nothing'... 'all quite forgettable'... except that the feeling of disillusionment and disappointment is hard to forget... The absence of Ron Fricke and his incredible cinematography that mad the other films so great stops this from even being interesting.Don't waste your time.
Great movie, but. I second the reviews below.  This is a 5-star movie, but the quality of this transfer is horrible.  Parts of the movie are very scratchy and full of film debris.  Worst yet, to me, are the subtitles.  They are laughable.  Almost every subtitle contained some error.  While it was (sorta) fun to laugh and the odd subtitles, that tended to remove me emotionally from the film.  Too bad.  The same comments apply to the "Raise the Red Lantern" release from this same company
Good cast, slow, just overdone on driving the point home. First off, this is a very wordy, wanna be woody allen type film, which means just not funny.  In the trailer, they did pick a few of the humerous parts, but it just really isn't a comedy.  Secondly, if the characters would just shut up once in a while and actually work on their problems (epecially jennifer aniston's character), then the characters would get things done in their lives. Therapy is what Aniston's character really needed, or a boot to the head.  True friends would have gotten her help before she got to where she did in this film.There were parts that were amusing, because it depicted real life scenerios, and pointed out irony, but that gets old real quick. This movie did have a good cast, and a reasonable message that friends are what matter, and that true friendship comes easy by being yourself.  That is what gets this film two stars.   Rent this movie (don't buy it), but best if you borrow this from someone else who rents it.  I only saw it because my wife rented it. You won't want to see it twice.
Well, it could have been worse. Really. Bay of Blood (Mario Bava, 1971)It amuses me that Mario Bava himself hated this movie. The first thing I thought after it was over was "man, that was miles better than Black Sunday." It's still not worth rewatching, but if you've steered clear of Bava after watching the borefest that was Black Sunday, this may entice you to at least give him another try.The plot, what little of it there is, is this; a husband kills his wife in order to get his hands on some land that includes a private lake (the bay of the title). Her daughter stages a suicide, so she can run around uninhibited by family obligations trying to get said bay back with a couple of hired hands with less than pristine motives themselves. A bunch of partying kids happens on the scene completely by accident. Complications ensue.It's hopelessly entangled in its own plot, despite that plot not being in any way complex. It throws in a good deal of gratuitous violence and not nearly enough gratuitous nudity (but some, at least, courtesy the lovely softcore actress Brigitte Skay), foreshadowing just about every silly slasher film to come. Basically, it's mindless fun. Dario Argento did it far better a few years later with Profondo Rosso; see that instead. *
It is not special. This product is routine Yoga and is not something unique. It is exactly which you can find in other Yoga classes
old documentary!. Please think this DVD is recorded in 1986. More worse, this is recorded as a documentary. Sound quality is worst. After I bought this and DVD of &quot;Company&quot; (same, worst sound quality DOCUMENTARY), I suspect the word &quot;concert&quot; or &quot;soundtrack&quot; in DVD title
Confusing, too many characters, difficult to follow story line. Simply put: the movie is boring.  Clich upon clich is confirmed and story lines never come together. It seems as if the director was unsure whether to make a movie or a documentary. The main plot is very thin (a CIA agent is ordered to kill an oil prince, gets caught and then warns the prince (why?)) and therefore some elements were added to make the movie more interesting. So, a kid dies, which results in the "natural" response of the father: freely advising the person indirectly responsible for his son's death. The lawyer has a drunk "friend" and keeps him around, why, no one knows. Some kids become suicide terrorists and blow up a ship.All in all, this is one of the worst movies I have seen in quite a while. I was neither entertained nor intellectually challenged. I neither laughed nor cried, I did not gain an understanding nor was I compelled to learn more or take up a cause. It meant nothing to me, which in my eyes is the worst one can say about a movie.Save your money, save your time, choose another movie.
Have your kids watch someone get verbally abused through half the movie. This is a wonderful movie - with much more artistic content than the earlier shorter Christmas story video.  It is great except that for half the movie people are calling Charlie Brown names.  Blockhead, worthless, etc etc.  We had to stop the movie while our four year old was half through.  I should have prescreened it.I don't trust peanuts videos now - for my impressionable four year old.  Maybe when she is older..
Promising series, defective dvd, don't take the risk. I managed to watch only one of the 39 shows presented on this series.  The second episode began to fall apart into digital clutter and finally quit playing altogether.This is unfortunate -- the first episode was actually of interest and the series promised many hours of entertainment.As I have learned, to my chagrin -- if there is a quality problem with one dvd or cd, there is a strong likelihood that the others in the production run will have the same issue.In short, there is a reason for the low cost of this item, and one gets what one pays for.  Don't count on being lucky like other reviewers -- my recommendation is you avoid this until the company announces that they have fixed the quality problems
Blind buy gone wrong. I bought this without previously knowing anything about it, not knowing it was a sequel. I was taken in by the title, and the blurb. That's it. It sounded like a really romantic film, one that I might identify with, as I've always wondered what would happen if I met my first love again, if I would have the same feelings. After watching the very, very long trailer, I was slightly disappointed, and I only managed to half an hour into the film, before I started to doze off. It's so incredibly boring! And although I wouldn't say I normally mind "real time" films, it's all set in the mid-late afternoon, a very dull time of day if you ask me. It was the only time of day director Richard Linklater would shoot the scenes in the film. He felt it added to the reality of the film, and often relied on the actors to get perfect takes at the right time, and it shows, as it was shot in a mere 15 days.But it's nothing but talk and meandering around Parisian streets in the parts I watched. I just didn't identify with it. Nothing happened. And I hated the two actors. I don't normally like Ethan Hawke anyway, but I thought I might be able to ignore this, but no I disliked Julie Delpy too.I wouldn't recommend this film to anyone, although I know other reviewers are gonna disagree with me, but it just wasn't what I expected.
Production values?. First let me say that I think some of the information here is both valid and useful, especially to men who've never thought this stuff through. That being said, Come on guys, production values! I'm not saying they have to be great but don't just sit against a tree for 40 minutes. And when flies buzz back and forth across the screen do another take. It wasn't filmed well and the lighting during the sex scenes was poor.Now let's look at what's really important, the info that was presented:Start by massaging your partner for between 15 and 60 minutes without getting sexual at all. Next tease her for quite a while. Next comes the serious foreplay then the sex which they kind of skip over. You finish with the afterglow which he says should go on for longer then normal. This sounds great in theory but by my count that would make each encounter last about a day and a half. Fun but not very practical. I hope these people don't have jobs.The DVD concludes with a demonstration of "New Sex."  Here's where I think it falls flat. It doesn't follow what he said at all. It begins with him doing stuff under the covers for about two minutes, none of which we can see for obvious reasons. Then after minimal foreplay they go at it. It concludes with seven minutes (I kid you not) of afterglow. This consists of him lying on top of her whispering things to her, most of which we can't hear.In conclusion, while as I've said this DVD raises some good points and therefore does have merit, it could have been done a lot better
Pretty horrible. Granted, I saw this movie at about three in the morning at a party, but I think I had enough sense in me to realize how truly horrible it was. It's so... bad. It has some seriously subpar performances from pretty much all involved, and the script was just awful. Gosh, it's hard to believe I actually sat through it. It was just so... exactly what it was, I guess. A stupid sex comedy that's absolutely terrified to be anything else. The thing that really pushed this above the radar for me to blip at was the truly offensive tone of some of the material. I think my real downfall here was the fact that I'm a gay guy whose friends are mostly straight guys. The scenes regarding a certain character and his chance encounter with homosexuality are so repugnant it's almost ridiculous. Now, I'm not one to get offended easily, but this just took it a bit too far. Just the attitudes and behaviors expressed by most of the characters just made me depressed, which isn't really something I look for in a movie. It just seems to me that if 'gay' had been replaced with 'black', this would have been deemed racist and probably wouldn't ever have been released. Not that I'm condoning censorship, but when your tone becomes so... mocking, I guess. Oh well, I guess all I'm trying to say is I will definitely not be repeat viewing this film, and I don't recommend you view it at all if you're a woman, or gay, or you care about others
Beyond horrible. I cannot believe I wasted 90 minutes of my life on this crap. I almost NEVER find movies bad. It's happened very few times in my life, but oh my, I cannot seem to find words to describe how bad this movie was. First of all, it was EXTREMELY disgusting. If your idea of a comedy is watching fat men take watery-sounding craps on small toilets, seeing close up shots of peeing in showers, people vomiting violently on restaurant parking lots, and hairy man cracks, then yes, I agree, this is the funniest movie ever made. Yes, I know what you're asking yourself, and the answer is yes: it's worse than BORAT. Yes, BORAT. If you thought nothing could more disgusting than Borat, you haven't seen anything yet. Second, a comedy is supposed to make me laugh because it's laughably funny, not because it's laughably BAD. The storyline is terrible and the acting is a joke. It's just not funny, and it's that simple. Watching my own toenails grow is more fun that watching this movie.Avoid this one like the plague
Pretty much groan inducing.... -Not a great one here, entertaining for all the wrong reasons, mainly because the film is so bad, so often.-It is nice to see Christina Ricci in a movie again, as she's usually good even in a bad movie and doesn't do too bad here.-Wes Craven directs this one and I could tell right away it must have been do to a contract obligation (much like Edward Norton in "The Italian Job"). I could tell this because very little effort seemed to be put into the script, both the story and lines of dialogue were very predictable and dumb. Also very little effort seemed to be put into the effects, as they were very lousy at times, especially when they finally showed the werewolf.-As I said before, quite predictable the story was, both Ricci and her brother get bitten by a werewolf after they try to save a girl who got into a car wreck. Then both try to figure out what's wrong with them, though the brother is much more active about it than Ricci.-It's also quite obvious who the main werewolf was, the film tries a bit of a swerve, but it doesn't really work.-Besides Ricci, the cast includes Shannon Elizabeth (American Pie 1&2), Portia De Rossi (Arrested Development), Joshua Jackson (Pacey on "Dawson's Creek"), Scott Baio (don't ask me why) among others. All do pretty poor jobs, besides Ricci that is, the rest don't really seem to care, not that I blame them that is.-There is some humor throughout the film, but a lot of the film will get unintentional laughs from those who watch it.-The only reason to watch this is to make fun of it as the effort is not really there by mostly anybody on the cast or crew.
GHOST GAME DVD REVIEW 1/5. This movie actually had potential (in the beginning) for a mediocre straight-to-DVD horror film. However, too much bad acting was present throughout most of the movie and the screenplay was brainless. Only watch this movie if you have nothing else to do. Overall, it's not really bad, there are a number of films far more insufficient than this.
Don't buy this movie!!!!!!!!!. This may be the worse movie ever made.  The plot is pretty lame and the movie itself is boring.  Basically nothing happens during the entire movie.   If I could give this zero stars I would
Yuck. I love and "get" John Waters ("Cry Baby", "Hairspray", "Serial Mom" etc)and I love the unique slightly larger than life elevated acting style he demands from his actors. But THIS one left me cold, uncomFARTable and slightly nauseous. I didnt even finish watching it. I decided to rather take a dip in our local sewerage
HAHAHAHAHAH. This movie was extreamly stupid, but very funny.  We just laughed though this hole movie.  This was pretty much very soft porn.  The hole time all the guys did was rub themselves or the priest rubbed them.  The special effects sucked, they were probably better in the old bewitched episodes (the black and white ones!!).  The acting was very bad, and this movie is very anticrist
Poor Quality. I'm not going to waste a bunch of my time or yours giving a personally oppinionated review of the movie plot. It's redundant and unnecessary, and whether someone likes the story or not is irrelavent. Only you can form an opinion of whether you like it or not by watching it yourself. Double that with the fact that most movies hardly ever line up with the book that's based on and well...My gripe is the transition from putting the movie in it's original format onto DVD was bad. The soundtrack is about 1/2 to 1 second off from the video part of film, therefore the voices don't sync up with the lip movement.
Unconvincing. The 3 leading ladies had no chemistry what so ever, even when the 3 dare share a bubble bath. The oldest daughter Tilden was the most hateful and unlikable girl I have ever seen. Not one convincing smile crossed her bland face. The lack of chemisty however had nothing to do with actress Elizabeth Perkins who is always a joy on screen. Also Scott Bakula was good too. It all boils down to heavy handed melodrama at it's dullest
A sad end to what could have been a great franchise. The 1999 film "The Mummy" (TM) was one of my favorite action adventure movies in recent years.  The characters were interesting, the cast was awesome, and the story was fun.  It turned out to be somewhat of a surprise hit so a sequel was inevitable.Unfortunately the sequel, "The Mummy Returns" (TMR) has almost none of the magic the first film posessed.  In fact it feels like the film makers just exploited the fans of the first by cranking out a sequel before they had a decent script.  There is a fair amount of action and more than enough CGI, but the plot and the script are just not as good as the original. The movie takes several silly flights of fanatasy that include a flying ship and some undead pygmies that live in a forest in the middle of the desert.  TMR takes so many liberties that it actually rewrites some of the storyline from the original.  Without giving any spoilers we now have a unexplainable backstory that links Evie, Rick and the Mummy.  There is also a inexplicably resurrected Anck Su Namun whose existance conflicts with the very premise of the first movie.  The biggest let down to me was the change in Evie's character.  In the first she was a bookish nerd who when asked who she was while drunk, proudly proclaimed "I, am a Librarian!"  Gone was the feisty little nerd that used her brains not her braun.  Instead she is a female version of her now husband Rick and that completely changes their chemestry.  In the first they rely on each other's strengths, her the brains, him the cunning.  In TMR though they are both the prototypical Indiana Jones characters with no chemestry what so ever.There are a few bright spots.  John Hannah is back as Evie's bumbling brother Jonathan, although he is a bit underused.  Also back is great Oded Fehr as the mysterious Magi warrior Ardeth Bay.  The opennig sequence with the Rock is interesting but he is barely in the movie.  In my opinion the best scene in the movie had to be the duel between Particia Velasquez and Rachel Weisz.In the end there are not enough bright spots for me to recommend "The Mummy Returns."  If you were a fan of the original you may want to give this a look, but this fan was disappointed.
not what i expected. this was a very poorly made documentary. there was barely anything about the band and they kept flashing the same still shots of them over and over again. the dvd was poor quality and it seemed like it was just pasted together in a rush. it seemed like it was skipping even though there are no scratches so it is just poor quality. i wouldn't recommend this
XBox 360 HD-DVD Unfriendly. Only the FBI warning screen plays on my XBox 360 HD-DVD drive and then the machine locks up.  Poor encoding again
Be warned!. I bought this on the basis of the various glowing reviews it received here. This is terrible. The documentary is glib, over-sentimentalised and downright embarrassing a lot of the time. The photography is bad too. The performance, far from being as fine as some would have you believe, is certainly a student one: playing is very, very ordinary and the conducting dull and lifeless. My old Supraphon recording with Neumann is a billion times better than this in every way
Worse than dumb!. These 2 guys playing Harry and Lloyd were so disastrous. They didn't even know how to act corny when they're supposed to.Jim Carrey might be crazy at times but I don't think he's this bad. The whole thing looked like monkeys flying around the screen. Nevertheless, it has some funny moments like when Jessica's parents found all the poo sticking all over the toilet.The whole idea of a 'special class' was just so stupid. Nothing made sense. I didn't see a single point of the whole plot in the first place just to get a little extra cash.The first one was a lot better than this one. Jim Carrey and Jeff Daniels were a lot dumber and a lot funnier. These 2 were worse than dumb and weren't even funny at all.I guess 'Dumb and Dumberer' would be better if it were still Jim Carrey and Jeff Daniels starring but nooo, it had to be these 2 who I don't even know.Please don't watch it guys. It may be funny for some guys but it's mostly corny like kindergarteners gone wild. Watch the first one!!!Kirstie Mabita
sum of all stars? zero!. Maybe no one noticed but towards the end of the movie when the Russian President and Jack Ryan are talking to each other through the computer, repeat is spelled "reapeat".  On top of that, the acting was horrible...this movie didn't take itself seriously enough.  Ben Affleck sucked as much as he did in this movie as he did in Pearl Harbor
Love Samuel L. Jackson but not as Coach Carter. Samuel L. Jackson seemed somewhat tame in this movie, yet still believable as a coach of a high school in a rough neighborhood. I thought it could have been a little shorter but the time but it's only 76 minutes. That's pretty short. If it was 90 to 120 minutes I guess I would have been as restless as a 6 year old at church. It's kind of dull.
Great material. Ate-up pricing and marketing. Don't get me wrong, South Park is genius comedy. Sitcoms from the 50's through the 80's usually had a moral at the end of each ep. I dare you to find an episode of "The OC" or "Dawson's Creek" or "Prison Break" that has a healthy moral.SP has an intelligently articulated moral at the end of (almost) every single episode. When my kids turn 14, they will be forced to watch all the back episodes.In other matters:You can pay $155.99 for the 5 season DVD set.Or you can pay $128.89 and buy seasons 1 through 5 individually.Somebody at Amazon hasn't been doing their homework.Price this collection for $99.99 and you'll sell about a billion of them.Update: It's April 12th, 2006 (2 days after I made the above review) and the prices of the South Park DVD's has changed. Seasons 1 - 5 now go for $29.99 each; $149.95 for all 5. The 5 season collection is $155.99. What do I get for my extra 6 bucks? A fancier box?If you customer buys your product in volume, they usually get a discount, not an upcharge! Duh!Update: It's Tuesday April 18th. The total price for seasons 1-5 purchased individually on Amazon is $118.85.The box set is $145. It should be about $100 and I won't buy it until it is.
Painful. From the cover, this movie looked like a fun mixture of Cruel Intentions and Metropolitan. No such luck. I think the biggest problem in this movie was the script-- the writing was so bad that it was actually painful to listen to the dialogue. Though there are some normally fine actors in this cast, it would have been impossible to triumph over the poor script, and the cast as a whole seemed strangely void of emotion, except for a few moments of melodrama. I found myself hating even the characters we were supposed to sympathize with. Delilah, who is supposed to be the "fun, crazy" outsider, simply disgusted me with her actions at the movie's central party. Even the art direction in this movie was strange-- many pivotal scenes in the movie were shot from very far away. The strangeness of this movie is not intentional, it's just lack of skill. Stay away
I wish I could give no stars. I have several Kathy Smith videos this is the absolute worse! I agree with some of the other reviewers that Kathy has not rhythm and in this video the steps do not match the beat of the music which makes it frustrating and makes her look very uncoordinated. Also, it seems like there a too many people in such a small space, the whole set looks very chaotic. I wonder if Kathy thought up the choreography for this one herself, it is very poor. All those crazy shuffle moves! Any other Kathy Smith workout will be better for you than this one.
Only worth the curiosity value. Really not worth the effort to find it, even if George MacDonald Fraser was involved with the screenplay. The producers chose the "least best" of the Flashman novels to adapt, they cast the wrong actor to play the role, and they reduced the whole story to a bawdy, not-very-funny, slapstick comedy. Don't bother searching for it. True Flashman fans will be disappointed
... and the stars aren't for Coogan and Anderson.... One of the types of film I hate the most are precious conceits by film people about themselves at work. This is far less about the story in TS than it is a twee take on how clever they were trying to film it. Skip this. Buy the book, and read it, of course, and get a sense of where Thomas Pynchon might have first conceived his style.Essentially this is a Brit take on the same ideas visited by Truffaut in "Day for Night." The core movie is different, but it's the same story. And while from a certain perspective you might say it's in the spirit of TS, in point of fact, TS could have been any book about which they were making an underfunded film. Quel surprise! The best of the movie, for me was the brief dialogue Anderson engages in with Rob Brody, and the blackened screen, i.e. my 2 stars. Coogan looks like he wants to get out of this film as quickly as possible. Most of the others aren't sure if they are in the film or in the accompanying "making of..." disc. And for the record, I never bothered with the other disc. What for?
what was this. it doesnt even deserve any stars from me. the picture quality isnt that great. you would think that a movie like this would go out and try and use a video codec. it should have been vc-1 which is far better then mpeg-4. once again horrible movie with horrible actin
Glossy  Presentation but a Dull Finish!. I bought this with the intent in mind of seeing step by step house painting instructions. What I received was a DVD with allot of talk on "how to do"  certain painting exercises but the "hosts" did not conclude or follow thru to a logical end. Lacks thorough demonstrations for the novice to really "apply", translate this to one's own painting projects!
DVD-production disaster. The story is entertaining enough, but there is not much joy from viewing this DVD. The problem is that the folks producing it apparently were trying to win the contest for the DVD having the world's squattest image. It is EXTREMELY letterboxed WITHIN a 16:9 widescreen format. Even your zoom function won't help you, because the producers moved the subtitles into the black-bar region (and the subtitles are about 2/3 the height of the image itself. The movie becomes simply uninvolving when you see low-resolution images on a thin ribbon across the screen
Overrated. There is some good stuff there, however, it is not funny, it is predictable and it is slow
Poor History and a screenplay over-dramatic. I'm glad someone knows enough about English History to recognize the pure fiction of this film.  But in addition to points made about historical inaccuracy, I also had to object to the ridiculous portrayal of Mary Tudor.  Over-zealous and fanatic (as was a common religious stance in those times - promoted by both sides of the Protestant/Catholic conflict), she was not insane as the film makes her in the opening scenes.  And throughout the film, there was this emphasis on milking the passions for all they are worth - no objectivity whatsoever.  I was sorely disappointed!If you want to get to know Elizabeth and the period in which she lived, I would recommend the superb BBC series, Elizabeth R with Glenda Jackson.  And if you want even further background, look to the BBC again in the Six Wives of Henry VIII with Keith Mitchell.  Tidbits can be gained as well from the movie Mary, Queen of Scots (although a few historical inaccuracies can be found in it - for example, Mary Stuart and Elizabeth never met, although it was Mary's great desire) and even another title, Anne of the Thousand Days.  Those two more theatrical representations fulfill the desire for the more dramatic while still coming closer to the history of the times.  This film just doesn't cut it
The *ahem*...LESSER Farrelly film. Ok, check it out, there's two Jack Blacks. One is the guy from Tenacious D, you see him all the time. He's funny and childish and insane. Then there's the other Jack Black. He's the evil creature who pervades films like Shallow Hal and King Kong, whose only humorous lines are the ones that are funny by accident. Well, as long as you aren't fat and don't feel patronized by Gweneth presuming to know what it's like not to be desired all her life (ha), then by all means suspend all disbelief, logic, and brain power and watch this dumb movie. Gweneth's fat suit is actually pretty convincing, although most of the movie she's played by an actual fat chick...who by the way should have just been left in, without the whole "ha ha the dude thinks she's skinny" nonsense. Obviously, a film about a dude trying to cope with dating a big girl would have a lot more resonance if:a) He weren't brainwashedb) His fat girlfriend wasn't replaced by a twiggy blond chickc) The movie didn't throw ridiculous concepts your way (like a guy could have sex with a 300 lb woman without realizing it)d) Tony Robbins was in no way involved whatsoeverI knew I was slumming it when I saw this movie.  But I'm not sure what the message of this film is.  Jack Black's character is decent, considerate, great with kids and perfect in every way.  Oh, except he's really shallow for no dicernable reason, other than his dad's dying words were for him to go out and chase tail.  The weird part is that Hal's not a bad person.  The movie beats you over the head showing you he's the nicest guy on on the face of the Earth, so you can't really laugh at him looking like an idiot.  Rosemary is so fat she has superpowers.  Her butt actually creates typhoons (I wonder if that has military applications?).  Suddenly, Hal mistakes ugly pimply girls for supermodels and evil skanks for old shrews.  Tony Robbins brainwashed him, the fiend! When Hal finally realizes this he decides to (ooh big spoiler) love Rosemary anyway, and learns a VALUBLE LESSON.  Along the way there are a ton of cliches like people thinking he's dating Rosemary just because her dad happens to be his boss, and a sexy neighbor in his building who starts to get the hots for him when she sees how non-judgemental he is dating a fat girl ('cause that would make any woman melt).  Of course there's requisite best friend, played by Jason Alexander, who is repulsed by fat people and plots to get Hal to dump her.  Then again, the friend is a complete troll, so I don't know why Hal would want him around.  And to insult us further, they force some burned kids on us at the hospital to strike a SERIOUS note about how true beauty is on the inside. Too...many...public...service...messages! PICK...ONE..!!But brain-dead writing aside, Paltrow really sells her performance when they actually show her in the fat suit (despite Gweneth's postering when this film was first released). Regardless of its clumsy benevolence, I have to rate this as a romantic comedy. And for that, I give it a rating of totally unremarkable. Nice gesture, Farelly brothers. Not to be bothered with
A noodle western with a Last Stand that strains credulity. What a disappointment this film was for me!Let me say first that I have a terrific fondness for good martial arts films, and many of the Hong Kong films of the genre, while certainly showing and revelling in elements that are cheesy, yet succeed in being extremely entertaining. But this...!I think it's fairly well understood that the Hong Kong martial arts film genre deliberately utilises many American westerns. It's not exactly unusual to see a tumbleweed go rolling across a deserted plain or through a deserted Chinese village, however silly that may seem. But in the case of this film, it went too far. My willingness to suspend disbelief and criticism came to a crashing halt. It began, I'm afraid, with the very opening scene. As soon as I heard the Chinesified western theme (borrowing heavily from the well-known musical theme that you'll recognise the instant you hear it), I flinched and said, "Oh Lord, please let it improve."The film's score is just a mishmash of inappropriate melodies and songs. Featuring far too heavily are those frankly appalling songs sung with sugary sweetness by Chinese popstars who moo their way through lyrics of awful saccharine fake emotion. Chinese lyrics and poetry can be so delicate and powerful (exciting our admiration especially when they use miniature to create a sense of space), but the flip side is that they can also be horribly vulgar and overly sentimental. This film showed the flip side.The story is predictable: displaced prince (Brother Yen) wants to regain his throne after travelling like a nomad through the land for years. His faithful follower, a beautiful Chinese girl, turns out to be hired by his evil brother (who usurped the throne), but switches sides yet again (after failing to kill the prince's betrothed) to fight for the prince in the final showdown. A young fisherman named Fei, with fabulous martial arts skills, defends the prince's party in a surprise ambush, and consequently bonds with the prince, falls in love with the prince's betrothed when he's sent to fetch her, and plays artlessly with a large dolphin called Wei. (There's a truly awful song at this point, by the way - it tries to be a lovely innocent "love the environment" song, but oh dear... oh no... it's one of those moments where one cringes and fast-forwards through the embarrassing music.)Fei hides the prince's party in an underground tomb accessible only by a path which he knows (but that doesn't stop the evil usurper from finding it without difficulty) and also by sea. The final show-down reveals that: a) an evil usurper can generally fight off as many attackers as need be; b) rightful emperors (aka the prince) can be defeated by said pole-bearing evil usurper without difficulty; c) the girl who doesn't get the guy (aka the girl who joined the prince's forces in order to betray him but ended by loving him, even though his emotions were centred upon the daughter of his old friend General NanNing (I think that's the name)) is sure to be killed by the evil usurper, and to murmur, "Even though I could not live for you, I am happy to die for you, my prince"; d) the general's daughter is of course torn between the prince and Fei, loving both of them, and of course she dies; and e) (this one's the killer) it takes a dolphin to kill an evil usurper. Yes, indeed - I joke not. The finale includes Wei surging through the river that leads to the cave in which the underground tomb is built, LEAPING out of the water to whack the evil usurper in mid-attack, and pulling down the entire tomb structure to kill everyone except Fei who finishes the film by looking at the flower-covered ground below which is the tomb, and making a philosophical comment that harks back to an earlier moment in the film.The film's not all bad. The actors all look fine, and the swordplay is neither better nor worse than most of these types of film. I did become exasperated with some aspects of the fighting, because too much of it was dancing around attacking each other's weapons rather than each other - a big no-no in martial arts. "Have at you, you foul sword of my enemy! Let me beat you, o most hideous polearm of my foe!"... There's a good idea for a spoof there.The story is, again, neither better nor worse than many another film of this genre - except for the laughable ending.The cinematography is only adequate, not wonderful. It certainly isn't a patch on some of the magnificent films in this style which have emerged just recently.The insistence on having the terrible enemy be undefeatable is a peculiarity one often meets with in Chinese films of this sort. I confess I have never become accustomed to it. Why is the hero not able to defeat his evil foe? They are both mortal. They're both skilled. It's clearly a cultural element that is difficult for non-Chinese to understand.But by far - BY FAR - the worst thing about this film is the soundtrack.Comparing this film favourably to "Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon", "The Emperor and the Assassin", "House of Shining Daggers" and "Hero" is unbelievable. The aforesaid films are not just nice-looking - they're gorgeous. The cinematography is superb. In most cases, the plots are good (in the case of "Crouching Tiger", the plot is superb and intricate). In each case for the films I've mentioned, the acting is magnificent and the fight scenes beautifully done. I'm afraid "Moon Warriors" will disappoint those who expect the same standard.Recommended only for those who want to collect every film in this genre
Something Little Kids *Might*  Enjoy. I couldn't get into this movie. It was boring, too long, and I couldn't wait for it to be over with. George was annoying and he should've been tranquilized and thrown into the zoo. The only thing I liked about the movie was the use of computer animation to enhance the traditional cartooning
What the hell?. How are we supposed to feel at the end of this movie?  Good, that the Nigerian patients survived?  I don't think so.  The most important aspect of this story is really quite simple:  Lt. Waters disobeyed direct orders and sacrificed the lives of four SeALS.  More than $5,000,000 in assets lost because his character had an emotional crisis?  That's a steep price to pay.  In the really real world, a deserved court martial would be awaiting Lt. Waters upon his return home.  Besides all of this, the military tactics, or lack thereof, in this movie must have been 'developed' by a blind monkey.  JoJo the Idiot Circus Boy must have been the military consultant.  I can only hope that a sequel is made, with the end result being Lt. Waters hanging from a yard arm!
More Shafting of Loyal Fans. Let the movie companies know you are sick of this scam of continually releasing multiple editions. The best way is to hit them where it hurts... bottom line, dollar sign. Do not buy from these companies who continually re-release. Support and purchase from companies like Critereon, who always issue, as far as I know, definitive versions of a flick on DVD. This is shameless baloney, and greedy corporate crap
Exit....Stage Left - Supremely Dissappointing. I guess I should have read the reviews first, and rented this from netflix....instead of getting excited over the DVDs and buying it!!!!!!!No one wants to hear anyone talk during the songs!!!!!And everyone wants to see the entire song - not sound clips.Not a good way to sell to fans!!!!!!!!Extremely dissappointing.
Do not buy. This is her pre-Skyscraper direct-to-video attempt at becoming a Hollywood film star. Acting and writing are poor. Lighting, sound, editing are professionally done
Disappointment eith a great subject. I purchased this DVD with the thought of replacing my VHS versions of same.  I expected Joe Garagiola & Vin Scully narrating the 1986 World Series as they did on television and Lindsay Nelson & Curt Gowdy for the 1969 which were the official broadcasters on NBC.  I got neither.  If you own these World Series classics on VHS, don't discard them for this DVD
Let's be honest. This is a so-so sci-fi pic from the late 60s -- nothing more, nothing less.  To claim otherwise you'd have to be either deluded, or have a personal investment in the film
The Firm. Great movie but CD not perfoming in the last few scenes.  It gets stuck or restarts itself.  Very frustrating and more frustrating to have to return new CD
Not for Beginners!!!!. Very disappointing.  Leisa Hart goes much too fast for anyone to catch on to her moves.  The dance moves she does are much to fast to learn and so is her pace with which she teaches.  She does not set a very relaxing tone to her yoga poses, either-she sounds very rushed and does not teach any of her moves before she performs them.  It is extremely difficult to keep up with her.  Also, I thought there would be more exercises with your baby.  Very disappointing
Complete and utter mess. Its not the idea that Jesus was a man of color, there are clear indications that he might have been. Its the ridiculous notions and "creative liberty" that is taken with the scripture. I am so upset and hurt by this sinful depiction of Jesus, his disciples and the events leading up to his death.Sure, if he was black I truly believe that the crucifixion had something to do with him being black, but the reality is that there is no scriptural proof that Judas raped Mary or that Mary was "in love" with Jesus or that Jesus was a man of worry, fear or indifference.It is these types of destructive "interpretations" that lead people astray. I am also disgusted that Bishop Jakes was so money motivated that he would allow his movie to be a preview on something that  so obviously nullifies scripture for self interpretation and profit.
Look Grandpa, It's a Mainstream B Movie...... This movie is almost like Evil Dead meets Ever After and Van Helsing, while Sleep Hollow provides the backdrop.  This movie is like a mainstream B movie.  There were times I found myself laughing out loud at how cheesy or genuinely funny the movie was.   I would say Matt Damon and Heath Ledger didn't do a bad job acting, however both of their performances aren't anything to get excited about either.It is worth watching this movie just to see some of the set design and SOME of the special effects. But there are other movies in this department that deliver in a much better fashion.  I don't think this movie did very well in the box office and I think I have a theory.  This movie was promoted with a PG-13 rating, which means anyone who is over 13 or with someone as old as 13 can see this movie.  Well some of the graphic violence in this movie was crazy.  I can see a parent not wanting their under 13 year old to see this violence, and an adult might wanting more graphic violence.   I don't know, I felt this movie was pretty brutal for a "light-hearted fantasy adventure".  Come on man, let's be honest with the viewers of America, this movie was morbid.  I can list some moments:1) A man is shot in the back of the neck and there is plenty of blood2) A child looses his eyeballs via mud3) Spider webs come out of a horses' mouth and eat a child4) A woman's face cracks and the decay of death is reveled under her skin5) A man is lanced with a broken flag pole6) Several decapitated heads7) A kitten is killed by a huge fan8) Horses are lit on fireNow the violence didn't bother me, a movie is a movie.  I just find it so interesting that there is such tightness around movie ratings.  For instance, the F bomb automatically makes a movie rated R.  However the former elements are put into a movie combined with a spooky-fantasy aspect and it is a family film.  Oh well I suppose this is why I never made it in the movie business.
Jerry Maguire. The movie is great, but the DVD leaves a lot to be desired.  I have to use "captioning for the hearing impaired" and I am not of Latino heritage.  This movie does not provide captioning for the hearing impaired in English - but in Spanish.The producer(s) of this DVD apparently don't care much for the English hearing impaired
Only mildly interesting, and no "classic". I saw this at the library and brought it home, thinking it might be interesting to watch. I very rarely watch films made after the 1950's, but this one looked as if it could be enjoyable. It ended up being only mildly enjoyable, and a bit boring. I felt that within all the time it ran, we didn't really get a good understanding of the inner being of the main characters; seemed to remain in shallow waters all along. The film was sort of good...pretty photography,and for the most part it seemed like the costumes, hair, way of speaking, etc. were accurate for the time period (so often such movies are so obviously modern people dressed up and pretending to be from way back when) but something just wasn't quite right, and it is hard to know exactly what it was. I was surprised and disappointed that there was quite a long scene with male nudity which to me was quite unnecessary and inappropriate. I think the whole swim scene could have been done effectively without showing full nudity. I am grateful the women in the film remained properly clothed. So I would not recommend this film for families with young  children, because of the nudity.
Hollywood missed the point. Hollywood took this incredible novel of courage and cunning and turned it into a war epic filled with famous stars who appear for a minute or two only. In the waning days of World War II, Hitler ordered the total destruction of Paris. His general in command of Paris did as little as possible to carry out this order, even advised the allies that they would be welcomed with token resistance. Direct orders to the Luftwaffe to bomb Paris were ignored as well. There was an incredible spontaneous disregard of the Fuhrer's plans to destroy Paris. And when the Allies refused to march to Paris, the French Army left for Paris against orders in the dead of night, forcing Patton to race after them. Apparently, this fantastic story was too dull for Gore Vidal and a young Francis Ford Coppola, who opted instead to write a two dimensional war story about how the Americans and British bailed out the French resistance. Read the book
1 DVD is not enough!. Im a huge Stone Cold fan and I have got to say that I am horribly dissapointed. This disc does not contain any of the good Stone Cold matches...specificlly the matches during the Austin/Mcmahon/Corporate Ministry era.Luckally, I rented this from Blockbuster. The main story is good but the rest I have seen in other DVDs. I was hoping for alot of matches. It would take atleast 4-6 DVD discs full of matches to really go deep into Austin's history. But 1 disc is pathetic. I put shame on the WWE as they have no idea what fans want.This DVD was not even worth the rent. I am a horribly horribly dissapointed Stone Cold fan and wonder how the WWE could put out trash such as this.I hope the WWE releases a 3-6 DVD set on Stone Cold otherwise I hope the WWE goes out of business as they are a horrible wrestling company now a days ever since they lost competion (WCW and ECW) and have no motivation to become better
Item not yet received. How can I rate it when I havent received it yet?Thank
Just Say No. This movie is no "Heathers."  It's not even "Mean Girls."  As hard as it tried to be witty, shocking, dark, and satirical, it just made me want to bang my head against a wall to make the pain of watching it stop.  Maybe I'm just too old for this drivel -- although I could watch "Clueless" and "The Craft" until my DVD player breaks -- but whatever entertainment value this movie was trying to push, I just didn't get it.  The movie wasn't funny (which is sad to say when one of my favorite comedic actresses, Carol Kane, couldn't even elicit a smile out of me), the plot was full of holes, and the writing seemed very rushed and contrived.  I wasn't expecting greatness when I watched Jawbreakers, but I was at least hoping for 1 1/2 hours of mindless entertainment.  Unfortunately, the "entertainment" piece was dropped and I was just left with "mindless.
"There's one problem with that.  You can't kill Ruechang...  but I can". In an imaginary world, a princess is on the run from the evil General Ruechang.  Ruechang's top soldier played by Dolph Lundgren is sent to capture the princess so Ruechang can marry her.  She falls in love with Dolph and convinces him to save her.The movie is not badly directed, but the acting and story is really hard to sit through.  The action is the only thing an Isaac Florentine movie should be watched for, and it doesn't disappoint in that area.  Thouands of bullets fly, there are hundreds of explosions, and don't even try to keep a death count.  While Florentine had not yet polished his action style (he used to direct Power Rangers), it is still fun to watch.  The movie is low budget, but Florentine manages to make it feel like a big production.  Where the low budget comes into play is with the actors.  Dolph Lundgren as the main star greatly hampers everything.  The editing is excellent, but Dolph just moves too slow.  If he was at least a decent actor, his slowness could be excused, but if someone isn't a good actor in the first place, Isaac Florentine isn't going to be a big help.  The final fight is not bad, but it is the best scene in the movie, and that is not saying much.  There is also supposed to be something between Ruechang raising Dolph since he was a child, but they only tell you this in the story and the acting and directing job doesn't allow it to be believable.1.5/5The DVD from HBO Home Video has good picture quality and has short cast and crew biographies.
Depressing with no point. This is one of the worst movies I have ever seen. It's basically a movie about 3 kids who grew up together only one was emotionally scarred for life as a child. As they grow up they all go their seperate ways until another horrific event brings them all together again for one more sad, unsettling experience together. Does anyone grow or learn anything? No. Do the "bad guys" pay? No. It is difficult for me to say just how much this movie sucks without giving away the ending. Suffice to say that no one wins, innocent people get screwed over, and in the end - no one really learns anything. It's a thoroughly depressing movie with no point - unless the point is that life sucks. As if viewers don't have enough of their own problems, or as if real life isn't traumatizing enough - we are subjected to this horrible 2 1/2 hours of misery. I am not exaggerating - there is no redeeming value to this movie. Sure the acting is great, but what good is it with such a tragic story. And this is not like a Greek Tragedy or Shakespeare Tragedy - there are no heroes, no lessons to be learned, no moral to the story - it just makes you feel miserable and hollow and then nothing - just the credits rolling. This movie is so terrible that I would rather watch "Kazaam" than watch this again
Meet John Doe. I purchased this DVD a while ago - FYI - A documentary of the anaconda was in the case and not the movie.  I went to the web site to complain and my profile could not be found.  Here, years later, when I'm finally placing another through Amazon They found my account and noted that I purchased Meet John Doe.  I guess it's a little late to complain now
Boring. I watched this movie with my fiancee last night, and it was disappointing. We started watching the clock after about twenty minutes, asking "Is this over yet?" The actors themselves aren't bad, but the dialogue they were given to work with was pretty bad, cliche, overcooked, etc. The fact that the husband and wife were split up and effectively had separate stories for most of the movie was a pretty cool idea, but I was never invested enough in either character to really care
Speeding to hell. The story here dosen't matter. The main characters fuse into a missle of meth and insanity towards an explosive ending. Scwartzman escapes his fate temporarily and murphy is blessed with a reprieve but rourke pays the full price for his evil concoction, meth. Quirky directing and film editing can be somewhat distracting but not meaningless. Roberts is so gay you want to smack his face. he an rourke have history on film and play out their familiarity. Rourke is phenomonal again as an immoral genius, a role he plays better than anyone today in film. BR
Kind of strange. This was our first Bob DVD and maybe I just chose wrong. My son waited for the theme song the whole time and it never played. Maybe that is the norm...This whole thing is kinda strange. My son likes it but doesn't love it.I simply should have researched more
Well done movie... ... But is is not the truth. Since the wall fell, we have learned that old joe was right. Hey, I bet in a few years Clooney will make a film about how honest and truthful Bill Clinton was
Sad, very sad. I, like the others, bought this DVD thinking it was a legit CD (I've seen the word unathorized used on videos before and thought it was just part of the name) with interviews, backstage material, and good music...instead I get a very disappointing knock-off. When I got home and took the wrapper and stickers off of the package it had in very small print on the back that the people making these DVDs got no permission from Nickelback or the producers (which means the band makes no profit) Why is this even being sold? I thought that kind of stuff was illegal
Very boring with walk-ons by fmaous people. This movie is very mildly amusing for about ten minutes.  Yes, it is slightly interesting to see the Cannes environment, but not enough to watch this film. It could be a cure for insomnia, though.  Fans who are looking forward to seeing their favorite actors in a satire will be disappointed.  You can count in seconds the amount of time any famous actor is on the screen, and it's really just very boring. All those fans of Johnny Depp: be particularly warned. He may have co-star billing, but blink and you'll miss him
The WORSTof the WORST DVDs!!!!!!!. I am really a Christina fan but I have no choice on this one other than saying the truth. This is the WORST DVD I have ever bought in my life. I can't encourage anyone to buy this one. I don't really know what Christina was thinking to release this DVD. There is no way I can call this a music video but rather call it a "SLIDE DVD" coz what you should expect to see are just slides about her biography and no music at all. I regret having bought this DVD. I repeat, DON'T BUY THIS ONE!!! This is really discouraging. Anyway if you have nothing to do with your money then you can buy this one. Better buy the Stripped one not this one
2 out of 10. The Pick-up Artist is a dangerously bad film. There is absolutely no chemistry between Robert Downey and Molly Ringwald. Molly Ringwald may have been of the most iconic 1980's female actresses, and she certainly proves her worth here. Ringwald looks too much of a virgin to me when her character wasn't supposed to be. That marks the moment when the film had lost its believably element. The real joke in this film has to be Robert Downey. His acting is insanely moronic. I often have to wonder if he wears a lipstick. I am pretty sure Robert Downey can make a great drag queen if he chose to. From the start to the end, I was annoyed. I couldn't see how Dennis Hopper and Danny Aiello got interested in this film and lend their hands in it. Harvey Keitel gives a fair performance, but I believe he is much tougher than that. Comparing Harvey Keitel's performance in Bad Lieutenant, Reservoir Dogs, and Mean Streets to The Pick-up Artist, it is enough to make an apparent observation that Harvey Keitel should have applied his talents to a more different film than this. A smaller film that he did rightfully apply his talent was Rising Sun, and he pulled that one off better than he did in this film. Why did they have to call it The Pick-up Artist? Could they give the movie a better title such as The Player
Sci-Fi Trash. Well, I can't say that the storyline of the Dr. Moreau flicks is bad, it's an interesting blend of scientific and horrific.  The 70's version of the film is actually pretty good.  This update adds some more color to the characters, and some more advanced makeup and better visual effects.  Well, if it weren't for the poor script this might be a worthwhile film.  The movie starts off with an interesting naration, but 2/3 characters are killed after about 30 seconds and we never get to know them or care about them, which isn't good.  They should've started it off in the airplane instead of the exact same way the 70's version started.  Also, the editing of this movie is probably the worst I have ever seen of any film.  The best example of this is a scene that ends with Dr. Moreau saying "Tomorrow we will have a trial" and the next scene shows the main character trying to escape on a boat and being threantened, not attacked, by BADLY animated mutant rats.  The next scene is the trial, and the rats never show up in the movie again and are never mentioned by anyone.  Who had the brains to do that?  There are plenty of other examples, but see for yourself.  I'm not sure about this unrated director's cut, but I doubt it can save this mess.  There are scenes that cut to a completely different location involving the same characters that seemingly pop up there in no time.  The movie doesn't make any sense, and there isn't enough development of, say, oh, DR. MOREAU.  He is the title character isn't he?  Well, he gets killed off way too early, and it's just not satisfying as he has no real defining roll in the climax of the film.  I can't say you shouldn't see this, it's a little interesting to see editing and writing's negative effects on a movie if you don't know what I'm talking about, but if you don't want to see a bad movie, don't see this
Gina just doesn't understand!!. Gina is just like the protesters--she just doesn't "get it!" The liberal way of doing ANYthing is throw more of our tax money at it! Whereas Africa's problems including poverty & AIDS will NEVER be solved UNTIL they get the birth rate down! As long as more babies are born than people dying, their population goes up--VERY bad. The only way to eliminate poverty is LESS children!! Send money for that but nothing else.
I have waited years for this. Finally it's here!!. The show is great, probably in the top 5 of all time best cop shows. The quality of the picture is great. The only problem I have is that it's not the full season. For the price we paid, it should have been the full season or a couple of bucks more. This entire series, if bought on DVD, will cost more than any other out there. I know many are waiting for the distress sale from Amazon when the price will be cut in half and that's a real shame. It's great to see this quality TV show
not worth the buy. So I recently purchased this movie, and it was really bad. Like I mean really terrible. I'm so mad at myself for buying this movie. Poorly made, barely any dialouge, and there was no point to the movie. No plot. Very disappointing.People, spare yourself the disappointment, and just don't even bother buying this movie.
Pretentious, boring, political, un-real. Thirteen year olds can be easily impressed by cheap tricks, "heartfelt" lyrics, and a lot of pretty lights. So it goes with some reviewers of this movie. This movie contains the unending internal reflections of about 6 or 7 different characters. These reflections never really go anywhere, never draw substantive conclusions. Primarily, there is just a lot of whining. THe only exception is the Sean Penn character until the end, when he whines at least as much as everybody else. "War is tough" is one of the main themes of this movie. Is that really a revelation?One thing you learn early on in acting or directing classes is to "play opposites," meaning put contrasting things in juxtaposition so that the contrast highlights both sides. An example is when a very evil character such as Richard III uses humor. "I'll have her - but not for long." THe fact that the guy is joking about killing his new bride makes him all the more evil to us. At the same time, perhaps we can't avoid laughing in spite of ourselves.OK, so this director had some of the same classes I did, but he has to use the technique over and over and over and over and over and ... until it starts seeming boring and banal. War scene, lots of dying. Oh look, a pretty butterfly! More blood and bullets. Oh gee, the light going through that leaf is beautiful! Use this trick once or twice and maybe it seems new to the uninitiated audience. Use it more than three times and you are asking for trouble. This director must use it 10-15 times. He turns it into a cliche. When the audience can predict when they are about to see the next opposite, you have overdone it.So what do we have so far? A bunch of whining character crying about war being bad and a bunch of contrast scenes. And really, that's pretty much it. The movie could have been cut in half with no loss because if there is one thing this movie is, It Is Redundant. It is spoon-feeding you the same message over and over and over again. Ouch, war hurts! Ew, mutilated bodies are yucky. Oh gosh, a little bird got hurt!!! We are so nasty! We must stop this war!!! (never mind the fact that thousands of little birds get eaten alive by cats every day)The director focuses on the yucky and inconvenient aspects of war - which I suppose would be briliant, except I think almost everybody on the planet already knows that wars are yucky and inconvenient. It's almost as if the author doesn't Believe we know, that he somehow thinks we missed it. And if only he reminds us at every possible repetitive opportunity, again and again and again, well, then maybe we will "get it" and start opposing wars, I guess. Never mind about Hitler and the 6 million jews. Never mind about Pearl Harbor. War is a yucky thing done by bad men, or nice whimpy men trapped in a situation by bad men. It has no meaning and there is nothing remotely noble about it. We were just wasting our time fighting the Nazis. The Nazis were just misunderstood! If they want to cook 6 million jews in the ovens, let them do it.An adult movie deals with realties and poses questions like, "how do I get myself to do something that I don't want to do, but that I know I should?" Making yourself do things that are not pleasant is one of the hallmarks of reaching adulthood. This movie takes a very adolescent perspective and asks, "if I whine enough, can I get out of my chores?"The dumbest scene in this movie is when the Jim Caveziel character is surrounded by Japanese and for no reason whatsoever, will not surrender. He stands there in the middle of about 40 Japanese soldiers and decides (after looking at some pretty leaves and butterlies) to raise his weapon so they will shoot him. The funny thing is, it's completely unnecessary: his comrades have already been warned. His death accomplishes nothing but relief for the audience - he can no longer utter his inane internal monologues.I think if you are a left-winger or have a thing for looking at the bodies of naked boys, you will love this movie. It's the kind of propaganda piece that a vacant, unquestioning mind will eat up. If your leanings are more adult, however, you may hate it. You'll wonder why the story is so one-sided, why nobody seems to believe in the causes they are fighting for, even though the Japanese did attack us, and the Germans did some naughty things too. None of that seems to matter to the storyteller."Why can't we all get along?" he cries, as the germans load another group of jews into the ovens and turn up the heat...A final note: if you want to see two really good war movies that make valid criticisms of the "war spirit" and how wars are conducted, see "Gallipoli" and/or "Breaker Morant." These movies are extremely effective in making their points without using cartoonish characters. The characters are real and the plots move the story foreward."The Thin Red Line" is what I would call "professed brilliance." A couple of simple tricks are used to try to impress the audience. But there is no real meat here. It's just a bunch of pointless whining. The poetry is poorly written and pretentious. And the characters are not real.
If you like the back of William Hurt's head... The only good thing in this movie was Ms. Howard's performance, she is innocent and believable.   I can't understand how good actors like Weaver, Hurt, and Phoenix would let themselves be wasted on this. The 'plain' dialogue among the 'elders' is painfully numbing, choppy, and stilted.  And the directing drove me crazy, especially since M. Night...insists on filming group scenes as is he was just passing through, or following them without ever bothering with close-ups. These scenes make me feel like they were done by an amateur filmmaker with a his first video camera.   If you like the back of William Hurt's head, you'll get plenty of it in this film, the camera seems to avoid his face like the plague; which is too bad, since when he finally has a good speech, we are deprived of the anger I imagine was in his eyes.  I agree with others, I would have worked better as a 30 minute Twilight Zone episode.  Rent it first before you buy, and save some money for a classic thriller, like Psycho
How Bad is Bad???  Pretty Bad. Without question, a truly awful movie.  Not sure what Daryl Hannah was doing is this picture.  Maybe it was part of her community service agreement with the court.  Jennifer Tilly proves again how annoying and untalented she is.  As for plot, character development, etc, you can forget about it.  You'll soon find yourself rooting for Jason to show up on the set and kill off everyone, including the clueless and dimwitted husband (who is &quot;seeking&quot; his wife, Daryl Hannah).  There is a reason this movie has had at least three different titles
Worst movie ever made. Without a doubt, this is the worst movie ever made, in any genre, in any decade, by any movie making company since the begining of motion pictures. Who ever put Sandra Bullock's image on the cover of the DVD should be arrested for false advertising, since Sandra is only in the movie a few minutes, and isn't very good in her role anyway. What a bomb, and that's an understatement. Don't rent it, don't buy it, and don't ever watch it, unless you are completely without anything to do, and want to find out for yourself just how bad a movie can be
don't expect much. I bought this DVD ...and could tell from the packaging it was nothing spectacular.  I was right.  If you're looking for a better rendition of the story of David and Goliath, though, I'm not sure what to tell you.  There aren't many to choose from.  I think Orson does okay for Saul and the guy playing Goliath is a giant, but not ridiculously huge.  He still looks human, but acts retarded.  David, on the other hand does much to ruin the movie as he looks more like an aspiring body builder than a shepherd or musician as he flaunts his way through the film.  Also I think it's trite the way he practically becomes Jesus on his first trip to Jerusalem with his persecuted sadness at the sins of the capitol city.  The daughters of Saul are pretty and almost make the film interesting as one coaxes Abner to villainy while the other coaxes David to righteousness.  The scenes are incredibly drawn out and a 90 minute movie feels like three or four hours.  If you put this one on fast-forward, you won't even notice
Annoying Lear. I didn't enjoy the film.  I also didn't enjoy the original play by Shakespeare.  King Lear is one of my least favorite Shakespeare plays.  I don't consider it particularly creative to remake a play that has already been done, and to add nothing of value to the original.  You can set it wherever you like, in medieval Japan or on the Moon, what's the difference.  It's King Lear, a downer of a play, there's nothing great about Ran just as there's nothing great about Lear, and it takes up three hours of your time.A moron named Lear, or Hidetoro, or whatever his name is, relinquishes power in his kingdom and turns the power over to his oldest son.  The youngest son warns him that it is a bad idea because the sons will be disloyal to their father.  He is right, of course, and Hidetoro Lear gets treated shabbily.  He's wanted dead or dead.In this treatment of the annoying plot, he loses his mind.  He has a faithful follower or two.  They overact.  There is nobody to root for in this depressing and ridiculously overrated downer of a play.  Lear Hidetoro is an absolute jerk.  Am I supposed to care what happens to him?  Why?  Because he used to be a powerful king, and a cruel one?  You may as well cry over Saddam Hussein.Look at this movie with fresh eyes.  Look at Shakespeare's King Lear with fresh eyes.  This stuff simply is not very entertaining, and is not very good.  The hell with King Lear.  He's an annoyance
Moon River....this movie is all wet!. Overacted. Boring. Horrible movie. The only likable character was Cat.
Dreadful. Save your money or give it to charity. This is one of the worst films for a long time. The characters are one-dimensional, you don't care who they are and when they die, you're indifferent. The direction and the screenplay are lame and the acting comes right out of a telephone directory.I was so bored with this film that I can't even bring myself to write anything else about it
a terrible screenplay with a bunch of bad castings. tasteless and bore-to-death screenplay with poor castings. a & e did another lousy job just like what showtime always did. i don't want spend time to review this worthless film with more words before i key in the dot(.
One star idea from Universal.... I guess with all the news recently that Universal wants to buy Dreamworks, their DVD marketing has started to go down the toilet, as two film packs like this one useually show little effort in both making a good DVD,adding any good bones features, and then just rushing it to stores.  The two movies on this gift set are rushed DVDs that were fast put together and were ment to rob you of your money.    Jurassic Park III; Perhaps the worst movie that Universal has done in ten years.  All special effects and no story.  Sam Neill deserves better films then this, and they still want to do a Jurassic Park IV......?!    Hulk;  Good Movie, bad DVD release and transfer.  Marvel did not like it either, nor Universal's less then promotion of the movie when it was about to be released to theaters.  There's talk of Marvel taking the Hulk Movie franchise to another movie company once the righst with Universal expire.  I say "Yes, Take it to a movie company that will do it right
Back to the future... of impossible romance?. If you loved the Back to the Future trilogy and, generally speaking, time traveling extravaganzas on the silver screen... simply forget about buying this DVD. All being well it would make you feel like a total idiot for the first half of the movie, while you try to figure out all the "time-traveling science" you've been taught so far, then space you out close to the end, leaving you totally speechless. This is not good, simply because the producers and the writers probably went crazy themselves trying to emulate the real time-traveling pros, while winding up with some abrubt, nonsense end of the movie, with absolutely no sci-fi logic at all: they simply had to eventually stop shooting, so they just thought any happy ending would have done the trick, no matter the time differences and the numberless loose ends still untied in the plot. Not a sci-fi movie and not a romantic story either: look elsewhere for any of these two types of movie
Disappointed. This set was supposed to have the Christopher Reeve "Superman 1-4" movies, but #3 was missing and instead, there were 2 #2s.  It was especially bad because the movies were a gift from "Santa" for my 6-year old son.  Further, the seller could not send me a #3 replacement, but offered to refund me $9.  However, i still have to go buy #3 on my own
Relieved I'm Not The Only One Who Feels This Way. After seeing the real show in L.A., my girlfriend and I were really looking forward to the DVD.  And after last night's viewing, I went to bed kinda creeped out and actually felt a little guilty that I didn't like the whole thing that much.  I'm relieved to see that other fans just couldn't handle all the audience shots either.  This DVD tries so hard to define Paul's place in our lives and his impact on the world through his music that it ends up blowing it for those of us who already know, feel, and live it.  They tried to document his music and its impact instead of just filming it.  If you're from Mars and this is your first day on Earth, you might appreciate the way the DVD attempts to explain the relevance of Paul's work.  If you've been on this planet for awhile, chances are you're already up to speed and just want to see the band and hear the music
AN INSULT TO ALL BLACK MEN ON ITS FACE - PERFECTLY VILE DVD. To answer another customer, YES UNFORTUNATELY I DID ACTUALLY SEE THE ENTIRE MOVIE FROM HIIDIOUS BEGINNING TO ITS AWEFUL END.  I DO SO TOTALLY WISH I COULD SUE THE PEOPLE WHO MADE HOW HIGH TO GET BACK THE MOMENTS OF MY LIFE WASTED WATCHING THIS DRECK!  Thank goodness a friend of mine rented it instead of my having brought this trash.I might share a movie I loved with people to a point but watching this movie was like taking a late night stroll through solid matter seperation tanks of sewage treatment plant in the heat of a still humid sweltering summer evening, not an experience one wishes to relive or share with others.  Generally I do not like druggie movies, but I have liked a few Car Wash, Which Way Is Up.  Even Cheech and Chong has more entertainment value than this critter. Oh I saw the all the black lackeys in the DVD including the Harvard token and to that I say one drop of dignity will not put out an inferno of toady stupidity. I know humor when I see it I just wish this How High had even the least little bit of humor in it for me to see.I even like a good black exploitation movie like "I'm Gonna Get You Sucka" which has no redeeming attributes but it was farce in weird and stupid way that did not suggest the kind of patently negative message How High touts.I often do not go into too much detail about a film because as bad as I might find something I won't be a spoiler.  My tastes in movies and books are generally not the mainstream which is cool by me.  Even if I hate a movie I will respect the artist enough not to ruin a movie for those others who might like it.  Where I come from not being a spoiler is just simple respect likely something not everyone can understand.This ranks as the most racially INSULTING vile stupid DVD I have ever seen.  The premise of the story is that black people (Black men in this particular case.) are so lame loathesome and hopelessly dumb that they can not logically be considered worthy of advancing to Harvard or other such IVY League Colleges without the help of "MAGICAL DOPE".  I honestly suspect the only person needing and using MAGICAL DRUGS WAS THE DOPE WHO WROTE THIS DRECK ONLY TO PLACE THIS SPAWN OF HIS PROFOUND NEVER ENDED STUPIDITY ON DVD.I think less of this foolish DVD than I do those old racist movies that portrayed all black people as, "Simple House Boys" bowing and scraping their way through life with the sole goal of "pleasin da masta".  At least older racially debased films lay legitimate claim to being products of a largely ignorant social and intellectual neanderthal nation mired in institutional hate biogotry and oppression.What makes this DVD especially bad is the fact that this is the new face of bigoted negativity in our modern age where some hip hop lackey's gladly take money to create messages that oppress and sell out our own black children.  The suggestion that black people are by nature of birth \ genetics alone inferior is wrapped into the core message of this DVD's storyline.  To watch this DVD youo must buy into its supposition that black people need MAGIC WEED, dope or some other supernatural transcending experience to become the intellectual equals of those who attend ivy league colleges which is the very height of today's more furtive ignorant stupid mindless bigotry disguised as comedy.This DVD functions as a racist tool to rob black men of their dignity, inner strength and self worth by suggesting as truth the lie that we need "MAGIC" to become the equals of those in this society who are afforded opportunities to acheive great things.Tell all the dopes who made this racist DVD you are not buying into their bright new package of old tired racist lies preaching the hate filled Gospel of supposed inheirent black inferiority by leaving this DVD trash on the shelf to rot.  Please do not buy this racist DVD media tool that insults the dignity and intelligence of every black man that has and will ever live.  I pray every black white red yellow whatever your race are stronger and better than sinking low enough to buy this racist filth
WORST MOVIE of all time. This film is terrible. It is so bad I threw the disk to the garbage. It was not even good enough to be kept on my shelf. Be warned
"Where's the brains?"  !!!!!!!  (imgaine this said by the wendy's old lady.). Yeah, that's how I felt when I noticed the lack of gore and the lack of development in the characters.  Even the zombies are the same thoughout the picture.  How can a zombie go from one part of town to the next in what would take a serious muscle car at least an hour?Regardless, it's worth owning to have the scene where they rise out of the cemetery.  The kid is downright annoying but, when I was a kid I liked him!  Suppose it's not time to have kids yet, aye?  Regardless it could have been better.  Flawed  but, if you viewed this before the first one... don't let it stop you from getting the first!  The first one rocked.  I thought the 3rd one was produced much better than this as well... but they just keep killing this series as part 4 and 5 I once again heard were terrible
Are You Being Disappointed?. Don't get me wrong, I LOVE Are You Being Served?  I have most of the episodes memorized but this is a total rip off.  The episodes shown here are available with the regular series DVDs and the quality is very poor.  The "On Set Interview" lasts about 4 minutes and involves some reporter asking cast members if they like being on the show. DUH!  Get the series, the movie and the sequel but forget this thing
It was great and awful at the same time. Blue Lagoon was a commercial success but due to the terrible acting and the cheesy storyline, the movie did very bad with the critics.I personally loved the beautiful scenery - the ocean and the islands - it really does make the movie worth seeing.  And Brooke Shields was just about the most gorgeous girl to look at when she made this movie - this is why the movie was a commercial success.  Though Brooke's acting was just terrible, she was so beautiful to look at that no one cared.  Now Brooke is trying so hard to become a serious actress.  She tries and tries and tries... however though she has improved somewhat, she just is not a good actress.  I just watched Bob the Butler and throughout the movie her efforts to try so hard to act well made it that I just couldn't see her character.  Brooke Shields trying so hard to act was all that anyone could see.  However this doesn't for a second take away from her great beauty and sweet nature.  She is a very nice person and a very lovely woman.So if you haven't seen Blue Lagoon, see it if you just want to get lost in the beauty of nature and Brooke Shields.  Otherwise you'll just laugh at this movie.
Plot Twists A Little Too Twisted. First of all I cannot stand Jennifer Aniston in any way,shape or form! But wanting to watch something in this day of retread movie plots I gave it a go.I have to say Anniston was a better actress than I thought, because from the moment she meets Clive Owen it looks like she couldn't care less about him and therefore I guessed where the plot was going immediately and what her agenda really was.Why would such a cash strapped guy with a sick kid even THINK about doing what he did? I found that hard to believe.At least Aniston won't be around much longer.She's on the downhill slide to 40 and not movie star pretty at all. In fact in the hotel where the big assault happens, did anyone notice as she is sitting on the bed how much like DUSTIN HOFFMAN she is beginning to look like?Thank Brad for your fame, girl, otherwise you're just a faded TV hack.
give me a break... im sure ill here alot from this review but everyone giving this movie 5 stars i dont see how or why.have you people just been introduced to the movie world?this movie is awful between the bad acting and the annoying music playing during talking scenes its flat out frustrating.rusty james brother in this movie acts like a mental case for you peole that havent seen this he dies in the end (i just saved you an hour and a half of your life cause now you wont have to waste it on this crappy movie).between the bad music the bad acting and the plot/storyline going all over the place in this movie its seriously like being on a bad acid trip.what a waste of money and time on this one.ill donate mine to goodwill or the garbage can..not worthy of my movie collection
Lousy. I was not satisfied with this movie.  I did not expect it to be similar to the first version of The Butterfly Effect.  However, what I did expect was that the film would at least do a decent job of telling the story in an effective manner similar to the first.  It failed, however.  The acting was lousy.  The script was poor.  The movie was an embarrassment and should have had substantial revisions.  Unfortunate.
R..... not PG. This movie is rated PG; yet I was not able to show this movie to my kids. I know that the world is full of aggression, however how can I sit with my family and watch a movie with so much violence between kids. Some will tell me that it is good to expose children to such violence and possibly reality of life and the human beings among each other. I totally disagree.This movie should be rated R and not PG2 stars, only because of the great acting; the story is basic, about  a father feeling awful for leaving his best buddy behind during the Vietnam War while his kids are fighting other children over a tree hut. I know I am probably going to bombarded with bad feedbacks however this is my honest opinion about this movie.
A Typical Male Movie: Cars, Girls, And No Sense. I mean, nothing made sense in this movie and it literally made my head spin. Nothing but fast cars, severly underweight h00chies, and plenty of rock/hip&hop music. It was like watching an extremely long music video. Sean is supposed to be in high school, but as old as he looked I guess he was on the 10 year plan. On top of that, he talked like Forrest Gump. In order not to go to jail, Sean moves to Japan to live with his dad. Sean was able to find himself a crew real quick. And if he and his friends were suppposedly in high school, how come they had so much time to race, fix cars, and go to parties? Shouldn't they have been studying for entrance crams? If it wasn't for Bow Wow and Vin Diesel (small part at the end), I never would've watched this waste of a film
The "original" versions are 4x3 letterboxed... The "original" versions are 4x3 letterboxed...For anyone with an HDTV or widescreen regular TV, these DVDs are a major disappointment.  The original versions are matted from their original 2.35:1 aspect ration for 4x3 TVs, so they look like crud on an HDTV or other widescreen TV.They appear to be made from the same transfers used for the laserdiscs.The other versions, from 2004, appear to be identical to the DVDs previously released
So so movie with inadequate storyline. Look people! The damn movie's about a guy getting demoted from doorman to sinkroom attendant. So what!?! This isn't Metropolis or Gone With The Wind as far as a great story. The overated camera techniques look archaic and the only impressive bit is the way the big city set is created just on a UFA studio-backlot. I bought this film on KIno DVD and felt financially ripped off upon seeing it
Save your money!. Awful!Doesn't even rise to the level of good camp or kitsch
Lacking of the facts. Don't let a propoganda wheel fool you of the truth1. The Miami Herald gained access to all Florida ballots and did their own recount, at their own time --- who won? BUSH! ----- http://www.usatoday.com/news/washington/2001-04-03-floridamain.htm2. There is a case that African American voters were turned away - however, where is the same case for the many Haitan American voters who were also turned away in droves, who are known to be sympathetic towards Republican causesThe filmmakers had a chance to make a point about voter rights and election problems - they turned this to an attack against President Bush and Republicans insteadSadly, their message will only be heard by Bush-haters, instead of the world, because of their decisio
I expected more!. I was really excited to receive the Leisa Hart abs workout from amazon after reading all of the excellent reviews.To my disappointment this ab workout turned out to be terrible! I exercise daily and am getting my degree in physical fitness but I would say that I am intermediate to advanced. When I popped this dvd in my friend and I were ready to get a good abs workout, but neither of us even felt a burn! (My friend is a beginner..) I figured that maybe I was not doing the moves correctly but when I tried it again with an intermediate exercising buddy, we stopped halfway through and put in another dvd. I just don't understand how everyone else on Amazon is posting all of these good reviews! Please don't listen to them if you are used to doing ab workouts- try Shape's "shape your abs" or The firm "jiggle free abs" dvd's instead. By all means, do not waste your money on this one! This dvd is extremely easy, and if you want to lose weight or tone up, you need something more challenging!
Where is the Disco song "I LOVE THE NIGHTLIFE"??????. Not The Original Film. Doesn't have the original disco scene with "I like the night life" song. THEY COMPLETELY RUINED THE MOVIE
Nothing of substance. I found this movie almost painful to sit through almost from the very beginning. The acting was amateurish and the dialog was stilted and unnatural. I have great love and respect for St. Therese of Lisieux because she was tender yet courageous, gentle yet determined, and most of all, holy in spite of intense personal trials. The movie revealed virtually none of this and made her appear superficial, almost to the point of silliness. I had really expected more depth and a more mature treatment of such a remarkable life.
banality by any other name. Jeez, maybe I am getting old, but I really found absolutely nothing about this film to be interesting or original in the slightest.A brilliant scientist.  Disfigured.  Angry.  Finds temporary techie fix for face.  Goes to get bad guys.  Fighting.  More fighting.  Still more fighting.  Ex mate learns he's alive.  He leaves her anyway (he's too ugly).  The end.  More to come, if successful.  Not recommended
Hmm... The old DVD from 1997 looks better than the new HD version. I've compared the two, and the first DVD had good color saturation, dark blacks and looked right with the heavy red and brown palette. The HD version has a blue-green haze covering everything and the picture is too bright. They also removed the film grain and made the image look smooth and creamy. The sound quality is better now, though, and the image of course is higher resolution.
Not impressed. I love Billy Blanks Lower Body and Ultimate Bootcamp dvds.  I tried his Ab Bootcamp, thinking it would be great too, but what a letdown.  I'm not sure why so many other reviewers liked it so much...maybe it's just me.His favorite move is standing and rotating the torso from side to side.  I felt it in the abs a little, but he keeps going back to it OVER AND OVER and it bothered my back. Also he makes some comment that your neck will stop hurting if you just suck it up and strengthen the neck muscles.  If you are pulling on your neck and using bad form that he teaches you, you can get hurt.Most of the video is done standing up.  He focuses more on the obliques (sides) than the rectus abdominus (front).  At first I liked the move where you rotate your hip up and bring your elbow down, isolating the obliques.  But I got bored of it after 10 minutes of the same thing.  He does crunches standing up too.  You stand in this hunched over squatting position (which I'm sure is bad for the back), put your hands behind your head, and contract your abs, pulling your head down (pulling on the neck).  I thought this was a lot of work for the rest of the body but I didn't feel it in my abs at all.  I prefer to do crunches on the floor, which uses more resistance since you're lifting the upper body against gravity.He does have some good floor moves in there at the end that I've never seen before.  It might be worth a rental to see those.As usual, Billy shows his lack of stretching knowledge.  His stretching routine usually involves swinging the arms like in Tai Chi...which really doesn't stretch anything.  I found it weird that he does a quad stretch and a hamstring stretch at the end of an Ab workout.  Wouldn't you expect an ab stretch?  Or a back stretch?This video is about 30 minutes.  It might seem short, but when you're targeting only 1 muscle group, that's a long time.  I thought my abs would be twice as sore compared to another dvd I have which is 15 mins, but the only thing that's sore is my back.  I guess I'll keep looking - I've heard good things about Gilad's Abs Workout
Welles has lost it. Orson Welles was a master of film. But not this film. While I appreciate the message he is trying to convey, his "cleverness" is off the deep end.   This film is like a big ego-trip for Welles.  He's so proud of how clever he is.  But the film is a mess, like paranoid, disjointed ramblings.   In his younger days he would have executed this with a more subtle style. Clever is most clever when it is not obvious.   In this film he beats you over the head with the "subtext" and thinks he's cleverly deceptive by trying to hide it in a jumbled-up the story line.   I'm sorry I wasted my time to watch it.  I would have turned it off, but given my high respect for Welles, I continued, expecting a revelation or twist.   Alas, no, it was just a stupid movie
Buy only if you are a jazz guitarist. The tiltle threw me off since i did not know who Danny Gatton was.I was expecting to learn some amazing rhythm patterns and great strummings techniques because of all the other reviews that I have read ,but all I saw was the same pluck and pick patterns and different jazz chords (some blues chords as well).I guess You have to be a fan of Mr.Gatton to enjoy the material.I know I did not enjoy it at all or really learned anything(I could not bare to sit through the whole thing but I forced myself).The only part I enjoyed was about one minute worth, when Mr.Gatton had the acoustic guitar(he used an electric guitar throughout the dvd)and used a really cool rhythm.
If you saw the trailer you saw the movie. From the glowing reviews here, I guess I am in the minority. Essentially this was a 10 minute Ben Stiller schtick stuffed into a movie with the barest of plots. If you saw the trailer then you saw the movie because that is all there was -- just more of it. It was clever and fun at the beginning but quickly palled as it became repetitive.  The other actors were largely props with the exception of Robin Williams whose talents went totally unused.  Some of the reviewers have commented on how this movie shows how history can be fun.  What this movie had to do with history is beyond me because dressing people up in costumes does not represent history anymore than Halloween would. There was little creativity and the simple (very simple) plot was trite, predictable, and appeared to exist only to carry the special effects. The special effects were really the entire point of this movie and if you have young children I'm sure they will enjoy this film.  I know I did, I was just disappointed that there was nothing more than the special effects
Heartburn is the least of the ills caused by this movie. A slow, loggy movie about a philandering husband (everyone was guessing this was Watergate reporter Carl Bernstein in the Nora Ephron novel on which the movie is based; he was Ephron's husband). Jack Nicholson plays the husband and Meryl Streep the wife, and both are uncharacteristically bland. There is hardly anything to the story: they marry, she gets pregnant, he gets restless and wanders. We finish watching knowing and caring as little about all this as when we started. Very dull
disappointing. i had never known that there was a movie made about the life story of one of my very favourite singers patsy cline.well they needn't have bothered as it was a very much by the numbers story something definetely not above anything that you would see as a midday movie on any weekday.i liked both of the main actors,jessica lange and ed harris.the problem for me was that there was no attempt at conveying any real depth to the characters.whilst i appreciate that there has to be some element of fiction in most bio-pics anyone watchimg the movie and not having heard of patsy cline would be none the wiser for her motivations and driving forces.the only saving grace for me was that patsys singing was used in the movie to at least try to convey the quality that others saw in her singing
watch out!. be careful with this video if you have any neck, back or shoulder problems
Sadly,. The lack of Liam neeson and raimi's directing is what ruined this movie for me. While Mr. Vasloo is superb in his taking on the burden of the Liam created character and mr. Drake always has appeal, the movie as a whole needed a much better script. It was too predicatble, too phoney.On the bonus side, they did manage to keep the hapahazard and crazy comments Darkman makes during chases and fight scenes in tact, so that was a plus
Scooby-DUD!. Loud, obnoxious and generally unfunny live-action adaption of the Hanna-Barbera cartoon.After watching this film I realized that the legendary 80's mega-flop "Howard the Duck" was almost twenty years ahead of its time. There's very little difference between Scooby-Doo (and most of the other current films of this type) and that classic bomb! Perhaps the only difference is that today this garbage is actually successful and is even considered "sequel worthy". Also, Just to be fair to Howard the Duck, at least that movie had the visual appeal of Lea Thompson.If your idea of fun is bombastic, poorly produced special effects, a crappy modern soundtrack and a plethora of booger and fart jokes then this is the film for you! Certainly worth checking out if you're a fan of the Scooby-Doo character, but just be prepared to end up wanting two hours of your life back!The sequel deserves the exact same review.-J
Please don't waste your money on this!. I have to get this off my chest. I can't go on hating the fact that I bought this tape and then not share my complaints with other potential buyers! So fans of this tape, brace yourself. I'm about to be brutally honest.First of all, you've got the pilates. Here's the interesting thing about pilates. It's great when you know what you're doing, but when you're not as strong and experienced as the instructor, Ana Caban, you're basically spending most of this video sitting on your mat feeling bad about yourself. If you've done pilates extensively and already are capable of doing the positions without killing your neck and spine, then maybe you don't even need this tape. For everyone else, keep shopping for a video that'll teach you proper form and give you some strengthening exercises to work your way up to Ana Caban's level.Now onto the cardio portion, which is the biggest joke of all. First of all, you've got music that suddenly shifts in weird places and throws you off balance. The cameraman also was having a bit too much fun and the swooping crane shots are enough to make you queasy, if not hinder your ability to see what Ana Caban is doing. Then again, does it really matter what she's doing? After all, you spend 20 minutes doing essentially four moves. You march in place, you lift one leg up behind you, you reach for the sky and you reach across your body. Over and over, you just keep doing that. Yes, there's an occasional break where you do some hard to keep up with lunges and 8 jumping jacks, hooray. Then at the end Ana Caban flaunts her ability to lift her leg above her waist for long periods of time, while you the viewer are feeling bad about yourself again. Then that's it. I didn't break a sweat at all and essentially had to take the workout at a double pace while adding my own modifications to get my heart rate going.So, in a nutshell, this is a video you would buy if you wanted to watch Ana Caban work out. This is not a video for any beginner or intermediate that wants to learn how to do pilates or get a good cardio workout.Phew. I feel much better now. :)
Horrid Movie. I saw all the revies for this movie and was expecting a dark enjoyable tale about a libtertine.  I was strongly mistaken.  Johnny Depp is a great actor with great abilites, but this is the worst movie of his I have ever seen.  Even his "cheesy" movies were better than this.  The rated R rating is light.  I couldn't believe how pornographic it was.  Even in Quills, it wasn't as raunchy as this.  Don't waste your money or your time with this one
Who can take this seriously?. What a world we live in where propaganda is no longer used to support governnments but corporations. After 30 minutes of this tripe I felt ill. Any serious person with an understanding of democracy and modern business practice will reject this heavy handed corporate propaganda
Nice Lip Syncing. There are no real performances here. Pretty ladies standing there not actually singing. Kinda boring. Music is fine if you like Celtic Yanni, but there's no reason to watch as there is no actual singing. If you are older, or don't feel like quality in music performance matters, perhaps you can overlook this... looks like many people have. Fake
Central Role Badly Miscast. A Perfect Spy is a complex novel, very difficult to film because it is essentially a psychological exploration rather than any sort of conventional narrative, much less a spy story. What one makes of the film will depend largely on how one reacts to Peter Egan as Magnus Pym. For my taste, he was absolutely awful, and he was hardly helped by the plodding direction. The only way Egan seemed capable of displaying the character's inner life (what the film is really about)was to grin throughout like a demented hyena, which was then forced upon the viewer in suffocating close-ups, a sure sign of a hack director. The script is intelligent, and the rest of the cast is first-rate, but hardly helped by a director who insists upon the sort of pretentious "pregnant pauses" that destroy all sense of natural pacing. The middle episodes are the best. The last two are interminable. There is no suspense really about the ultimate outcome, but what should be an intense and riveting experience leading up to the inevitable denoument instead becomes a boring caricature of psychological disintegration. I was seriously disappointed in this work
WEAK. If you want to waste two hours of your life watching a movie about the most implausible hooker in the universe, you are in luck.  Jane Fonda plays a call girl with a sensitive pimp and harmless businessmen for clients. She goes to a psychoanalyst on a regular basis to moan about her failed attempts to become an actress/model. All we see of her on the job is having sex with a few passive businessmen who meet up with her in high rise hotels and wait for Fonda to guide them through the act of sex.Donald Sutherland stars as the world's mopiest detective investigating the disappearance of some offscreen character. Did I mention he is a man of few words?  Most of Sutherland's screen time is spent in mute staring and trying not to react to anything.  When he does say a few lines it is in a mumble that registers no emotion.  His investigation consists of going up to hookers and asking them if they would like to be interviewed by him.99% of the movie is Sutherland and Fonda wandering around from one setting to another asking extras if they know something. Like a guided tour
bad demon, bad!!. This is camp and camp... and more camp.... but Bruce wouldn't touch it.  Bad acting, racial stereotypes, and more bad acting.  On the up side the make-up wasn't that bad, and I bet they had fun making this thing.  Plot goes something like this; evil movie theatre traps people to turn them into demons to take over the world... or something like that.  Warning!!!! This movie will not scare you!!!  I give it 2 on the camp-o-meter, because this really is what camp is about (just not good camp)... not much for memorable lines however.  The Pimp steals the show
Fictionally Tragic. All of us have a dark side.  Unfortunately AUTO FOCUS focuses on this small subset of actor Bob Crane's life and expands it out of proportion.  In doing so the movie reduces the other voluminous and interesting aspects of Crane's life and career as window dressing.  Even the screenplay is, at best, an uneducated guess at the evening escapades of Bob Crane and John H. Carpernter  -- since both are deceased with the former murdered and the latter the twice-accused murder suspect.In viewing this film I knew that it would involve some of Crane's extracurricular activities.  My interest in the film was as a HOGAN'S HEROES fan and hopeful that the movie would spend more time on the back stage politics and production of the successful six-year series.  Bob Crane's professional credits alone would make for a good film.  AUTO FOCUS unfortunately revolves around Crane's so-called "secret life" and is little more than a product for the risque film crowd.Facts are facts and there are established truths about Bob Crane's private life.  AUTO FOCUS, however, should be approached as a fictionalized story straight out of a grocery store scandal magazine.  You are better off spending your time and money buying the DVD releases of the HOGAN'S HEROES television series.
Disappointing Second Set. With the exception of disc# 6 this collection was very disappointing.  It was obvious that the show lost its charm after season #3 and was well on its way out before Paul Reubens little incident.   However, if you liked Pee-Wee Herman the first collection under Playhouse#1 is excellent.  It was fresh and innovative.  My 3 year old loves the first 6 discs.  Disc #7 to disc #10 are actually pretty bad and not worth the purchase.  They should have included disc #6 with the first set.  Anything after that was simply not entertaining.  The quality of all the discs still is excellent.
Modern Film Making at its... Weirdest. Do you not understand modern art?  Or does 50% or more of the art in MOMA confuse you?  If you answered yes to either of these questions then this film is definitely NOT for you.  If you answered no... well, this film still might not be for you.Do you like to watch people walking around?  A lot?  Walking everywhere?  If you watched a documentary of someone, would you be pissed off if they cut out anything at all, including scenes where people just sit around, or perform mundane activities like making salads?  If you answered yes to these questions, then this film is DEFINITELY for you.Eraserhead is an experiment in patience (on the viewer's part.)  It starts slowly, the (meager) plot unfolds slowly, and it ends slowly.  Nothing is lost by watching this movie 2x-4x (except the... unique... soundtrack.)  There ARE some interesting/worthwhile scenes but they are few and far between.  There are however, many riveting scenes such as someone getting out of bed, in bed, and out again, someone else walking, walking, walking.  People sitting on a couch.  A woman ululating for no apparent reason.  And many many more.  I don't know about you, but my dreams are more interesting than this.  This film really could have benefited from having 30 minutes or more cut out, but it seems to me like the director felt it necessary to pad the film with unecessary scenes in order to make it 'feature length.'  It's possible to have an artsy film not be boring (see Space Odyssey, Waking Life) but I think you need a little more than what is presented in this film.If you've never seen this movie before and don't really know what it's about, I highly recommend you rent it first.  This film is not for many people.Since this film is about 1 quarter interesting and 3 quarters boring, I give it 1.5 stars, plus .5 stars for a good job on the baby
Very Poor Quality DVD. Love the movie, but the quality of the DVD put out by Alpha Video was so bad it was very difficult to watch. The sound was scratchy and muffled and the picture looked as if the brightness was turned all the way up. If you don't want to be disappointed and feel like you've been ripped off, wait for the remastered cut before you buy this one
Drivel. I don't like to brag, but I'd like to think that I'm a pretty good judge of movies and whether they're good or not.  I wasn't expecting a blockbuster of a movie, or anything, but MY GOODNESS, this movie was awful!  One could ask themselves, "What's wrong with this movie?" But the answer itself is the very broad question, "What isn't?" Ashley Judd plays strong, sexy women very well, but she does NOT convince me when she plays a character whom is heart-broken and borderline desperate.Not only is Judd's character not believable, the actual plot pertaining to men behaving like cows who need many "places" to plant their seeds is just stupid. There are about a million and a half romantic comedies that are better than this, and I recommend all of them wholeheartedly over this joke of a film.Watch A Walk to Remember instead. Although not the best movie ever, it's a heck of alot better than this drivel
Barely Average... Mysterious Island was a quite a disappointment, considering the presence of Patrick Stewart and the fact that it is based on a classic by Jules Vern.The movie brings to the screen the story of an unlikely group of people binding together and making their way to a South Pacific island on a balloon where they encounter a "Jurassic Park"-like situation only instead of dinosaurs it's giant bugs.The acting and the plot are about average, the dialogues are way below average, while the setting is not bad at all.On the positive side:1) The Civil War was a nice setting.2) The South Pacific isle and its Jurassic Park feel were very interesting.3) Tying in Captain Nemo and learning about his past in India was cool.4) Having the pirates be sailing on an Asian ship as opposed to a European or American one was both accurate and realistic, and so was having a predominantly Asian crew....and that's about it.On the negative side:1) Weak/Unrealistic escape from the prison camp.2) Traveling from Virginia to the South Pacific on a balloon during the US Civil War, with next to no supplies was ridiculous to say the least.3) The woman and her daughter from Richmond had no southern accents taking away from the realism.4) The slave had too much of an attitude for that period in history.5) Captain Smith was way too politically correct for that period in history, or any period for that matter.6) The most likable character is killed almost the moment he sets foot on the island.7) The terrible special effects throughout the movie.8) Vinnie Jones carries out a terrible performance unlike in Deuce Bigalow: European Gigolo where he was great.The film would be more suited to youngsters, as opposed to adults, who are not that difficult to please.Though the potential for a great movie was definitely there it fails to take off.  A shame really...  No masterpiece here.
Not the greatest movie in world history, but . . . I would have to disagree with the statement that Scary Movie 3 was the best movie ever made.  The movie was a complete mesh of other famous flicks, such as The Ring and Signs.  I wouldn't suggest that people would buy this movie because it's just humor thrown into odd places.  I've seen the movie five times, and although I laugh, it still isn't the greatest movie.  I'm just relieved that there wasn't as much language in this movie than in Scary Movie 2.  My God - they swore every other minute!  Anyway, buy The Ring or Signs if you want to see a really good movie
UNWATCHABLE !. Save your money.  I gave up halfway through and shredded the DVD.  Amanda Peet was great in "Saving Silverman", but she should be mortified by this movie.  "Whipped" was probably written by two fifteen-year-olds on their junior high lunch break.  Absolutely abysmal
The Horror!  The Horror!. Well, I had to succumb.  I was attracted to this alleged film by it's notoriety as possibly the worst film ever made and a few of my friends who told me it was not that bad.  My low expectations for it were not only met but were exceeded.  This film reaches new cinematic depths.  It's complete ineptitude lacks even the charm of "Plan 9 from Outer Space."  It's stabs at humor are beyond pathetic they're just desperate.  Tom Green has to rank as the most unappealing screen presence, ever!  I felt sorry momentarily for accomplished actors like Rip Torn and Julie Hagerty who signed onto this dross but, hey, they cashed the checks.  Watching a few minutes of this slop is painful.  Enduring the full length of the film is outright masochistic.  To get the stench of this swill out of my consciousness I'm going to have to watch an actual good movie, like "Showgirls"
Full screen = no sale. I wont buy this title until they release the original WIDESCREEN version
MGM blew it. I think the publication of this VERSION of "Valdez Is Coming" is a travesty.The version published by MGM is NOT the original version. It is MISSING over 20 minutes of the original film. AND nowhere can I find a caveat advising potential purchasers of this film concerning this abominable editing.I have previously stated this opinion on the phone. WHY does AMAZON continue to PEDDLE a bastarized version?Repeat, repeat and re-peat. Isn't there a law against this sort of insidious editing of the work of a performer- Burt Lancaster, in this case?BAD BAD BADDON'T SPEND YOUR MONEY IF YOU WANT THE REAL THIN
Good Story, B Movie. The story is set in late 1943 but is unbelievable due to bad costumes and worse acting. A decent plot exploring the relationship between man and his enemy may be enough to keep the watcher awake, but maybe not.
Barberella Psychadela It's Not. The opening strip scene is reminiscent of Barbarella - too bad those aren't Basinger's legs though. Nerdy scientist falls for galactic beauty as presented by Kim Basinger. I have never understood Ackroyd's characters. And keeping in form, he is once again as unfunny as mud. Basinger tries so hard - too hard - to rescue this film, but that's no small task considering the ineptness of this way silly film. OK so she munches on batteries, and thinks she has to cook everything in the kitchen at mealtime. She seems a genuine Betty Crocker given that her favorite foods are nuts and bolts. Jon Lovitch also tries to prop up Ackroyd and this weak script. However, his contribution seems way overstated to me. He doesn't have much to do. Funny are the scenes inwhere the teenage girl eventually decides that her step-mother is not like other people. Basinger's character has a magic purse with an annoying creepy critter in it who tells her what to do. Think, Jar-Jar Blinks. I suppose it's OK as a backdrop for housecleaning. But that's it. Flat and mechanical
Feel Like I was Taken. This wasn't worth the money I paid for the deluxe.Lots of it was nonsense...If I could sent it back I would of.... I would just bought the Aloha from Hawaii.Don't waste your money,buying this.If I could sell it now I would !!!!!!Anyone want to buy it,let me know..........
Ultimate Boredom. After watching the 1 Ultimate Avengers I was expecting a another action packed romp through the park, but I realized this was truly anti-climatic. The HULK make the 1st movie extremely appealing with his rip-roaring rampage while decimating everything. I expected to see even more of the HULK this time and pretty much got nothing. Yuk for the sidekicks (No offense all the other hero's are just sidekicks to the HULK) blah, blah. While the Black Panther was cooler than I thought he would be, This was boring. WHERE WAS THE HULK???? Marvel, can you please do an American Icon like the HULK some love and give him some air time? HULK MUST SMASH and I cheered when he did (finally) show up but sorry this movie was mostly lame. Well, I bought it and I am stuck with it. I am feinding for the HULK to take it somebody (Villan or Hero) and open up a can o whup- @zzz. Please Marvel enough with the Aliens, there are some really cook villians in the Marvel Universe (Really Cool) and I have been a fan of the Avengers for decades but as much as I like Indepence Day The Movie, this Avengers seemed more like a knock off. Do yourself a favor wait until it comes on Cartoon Network or something, this was truly mediocre. HULK SMASH!!!!
Not that great. I don't think these dvd's are that great. I'm not sure if I just don't like Mari Winsor, or if I don't like pilates, but I bought these dvd's and only used them a few times before I lost interest. Some of the moves aren't that easy and others don't seem to do anything at all. I plan to stick with TaiBo
Don't Get Me Wrong... I feel I should preface by saying that I love this band to death. However, For Fans Only is pretty shoddy. Every negative comment listed below is pretty valid and probably more bothersome then one would expect. That being said, it's not without merit. I just wish it had been put together better
I'm the only one who didn't care for it. Gene Kelly was very good in it, and it did have one very good musical number with Kelly, that I saved, after I recorded it from Turner Classic Movies.I saw it all, but erased the rest. I kept thinking, "Did people actually pay to go in to see this weak movie, in 1948?"But everybody else loves it, so what do I know
not as good as the book. do not see beefcake, the book was better
Boring. There's nothing clever or subtle about this movie, there's no energy or chemistry, and it ain't even funny. Many movies can get away with formulas and cliches, but not this one.There are two stories: one about cool kids and nerds, the other a love story. The cool kids are beautiful, dumb, and cruel, the nerds are unattractive, brainy, and kind. Josie - Drew Barrymore - is a nerd who was constantly abused by the cool kids when she was in high school. It seems that the cool kids had nothing better to do than to torture and humiliate Josie. Now that Josie is a 25-year-old newspaper copy editor - and still a virgin nerd - she is given her first journalistic assignment: to attend high school as an undercover student and produce a sensational story that will sell lots of papers. The only problem is that Josie is still a nerd, and she's no better at infiltrating the cool cabal than before. But that all begins to change when Josie eats a marijuana brownie. Deep inside the nerdish girl is a wild and crazy party girl desperate to get out, and it feels great when she does. And everyone likes the party girl better.Now the love story. There is one person who likes both the nerdy Josie and the wild and cool Josie: her 30-year-old Shakespeare teacher, who, by the way, is not a nerd but a cool teacher. I mean, he really likes her, and it shows. It almost seems that he's stalking her, because after school he's always where she is. But since the feelings are mutual, Josie doesn't mind. At the Senior Prom, while slow-dancing with Josie, the teacher is about to tell her how he feels, until she interrupts him because he is being recorded by the newspaper. In other words, Josie stops him from being caught committing a crime. Does Josie see any red flags that this teacher she loves is making moves on what he thinks is an underage high school student? No. Not only does she ignore the red flags, she makes a huge public display of their falling in love at the end of the movie, and everyone is ecstatic. Hey, what's more romantic than a cool high school teacher falling in love with a student?If in describing the absurdities of this movie I have made it sound less boring than it is, I'm sorry. It's really not worth your time.
Oh, God, This Was Bad. This film was INCREDIBLY bad, easily the worst I ever tried to sit through. The editorial review said that it's hard to imagine a better Quixote than Peter O'Toole? Well, I sure can: his name is Brian Stokes Mitchell, and he at least can sing his own part. The poor man who dubbed over O'Toole, couldn't hit the side of a barn with a good note. The sad part is, I love musicals in general, and so I kept watching this one, hoping it would get better, but finally I just gave up. If ANY musical is in need of an onscreen revival with better performances, it's this one
Disappointing technical release. The studio should have invested more in the film to dvd transfer, the colors are a real disaster especially in "The Gang's All here".I whish I could ask for a refund. You know now what to expect..
Pieces Of a Puzzle. Ju-On the grudge is about a horrific murder that develops an un-rested spirit which rages in a small suburban house in Japan.  The movie constructs itself similar to a puzzled storyline as the movie developed through numerous storylines of the varying characters.  For the most part, viewers can easily be confused in the flick, or bored, as it may seem a bit redundant.  I thought the movie was well written and interesting in theory.  In practice, the movie felt never-ending, and as it drew to a close, i felt betrayed.  The movie was unfulfilled, as it never really explained a lot of questions I held at the end.  One question that leaves me wondering is questioning whether it is a Japanese custom to enter a house when no one answers.  For those interested in Asian horror, try Tale of Two Sisters.  This Korean film has great cinematography and story line.  It will leave you on edge and taken back at its close.
Original Cinderella. A bit disappointed - I had never seen this version before, having grown up watching the 60's version in color which I love, and even though Julie Andrews is very good, the story line was somewhat different and I found I prefer the 60's version
Disappointed. I bought this DVD after watching Jessica Simpson's latest music video "These boots are made for walkin'". I thought her Reality Tour Live will have some catchy songs and video but was very disappointed. May be OK for those who just want to watch Jessica sing
Only one reason to watch this film... ...and it's staring at you on the video cover.  It's more proof of Jodie Foster's brilliance that she manages to make you care about this character, when absurdity abounds in every scene.  No joke -- watch this with a 6-year old, and have him/her point out all the things in it that don't make sense.  It's a fun game that the whole family can enjoy.  Watch it anyway, because Foster is always worth it.  But please, Hollywood, let's find this woman some projects that deserve her
good music, too hard to follow for beginners... I will admit that Paula is inspirational BUT she doesn't give you enough time to "learn" the move before putting you in full gear. I loved the music and Paula's upbeat personality but felt it moved way too fast. This video will definitely get your heart a pumpin'
One of the worst films ever!!. I bought this DVD hoping that it will be a good one but it turned out to be awful and trashy. There is no story or plot to it, so I ended up throwing it away. I really regret buying it.If you're into sex, then this film is for you but let me tell you this, it is boring like hell.
Revolting. This movie is very difficult to watch after awhile. Its about a psycho boss but its not funny at all. I didn't laugh through any of the movie. I love dark comedies like election, heathers, to die for, etc but this just didn't work for me. I hated it so much I returned it (lied and said it was a gift). Don't even rent it horrendous
technical problems. I've loved this movie ever since I saw it on CBS years ago so I was really excited to own it on DVD. Unfortunately the experience was ruined when I discovered that there are big sound problems on the second disc. Loud popping sounds completely cover up the dialogue in an entire scene. I was very dissapointed.The movie is great but the sound problems aren't worth the purchase. Stay away
times like this amazon needs a no star option. I myself am a huge Buffy/Angel fan,  I had read the reviews here and I thought it was worth a shot seeing it.  Well The script was terrible,  the story even worse,  direction - don't get me started.   One reviewer said it,  it was like they didn't know whose point of view to choose.  The soundtrack was awful.  The ending was sooo stupid.  did anyone else see the people at the docks leaning against the rail as three people are shot in front of them...  they just keep standing there.  Like nothing is happening.  I really haven't seen a movie this bad in... well...  EVER!!  Oh and Alyson Hannigan's acting was way better in My stepmother is an alien. I think she was about 13 in that role.  Don't get me wrong she's a extremely talented actress...  I blame it on the script.rent it,  don't buy it.  You'll be embarassed to own it.  I am
hollow and meaningless graphic junk, deserve NO STAR!!. this is a ridiculous and clueless graphical junk! terrible! after watching it going mindlessly nowhere for 20 minutes, all of us, parents and teenagers, cursed loudly and decided to reject the dvd. WHAT A PIECE OF JUNK! we are very angry at the screenplay writer, director, the production and the release companies. acting? absolutely non-exist. pure computer generated junk so crappy that almost made us puke
The ugly side of ugly lives. Hank Chinaski can't hold a job, can't hold a woman, can't control his alcoholism, and can't make a decent friend because he wallows with the dregs of society.  Chinaski is the lowest of the semi-functioning drunks, barely able to keep himself in seedy hotels and in liquor.Unfortunately, the movie doesn't hold much interest besides seedy bars and seedy people.  Chinaski's struggles as a writer are only touched upon and not delved into.  There's no budding poet or tragic talent underlying his alcoholism.  The closest he comes to poetics, IMHO, is where he tells his ex-boss openly that he really needs his last check typed out now because he needs to get drunk.'Factotum' is saved only by the acting and the ability of the costume designer to turn Matt Dillon (Hank), Lili Taylor (Jan), and Marisa Tormei (Laura) into sleazy characters who look rode hard and put out wet in each and every scene.  The script is stilted, without any highs or lows to it.  The movie isn't near as fatalistic as 'Leaving Las Vegas', or as hard hitting as 'Requiem For A Dream', and without any of the comedic relief from 'Spun'.  The closest comparison would be the jaw-stretching yawn-fest of 'Drunks'.Even if you love addiction movies like I do, or love Dillon or Tormei, that still isn't enough to recommend this movie.  If curiosity overcomes you as it did me, then rent the movie before buying it.  It's earned two stars for the acting alone.  Have a ball or something else to play with if you rent this, it's that boring.
Not worth the time. As a fan of both golf and films based in biography, I expected to thoroughly enjoy this film.  Unfortuneately, it was, on the whole, a let down.  Part of it was the casting... with Jim Caviezel in an awful dye-job that was a constant reminder he was just playing a part, his appearance and his acting did not begin to enbody the man I have studied thru books, internet, and documentaries.  Part of it was also the script that lacked engaging dialouge.  With the exception of Jeremy Northam as Walter Hagan (the one bright spot in the movie), the characters were two-dimentional and forgetable.  My advice... if you want a good golf movie with true story backround, skip "Bobby Jones" and see "The Greatest Game Ever Played."  It outsines it by a mile.
big letdown. I read the book and loved it so I rented the movie hoping it would come pretty close. Didn't happen.If you haven't read the book you might enjoy the action but with out reading it the movie is kind of hard to follow. The part of Dirk Pitt is also portraded badly beacuse he's suppose to be the dashing strong fearless hero but Al stands out more than Dirk.The movie also skips some of the best parts of the book and totaly changes the story line. In short, read the book, its better use of your time
Not what I expected. I am sure some people would find this DVD useful, but it wasn't at all what I expected.  This may be attributed to my not being familiar with yoga, and have nothing to do with this particular DVD, but I wasn't even able to watch the entire thing
The Mothman Travesty. Three problems with this film:1. PACING - The film's pacing doesn't vary.  It's very boring.  As a matter of fact, this wouldn't be a problem if the film were much more tense (e.g., "Speed"), however this film lacks the high-action intensity to pull off such a slow expository speed.2. EFFECTS - Too many sequences of this film rely on color and light superimpositions, and there is an overabundance of high-speed imaging.  The scene changes that employ erratic barrages of images desensitize the viewer from the thrilling "horror" scenes.  Furthermore, they fail to make enough sequential sense of the film's plot to really mean much to the film as a greater whole.  The upshot: the film relies too heavily on the art of editing, to the point where plot twists are no longer interesting.3. TRIVIALITY - The plot's conclusion quails in the face of the "so what?" question.  The viewer is left with a sense of, "I sat through the film for THAT?"  In light of points (1) and (2), this obnoxious bit is the icing on the cake.Don't waste your life.ALon
anyone who watches this is an idiot. I weep for our nation. Anyone who watches this should be ashamed of themself. You are directly at fault for the decline of western civilization.
Wouldn't even play. I love the series and would love to see these episodes again.  Unfortunately the DVD wouldn't even play.  I tried it in three different players and it didn't work in any of them.  The only signal I got was a &quot;no disc&quot; signal after the disc supposedly got done loading.  I have the other four DVDs from Season 1 and have problems with Vol. 5, also
A Middling Collection Of Will's "SNL Career. After pretty much laughing my (...) off while watching "The Best Of Will Ferrell", I expected to do the same with "The Best Of Will Ferrell - Volume 2". However, when I watched it on tv in July, I was extremely disappointed. Outside of a few sketches, I hardly uttered a chuckle. However, when I saw this dvd a few weeks ago, I knew I had to buy it, thinking I might change my opinion. Needless to say, it remained the same."The Best Of Will Ferrell - Volume 2" is supposed to include sketches featuring some of Will's lesser known recurring characters that failed to make it on the (10 million times funnier) first volume, including rude and incompetent obstertrician Dr. Beamen, Hank of Bill Braskie's Buddies", and Ted Brogan", the 37 - year - old baby. Also there are some sketches that feature non - recurring bits. None of these sketches are funny.However, there are a few funny sketches. They are the opening Bush sequence, the famed "Wake Up And Smile", "Lovers" (though there's another version of this sketch with the same characters on volume one except it's with Jimmy Fallon and Drew Barrymore and it's much funnier), "Red Ships Of Spain" (with Will doing his Robert Goulet impression), and "Inside The Actors Studio" with Kate Hudson as Drew Barrymore (though the one with Alec Baldwin as Charles Nelson Reilly on the first edition was much funnier).The only other watchable sketch is "Janet Reno's Dance Party", which really only catches fire when she beats up Mayor Rudolph Giulianni. It's pretty good, but Will impersonated Reno 13 times, so there are probably better Janet Reno sketches out there.Also, there are many much more funnier characters that didn't appear or only appeared briefly on the first volume that without a doubt should have been included here. I'm talking about Frank Henderson (from the "Get Off The Shed" bit), David Leary (from "Dog Show"), Tom Wilkinson (from "Morning Latte"), Sean Patrick Flannery (from the Mary Katherine Gallagher sketches), Baron Nocturna (from "Goth Talk"), Don West (from the "Shopping At Home" sketches), and his Ted Kaczynski and Neil Diamond (where's "Storytellers") impressions.And why not include more Culps, Spartans, Roxbury, "Jeopardy!", Harry Caray and Saddam Hussein sketches? Yeah, they were on volume one, but they were truly Will's best! And as a final gripe, they could have given us at least one of the Bush/Gore presidential debates sketches.Overall, you can say this is a complete abomination, but it is tempting. Buy at your own risk and hope that volume three comes out soon and it's much, much better than this dvd
Hey Yo I dont like this. Its probably alright if you like stuff like this but I dont
Bor-r-r-r-ring!. Personally, I can't see this movie for dust. In fact, I find it extremely annoying. The only video worse than this one is "Monty Python and the Holy Grail." Yecch!Napoleon Dynamite, no offense to the actor, literally puts me to sleep. I don't mind his friend Pedro, and I also don't mind his brother (the dude with the glasses) or his grandmother, or even his irksome uncle, but Napoleon himself is as dull as dishwater. If they'd only take his character out, I'd probably enjoy this movie a little better.
Don't 'Fall' for this one. Teenagers plan a mock crime for kicks on the same day criminals knock off a bank for real and their paths cross.  I can understand implying that two ex-cons have or had a homosexual relationship but to lace an entire movie  with cheap double-entendre and to stoop so low as to give a lead male  character a female first name is a trifle ridiculous (OK, director we 'get  it' all men are secretly gay! You made your point, move on!) I can't even  imagine that a person of same gender orientation could possibly find this  film the least bit interesting much less stimulating. (for an intelligent  crime caper with a same-sex subplot see &quot;Bound&quot;)  Since this  movie is supposed to take place in Wisconsin they give the locals a  Southern accent.  An absolute bore
Lost Souls. "THE RULES OF ATTRACTION"Lost SoulsAmos Lassen and Cinema PrideThe Rules of Attraction" is a twisted story about sex, drugs, and college life. Three students at Camden College are involved in a love triangle. Sean Bateman, a womanizing drug dealer is love with Lauren, a virgin but who is more infatuated with her ex-boyfriend. Then there is Paul who is bisexual and used to date Lauren before he came out. Paul,However, is interested in Sean who he thinks is bisexual. Throw in a bunch of other characters and you have a mess. In fact everyone in this money is suffering from some kind of problem and each is only looking out for him or herself. We can tell right away that no good can come from these people and we are told so right in the beginning as the first scene of the movie is the end of the story and the rest of the movie tells us how we got to that point. In fact, a more apt name for this movie would be "Les Miserables" as that is what everyone turns out to be.In reality the film is a satire of those crazy teen movies like "American Pie" and "There's Something About Mary". If we look at the movie like this, it is ingenious. If, on the other hand, we look at it as just a movie, it bombs.The characters are not the kind of people that you would want to call friends but that does not mean they are not interesting. The problem with them is that we all know someone like them and they are realistic. Without the acting, this film does not move and the cast manages to succeed at that. For a young cast, the acting is good, better than what I had expected. His direction, however, is highly stylized and the tricks that Roger Avary employs just do not always work but by and large when I consider what he had to work with, his job is admirable.I think a lot of people were expecting a fluff movie with a young cast and what they got is a dark and realistic movie. It destroys some of the myths about drugs and college life and because of this, the movie has been deemed offensive by many. The treason for the offense is that many cannot understand that there are really this shallow who have no feeling.There seems to be no narrative focus, no beginning and no end and the focus is on a group of selfish ambiguous characters who traffic in rape, drugs, and homosexuality and general obsessions. We don't see smiling happy college kids. Rather we are given kids who have problems and they aren't pretty problems either. The characters are lost souls, pathetic people that we do not want to emulate. There is no resolution, there is no love.Everything seems to be overdone and excessive. The first time I watched the film I thought that my distrust in humanity had been validated and that perhaps I should consider becoming a loner. The characters are vile and horrible and not much more than amalgams of the worst that society has to offer. The only character that elicits sympathy dies right way. The satire on wasted youth never quite reaches its conclusion and comes off more as sour grapes.On the other hand, the movie can be classified as brilliant. It was true to the novel from which it was adapted and resented real characters even if we d not want to admit that people like this really exist. We are not supposed to like these people because they are too much into not being attached to anyone or to themselves. On first viewing I found the whole movie to be an appalling mess. On second viewing I eased up a bit and by the third viewing I was really into it. But then if it takes three viewings to appreciate a movie. I wonder if it is worth the effort. It is a challenging film. When sex means no more than a handshake, you want to question our value system. Likewise I am still questioning "The Rules of Attraction". Maybe one day I will shout its praises. Right now I am not in the mood for a fourth viewing.
Viacom's poor atempt of cashing in... The title says it all. Reguardless of why Dave left, these "episodes" -- if you even want to call them that, should have stayed lost. But because of Dave going MIA and seeing as how Viacom  wants to cash in on the popularity, they released not even subpar material. If I was Rick James, I would be spinning in my grave..
Bad movie. This has to be Dolph's suckiest movie.  I'm a huge fan, and I own a ton of his movies and watch a bunch more on a regular basis.  But do not buy this movie, save your money and buy one of Dolph's better movies like Army of one or Men of War.  Personally though I'm pumped for the release of masters of the Univers
Not that good...to put it lightly. Some eroticism, more of a soft-core porn movie but unlike most of those there is the plot.  The problem is perhaps that some of that plot gets lost in the translation, and there is much about Sada that goes unsaid and you are left to guess.The movie wasn't overly graphic in terms of sex, in my opinion, but the non-sexual images and some of the story was quite freakish.  Not worthy of the class people are putting it in on many of their 'most erotic movies' lists...  or maybe it's just not a very good movie.Was looking for an artistic, erotic masterpiece...this was about as erotic as a clockwork orange, but nowhere that good.  Some of the reviews here would have been more helpful--we wish we had read them, but I admit I didn't want to spoil the plot completely.
The Worst Sequel I have seen to date. This movie has horrible acting, and a storyline that is so farfetched its in outerspace. This is definetly not a movie for young people considering the constant inuendo and sex scenes. This movie only gets 1 star because that is the lowest option. If I could really choose it would get none. It is best to stick to the first which at least had wit and direction. Cruel Intentions  2 is the same storyline just trashier
WHY??. Why? This is a total waste of time and money on Disney's part. They just don't have that "magic" that they had in the 90's. I hope something happens because some of the animated movies are losing credibility. JMHO
Not as Advertised. I bought this DVD for my collection.  I do not buy full screen format DVDs.  Amazon described the DVD as "Anamorphic, Closed-captioned, Color, Dolby, Full Screen, Widescreen, NTSC" with an aspect ration of 2.35:1.  However, when it arrived, it was Full Screen only with an aspect ratio of 1:33.1.  Consequently, I returned it.  My recommendation, if you only want Widescreen, don't believe the description that this DVD is dual-layered and don't buy it
Horrible sketch comedy....terribly dated, and not very funny... Despite being a comedy show, this turned out to be a rather depressing experience. There were a few amusing bits here and there, mostly there, but the targets of the satire were very lame.  Most of the parodies are from pop culture in the 1990's, so they are extremely dated.  The "Information 411", "90210", and Yakmin Shirmnov sketches were particularly painful to watch, as bad as anything on SNL.  I only made it through the first 8 episodes, and skipped the last 5.  The commentary on episode 8 was more interesting (check out Garofalo screaming how she hated kissing a sock puppet because she hates "sexuality".  I still don't know what she meant by that) than the actual episode.  As we know, Ben Stiller became a star playing neurotic, clumsy nerds, Andy [...] has done a plethora of drugs and seems to be on the path of being the next Courtney Love (in terms of obnoxiousness and drug intake), Janeane does supporting roles in mostly forgettable (and sometimes wretched) films (even though she does have talent), and Bob Odenkirk did Mr. Show and recently (as of November 2006) directed the awful Let's Go to Prison.  The only sketches I remember in which I mildy laughed were the "B Minus Time Traveler" sketch.  Stick with Monty Python's Flying Circus, which is still unsurpassed in sketch comedy.
--Ridiculous portrayal of President Teddy Roosevelt--. I had looked forward to seeing THE ROUGH RIDERS, but my expectation for a good film was not met by this movie.The film does have a wonderful cast of actors, and that drew me to the story. Gary Busey was terrific.  Sam Elliot, George Hamilton and Chris Noth were all very good and believable in their roles. Illeana Douglas as Mrs. Roosevelt was wonderful.My problem was with the way that Tom Berenger played the part of Teddy Roosevelt.  He portrayed Roosevelt as a bumbling idiot.  I can't believe that Berenger, who usually does a good job, got so off track with the part of Roosevelt.  He tripped over objects; he bumped into people and even knocked them out of the way when he was in a hurry. Yes, I believe that Teddy Roosevelt was a man of action, but this depiction was an insult to his memory.  Roosevelt was essential to this story and I was not able to enjoy much of the movie because his part was unacceptable to me.I do enjoy movies and know that poetic license is a way of life for movie makers and I understand that; however, I find it unforgivable and offensive to mislead the audience when showing a real person. In this period of our history, children and adults don't read as much as they did in previous times.  Unfortunately, a lot of information is learned and accepted because someone saw it in a movie.  I believe that filmmakers have an obligation to portray historical figures in a true and honest fashion.
Where's the music???. Muse is obviously one of the top bands musically in this day and age.  Creative music and lyrics will always make them an amazing listening experience.1st note:  There is abolutely no Muse music on this DVD.  I guess they did not, or could not get copywrite approval for the DVD.  Maybe this should have been considered before even creating this DVD.2nd note:  The DVD does contain Muse interviews and such, but compared to the 63 minutes on the total DVD, its probably less than 15 minutes.  Some of the interview footage is rather funny.3rd note:  The DVD does give some interesting history on how Muse met, where they came from, etc...4th note:  The DVD does have some interviews with people who have worked with them.  The best of the interviews come from the old Guitar Tech, and a Producer.  All the other interview sessions sound like a sale or a promotion of the band.Not sure how or where this DVD really came from, but it kind of was a dissapointment.  Quality is pretty high, so some one did definately put some $$ behind this project.  But seriously, how can you have a MUSE dvd without MUSE music?
A 10$ INSULT TO THE BACKWOODS HORROR GENRE !. I'm a big fan of low budget/straight to dvd horror but this one just didn't do it for me. There was so much potential & if the makers of this film tried hard enough they could have done so much more & believe me it had nothing to do with the budget this was simply a lack of effort all the way around. Detour is neither scary or funny its just a low budget snore fest & for some shmucks out there who compare this movie to Tobe Hooper's 'TEXAS CHAINSAW MASSACRE' and or Wes Craven's 'THE HILLS HAVE EYE'S' to me you only reveal your stupidity because the only thing Detour has in common with those classics is the backwoods idea & thas it! slasher fans don't be fooled by all these positive reviews like i was! Good low- budget movies are 'last house on the left''scrap book''dead alive''bad taste''the janitor''dead & breakfast''redneck zombies' & so on! Good straight to dvd movies are 'dead end''dead birds''shallow ground''the last horror movie''satans little helper''creep''malevolence' & so on but 'Detour' just stinks!
An easy film to sum up... Just repeat the following several times.1) Draggy plot2) Uninspired acting, especially Allen, who almost sinks it3) unimaginative (story, direction, etc)Then get a Hitchcock film
Blind Faith. Disappointing, to say the least.Poor sound qualityl 2 channel stereol I mean c'mon; no surround soundThis is 2006!They could have mastered the picture quality, as well
I Call Shenanigans!. Shame on you Disney, for trying to bleed me of my hard-eard money.I call Shenanigan
Iconic film-depressing, grim view of life. Nicholsan's performance is without a doubt superior, but the material is second-rate.  Why anyone would want to make a movie like this, much less act in it, is beyond me.  It depicts a bunch of self-obsessed and depressed people(unless they're two-dimensionally portrayed egotistical and superficial snobs to whom the depressed losers feel superior) doing stupid things and being nasty to one another.  You just feel sad and frustrated after watching it, because it doesn't reflect life as it really is, or at the very least, it doesn't give a full view of life, just the small, mean, petty, grimy, sordid vision of one unhappy screenwriter who thinks they're being deep and insightful
Dung and a drag. OK, first things first true believers - The Curmudgeon is NOT a D&D fan. I've nothing against it or anything (I don't think it's nerdy or whatever), it's just never been my bag. But I was VERY excited when I saw this movie was being released. Why?Simple - the Dungeons and Dragons cartoon, which was by far the coolest cartoon of the 1980's. It smoked He-Man, Thundercats and any other contender and became one of THE best experiences of childhood. So while a movie based on the board game would have been cool, I was secretly hoping for a movie based on the cartoon. Come on - Hank and his flaming bow and arrow? Sarcastic Eric and his shield (you'd think the Dungeon Master would have thrown a SWORD in there too?), Bobby the Barbarian.. and let's not forget the uber bad-ass - Vengar himself. Let's face it folks - done right, it would have been AWESOME.But we didn't get that - we got, well.. who knows? The plot is so incoherent and amateurish it could have been based on a game of Hungry, Hungry Hippo's. And whilst great acting is never the prime goal in these sorts of movies, special mention MUST go to the utter lack of any conviction the actors here have in their performances, coming across as just stepping out of a Snow White pantomime.And then there's Jeremy Irons. Bit of a superb actor is our Jeremy, and I'm sure he thought at first he had signed up to a classy fantasy movie, thinking perhaps of Sir Alec Guiness in Star Wars. Then he read the script and saw the talentless monkeys he was working with and went full out into giving the worst performance of his entire career, not so much saying his lines as yelling them and spitting at the camera in an attempt to hide his embarrassment. Easily the best thing of the movie.The producers obviously thought it was going to do well judging by its laughably hopeful ambiguous ending. Not a chance in hell, guys.  You had your chance and you blew it with this dragon turd of a film.Stick with the boxset of the cartoon, and see how fantasy really SHOULD be presented.The_Curmudgeon_Hates_You@yahoo.co.u
Long and Boring. Long on loathing. Boring, I fear. This trip was at somewhere I've never been, and I don't want to go there. A place beyond the event horizon. Who could care less about these people? Great title for a book, or a film, though. For some reason I've given it an extra star. I don't know why. Perhaps because it definitely belongs in anybody's collection of bizarre movies
Stop the world I want to get off. Five of six episodes of 1955 mini-series Orson Welles created for British television.The first episode takes place in St. Germain des Pres in Paris.  It opens with a very young Art Buchwald at the typewriter providing a typed narration of sorts.  The idea was jettisoned for the remaining episodes.  We catch a quick glance of Jean Cocteau and Simone de Beauvoir waving at the camera and running away.  Most of the episode is taken up with Welles interview of an old American expatriate in a tunic.Episode two takes place in London and splits its time between Welles interviewing a handful of old women who live in a home for destitute widows and the Chelsea pensioners - retired soldiers, interviewed in a pub.Episode three is a loving look at the Madrid bullfight, with much history and explanatory narration supplied by writer Kenneth Tynan and then-wife Elaine Dundy.Episodes four and five take place in the land of the Basques, an `aboriginal' people living on the border of Spain and France.You can probably file this one under "Failed Experiment."  In the first two episodes Welles seems to think that the audience will find his tittering eccentrics as interesting as he does. Either that, or more likely, he went into this project without a plan or purpose and ran the camera at the first thing that wouldn't run away.The third episode - the bullfight - seems to support this argument.  Not only is it the only interesting episode, it's the only one that seems to have been thought out beforehand.  (Why was bullfighting so popular in the '50s, anyway?)The final two episodes show a real loss of whatever steam this project had.  Marginally interesting to begin with, episode five repeats two full scenes from episode four.Recommended only for die-hard fans of Orson Welles.
Mediocre DVD Transfer; Average Sci-Fi Movie. For a 2-disc, director's cut, my expectations were perhaps too high for this DVD.  Nevertheless, I was appalled at the poor quality of the transfer.  The colors were dull throughout, and focus was frequently not at the beginning of scenes.For the movie itself, I don't agree that it is holding up well over time.  At 25 years old, the movie just has limited entertainment value for people who aren't waiting for their beloved canceled TV series to be on the big screen.There's no question that II and IV are the best of the series, but comparing it to other Star Trek original cast movies isn't putting the bar very high.My interest in watching this again was just having finished Melville's Moby Dick, the final scenes of which Khan repeats liberally during the final space battle.  That said, I think Montalban was fantastic as the revenged-obsessed Khan and very evocative of Ahab.  However, Shatner's pretentious Kirk just becomes more grating as time goes on.  The original cast schtick just doesn't make for a compelling drama
Not as good as one would think. I tend to be a little picky about which movies I watch, especially for those rare theaters visits, but to some degree for my rentals pick as well.  The factor I most often use to influence my decisions are the films' trailers.  Usually they are a decently reliable indicator of whether I will like a film, although once in a while it proves to be inaccurate (MY SUPER EX-GIRLFRIEND among others).Unfortunately, JET LI'S FEARLESS is another of those films that catches your attention with an impressive trailer, but turns out to have little else of interest or enjoyment beyond the clips used to advertise it.  The film does feature some impressive martial artistry and choreography, for which Jet Li has become the pre-eminent martial arts action star.  And though his acting ability and language proficiency are limited, he does have a good screen presence.The weakness lies within the remainder of the film (which composes the majority of it).  It is competently and even skillfully filmed, but the pacing goes from slow to dreary at some points.  The writing is bland and sappy and preachy.  Though the film is based on a true story, there are still points which strain its credibility, most especially the fight between Li's character and the titanic American boxer.  In fact, the creative license they take with the scene crosses that line from creative embellishment to insulting the audience's intelligence.The film-marketers may lure you in with "promises" of dazzling fight scenes (which is what happened in my case), but the bulk of the film is tedious sanctimony.  No umbrage towards those who market and promote this film; they did their job well, though it is little reason to celebrate.  Overall, this is not a terrible film, nor even a bad film.  But it is not a very satisfying movie, and that is ultimately what most influences the ratings (number of stars) that comes with a review.This film claims to be Jet Li's final epic.  After watching this film, I say it's about time.  Though Jet Li is still great - maybe among the best - if you want to see an amazing martial arts action star who does action-filled (if not very cerebral) movies, Tony Jaa is the new champion.
Down right weird!. I saw Dead Ringers in the movies. The theater was filled with mostly couples. When it was over, as we walked out, laughter began to spread as we all recognized that we as couples were having the same conversation; "Whose stupid idea was it to pay money to see this move"!
Not a movie. Buyers should be aware that this is not actually a "movie", but a narrated reenactment. It made me feel I was back in grade school. Still, evenso, it retained much of the wonderment that I felt with the school movies and the action and pretty guns going off. If you watched Last of the Mohicans, or Drums along the Mohawk, you will be disappointed when you come to this. It is nicely done, but not tops
omg................... i love jane austen and i really enjoy period pieces. but the main character was the WORST actress i have ever seen in my life. she was boring, weird, ugly, and never changed her expression. i dont kno how anyone could love her. i could barely understand what they were saying. a terrible film. i hated it.
How to make a good story boring. Watching this movie, I am struck by how effectively they can take one of the most interesting and exciting stories possible, and make it drag out on the screen.  The disappointment at the pacing of such great subject matter holds no bounds.  Watching this moving is almost embarassing knowing how good this could and should be, and how poor direction, and what seems like a script which does injustice to pacing and drama can wreck what should be greatness.  I won't even go into historical inaccuracies, or the completely ridiculous cover art showing a modern beretta as the pistol sidearm 40 years too early.  Makes me wonder if this movie was crafted with apathy towards the subject, the audience and history instead of respect
It's a Dog...  ARF! ARF! ARF!. Watching "Toys" was like watching "Teletubbies" dumbed down for an audience of subhumans.Six Million Jews died in concentration camps during World War II.  It took the combined forces of the free world to stop this genocide.  Williams and the production company that made "Toys" are just closet nazis.Inasmuch as I watched this self-righteous piece of elitist garbage, I can say without any hestiation that if you believe that whole nations would be better off in the hands of two-bit despots, then maybe you'll be stupid enough to accept the premise of this unadulterated nonsense.Pray for peace, but never give in to evil
Spacey moons the camera, then the movie gets mooned. starts off as Spacey's moons the cameras and people and then goes on with a boring pace and the worst part is that Colin Farrell has little screen time in this one and gets killed as hes shooting from behind a painting, what the hell. Fiorento has a good British accent but the story is to dumb and Spacey's friends and the cops are obnoxious, but Farrell was mute maybe for most his part. for Spacey or Farrell fan
The Itsy Bitsy Problem. By the time you see the ending, you'll already be wishing that you hadn't watched this movie
No need to Suicide. I get the story line but 5 grown women need to suicide!?  The one dare to have a boyfriend and not go home for the night.  Why would that kind of free sprite would kill herself!?!?  It is not matching the character
Scarlett. Margarett Mitchell must be rolling in her grave. She wrote a masterpiece in the 1930's, then Alexandra Ripley bought the rights to her book by conning Margaret Mitchell's heirs to sell out the legacy of their relative.  Alexandra Ripley's novel was an embarrasing pile of mush, even worse than a Barbara Courtland romance novel.Beautiful costumes and a good cast - but the script is a soap opera and very poorly written with too many cliche's.  The TV movie version is even worse than Alexandra Ripley's book. I would have given this movie zero stars - but gave it 2 stars solely for the world class acting of Sean Bean as the deliciously evil Lord Fenton.Sean Bean heats up the screen as a sexy, feral villian along the lines of "The Man You Love to Hate" as an unsafe sex symbol.  Unless you are a Sean Bean fan, there is nothing worthwhile about this film.  The script is trite, cliche'd and very slow moving.  Sean Bean is only in Disc 1 and his character is eliminated and the movie slides downhill from there.Disc 2 is overwrought with very boring, drawn out courtroom scenes...I was almost rooting that Scarlett would be hanged for the murder just to see an end to this movie!I've always liked Joanna Whaley-Kilmer and Timothy Dalton. They are excellent actors wasted in this pile of mush movie. Ann-Margaret's performance as Belle Watling is so bad I wanted to slap her.Do yourself a favor and watch the original Gone With the Wind starring Clark Gable and Vivien Leigh if you want to see a wonderful film
Down By Law DVD Dissapointment. The movie itself is just as good i remembered it.  But the Criterion Collection DVD package, however, is so totally not worth the $40 plus postage i paid for it.  I've gotten so much more bang for my buck with other "special edition"-type DVDs.  i found the interviews and "extra" stuff dull.  I want my money back
Lousy follow-up. This is pitiful. How do you maximize profit? Easy, minimize quality on every level and capitalize on the brand name. In other words, raise expectations through the roof with a superior detective series and use this momentum to sell an inferior follow-up series under the same name.Ghost in the Shell 2nd Gig says "Cheap" from the opening credit montage to the bare bone ending credits. The colors, unlike the first season's which were deep and juicy, are dry and monochromatic at times. The inventive little things that embellished the high-tech philosophy and look of the first series are completely lost on this one which seems less specific and more abstract. Even the presentation shouts "economy". The first season's packaging included a booklet, this one, nothing. Oh, I forgot to add that the art for both boxes look thrown together. And let's not forget the animation. There are a lot of clever things being verbalized but by it being called "animation" I don't expect to sit through ten minutes of dialogue to see something, anything move. Another clever little trick to save money.The look of the characters, from Batou to Kusanagi have been altered considerably. Kusanagi's eyes are bigger and her body seems shorter and less voluptuous. Batou's arms are shorter. The lean, chiseled features of Aramaki which made him appear old and wise are now younger and fuller. The mecha and weapons in this series are also vague. The individual eleven are not as interesting as the laughing man plot of the first season's series.I had high hopes for this series. There was a lot of thought and creativity behind the first season of GITS. It was better, in my opinion, than Samurai Champloo (though not as popular). I still believe that as this current storyline spins out that it will be better than most of the series out there. Unfortunately, this one will not even come close to the first season and this will probably be the last season for this franchise. Too bad.
Awful!. Saw "Hart's War" the other night and couldn't really believe anyone would invest money and time in a film as awful as this one.  This film bombed at the box office and was yanked from circulation after only a few days.   Here are ten reasons why:1.  This film isn't "The Great Escape" and even though he would probably like to think otherwise, Bruce Willis isn't Steve McQueen.  Even though Willis received top billing, this is a Colin Farrell vehicle.2.  The vast majority of the target audience of 18-34 year old moviegoing males could care less about what happened during the Reagan administration, much less World War II.  "Hart's War" may just as well be a film about a POW camp during the War of 1812.  Anything with Vin Diesel or the Rock would be bound to sell more tickets.3.  As far as depicting life in a POW camp, "Hart's War" is pretty much on par with "Hogan's Heroes".  The Germans are nice guys with guns who don't know very much and everyone gets away with just about anything.  Where did the GI's get all those cigarettes, anyway?4.  Any Stalag Luft comandant worth his weight in sauerkraut would have just as soon killed the Bruce Willis character as look at him.  As depicted in "Hart's War", the camp commandant (as portrayed by Marcel Lures) would have had a very difficult time maintaining any sort of status as an officer in the German Army.  His collection of American jazz/blues records is a cute writer's invention that has nothing to do with the reality of the situation, or of the type of men who were in charge of German POW camps.  In reality, the Marcel Lures character would probably have been relegated to another type of nazi camp with a pink triangle sewn on the front of his tunic.5.  The storyline is not completely unbelievable - trials did take place in POW camps, one good example being the POW's who were tried and hung in Andersonville;  However, the whole idea that the camp's commandant would actively participate in such a trial as sort of a Jerry Springer type advocate is ludicrous.6.  The idea that during the trial, a group of POW's who escape go on a secret mission to destroy a nearby munitions factory is insulting.  Not only did nothing like this ever happen during World War II, it degrades the bravery of those poor souls whose only act of heroism was to survive internment under harsh and sometimes brutal conditions.  The German army simply wasn't that stupid.7.  I saw this film once and didn't like it.  I thought that maybe the second time would be better.  It wasn't.8.  Beyond being sheer Hollywood political correctness, "Hart's War" seriously misrepresents many of the more important aspects of internment.  It ignores the real focus of life in such a Stalag which, for most POW's, was just day to day survival.  Also, the soldiers who served in our armed forces during World War II and also happened to be African Americans weren't spineless, hapless dopes.9.  Bruce Willis playing the same role in variations of "Die Hard" over and over and over again is tiring.10.  Better films about the same sort of subject matter are "The Tuskeegee Airmen" and "Stalag 17".  Hopefully in a few years, "Hart's War" will be completely forgotten, and these dvd's will be rotting in some landfill.
Turn off your brain and enjoy. Despite my one-star rating, this is an acceptable time-killer: good-natured, forgettable and not real bright.  Poor Hilary Swank - from that movie where she was a boy to this in a few short years.  Of course, her fall wasn't as steep as Cuba Gooding's (from Jerry Maguire to Boat Trip in one movie) or Jamie Foxx's (from Ray to Stealth in one movie).  She looks like Jolene Blalock - T'Pol from TV's Star Trek Enterprise, and it wasn't until the credits that I realized it was actually Swank and not Blalock in the movie.  Perhaps Swank was trying to camouflage herself.The movie begins with a space shuttle landing in the LA River, which is interesting, but has nothing at all to do with the rest of the movie.  Next thing you know, the valiant pilot is recruited to some mission to drill to the center of the earth to restart the core, which got some spyware or something and stopped working.  As a result, the Coliseum and the Golden Gate Bridge get wiped out by lightning.  Don't ask.  The Feds then assemble a team to take a magic vehicle to the core, drop some nukes, and reboot the earth.We learn some interesting things on the way, such as: Molten rock is completely clear.  There are really unconvincing sets with big fake crystals deep inside the earth.  And, if you're a jerk, you'll get killed by rolling nuclear weapons and then repent.You can guess how it ends.  It's not great art, but it's dumb fun on a rainy day
There is nothing wrong with your television set.... The two-star review is for the transfer. While the movie itself is pretty good, the transfer for this DVD is awful. It looks like they burned copies from an old VHS tape (that happened to be in widescreen) and turned around and sold it to the public for consumption. Sorry I bought it
insufficient, boring, and eventually annoying. I can do all the exercises here, with sufficient rests between them, plus a warm up and warm down, in 15 minutes.  So what's the other 15 minutes of this 30 minute DVD?  Um, the instructor blabbering on about nothing.  The exercises are as basic as can be, you could do them without a DVD to follow because he doesn't switch things up at all to keep them interesting , and there isn't even any music to get into.  This is the least useful exercise DVD I own -- I know that sounds really negative, but anything by Denise Austin or QuickFix would be a lot more interesting and a lot more creatively put together.  You can find other DVDs with several different workouts on them so that you can rotate the routines, and for the same price.  Keep looking and don't buy this one
Unbelievebly predictable (and bad). This is the most boring, vapid, cliched movie in the world.  Here's the plot (if you haven't guessed): Soccer team of lovable misfits sucks at the beginning of the movie, losing to their stuck-up but great-at-soccer rivals (even the name is predictable--the "Knights"), but then, through teamwork and dedication etc. slowly get better (esp. the fat kid).  They come from behind at the end of the season to beat the Knights with seconds left (I believe the little kid, who is always dirty, scores the last goal). The Knights are humiliated, the Big Green recieves a cup that makes it look like they won the World Series, they learn eminently predictible life lessons, etc.  It's the standard feel-good sports-movie plot, and is not helped by maudlin, cliche-filled acting (not to mention music).  Don't believe the five star reviewers, because apparantly they enjoy mindless pap.  DO NOT BUY THIS MOVIE!!!!
Cliched story, inferior animation. We're deep into the formula now with computer animated films -- and Over The Hedge is one of the most tired of the bunch. Can anyone say Buzz and Woody? Chicken Run? The Exterminator is the stock villain in CGI movies --almost identical to the vintage toy collector in Toy Story 2. How many times can you do the A-bomb joke...Worse still is the dialogue, the painfully unfunny one-liners, and thesee-saw animation that is either dull or like a pinball machine with sight gags and explosions. It is clear that each of these animators are trying to outdo one another, and that once again we see a cleverly-disguised lack of locations -- or interest. There must be nothing easier to craft and render than endless rows of geometric homes and a single proscenium of forest. This film is a by-the-numbers piece of merchandising with very little genuine artistry.
Horrible Compilation. Atrocious Compilation - it's of some of the worst films the Coens' did (excluding The Big Lebowksi) and does not include their most famous films.  What were they thinking?  It's like if they released a Spielberg Compilation but only included Catch Me If You Can, AI, Minority Report, and War of the Worlds.  WTF!!!!Plus you can buy each DVD separately and come UNDER the asking price of the entire set.  The BIg Lebowski and The Man Who Wasn't There are about 10 bucks new in most stores.  Blood Simple and Int. Cruelty (which is the most UNCoen film ever) are closer to 5 in many places I've seen.  So don't fall into the "compilation trap" because you are not getting a "bulk" discount.  Just buy the films you want separately.  Most Coen DVDs are very reasonable price wise.Any Coen compilation without Fargo, Barton Fink, and Raising Arizona is worthless.And again, you're better off spending $40 on those DVDs individually.
Dreadful. I recall this movie fondly--Unfortunately, the DVD quality is so poor, this cannot be watched.  Pity Amazon does not allow negative stars the their ratings.  Don't waste your time until someone cleans this up.  But it makes a nice coaster, though
Too Slow. I was very disappointed in this movie.  I thought it was slow moving and found myself contunually calling up the display to see how much longer it lasted.  The Grandfather has such a heavy accent that I missed a lot of what he was saying but didn't want to drag out the movie by playing it back. I have seen many fantasies in my time but this one left me cold. Didn't like!  I was sure glad I had gotten it from the library and not bought it
Only a few more laughs. By the time I came to this movie, I had already gotten there first three. Up in Smoke was fantastic, Next Movie was great, Nice Dreams was good, this was was pretty poor. They get pretty desparate at some points here, and they constantly repeat chracters we've seen already.The Low points are when they attempt to impersonate two homosexuals (badly), the astronaut which is Cheech miming for 3 minutes of in space, and then pretentds to jerk off at the end. Also, when they got to "Harry Palms" masterbating Champion, that was about as low and unfunny as you could get, just awful. All the points in the stand-up go on about a minute too long, including the fake nightclub. The people laughing at Cheech doing a redneck, had to have been payed actors.There are some good points... not that many though. Maybe the wrestling scene, and some of the scene with Chong recording with a videocamera in the hotel room. They don't seem to do much in this. I wanted something different, which is what I got, but I didn't think it would be this horrible. These guys can do better.
Primer. What looks like a good movie to watch quickly turns into disappointment. Whilst you expect some plot to come together (at least on first viewing) - it is strung together to confuse - even to frustrate the viewer.I was given no warning about the really really bad quality. Having a HD Large display does not help either. The sound is annonying as is irritating. In fact I got a refund on the movie hire!I don't expect overboard special effect and CGI overlays. I expected the quality to be above a cheap CAM recorder however.The plot is complicated and the noise in the background adds to the disorientation which is done on purpose.On the other note: The cheap and nasty props do not add anything to crediblility either.Stay clear - but if you have the time and want to view the movie - settle back and expect a "student" movie from some high School college.This movie although good in concept fails. I would like some production house to take it on board - create the situation with some convinving special effects (to help the storyline), better sound, widescreen and convincing props.It could have been a brilliant movie but is spoiled by bad quality and unconvinving props.
Pointless and Mostly Unfunny Sequel from Martin Lawrence. Malcolm aka Big Momma comes back after the original became a big hit about 6 years ago. Martin Lawrence again wears a fat suit to play the role of BM, undercover agent in the disguise of obese Southern lady. The fact that this sequel reached the No. 1 in the US box office chart, getting more than $70 million proves that people (at least in the United States) fondly remembered the original film, and wanted to see what Martin Laurence can do. Not much, it turns out, except for the more family-oriented taste and a few precious laughs.It is pointless to pick out the countless plot holes of `Big Momma's House 2' in which Malcolm is now doing less dangerous jobs like publicity activities. After his former partner's death in the line of duty, Malcolm again disguises himself as Big Momma in order that he can get some information about the killers.This time Malcolm/Big Momma is employed as nanny because he must infiltrate a dysfunctional family. This is an obvious rip-off of `Mrs. Doubtfire' but instead of doing Robin Williams' over-the-top turns, Martin Laurence shows less manic schticks than you expect. You seldom see sexual innuendoes, nor hear dirty words from him. This is the same road where Eddie Murphy went years ago (from `Raw' to `Dr, Dolittle'), and though it is an understandable choice, it may also be killing some of Laurence's merits as funny man.The whole film goes on like autopilot, and everything is predictable. Laurence does not seem very interested in what he is doing, and the supporting actors are at best so-so. The technical staff did a fine job to make Laurence a fat lady, to be sure, and some scenes include Big Momma in a scanty bathing suit ala Bo Derek, which must be a touch task for anyone involved, but those outrageous ideas that could have invigorated the tepid script are hardly to be seen during the entire film.`Big Momma's House' is just another pointless sequel from Hollywood and Martin Lawrence, who seriously needs a hit. Strictly for his avid fans
ugh. This is an extremely dry anime.  The manga version by Masamune Shirow is filled with bits of humor.  Not so for the anime.  The character Batou was especially funny in the manga, but, for reasons unknown, he is the driest character in the already humorless anime version.Expect long scenes filled with monotonous talking.  These really make the movie crawl.  One minute there's action, next you're listening to Matoko or Batou go on and on about existentialism.  Seriously, these little talks, take up 3/4 of the movie.The visuals are awesome, no question about that.  Even so, they do not fulfill the need for SOME kind of thread of a story.  Altogether, not much actually, HAPPENS during the movie.If you must see it, rent it first to be sure you want it
Frankly my dear... ...I was bored.  This despite some top-notch performances (especially Sean Bean); costumes, settings.  The actress playing Clarissa merely came off as a self-rightous little prig.  You're not supposed to feel relief when she dies, but I sure did.  She's not very pretty either, so the attraction or lust that Lovelace felt was inexplicable -- I guess corrupting her absolute innocence and strong morals were the real attraction...yet despite his dastardly deeds, I felt more pity for Lovelace.  The story does drag a bit; don't let the rave reviews fool you.  It's worth seeing for Sean Bean and several of the supporting performances but the story moves too slowly and is on the whole a very depressing one.
A goody-goody propaganda video. This is a "goody-goody" Ronald Reagan propaganda style film. By that I mean that it tries to portray the US as the good guys being hit by the bad ones. It doesn't say what dirty role the US CIA had in birthing the whole horrible genie of fundamentalis Islam, how it set up, equipped and nurtured not only Bin Laden and his Al-Qaeda, but a whole bunch of other loathsome Islamic terror outfits now stalking the globe - like the Islamic Brotherhood and the Taliban for instance: all just to defeat the USSR, and gain access to hydrocarbon rich regions, to fuel the greedy American consumerist lifestyle which US citizens take so much for granted. I am not a "conspiracy theorist"; these people are usually an absurd breed, going off at the other extreme tangent. I live in Peshawar, the hotbed of CIA mischief in the 1980s and 90s (and even now), and the area where I live - the University Town - housed all the actors on this stage: the US officials and spies, their clubs, the Afghan "Mujahideen" leaders' houses, etc. etc... I grew up seeing all this going on literally next door, and so would like to apprise my American friends of the unpleasant truth. The National Geographic and the Reader's Digest magazines are two long established icons of US media culture that have served as the unofficial (and therefore hard to suspect) mouthpieces of some of the most outrageous US propaganda drives... Never trust their political commentaries, although their articles about polar bears and planets can be very nice..
Fair... This is a nice item to add to a collection of D&D trinkets, but in NO WAY is good. It is lacking in story and acting. A lot of the scenes were pleasant, but I was never "compelled" by the story.I would only recommend this to a hard core collector or a funny break from your current game..
Unknown Quantity. unable to view because of incompatible format (as you warned me!)However, my ancestor James McLintock of Barnsley, Yorkshire, England sent John Wayne an eiderdown quilt for making the film (which is why I wanted the DVD)so.....
warning. Not in a long time have i had such a dislike for a movie as i do with Freeway. I am a fan of dark comedies so i thought i might check this movie out, it has reese witherspoon after all, how bad could it be? Well, really bad. First of all on a good note, reese witherspoon is good enough in the movie, although her character isn't all that likeable nor do you empathize with her all that much. But Reese does a good job with what shes given.My main beef with the movie is that i would not call it a dark comedy. It's more like a comedy that also wants to be dark, graphic and serious, or a dark graphic serious movie that wants to be funny. The result is that it's a movie that doesnt know what it is or what it's trying to do. Both the funny parts and the serious parts are horribly mixed together in a way that it feels like two different movies fighting for the screen.But hey, if you find being shot in the neck, or stiff lifeless grandmas with their throats slit and a horrified expression on their face to be funny, you just might like this movie
Not worth the money-time. I thought with both Luke and Owen in the same movie it should be fairly entertaining. But I kept waiting for it to get good, kept waiting and kept waiting. Then the movie ended... aaargh, another wasted night.
Entertaining because its so bad. This would have to rank as one of the worst movies of all time. Overlong, boring, dreadful acting, embarrassing  screenplay. By the time you get to the battle sequence (meant to be the movie's centrepiece) you're so bored that you don't care what happens to any of the main characters. In fact, you end up hoping all the main characters die quickly so this pathetic movie will end. But I did find it very funny to listen to the dreadful dialogue, so at least I got some amusement from it.I actually found the battle scenes quite disrespectful to the memory of the men and women who died at Pearl Harbor. Scenes of people dying horribly using modern-cinema realism and gore was quite repulsive and offensive. I'm surprise Michael Bay was allowed to get away with it. As I watched the gore-fest that is the battle, I wondered what those people who died that day would think of the way their deaths were portrayed - like some ghoulish freakshow for us 60 years later to watch and say with a morbid smile on our face ... Oooooo ... ahhh ... yuck. It would have been much better if Bay had gone down the tasteful, respectful path rather than the shock, showman route.My favourite cringe-worthy lines -Alec Baldwin as the General (or whatever he was) - The heart of a volunteer is the noblest of all.Josh Hartnett, while looking at himself in the mirror wearing his uniform - (Crying) You know, whenever I see mahself in this here uniform .... I just don't feel like a hero. (Cries some more).Also cringe-worthy is the way the Japanese are portrayed in the movie. Whenever we see Americans, there is beautiful music playing behind images of pretty scenery and lovely, bright colours. Whenever the Japanese are shown, we see dark, grey tones and booming, dark, evil music thumping away. Cut back to Americans ... cue pretty music and bright colours. Talk about manipulate the audience's emotions, rather than Bay making his point in some subtle way ... like a good script.How can anyone think this piece of garbage is worth 4 stars?The soundtrack is incredible though. Hans Zimmer's score is truly wonderous. Its a pity his talent and genius was wasted on such trash
Monkey Business. A dissapointment. Sadly, neither of these actresses were wearing masks in this film.What in the hell happened to Kelli McGillis? Don't expect to see anyone even closely reminiscent of the sensual Top Gun actress of long ago. McGillis is simply wooden in this role. Susie Porter is somewhat of a toad who appears to be wearing the same outfit throughout the movie's entirety. The acting is poor, the frequency of obscene language is distracting, the storyline is silly and the actresses chemistry is as romantic as a mud sandwich. Don't waste your time with this one or you'll end up feeling like a monkey
No Show. This item was never received. Amazon's tracking system claims that it was shipped on January 20 by Canada Post.
What is the point of this film?. ...I mean,other than making a profit for the studio(which,I understand,did not happen yet)...Whoever wrote the script for this doofus movie ought to be re-trained,and put to work doing street-cleaning,or garbage pick-up,or something that he/she can't screw up...Better yet,re-train the actors and actresses involved because obviously they did this turkey for the paycheck alone and gave no thought whatsoever to the audiences that would have to sit through this drivel...The premise of this film had potential,but someone,or,more probably,some committee decided ,Hey,we don't want to make anything that is actually good...Heavens no...what we want is a made-for-teevee spook story with a made-in Hollywood big budget...Where did"White Noise"go wrong?Almost from the begining...So apparently some lower level employee of the Michael Keaton charecter is some sort of nutcase serial killer who just may be in the control of some trio of disembodied demons...or something...Keaton's pretty,pregnant second wife goes out for a drive and never returns..Did she slip,fall,and get carried away in the river?...apparently not...apparently the afore-mentioned nutcase serial killer tortured and murdered her,maybe at the instigation of the demons(or maybe just because he is a nutcase serial killer...who can be sure?)...Anyway,one day some over-weight EVP practioner comes along and tells the Keaton charecter that the dead wife is contacting him"from beyond"...Spooky?No,not really,as the overweight guy seems almost a buffon..Later we meet another pretty blonde who believes that chubby-cheeks has made contact with her dead boyfriend..Keaton hears a tape that MAY contain his wife's static-filled voice,and he's hooked..Later he sees tragic episodes before they happen(and claim lives),and finds out that,MAYBE his dead wife is directing him to the scenes of local accidents ,deaths,and worse(again,we are never sure what exactly is going on)..Then the big guy winds up dead,but not before telling the Keaton charecter that there"are a lot of bad people out there"(sort of like in real life)..Keaton fails to prevent the blonde whose boyfriend may have contacted her"from beyond" from falling out of a high-rise apartment(which would have killed you or I but didn't kill her),he goes to an uncompleted high-rise where some missing housewife is being tortured by his employee,is maybe attacked by demons and dies...Oh,sure,there is more to this loopy script,but why bother telling it?I can write a better scarefest than this...Probably so can you..
Not my cup of tea. I bought this DVD based on reviews here on Amazon. I won't fault others for thier position, it's just a matter of personal taste. For me this was a big disapointment. The story leaves a lot to be desired. The character Walker (Lee Marvin) gets away with a lot of crimes he shouldn't have. The direction seemed to be a practice in doing something different, but it failed. I'm sorry I bought this DVD
Waste of time and money. I have to wonder if the reviewers that gave this DVD a good rating saw the same one I did. The animation is cheesy, the comedy is beyond lame, and the characters are downright annoying. The basic idea is great and it's a shame it was handled so poorly. The shows look like half the scenes were chopped out and what remained was cut to the bare bone. I'd have given it one star except that I reserve that rating for truly horrendous examples of defective wares foisted on an unsuspecting public. My advice? Spend your money elsewhere
stitch or pokemon?. if your and adult and love the first moviedo not get this one it is stitch the movie,a movie to start the TV show.check the rating lilo and stitch PGstitch the movie Gthis movie is too happy no worrylike the TV show.no real drama like the first movielilo comes from a broken familyand stitch a destructive alienthere has to be new problemsfrom there personalities,but the TV show has them have happy advancers.l thank goodness they mad the real sequellilo and stitch 2and I wish there was a worningabout the kids only stitch SHOWI was a shock to see that a cool space fantasy/broken familywas tern in to a lets catch a monster show.belive me I seen the episodes ther nothing likethe first movie.get the lilo and sitch 2it had them at ther bestwith a even deeper drama.
Of Spiders and Exotic Dancers. Please understand that I am a die-hard cheesy movie buff.  Pause with me while I attempt to explain this movie.  Around 1960, a European filmmaker blended sci-fi horror with sexploitation.  What this premise lacks in originality it usually gains in our twisted curiousity.  Hope springs eternal.  An exotic dance troupe (i.e.; strippers) and their male manager, stranded on a remote Pacific island, find a dead scientist dangling in a big web.  They find the dead man's research notes that reference a strange "hissing" around the perimeter of his camp.  This is a promising start.  The women are worth viewing as they display ample cleavage and bare legs.  The "giant spiders" are not giant.  They are about the size of cats.  They are as "real" as discount store Halloween decorations.  Never mind batteries, you can almost see the windup key turning.  Classic sci-fi fans who recall "Tarantula" should adjust their expectations.  Low budget is, after all, low budget.  I know it sounds an unlikely thing to say, but the script spends too much time on the "girlie" show.  Between the basic B&W photography and the constraints of the censor, attractive women just hanging out can get dull.  Even the occasional catfight can't ease the tedium.  When the boss turns monstrous with spider venom, I thought the story would get moving.  No such luck.  The mutated guy disappears into the jungle, and only sporadically reappears.  The story comes to the inevitable climax.  No, I don't mean that kind of climax.  Ultimately, the script can't decide between sexploitation and horror.  It succeeds at neither.  This flick is okay for we of the cheesy movie hall of fame fan club.  Not great, just okay.  The low priced DVD edition is adequate from a technical quality standpoint.  Go slowly into this dark night.  ;-)
Too fast, bad transitions. I bought this DVD despite the mixed reviews and have to report that I was disappointed with the purchase.  I have another Pilates tape (not DVD) that was one continuous workout which I much prefer.  With this one, there was no time in between transitions and there often were no clear transitions.  I also found that it went way too fast and tried to cram in too many things into each session
What were they thinking???. I loved this movie the first time I saw it, when it was called THE WRATH OF KHAN!  This movie is a complete and utter rip-off of Star Trek II.  I had very high hopes for this film and was completely let down.  I guess it is ok for a casual Sci-Fi fan but as a Star Trek film it just does not work for me.  If you want to see a great sci-fi/Star Trek film go buy Wrath of Khan
Crass does not automatically equal funny. I was very unimpressed with this movie. "Borat" suffers from the same delusion as Sarah Silverman in thinking that crass or politically incorrect AUTOMATICALLY equals funny. It does not. Of course sometimes it can be hilarious (and Borat does have moments like that), but overall I did not find this movie particularly funny or even amusing. Especially the scene where the naked friend sits on Borat's face was just disgusting and it dragged on and on and on. At some point I just fast forwarded it. You're not missing much if you don't watch this movie
What happened... ... to the outtakes when they roll the credits?  This DVD is crap!!  I got this for $5 at Target and, man, what a mistake...  The English dub is stupid, too.  Don't buy this...  Get the HK versions like the other guys said..
GARBAGE. This movie was really a waste of money. the writing the directin are all very bad. it is also very low budget which i thought would increase the realness but i was wrong safe your money and keep searchin
Corny, Predictable, Blah..... Don't bother with this unfunny, predictable, boring, pedestrian, fingerpainted drivel.  The piggy stole the show
I wish I could have rated it 0 star. I decided to buy this movie after reading many excellent reviews of it. I watched it with my girlfriend. Bad idea... The sex scenes are bad and very short, and the rest is downright boring. This movie is simply bad, and slow, and generally laughable
Given a choice between the dentist and the Deep Blue Sea, take the least painful option - get a cavity filled. Caution: This review contains a couple spoilers!First off, I have to admit that my husband and I ended up seeing this by accident, when flipping through channels. What is not accidental (and is patently inexcusable, in my opinion) is the sheer awfulness of this movie. It was so bad it was funny, and for that reason alone we watched it for the (surely unintended) comedy.The movie is rife with stock and unoriginal characters: whiny useless blonde woman, who can only stand there and scream at critical junctures (almost as vexing as those young women in horror flicks who are running for their lives but always trip and/or fall down), sexy young doctor/bimbo character (I guess she finished that pesky PhD while still in high school), buff blonde himbo (no, that's not a typo, he's just the male surfer version of the bimbo), and a couple of token minorities, one of whom gives preachy pep talks (we actually cheered when in the midst of Jackson's character's "we must pull together as a team to survive" rah-rah speech, a shark surfaced and gulped him down raw). Yummy. Mr. Shark doesn't fancy that sanctimonious claptrap anymore than we did.Most amusing scene: bimbo scientist feels it necessary to strip off her wetsuit before she kills a shark, and after all the drama and suspense of the impromptu strip-tease we see she's wearing sensible white undies rather than Victoria's Secret. Aww, what a disappointment. But I guess good girls don't go to heaven if they wear naughty underwear.More things we picked up on: whenever a character cusses, drinks, smokes, or looks at porn, something terrible happens. Evil shark suddenly appears and punishes said sinner. Hardly subtle. (For example, one guy lights up a cigarette and seconds later loses a hand - hubby said this was the best anti-smoking campaign ad ever!) There are probably more than a dozen references to God throughout this film, which in itself is not objectionable, but becomes obvious and annoying after more than a couple times. There's even a "group hug" scene where all the characters join hands in a circle and pray. What is this, the 700 Club? Not to mention a shark gets stabbed with a crucifix in the end. Spare us the lofty moral overtones and get on with the story already. Oh wait, that would require a plot, wouldn't it?A lot of people have been comparing this movie to "Jaws." I'm not sure what they've been smoking (careful there, might lose a hand!;), but the only thing this joke of a film has in common with "Jaws" is the CGI effects might as well date from the 70s. There's no excuse for a 1999 film to have CGI so terribly bad that it's just plain embarrassing after awhile. Cast should have done shadow-puppets on a wall instead - I think it would have been scarier. More entertaining, too.This movie is so predictable, so corny, and so appallingly bad that I wonder if the actors even dare list it on their resumes.
What?. I was under the impression that this was the entire series. I finally, after many issues, got my set and unwrapped it, and my heart sank audibly when I saw "Complete Collection I". I popped the last disk in and lo and behold, it wasn't the full series afterall.
Should have been called "Star Trek: Retconiverse". I tried to give ENTERPRISE a chance. I was excited to see how the Federation and Starfleet first developed and what happened soon after the discovery of warp drive. But the show didn't deliver on those promises in the first season.I could (possibly) have forgiven all glaring inconsistencies about the ship's naming and the technology, the bland crew, and the 'Patch Adams' theme song if - IF - the NX-01 hadn't started off by meeting alien races that were not discovered until centuries later. Picard encountered the Borg first? Nope, Archer. Ferengi? Archer. And on and on and on. That was not only flagrant, unnecessary retconning, it was totally against the (alleged) premise and promise of ENTERPRISE: They missed so much opportunity to show how the charter Federation members were discovered and eventually allied with. A virtual warehouse of cultures to explore and flesh out and they pick ones from the TNG era that have been done to death? That was the last straw for me.I understand they finally got around to doing this when the show was in its death throes but I wasn't around to enjoy it by then.Exploring the charter races, I mean.Well, the death throes, too
Jesus, what a steaming pile of crap!. Julia Roberts plays Ed Harris' young new wife. Susan Sarandon plays Harris' ex-wife. Ex-wife does not like new wife. New wife does not like ex-wife. Ex-wife's cutsey, but bratty kids make new wife's life a living hell. Ex-wife thinks new wife is a stupid bimbo. New wife thinks ex-wife is a nagging battle axe. New wife and ex-wife fight and yell at each other ad nauseum. How does the film solve this conflict? Ex-wife is diagnosed with terminal cancer -- everyone reconciles, ex-wife and new wife suddenly love each other, the end. This is one of the most cliched, saccharine, hackneyed and shamelessly manipulative pieces of garbage put out by Hollywood in the past decade. If you like Julia Roberts, Susan Sarandon or Ed Harris, please see Erin Brokovich, Dead Man Walking and The Right Stuff and run screaming from this nauseating cinematic catastrophe
Yawn. Too bad there is no such thing as a zero star.  This video is such a bored-fest.  I was actually given this video for free by a friend of mine but after viewing this now I know why this was free.  I came to Amazon to see just how much this pathetic video was and to my amazement, almost 30 dollars.  After viewing about 5 minutes of this video I was already yawning.  I thought, okay, pretty soon, I will learn some new fantastic technique or some sort of new secret but neither.  Here is the basic plot of the video - play with clitoris, drink water, play with the clitoris, end of plot.  It is probably better to burn your money and to buy this god awful video.  Another poor quality video by the Welcomed Consensus.  Folks before you buy this video, do the research on the internet about the videos and especially the company who is producing it, you will be amazed what you find out about this company.
Terrible, fake, sleazy, cheap disappointment. I must admit that when I heard this movie was in the works, I was giddy with excitment. When I heard that Stallone was writing it, I became a little less excited, but still optimistic. Being a huge CART fan, this was going to be the movie that helped define the league.How unfortunate that this movie turned out to be a steaming pile of cow manure! The 'plot' is ridiculous. The 'action' is not even remotely close to real life. The 'special effects' look worse than most 1980's video games. I've never seen a movie with more potential go so horribly wrong. It's too bad that CART ended up going bankrupt after this movie. Who knows, maybe if the movie was halfway respectable, it could have helped CART's financial woes? If you are a racing fan, I would advise that you watch this movie, only so that you know how laughable it is. Also, you will then know how NOT to make a movie
Nice Imagery and sound but... Unfortunately I have not been able to experience what most of the reviewer of this product experienced. After couple weeks of researching for ways of achieving relaxation/meditation, I was ready to make a decision and buy one of those Visual and Sound machines (more specifically the Proteus from MindPlace) until I stumble with AV3x and start reading all the comments about it. I thought wow! Apparently this is working for everyone here, and also professionals in the industry are recommending this product. I was really exited since some of the people said that the experience was richer than Audio/Visual machine and of course I didn't have to spend [...] bucks to get that experience.Well, I ordered the DVD from [...] after reading even more reviews and making sure that this was the product for me.I got the DVD, I shut the lights off to get a best results, I seat down in my favorite chair after a hard day of work ready to enjoy the benefits...Ok! DVD menu: "Play All" (I enabled the Light Stimulation feature first)...Nice music and Beautiful imagery fractal like pictures moving while a stroboscopic like light pulsating in the background was trying to induce my brain through visual stimulation to reach the desired state...After watching the first couple tracks I wondered, is this working? It certainly does not feel like it.  I decided to go through all the tracks, may be I need it more time to get results... nothing, not even a subtle change (as far as I can tell).I was really looking forward to enjoy this product after all the wonderful things that I read about it from bias and mainly non-bias happy owners.Could it be that some people is more susceptible to others to this kind of stimulation? May be, so please don't take this as negative review; I am sure many will benefit from this product, is just that I couldn't. (Today I loaned the DVD to a friend couple. We'll see what happened)
Don't waste your time or money. After an interesting setup, this movie goes downhill very quickly, with ridiculous coincidences, far fetched plot developments, some over the top "acting" and poor makeup, followed by laughably pathetic special effects when "hell" is depicted.  The idea that the folks at Criterion consider this a "horror masterpiece" indicates they don't know the meaning of either word.  It's not scary.  It's not well made.  And it's so bad, I couldn't even get to the end.  I'm not talking "Plan 9 From Outer Space" bad, where you can be entertained by its ineptness -- no, this is just "I can't believe I wasted my time on this drek" bad.  Please, learn from my mistake and spare yourself
Hurt My Back. This DVD really hurt my back.  I did the easier of the Yin workouts and my back hurt for two days.  I would highly recommendBaron Baptise, Kathy Smith and/or Bryan Kest if your looking for a good yoga workout that won't cause pain
UnType-Cast. DiScala was emotionally type-cast, and physically mis-cast, to play an allegedly desirable woman. She would, however, be perfectly cast as a fat-assed, shallow, narcissist. Oh, that's right, she has already scored that role on the Sopranos
The makings of a television movie. I had great expectations for this movie, as it included one of the greatest actors of all time, Walter Matthau, as well as, what I thought would be, great subject matter. So sad that the serious subject of in-fighting among the Supreme Court Justices was reduced to a sitcom-like depth.Neither character seemed to truly represent a mindset (liberal or conservative), but rather, they seemed to argue for no apparent reason. Perhaps some scenes setting up their conflict were deleted?Regardless, while Matthau is enjoyable to watch, no matter what the script, this was one of his weakest. There are even moments when the viewer has to stop the movie and go..."hey, wait a minute!"...as when the Justices enter the Smithsonian in pouring rain, and come out minutes later to snow, and plowed sidewalks!!!As for the DVD...it was also extremely weak. It contains no extras (not even a trailer). Some background on the Supreme Court would have been excellent. But then, I guess that would be assuming that this movie was meant to be thought-provoking, which it obviously isn't.The widescreen transfer is fine. The picture is reasonably sharp, and it isn't hampered by grain. Too bad it was wasted on this movie.
Taking Lives  (2004). Director:  D.J. CarusoCast:  Angelina Jolie, Ethan Hawke, Kiefer Sutherland, Gena Rowlands, Oliver Martinez, Tcheky Karyo, Jean-Hughes Anglade, Paul Dano.Running Time:  109 minutesRated R for violence, gore, language, nudity, and a scene of sex.It's no crime to emulate that which is successful. Hollywood 's entire history, for better or worse, is based on studios, producers, directors, even actors, tapping into that which is au courant and using to their own best advantage. It's only when a moviemaker so blatantly rips off another that a hew and cry goes up about cinematic plagiarism (re: Brian DePalma's unabashed love affair with all things Alfred Hitchcock, so vividly on display in such films as "Carrie", "Dressed to Kill" and "Body Double") Even then, while those films can be accused of being rip-offs of their superior progenitors, at least they are good rip-offs. DePalma's brand of obsessiveness appears to have afflicted director D.J. Caruso with his sophomore effort, the new suspense thriller, "Taking Lives", starring Angelina Jolie, Ethan Hawke and Kiefer Sutherland. Caruso's work reeks of so many other latter day suspense classics (such as "Seven" and "Silence of the Lambs"), yet he doesn't appear to have learned his lessons well from the masters.  Jolie is a special agent for the FBI who is called to Canada to help with an investigation into a series of killings that appear to be connected. Jolie's character, we are told, has a special affinity for this kind of work. She's the type who garners clues as to the psyche and motivations of the unknown killer by lying down in the site where a victim was found. Ostensibly, she has some kind of extra sense about serial killers, something known to the Canadian Chief of Police, a former comrade (and possibly lover) of hers when they trained together at the FBI, and a trait that some other, highly chauvinistic Montreal cops (i.e. "Unfaithful"'s Olivier Martinez) don't buy into. Her investigation leads her to a woman who tells police she has just seen the son she thought died nearly twenty years, a young man she admits is very dangerous, a shaky eyewitness to the most recent of the serial killings, an art dealer played by Hawke, and a suspicious and mysterious man played by Sutherland. The police believe they have zeroed in on the killer, who has some connection to Hawke, so they use him as bait, but as is the case with these movies, all is not what it appears.Director Caruso borrows heavily from the look and feel of such films as Silence of the Lambs and Seven. Much of Taking Lives is shot in dark, dank basements or closeted rooms, shards of light penetrating through cracks in the walls. Dismembered and/or rotted bodies tumble from secret hiding places, dropping into frame right on cue for the maximum on the scare monitor. The problem is, we've seen all of this before, and most people get a weekly dose of this kind of ghoulish forensic foray on television with CSI: Crime Scene Investigation, so the scare tactics never really initiate the same fright sensibility.  The all-star cast does their best to rise above the pedestrian screenplay, but even they are hamstrung by the script's mediocrity. Jolie, putting in perhaps the most mainstream performance of her career, is sensual, sexy, tough and determined, the quintessential female heroine in the mold of Jodie Foster's Clarice Starling. Unfortunately, her character has too many vestiges of Foster's, with the exception of the eroticism that simply comes with being Angelina Jolie. Hawke is all nervous ticks and twitches that almost give away too much, while Sutherland, on hiatus from his heroics in TV's 24, gives perhaps the film's most subtle performance, seductively menacing.  "Taking Lives" has everything it takes to be a first-class suspense thriller, but somehow falls short, particularly in the film's climactic moments. The denouement is nowhere near as satisfying as one hope for, the suspense long since having been played out so the life is taken out of "Taking Lives"
Traumatically bad. This movie starts off with the death of Emily's (Dakota Fanning) mother.  Wanting to get away from it all, she and her father (De Niro), move to the country.  There she finds friendship in an imaginary friend she calls Charlie.  Strange, creepy things start happening, writing on walls, people dying, dolls defaced, etc...The movie pretends to play out on the psychological effect of grief, which here came from the death of the mother.  I don't want to spoil the movie, so I'll just say that one form we see comes in the shape of Emily's reclusiveness.But unfortunately, it's just that, it pretends...there's no REAL psychological depth to the movie, which is too bad, otherwise it wouldn't have been that bad.The movie plays out fairly predictably, in the sense that you can tell who is going to die and who isn't.  Now I know this is supposed to be scary or something along those lines, but I just thought it failed at that.  I was bored out of my mind during the first half of the movie, and then when things got a little "juicier", the answers came along relatively fast and it's a little dissapointing.Without revealing anything, I'll just say that I thought the ending was just bad.  It looked like a bad wannabe version of the Sixth Sense, or worse, The Village.  We're also left with holes with some of the characters, notably the neighbors.However, this movie does have something going for it : Its cast.  Dakota Fanning carries this whole movie, she's great.  While I'm not the biggest fan of DeNiro, he's also good, even more so when you take the whole of the movie into consideration.  The supporting cast (Elisabeth Shue and Famke Janssen) breezes through as well.My only recommendation is that if you want to be scared, you'd be better off walking around your neighborhood at 2 o'clock in the morning than watching this movie, most likely because I found it amusing more than anything else
This movie has no substance. I have to say... all the CGI movies I have watched have all been top-notch as far as story goes. I'm talking about Toy Story I & II. Finding Nemo. Shrek. etc. etc. I realize this wasn't made by the same company as Toy Story and Nemo... but it IS from the creators of Shrek. Therefore this movie fails. The animation is good, yes. But the jokes are empty. Nothing is really funny at all. The story is almost non-existant and had no real direction.In my opinion, this movie was a waste of space. In everyway possible. Shame on you, Dreamworks. Shame on you
NOT JUST BAD BAD FOR YOU! So Sugary sweet it makes you sick to your stomach. On the surface Maid In Manhattan it seems like a light romantic comedy with a predictable and sweet love story. However the numerous racist and sexist stereotypes throughout the undertones of this Cinderella tale will make any viewer of color extremely bitter. Better have a couple of barf bags around while watching this movie. You're gonna need them.Jennifer Lopez is a maid in a four-star downtown Manhattan hotel. (Stereotype #1 about Latinas) She dreams of becoming a hotel manager (Stereotype #2 about Latinas- all work in service jobs). A single mother (Stereotype #3) she struggles to work during the day and take care of her 10-year-old son and is supported by her mother (Stereotype#4) who works in a rundown Spanish restaurant uptown (Stereotype#5) While cleaning the room of a rich British woman, she decides to try on some of her clothes. Conveniently, a rich senate candidate comes to the room and mistakes her for the Hotel guest. He's smitten by her charm and her looks. She's attracted to his loot. So to bag the rich guy she and her friends (also minority stereotypes) go along with the ruse and more supposedly humorous hijinks ensue. The flimsy story disappears and the movie slowly changes from a vehichle for Jennifer Lopez, Actress into a vanity project for J. Lo, Superstar. We get numerous shots of her walking around the city in designer clothes, Eating at fancy restaurants and trying too hard to look hot while courting a bored Senate candidate. The movie comes to a climax when the ruse is revealed. She and her friends at the hotel are fired and her dreams of becoming a Hotel Manager are crushed.But wait-Prince Charming(tm) is riding down in his white limo to save her. He's had such a wonderful time with her that he's fallen in love(tm). He tries to talk to her in the street, but she gives him some spiel about not knowing who she was when she was a maid and now caring about her. This leads to him seeking her out at her new job. While she's working at another hotel, where he's conveniently he's holding a press conference, he finds her and professes undying love for her. They kiss and we get a montage of pictures showing them living happily ever set to J.Lo's painful butchering of Diana Ross' classic "I'm Coming out." She's married to the senator, getting the management job at the hotel and then one of her saying they're still married a year later. Excuse me I have to go puke. (I also have to reorder the barf bags; no telling when I'm going to need them for the next romantic comedy)Words can't describe how much I hate this movie. It's an insult to women and minorities. Maid in Manhattan insidiously hides numerous racist and sexist messages under a beautiful front of pretty actors, lavish locations and luxury goods. The movie secretly tells women of color they can't find success without those essentials for success: expensive designer clothes, perfect make-up, beautiful hair and a rich White man to save them. Worse, it tells women to lie and manipulate to get what they want. Because we all know working hard takes way too much time from shopping. Movies like this aren't bad; they're bad for you. Watch too many movies like these and you'll get your mind warped.It seems like the producers were trying to make a "Pretty Woman" type movie for J.Lo but they didn't understand the execution of J.F. Lawton's brilliant concept. In an attempt to copy Pretty Woman, Maid in Manhattan tries to update the fairy tale by just using minority characters in most of the roles and fails miserably. There was a lot more under the surface of the Richard Gere/Julia Roberts vehichle than most people understand. Pretty Woman wasn't an update of a fairytale it was a satire poking fun at the fairy tale. Lawton was making fun of all the fairy tale stereotypes by using L.A's downtrodden as the characters in the story. He was making the comment that to get to happily ever after both the man and the woman have to learn to value each other as equals.The acting here is horrible. No, scratch that it's WRETCHED. Jennifer Lopez is terrible. Terrible singing, terrible acting and she didn't look too hot in all those designer clothes either. She has no chemistry with Ralph Finnes and adds no dimension whatsoever to her character. Throughout the movie she's just J.Lo superstar playing dress up. After seeing this movie and Enough I can tell you Jennifer Lopez's acting career is in serious trouble. She's gone from an actress who showed tremendous potential Selena, Out of Sight, and Anaconda to an egotistical over-the-top ham with no presence and no personality. Ralph Finnes is horribly miscast in the role of the Senate candidate. I couldn't believe he was from New York with that British accent that kept popping up in every scene. An actor of his caliber deserves better than this syrupy slop. Bob Hoskins must need some rent money because a fine actor like him deserves better than this. Natasha Richardson and Amy Sedaris chew on scenery while waiting for their paychecks to clear. Tyler Posey (Parker Posey's son) is the only actor to give a good performance here. I'd love to see more of him in the future.Please, Please IF YOU VALUE YOUR DAUGHTER'S SELF-ESTEEM DO NOT LET THEM WATCH THIS MOVIE! Get them the Wonderful Bend it Like Beckham, Akeelah and The Bee, and Disney's Mulan. The older crowds can Get Muriel's Wedding, J.F. Lawton's Pretty Woman or his hilarious Cannibal Women in the Avocado Jungle of Death.
Wait until  November. On November 28 two better versions of this collection will be released.   The first is entitled "The Christopher Reeve Superman Collection".  This release is listed on Amazon.This version will have 8 disks including a 4 disk special release of Superman I with both the 1978 release and 2000 expanded edition (don't know how that relates to the longer TV version only shown twice).  There will be a two disk version of Richard Lester's Superman II which will only contain one version, not the longer TV version (a darker film), which has not been rebroadcast.  There will also be one disk versions of III and IV with some new special features.  In the case of IV it is not clear whether it will be the version released in the US or the 20 minute longer version released in the rest of the world.I and II will also have remastered productions of the Fleischer Studios Superman cartoons, long overdue since the special edition VHS versions of those cartoons (no longer available) were of superior quality to the DVD releases.The four Superman movies  as described above supposedly will also  be released individually.Most importantly, the long hoped-for Richard Donner's version of Superman II (a noticeably different movie from Superman II heretofore available) has been completed and will also be released seperately at the same time.  This is not just a modified cut, but actually a noticeably different movie as Richard Donner had a different view of the basic story.  For one thing, Marlon Brando as Jor-El has a major role in Richard Donner's version, while he was totally writtten out of Lester's intrepretation.  Marlon Brando's appearance in Superman Returns was made up of alternate takes of what he did in Superman I.  What is in Donner's Superman II has not been seen publicly before.   Donner's Superman II is not planned to be part of the collection above.  Superman Returns will also be a separate release in one and two disc versions, although this is not yet shown on AmazonOn November 28 the Ultimate Superman collection will also be released.  it will include all of the above along with the Richard Donner cut of Superman II, the 2 disc version of Superman Returns  and a host of special features.  Not yet sure if Supergirl  will be in the package, although a new release of that (not yet listed on Amazon) comes out the same day).  Still some speculation if 13 or 14 discs.There is reportedly another package, also called the Ultimate Superman Collection, that will come out the same day, consisting of 19 discs.  Not sure what's on the extra discs relative to the US release.  That version will be released abroad, not in the US, at least not now.  Maybe later, after they've sold as many US versions as they can and want to see if they can sell the collection agian with these extra discs.
False advertising!. As amazing as it would have been to finally watch the famed MURDER SHE WROTE/MAGNUM P.I. crossover as it originally aired -- and, as the packaging would lead you to believe, should also appear in this box set -- they included the WRONG VERSION of the "Magnum" episode. When it was originally created, they shot the episode with two endings: The "to be continued" ending for the crossover, and then a self-contained ending for syndication purposes. The DVD packagers grabbed the wrong version! AAAARGH! This is an awfully expensive package for such a sloppy mistake
Not as good as I remember. When I was 18 watching topless woman was all I needed to Like a sex comedy.Now 30 years later this movie didn't hold up so well.The comedy is not that funny as well
Not a sequel just another werewolf movie. For those that waited all these years for a sequel to the classic American Werewolf in London, the wait is not over.American adventurers looking for thrills across Europe decide to bungy jump from the Eiffel Tower.  But there is a beautiful woman who is going to commit suicide by jumping.  One of the boys jumps to her rescue.  But her secret is she is a werewolf and accidentally infects him.Well, it turns out that there is a pack of werewolves in Paris and they feed on Americans. (Let's talk obvious stereotyping.)  While at times it is good (especially when Julie Delpy is on screen).Don't waste your time watch the original!!
Out For A Crap. Steven Seagal drops yet another classic on the film world with 'Out For A Kill'.Seagal stars as an overweight but super-sexy professor named Robert Burns.  He's an expert in ancient Chinese relics and is in China doing some excavation and cataloging of newly found antiques.  Unbeknownst to him, the people who hired him are using him to move drugs out of the country.  Boy, did these wacky Chinese drugdealers pick the wrong professor to screw with.  The Lord is arrested and sent to a Chinese prison, leaving his mailorder Russian bride all alone.  He's in prison for an undisclosed amount of time, but due to the editing it seems like he was in lockdown for about twenty minutes.  He is released through some stringpulling by the American government to use him as a pawn to lure out the drugdealers.  Little do these dealers know, but Lord Steven was once the most feared theif in China.  So, the dealers decide that Steven needs to be eliminated so they blow up his house.  Only the Lord isn't inside but his Russian wife is.  He gets pissed, swears revenge, and hilarity ensues.'Out For A Kill' is pretty much pure crap.  The plot is ridiculous and very vague.  The fight scenes are pretty sad(especially when Seagal fights a small Chinaman who happens to know some sort of monkey kung fu).  There are numerous useless characters:  the black dude Seagal befriends in prison who the filmmakers lead you to believe will have something to do with the plot later on but actually is never heard from again.  And also there are the two DEA agents who do nothing more than show up to find the bodies of Seagal's victims and say lame crap like "He moves like a ghost".  I died at that one.  He doesn't even come close to moving like a ghost.  All he did was lumber his tubby ass out the door.  Hilarity.Anyways, 'Out For A Kill' sports a lame script, pathetic acting, sad fight scenes, absolutely putrid dialogue, and a vast sheen of vagueness.  This one is for hardcore Seagal fans only and even they won't like it.  Watching this movie is like getting fingerbanged by your grandfather:  you may want to enjoy it, but its just uncomfortable
Garbage. This shows what hype all this has become. SCRATCHING is beautiful but this movie sucks. It is a live performance w nothing new. No tricks, jazzy is using a laptop. Mixmaster mike bites z-trips routine. and the x-cutioners show off that they can do a whole lot of noise and make everything sound wack.Final rating WACK AS HELL. save your money for your groceries or for porn
Could have been better. Gay guy tells straight guy that gay guys can get any girl. Straight guy tests this out and supposedly, fiasco occurs. Well there was a fiasco: the acting, the script and the lead actor (guy who plays straight) because he painfully upstaged the rest of the cast. He does a good job in a bad script. The guy that plays his roommate (the straight guy's roommate) is a horrible actor. He made me flinch everytime he delivered his lines. The rest of the cast was 'high school production-esque'--  I especially liked the trampy girlfriend. She kind of reminded me of a non drag version of Devine.I don't remember the names of the characters because most of this movie is forgettable. Some of the scenes were funny when they weren't supposed to be and others were awkward when they were supposed to be funny. There is a little girl (straighty's sister) that also has some funny lines and fairly good delivery.If you want poor production, bad scripts and bad acting, you can either rent America's Funniest Home Videos or this movie. Both have some decent moments, but neither of them are worth buying on DVD
The book is fascinating; the movie fails it. I'm a retired attorney. I enjoy crime novels and the movies that bring them to us visually. However, this movie simply is a pain to watch, IF one enjoyed the drama of the book. The book "Blood Work" is very detailed and the solution to the "who done it" is very well hidden. I won't bore you with details but if you want to know how the movie compares with the novel, read the review by "km southern" dated Oct 19, 2004, that is available below. She is right on. The movie has so many flaws that even without having read the book upon which it purports to be based, it is a poor choice
Waste Of Time. Ring Two wasn't scary at all and though I was sad when the cute guy got killed there was really nothing to really comment about except it was pretty boring.  If you want to get creeped out watch Boogyman or Saw 1 or
Wonderful film but poor DVD quality. I bought the DVD with this artwork out of a dollar bin and I got what I paid for. The image is fuzzy and the audio is of poor quality. This must have been taken from a 16mm print. It may be that this film is in public domain, so it may be difficult to find a decent quality DVD. There are many issues of this film so you would do better to try one of the other DVD issues. Note: Amazon seems to spread these reviews across DVDs of the same title, so you may see this review under multiple DVD releases of "Meet John Doe".  The poor quality DVD that I bought has a cover that looked like this: [...
Mediocre is good?. I was very disappointed after reading all the glowing reviews for this movie and then watching your average "bad guys on the run" movie.  Gee, Billy Bob Thornton plays a crazy bad guy who shoots people and he doesn't like cops at all; he even uses bad language!  A friend was watching it with me and he thought I was watching the Lifetime channel. This movie just plodded along down cliche boulevard
2 stars for cameos. A dull dull movie that perpetuates stereotypes of latinos in the US and abroad. I was very bored with this movie and found the plot to be very insulting. I enjoyed seeing some of my favorite latino actors and performers on the big screen, but for a somewhat mainstreamed movie that one can buy in target, I think it's just a shame.The whole cast was pretty much of Latin America origin, but that did not do much to glorify latinos as capable and deserving actors on the spotlight. The plot and dialogue dehumanizies and insults many.
NY City Ballet 2 - thumbs down. I am an adult ballet student. I've been dancing for 4 years and wanted to be able to workout at home when I couldn't make a class. This video is not a ballet class workout - there is no bar, center, across the floor setup. There is no music for you to feel as you watch the few exercises they guide you through. It is more of an aerobics class workout. The dancers are wearing dance sneakers!  I'm very disappointed and glad it cost me less than $10 to buy this - I'd return it if I could!  The voice on the tape is horrifically monetone and the dancers are not moving to any type of music - there's the same background music playing the whole time so you can't even feel a pattern. Do not waste your time on this if you are looking to mimic a ballet class workout.
Its good but... I was so excited to see this movie. when i saw in theaters i immediatly though well it was good atthe beggining which is true. the entire movie is hilarious with at the beggining showing Tom Cruise, Danny Devito, etc. but after the first hour it got wierd with Scott (Seth Green) going bald because he was turning evil, which was funny till the very end (i'll get to that). the agent with the mole is where a lot of the jokes are aimed at.Later in the movie i thought "what happened to Felicity (Heather Graham)? well i dont know and i guess they forgot about her but the movie starts to fall apart Austin Powers(Mike Myers)meets Goldmember(Mike Myers) and thats where the worst character in the movie comes. he is just gross little kid humor over PG13 humor. He meets Foxy Cleopatra (Beyonce Knowles) who had never called again i think because he was frozen.Him in Foxy go through the movie till the end where Scott is completly evil and more than Dr. Evil (Mike Myers) which set it off then they where told that Austin Powers and Dr. Evil are brothers which made me very angry because that was the worst ending they could possibly come up with.So if you watch the movie keep this in mind and be sure that you see the first 2 first
This just didn't do it for me. Maybe I loved the original one too much, but this version of the story did not work for me. I especially was dissapointed in the music and the oompa loompas. Stick with the first one. It was perfect
poses, not pratice. I read all these great reviews and must admit I was REALLY disappointed.  I thought it would be a yoga dvd I could do with my child and she could have fun while I got at leaset a litle of my workout in.  WRONG.  It is more like a visual encyclopedia of kid &quot;yoga&quot; poses.  The yoga guy talks about the pose and &quot;kid chats&quot; a bunch, but RARELY is the one demonstrating the poses. I do not want to suffer though it again for an exact quote but basically he says things like &quot;Camel pose is great, do you want to be a camel???  Camels this and camels that, bla bla bla camels&quot;.  The whole while sitting there looking at you not doing the pose he is talking about and just talking while looking at the camara.  Not even telling you what to actually do, just talking up the virtues and fun of the next pose.  I would give it a 5 if it were a 2 part dvd with an actual yoga routen you could do that put all these poses together.  The host talks longer than you do the pose it felt like.  Definately not a break a sweat or high energy dvd.  LOTS of down time and chatter with NO flow or routen.  It will not remain on my shelf.  If you are looking for a DVD with tons of talk and lots of gaps between movement than this is the one for you
incorrect region code. Bad News ! The DVD what I purchased from you, I cannot see, you send a copy with an " Incorrect Region Code " which in South Africa I cannot play back.  I spent lots of money to purchase, and to receive the parcel at the post office, but it is too much trouble to send it back.Therefore I justleave it as it is but of course, I amnot happy with the transaction. Regards Attila Sauze
maybe a good film but not a true story - warning, spoilers!. There are so many reviews saying this is a true story I have to point out that while the war and the deployment were real (obviously), about everything else is dramatized (including the mission objectives: SCUD hunting on foot, which is a joke to anyone who knows how wars are fought today). McNab has essentially written Tom Clancy genre fiction. The book Bravo Two Zero differs in details with another book written by a second member of the patrol, Chris Ryan, called The One That Got Away. However, both are convincingly debunked by a third SAS memeber in a book called The Real Bravo Two Zero, also available on Amazon, though only the UK Amazon site (which you can still order from in the US). In it, an SAS member who can actually speak Arabic retraces the patrol using both books as guides and talks to all the people McNab and Ryan supposedly killed and gets their side of the story. Most importantly, he manages to restore, without a doubt, the reputation of Vince Phillips, blamed by Ryan for getting the patrol discovered by the Iraqis and a couple members eventually killed. Contrary to what you may expect, I would recommend seeing this, in fact I recommend getting and comparing all three books: B20, The One That Got Away, and The Real B20
pass this one completely. What is the point of making a Tracy and Hepburn collection without including "guess who is coming to dinner?". This collection has only 1 "ownable" movie; Adam's rib. The rest 2, you can watch once, feel good and forget. But to not include their best movie together (and perhaps one of the most underappreciated gem of all time) is simply infuriating.Do not fall for the cheap tricks of so-called collections. They will mix one good movie with two passable ones. Instead, buy "Adam's Rib" and "Guess Who is Coming to Dinner" separately and save your hard earned money.
Oh no...it finally happened. Leslie Nielsen in a bad parody!. I am a big Leslie Nielsen fan. I first saw him in the Naked Gun series, which I thought was awesome, then I saw him again in Wrongfully Accused. I was so enthralled that I acquired Airplane, which seems to be a highly praised movie with him in it.I had thought he could do no wrong, but he really disappointed me here. What is wrong with this movie? EVERYTHING you will see in here are things you have already seen in other Leslie Nielsen comedy movies. There are times that what will happen becomes so obvious that it's painful rather than funny. For example, the x-ray glasses. My God, when that was mentioned, I just felt nauseous.The problem with this movie is that it continues the Naked Gun-variety humor, but it does it rather badly. Most of the humor in this movie is sexual-based and that will eventually get boring. Aside from that, this movie lacks a proper plot. All throughout the movie, it doesn't seem like Dick Steele (Nielsen) did anything, but move from one area to another in preparation for a gag. Nielsen's other movies had bad plots too, but at least they were coherent.I am sorry (mostly to myself for seeing this), but this was just a bad movie. Perhaps the director should go watch the entire Naked Gun series to see how it is done
the name says it all. this movie is one of the 3 ~worst~ movies I've ever seen.these 98 minutes seemed more like 6 hours.and for chrissake - he's NOT an american
Frosty Returns?. This is the worst cartoon I have ever seen. The original frosty is really good. I will never watch Frosty Returns more than the once I have seen it
Juvenile. Dialog was unoriginal and juvenile.  Plot looked like many others blood and gore movies.  I hated this movie
Watch out for hybrid combo discs!. I just purchased the Toshiba HD-A2 HD-DVD player and I love it.  I was unpleasantly surprised when the HD side of the disc would not play on my machine.  I had already registered my player and was told my Toshiba to upgrade my firmware.  I received the firmware disc today, installed it and the disc still won't work.  The Standard DVD side works fine, but what's the point.  So I'm sending the disc back to Amazon.Beware of these hybrid discs! Many other HD-DVD owners have had similar problems.  Happy Feet, Army of Darkness, and other hybrid discs to name a few, may not play on your Toshiba, even with the firmware update.  Recently, Universal decided to kill hybrid discs altogether for future releases and are reissuing current releases as HD-only.  I'm 99% sure this was done because of playback problems like mine.Bravo to Universal for nipping this in the bud right away.  Besides, if I wanted to buy the standard DVD, I would have.  But I want my HD! So when Children of Men is reissued, I will buy it again.  Until then I will stay away from the Hybrid Combo DVD's until they are all discontinued and re-issued.By the way, Children of Men was awesome in the theater...it's killing me that I can't watch it in HD yet..
a slam banging Van Damme..no wait...this aint good at all. one of the worst Van Damme movies of all time, this one and Derailed and Replicant and Knock Off, come of Van Damme baby, make good ones and have good directors too. this one has Van Damme after Mickey Rourke who Rourke ends up killing him or he thinks he killed him, then Van Damme goes to an island of lost dead agents and villians(corny). he escapes retardedly and then goes back to save his wife and his up and coming child(who Van Damme and Rodman almost indanger the poor kid, bastards). Van Damme gets help from puke and choke Rodman and they have awesome adventures and eat lots of candy, no wait, thats what I was thinking and then, no. but there's some, I SAID SOME, good action, but then it dies and sits there. the end with an oiled up shirtless Rourke and the tiger lets the suspense and action down. strickly for fans of the movies Van Damme was crappy in. this is repuked up snot on a seseame seed bu
really disappointed. I thought the screenplay was really thick. The lines were unnatural, and too philosophical.
Don't Waste Your Time. I have to agree with the some of the other reviewers of this movie, that it is a real stinker. And Wood Harris is not a bad actor, but in this movie he is given the impossible task of playing unarguably the best guitarist who ever lived. Jimi was one of a kind and I doubt that we will ever in our life times see another such original or innovative musician. So from the beginning, the movie is a failure in attempting to achieve something that should have never even been attempted.And yes, the music is horrible; not even close to the beauty and passion that Jimi created. It also sort of plays fast and loose with the some of the facts of Jimi's life and does not really make the viewer understand what demons he was fighting at the end, which I believe would have made the movie so much better.I read somwhere last year, that the Hughes Brothers were thinking about making a movie about Jimi. Well they should watch this movie and then do the exact opposite. But I really believe that it would be almost impossible to make a movie about Jimi that would be true to his life and what he stood for, and one that his fans would accept.So I agree with some of my fellow reviewers, don't waste your money. If you want to know about Jimi and his music read ELECTRIC GYPSY or JIMI HENDRIX: MUSICIAN or Sharon Lawrence's book. And if you want to see him playing as only he could, watch Monterey Pop, Woodstock, Jimi Plays Berkley or even Band of Gypsys.
Mediocre Retread. I saw this with a group of Strangers with Candy fans, and everybody was pretty disappointed.  Each scene of the series was overflowing with humorous touches - the film is strangely sedate.  At the same time, a ton of jokes are lifted straight from the television show.  The things they don't lift are missed - why did they swap Gerri's manically comatose father for Dan Hedaya laying peacefully in bed
Pretty Lame. I rented this movie on VHS because that was teh only formate they had. I think its pretty FReaking Lame. The Sport Sequeces are cool, but aside from that it was very boring. Basicly i Think this movie was yet another example of Hollywood Movie Trash
keep away. This was purhcased by accident.  But still one of the crapiest movies I ever seen.  Story wise, well it's bad to see what situation young girls could have with whores for mothers and growing up just like them.  It's actualy very sad to see young girls throwing away their life away.  Other wise, movie had bad ending, good quality packing and dvd from amazon.com ...
Bastardization of A Good, Classic Tale. This movie was horrible!!! I watched it with my twin 6-year-olds and we were all equally bored and disappointed with this video! It was just SO far off from the story and all these extra characters (an excuse to add some star names to the mix), just came and went randomly. Most of the jokes seemed more aimed at adults than the kids it is intended for. My kids, however, are OBSESSED, with the older version of this story starring Chloris Leachman as the witch and complete with the original Engelburt Humperdink music. The video is hard to come by though. Someone should re-release it. It's great
Tedious and Long. Contrary to the adorers of this film, I find Kings and Queens to be tedious and long.  There are a few redeeming moments in the movie, but they don't make up for its needless wandering and at times bizarre path.  Francophiles look elsewhere
TRUTH BE TOLD = #$%&  %^&*   !@#$%^&*. AS A CINEMA/TV MAJOR I MAY BE LITTLE ROUGH SO PLEASE EXCUSE MEBUT I AM 70'S - 80'S ADDICT-O-HOLICI MEAN I WATCH THESE SHOWS DAILY!!!!AS FAR AS SEASON 3 IS CONCERNED THERE ARE ONLY TWO EPISODES THAT ARE FUNNY {TRUST ME)!1. THE THOMAS TREASURE2. THE BENEFIT  (THE FINAL EPISODE)WITH THAT SAIDI CAN'T IMAGINE WHAT IDIOT CAME UP WITH THE IDEA OF WRITING OFF MABEL KING'S (MAMA) CHARACTER.BECAUSE THAT WAS THE NAIL IN THE COFFIN FOR THIS SHOWBUT WHAT AMAZES ME IS THE FACT THAT THEY STILL WOULD TALK ABOUT HER IN THE LINES  LIKE SHE STILL WAS AROUND OR ON THE PAYROLL. IT WAS  REALLY AN INSULT TO OUR INTELLIGENCE AS VIEWERS AND TO THIS TONY- NOMINATED* VETERAN ACTRESS ("THE WIZ" 1975*)I WOULD HAVE RATHER THEM SAY SHE GOT RE-MARRIED TO BILL AND MOVED DOWN SOUTH AND BRING HER BACK FROM TIME TO TIME....OR I HATE TO SAY IT BUT .....AT LEAST KILL HER CHARACTER OFF PROPERLY (IF THERE IS SUCH A THING) MAYBE A CAR ACCIDENT OR A ILLNESS.THAT WAY THE VIEWERS AS WELL AS HER TV CHILDREN ROGER AND DEE CAN HAVE CLOSUREAND DEE'S ACTING ABILITY(OR LACK OF IT) WAS WAS VERY VISIBLE WITHOUT THOSE CUTE ONE-LINERS SHE WAS KNOWN FOR IN SEASON 1-2THERE WERE TWO THINGS MAJOR THINGS THAT SEALED THE DEAL FORCANCELATION1. SEASON 3= THE WRITING AND STORY LINES WERE HORRIBLE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!2. BIG AND LITTLE EARL (ENOUGH SAID)WELL.... TO ME THEY SEEMED LIKE A BAD CORN FLAKE COMMERCIAL.THEY ONLY REASON I BOUGHT SEASON THREE WAS BECAUSE I WAS A FAN OF SEASON 1-2 AND WANTED IT FOR MY COLLECTION.WITH THAT SAIDBUY AT YOUR OWN RISK!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Spaced Out Reviewers. I usually trust Amazon reviewers on movie reviews, but this time ....NO WAY!   This silly, totally predictable film left us playing with the cat for our evening entertainment, hoping the movie would liven up.  Sadly, it didn't. To those who rave about the film...you must be in another dimension or something.  Thumbs DOWN.
MERYL'S BIGGEST BOMB. I rate this and "Impromptu" (and also maybe "The Piano") as films that are so impressed with themselves and their supposed pedigree they don't have to "work", and the results are a rather tedious series of costumes, pictures, statements and events.  Maybe it was the creator's intent, but at the end of this movie you don't give a crap about this egomaniacal woman and her emotional patchwork of a life; just on the two hours you'll never get back having endured this drivel
Why pay more for less?. I'm puzzled as to why anyone should pay $59.39 for these three DVDs that currently retail on Amazon for $11.24 (Signs), $14.99 (Unbreakable), and $26.99 (Sixth Sense*) totaling $53.22?*There is also a less expenseive "Collector's Version" of the Sixth Sense that only costs $14.99 if you'd rather not pay the $12.00 for the "Vista Series" extras.I'm also skeptical as to whether the version of Unbreakable sold here has as much content as the Vista series edition sold seperately that contains 2 discs (I assume this edition does not because this box set only includes 3 discs, 1 per movie).I love the movies, but where's the price break on buying them all together when the package is $6.17-$18.17 more than purchasing these DVD's seperately???
made me ashamed to have served. This is the first time that I've ever felt so compelled to write a review for a movie I thought was horrible.  But this movie is that bad.I can't believe someone actually enjoyed this.The one liners, and that whole rock candy thing???  What was that all about?  Was that supposed to be funny?Who wrote this anyway?  He should be tried in a criminal court for waisting my money and my time.The acting was also some of the worst I've seen.  I will never be able to watch Terminator 2 again.Oh, the explosions were impressive.  Maybe if you took away everything but the explosions it wouldn't be too bad.Thanks.  I feel a little "dumber" for having sat through the whole thing
Too true to Life. I read the book when it was first published and then a friend had a son diagnosed with leukemia and went through the same thing as the Mom in the book. Fortunately he had a lot of advocates that pushed him to ignore the insurance company and his son finally found a donor match but it was too late. So I feared that this movie would not be up to the book. My fears were unfounded, the casting was brilliant and I loved this movie, even though it is tough to watch, I still catch it in reruns on the satellite occasionally and "must watch". That is how good it is
Painfully stupid. Ring of Darkness (David DeCoteau, 2004)Former porn director David DeCoteau, whose most notable mainstream flicks have been the Puppet Master franchise (he directed 3, 4, and 5, the last two under assumed names), takes an absolutely brilliant idea and makes an incredibly stupid movie out of it. Now, to be somewhat fair, not only is it a made-for-TV shlockfest, but one that certainly didn't have the budget of a Danielle Steel miniseries (IMDB estimates the film's budget at three-quarters of a million dollars). Still, it would be hard for this movie to be worse than it actually turned out; about the only thing that saves it is its premise and the fact that DeCoteau took nothing seriously.We open with Gordo (Club Dread's Greg Cipes) fleeing from a mansion. Just as he gets to the beach and seems as if he's going to get away, he's cornered by four dark shapes. Cut to an announcement that boy band Take Ten are auditioning for a new lead singer. (I'm sure you can draw the proper conclusion.) After a round of auditions, during which you're liable to get as sick of the catchy little tune they play just as much as you did any nineties boy band hit, the four remaining members of the band choose three possible replacements for Gordo-- Shawn (Guiding Light actor Coltin Scott), Jonah (DeCoteau staple Jeff Peterson), and Xavier (Baywatch's Jeremy Jackson), who are all flown, with Xavier's girlfriend Stacy (American Idol finalist Ryan Starr, whom you will be pleased to know does not sing at any point in the film), to the band's island mansion. Which, of course, looks very familiar. As the three continue the auditions in a slightly more stressful situation, weird things start happening...With all the young-and-beautiful male skin on display, you're likely to think you're watching a Victor Salva flick. However, comparisons with the superior Salva end there; DeCoteau directs as if Ring of Darkness (the title, by the way, has absolutely nothing to do with the movie itself) were his first film, not his fifty-second. I haven't seen this much obvious shot repetition in a movie since Night of the Lepus. The acting is atrocious, as one would expect from folks who cut their teeth in T&A-fests (the two notable exceptions to this are Adrienne Barbeau, who plays the band's manager, and Coltin Scott), the script is bad even for a horror-flick parody, and the whole thing is just on the right side of unwatchable to keep you glued to the screen.Or maybe you just want to watch a boy band get theirs. I know that was my motivation.
Don't go West, young man. Mae West became a sex symbol not because of the way she looked but because of the way she spoke. Her unique delivery coupled with memorable, highly quotable double entendres ("Is that a gun in your pocket or are you just glad to see me?") were the highlights of her early-'30s movies. In SEXTETTE (1978), her final film, a fossilized, eighty-something Mae delivers the same kind of dialogue that made her famous way back when, and the result is a textbook example of how not to grow old gracefully.In this West-scripted endeavor, Mae immodestly casts herself as sex queen Marlo Manners, the World's Most Desirable Woman (yikes!), who can't seem to keep men from pursuing her, even when she's on her honeymoon. The once-in-a-lifetime supporting cast includes Timothy Dalton, Tony Curtis, Ringo Starr, George Hamilton, Alice Cooper, Dom DeLuise, Keith Moon, George Raft, and Regis Philbin. People say you can't go home again and it's true; embarrassingly, the respirator-ready West apparently felt she never left home to begin with. Yet, no matter how bleak a picture I paint, this is one movie some folks will insist on experiencing for themselves. Good luck.
Not bad...once. When I watched this movie, I have to say, I thought it was pretty pointless.  Napolean Dynamite is, too, but it's funny.  This isn't quite up to Dynamite standards, I'm afraid.  It's not as squeaky clean as good ol' Napolean, either.  Don't buy it.  If you must see it, rent it
Misses the Point. I found it very annoying that the makers of this version felt the need to have everyone keep teaching little lessons and reciting little morals to Alice.  As another reviewer has said, that is contrary to the whole spirit of the books and contrary to their original intent.  (A similar outrage was perpetrated by the makers of the TV movie "The Odyssey," where--contrary to Homer--we see Odysseus having to learn little life lessons before he is allowed to go home.)  What I did like, though, was some of the casting, especially Whoopi Goldberg as the Cheshire Cat and Sian Phillips as the Red Queen.  For those who want a good version of one of the Alices, the one starring Kate Beckinsale is actually rather good.  It keeps to the events of "Through the Looking Glass" and it has a good absurdist tone
The Stepford Wives Lay an Egg. A few days ago I was delighted to learn The Stepford Wives would be shown on cable TV, but I soon realized I was watching a turkey. The opening scene is a heavy handed parody of the Jerry Springer show, and from that point it's downhill all the way.The plot is weak, the characters inconsistent, and the story incoherent. The production values of casting, costuming and set design are certainly high. But that just makes this movie a pointless, glossy mess
Reporting from Location. In 2005, we took a weekend trip from Baton Rouge, LA to Natchitoches, LA, where fifteen years earlier the filming of Steel Magnolias in 1989 remains about the biggest thing that ever happened. Having never seen the movie, we rented it as soon as we got back home. Everyone had a reason for watching it in two segments--mine was my sense that this was one of the "cutest" movies I'd ever seen, and I'd had quite enough "cute" lately, especially after sitting through Will Smith in "Hitch". The accents and the caricatures of the characters were all so thick that it reminded me of The Beverly Hillbillies, though more embarrassing than funny. One "Hillbillies-like" moment that pretty funny was the few non-female characters' effort to shoot some "crows" out of a tree so that they won't "**** all over the reception". Their creative use of a crossbow is a classic.Sad to say there isn't much else classic in a story that is at the same time saccharine and maudlin. There was also some choppiness between scenes (as the movie was adapted from a play that never left the beauty shop). I can think of two scenes in particular--one where the town-big wig Clairee (played by the noted-Southern belle Olympia Dukasis) buys the local radio station so that she can do the color commentary on the local football games (the scene features the same guy filmed bare from the back waist-and-lower view as he walks in front camera in the locker room three times.) In another scene, the Darryl Hannah (hard to recognize) committed Christian character argues with her boyfriend over his repeated taking of the Lord's name in vain. Neither scene has any impact on the rest of the story.Dolly Parton is her usual big hair, big smile, big **** self as the lead hairdresser. Shirley MacLaine has a very unsympathetic character as the Eatonton's (Julie and Sally, and family) ill-tempered neighbor. The male characters are more or less wasted, especially the estimable Sam Shepard, who spends most of the film underneath a car, or sitting lifelessly in front of a TV.The movie improved from the seemingly endless wedding prep and wedding of the first half to the second half, which became more dramatic. Sally Field has a pretty good scene near the end, she and the story make you think a little about the motives of the main character (Julia Roberts as Shelby).Overall, I thought that Steel Magnolias was a relatively embarrassing depiction of life in the beautiful town of Natchitoches, LA. Given that the locals seemed not to mind too much, I may be overreacting. They even showed us where the truck made an illegal left turn in the final scene.
Horrid experience, and way too long. While I've seen worse films, few films that I have ever seen combine action, comedy, and dialog as sloppy as this overlong, over-loud, over-stupid, over-profanic, and over-offensive piece. The editing on the action scenes, which are frequent, is undiniably bad, making them frustrating and nausiating to watch. The movie's comedy all falls flat, and is often offensive and mean spirited. The dialog is incomprehesibly bad; I don't mind that there's a lot of profanity, I mind that profanity is used to be sick, mean, and stupid. The plot from the begining is just a throwaway. From the beginging with, of all things, a drug bust on a KKK group, with frequent use of the N word to try to be funny, and an action scene like all the preceding others that half the time one can't tell where another person is shooting, I knew it was bad. Why, oh why, does this movie clog over two hours? It should have been 90 minutes max, but even if it had been I'd still be saying the same things. Terrible film.
Bland, predictable and cliche... There are certainly some memorable scenes in this film, but as a whole it just didn't quite work for me.Vlastimil Brodsky is indeed a talented and endearing actor but spends the whole film playing the same stock character: Fanda, a maddening yet adorable grandpa, oh-so-young-at-heart, oh-so-mischievious and impish, but somehow oh-so-good-hearted and harmless that you can't help loving him warts and all.In fact, that's one of the fatal flaws of this movie: the lack of any dark side to any of the characters.  They're all basically harmless Walt Disney types, even the bumbling and self-absorbed son.  There are no real consequences to Brodsky's actions other than Stella (his wife) finally talking divorce but it's obvious almost as soon as the words are out of her mouth that she'll come back to him.  There is no center, no force or dynamic power in this film---it's like a limp wine that you tolerate because you don't want to hurt the feelings of your host.The ending also relies on another lazy device, the virtual deux ex machina in the person of Stella suddenly transforming into a spirited accomplice/supporter of Fanda's when she sees that his attempt at self-reform is only making him miserable.This film might've been much more effective and poignant had it spent more time dealing with Fanda's desperate fear and avoidance of dealing with old age and death, instead of focusing on how clever, audacious and adorable of an elderly madcap he is, which makes much of the film reek not only of kitsch but even worse, narcissism.  One wonders if the director was just so awestruck at the chance to work with Mr. Brodsky, who is a towering figure among Czech actors, that he decided to turn the film into a bit of a hagiography of him.A more accurate title for this movie, especially given the ludicrous ending shot as the credits roll, might be: "The Fantasy Life of a Poor Old Man."
Minor, atypical Eastwood. A major dud at the box-office when released in 1989, &quot;Pink Cadillac&quot; was perhaps the first serious sign that Clint Eastwood's career was in need of a comeback (which came in the form of  &quot;Unforgiven&quot; three years later).  If his Oscar winning western is  his best film, &quot;Pink Cadillac&quot; may very well be his worst.  As  both an action film and a comedy, it's pretty lame most of the time, but it  remains a must-see for Eastwood fans in that he has never before (and only  rarely since) been so extroverted on screen.  He's quite funny throughout,  and his performance compensates for a script that is as ridiculous as it is  cliched.  Though a minor credit in Eastwood's impressive filmography,  &quot;Pink Cadillac&quot; is worth a look for his fans
Good intentions but... A prestigious scientist (Scharwzenegger) is embraced by artificial insemination testing by himself a new pharmacological device.In spite of the existence of several funny humor blows, it predominates along the picture coarse humor, signed by a permissive and excessively didactic vision of the sex. To be true, there is a potent allegation respect the familiar institution and the motherhood virtue. The fact is that a good chance was wasted about regain the magic of those classic comedies directed by Wilder or Hawks.But anyway, let' s make an imagination exercise; Mel Brooks directing, with a six hands script written by Robin Williams, Billy Cristal and Danny de Vito would have been a major successful premise.But all comparisons sound hateful, perhaps. Don `t you?
docu-commentary: all the pros for wal-mart, none of the cons. This film pulls together all of the arguments in favor of wal-mart.  There is also a very interesting conclusion on the undeniable good work that the company did in summer 2005 in the Katrina-ravaged regions.  However, none of the legitimate concerns of critics are given any thoughtful review.  I say this as a concerned conservative, who wants to understand the enormous changes occuring in my country, and not a liberal.On the plus side, it is hard to argue against the business model of wal-mart:  it offers everyday low prices, which the company accomplishes by incredible and continual productivity gains - by some measures wal-mart is responsible for 25% of the productivity gains in the US due to its use of new technologies! - as well as vast scale economies in particular with globalisation.  Regardless of what critics say, these factors are the basis of the company's success:  consumers chose to buy there because of the prices and convenience.However, this is the point when the film becomes disingenuous.  Anything that critics say is summarily dismissed by either a single and simplistic example, by some self-appoined talking head, by employees who like their jobs, or simply by people passing by on the street.  I found this pathetically unconvincing.   For example, because wal-mart is criticised as a destructive force against traditional town centers, the filmmakers find one town that was able to renew itself as a tourist spot with boutiquie stores and then assumes that that can happen everywhere (but the site was in the Blue Mountains, not in the Oklahoma dustbowl).  No statistics are offered, no additional proof, and no counter-arguments are acknowledged.Moreover, it is easy to find people to spout the opinion you want to espouse by looking for them - to be sure, wal-mart critics do the same, but there are some critics who act like journalists and try to see what truth there is in the arguments advanced.  This film does not.   At one point, the filmakers interview a group of teenagers who state wal-mart wages would  "enough" for them (none of them work there), as if that refutes the experience of single mothers trying to make ends meet on wal-mart salaries!  They also get a few people to state that they never get asked to work overtime wothout pay as if that eliminates the need to investigate the claims of thousands of others who are winning multi-million dollar class-action lawsuits against that practice in their wal-marts.Finally, some of the talking heads make the most ridiculous arguments.  One of them dismissed all the arguments of critics who charge that wal-mart urges its workers to use the welfare system as "those who advocate government health care anyway" - as if that negates their arguments!  By glossing over the details, they don't even make the case in  favor of the wal-mart business model all that well, let alone consider how the intallation of a wal-mart impacts entire communities.As such, this film is for the convinced, for those who want to have their opinions reinforced rather than challenged.  That makes it like Fox news at its worst:  you know what you are going to get before you switch it on - pure opinion and little reporting - so why bother?  It isn't for learning.  The costs behind wal-mart's methods are not even open to question.  The one thing I took away from this is the sincerity of some of the employees, who genuinely believed in the company.Overall, I cannot recommend this film, except as a pure ideological view in favor of this controversial company.   This doesn't do anyone any good - there is no chance for dialogue in this approach, no acknowledgment that critics can make legitimate points.  Whether powerful companies like it or not, they do not automatically deserve our trust, but instead our critical and constant scrutiny
OK But not for beginners. I suppose this workout is okay for someone already in fairly good shape, but for anyone overweight most of the exercises are almost impossible to do. Most of the exercises require that you be able to bend really well and if you are overweight and trying to get in shape you should start with something else that doesn't require this amount of flexibility. It would have helped to nost waste money if they had said this was not meant for overweight people or beginners
Born To Lose. Does Deniro even appear in this movie?  Talk about false advertising.
Very disappointed. I had high hopes for this DVD as I'm looking for good insightful information re 9/11, especially in relation to the collapse of Building 7. I'm sorry to say I was very disappointed and really learned little from it. It is like a home movie in real time. Could be edited to a fraction of its length and not loose much. Yes, devastation was shown but that alone is not sufficient to make it worthwhile. Of course Steve Spak did not know WTC7 was going to collapse but one reviewer referred to the fires in it, as though there was significant information in the DVD about them. There is not. No hard feelings but I wasted my money
Awful. BOO has to be the worst horror movie I have seen in a long time. Poorly conceived, badly acted (and, boy, is the acting BAD), atrociously written, sloppily directed and lacking anything approaching a genuine sense of atmosphere, this film has virtually nothing to recommend it. There are occasional (VERY occasional) glimpses of the film that might have been, but every opportunity is wasted and all we're left with is ninety tedious minutes of teenage histrionics and unnecessary (and unconvincing) gore. Even some of the potentially disturbing imagery (not to mention the presence of Dee Wallace Stone - oh, how careers can plummet!) cannot save it. The one thought I came away with at the end is 'How do people with so little talent and aptitude actually get the opportunity and funding to make a film like this in the first place?' I guess that's one of life's more baffling mysteries, that and the assumption on the part of film makers that horror fans will accept any old rubbish. Avoid this film like the plague. It is truly, truly dreadful
Racist Movie - Worst Black Stereotyping I Have Ever Seen. This movie was pretty awful. Since I am ranking it with 1 star, then according to another reviewer I must not have a soul. Hey, it doesn't feel bad!This movie has the worst black stereotyping of any of movie I have ever seen, particularly in a sci-fi movie. It is worse than the blaxploitation films of the 70's, which were at least entertaining.This movie is about a group of teenage white kids, with one token black thrown in just for the hell of it. "But just how 'black' is he?," you may be wondering. Well the movie makes it clear that he's a true soul man because it goes out of its way to establish these facts:1. He talks different from the whites. ("Hey Bodee." "His name's Bodhi!" "Well you say it your way, and I'll say it mine." Or something to that effect.)2. He breakdances. (And we all know that all black people can breakdance, can't they?)3. He likes basketball. (Again, every white person knows that black people all like basketball and they are all good at it, right?)4. He raps. (Because a person isn't truly black unless they can do a little hip-hop, can they?)I'm a white guy. And I'm not overly sensitive to racism issues. But watching this movie really surprised me. I was amazed to see such a blatant black stereotype. I can't say that it's a good thing. It is quite embarassing to watch, actually. What where they thinking? This movie would never have been made that way in today's day and age.The movie itself is pretty lame. It was made back in the roller-blading / cyberpunk craze of the 80's. It has the usual bleak dystopian future typical of those movies in those days. It also features a funky little ball named Bodhi. It is the weirdest, most nonsensical story I have ever watched. It is almost like a bad dream that somebody wrote down as soon as they woke up, which was later worked into a screenplay.This movie is so stupid that it is painful to watch. The only good reason to see it is to see a few young actors such as Jason Patric (The Lost Boys) and Jami Gertz (The Lost Boys, Twister, Still Standing). It is also nice to see Richard Jordan (Logan's Run), as well as the stunning Sarah Douglas (Superman II, Conan the Destroyer) starring in a villainess roll, as usual.Sarah Douglas really does make a good villain, too. It's too bad that her talent was so wasted in this crapfest of a movie. "Sphere of longiness"? Ech!I don't understand all you people who are giving this movie 5 stars. I mean, what are you thinking? It has to be just the "I love the 80's" nostalgia-factor kicking in. I don't see any other rational reason for this phenomenon.And please. Skating on an overgrown road? Skating in the dirt? They'd get about 10 feet before a rock stuck in their skates and they went flying. It might be fun to watch if you can make yourself believe that rollerblades work in the sand.I'd have to say, that other dystopian future skating flick, "Prayer of the Rollerboys" is a much better movie than this. Of course that ain't saying much, because that movie pretty much stinks too.Buy something else. ANYTHING else. If not for yourself, then at least to show the black people of the world a little basic human respect
Not what I remembered. I remember LOVING this movie and all of its silliness. I recently made it a nostalgia purchase and realized-it isn't that great. but my 6 year old LOVED it and continues to watch it all the time. My child is now a Weird Al Fanatic...and I am ok woth that
No Point & Very Blank. As I recall, 1967 was not the most prolific year for movies and Point Blank,in my opinion, would be one of the worst films I have ever watched.  Notwithstanding the very violent nature of the film, the acting by such notables as Lee Marvin, Carroll O'Conner and Angie Dickinson continually appear to search for conviction with their dis-jointed and nonsensical dialogue.Flashbacks, San Quentin, the San Francisco skyline cannot save this film from the trash heap of celluloid history. If your a Lee Marvin fan, better to watch "The man who shot Libery Valance" twice, than waste your time on Point Blank. Your disposition will be better for it
Gore's Campaign DVD For the Presidency. Pseudo-science from the inventor of the Internet, the inspiration of Love Story, the guy on the cover of Rolling Stone and the "winner" of the presidency in 2000. Garbage not worth watching.
Awful script,bad acting!. Well,I'm afraid there's almost nothing positive to say about this movie.The plot is ridiculous,the directing is terrible,most of the acting is unbearable and the music is getting on one's nerves.If you are a fan of season one (like me),this movie will totally disappoint you.It has nothing to do with lifeguarding,it's nothing more than another opportunity for the "Baywatch Babes" to show their (barely dressed) bodys.Entertainment at its worst!There are only two persons you can really call actress/actor.Alexandra Paul and John Allen Nelson are really wasting their talents on this movie.You better watch the great episodes of season one and forget about this movie which is a waste of time and money!
Not enough Monkey Business!. Everybody say CONGO is a film about scientists find killer gorillas in th rain forest. This is true, but before we get to the psycho monkeys, we have to sit trough hostile militants, the Hungry Hungry Hippos in their cruel retirement, and guys who just get this occasional urge to shoot planes out of the sky with seeker rockets that thwarted with flare guns. The killer gorillas show up in the first five minutes to kill Bruce Campbell (dang you monkeys!) and disappear until the last twenty minutes or so. And this film is 110 minutes.Well, I guess I can't get too angry at CONGO, it at least has decent effect and a few cool action sequences. Those are really the only two good things I can say about this borefest. Stay away unless your a Michael Chritchon completest.
Mistitled, but a good movie. This movie added a world war, changed the continent the story took place on, and then brought the dead back to life. To me, once the essential elements of the author's story are that fundamentally altered, it's not fair to use the title anymore. I realize a number of the changes are a 'tribute' to the Shirley Temple version, but I'd hoped that since the new version wasn't a star vehicle they might have returned to more of the original storyline, but no. At least the first movie was on the correct continent! I like the movie, believe it or not, but it's not the story I read until the first book fell apart, and the changes to the story I listed weren't necessary, and it may have been nice to see that things can work out even when a parent stays dead
DON'T BUY THIS!. The "film makers" of this piece of garbage misrepresented themselves as a film crew for the BBC. Everyone interviewed in it were lied to and edited in a way that would make situations appear different than they were. Eyeball Records did not knowingly agree to be involved in this dvd. This is typical British tabloid junk. Save your money.
Horrid. I once saw this movie seven years ago and really liked it.  Hey, I was young and naive.  I recently rented this movie to see it again.  I was once again robbed of my money. Cameron's Closet is 90 minutes of pure boredom.  The acting is horrible, the monster is laughable, the writing is unbelieveable, I could just go on and on about how terrible this movie is. Cameron is a young boy who has telekinetic powers.  He then brings a demon to life through a statue his dad gave him.  Then people begin to die.  A detective and a psychiatrist begin to investigate. I can't begin to comprend why I liked this movie the first time I saw it.  This is just one big laughfest from the start to the end
Who's History?. Neither side in the 1812-1815 war emerged victorious, although you might think one side did from watching this documentary.  The US came close to defeat several times and it was only the occasional victory (Fort McHenry) that saved the US. Had the US navy not secured victories in the northern lakes, then the US army would have been in serious trouble.With Napoleon defeated, Great Britain started to transfer large amounts of ships and experienced troops to America. There was no opposing great power like France, Spain or Holland to come to it's aid this time. Had the war not ended, then there is every chance the United States would have gone bankrupt and lost some of the states. New England was close to breaking away.The Treaty of Ghent ended the war but resolved none of the issues that started it. This documentary is interesting for some of the details, but the overall slant is biased and could have provided so much more details.Not sure why Ironclads are on the dvd since all ships were still made of wood in 1815
But, Mom, I am asking For It. It is movies like this that make me wonder if the writers/directors/producers of these Lifetime movies think about what they are implying before they just fling it up on the screen. Here we have "Odd Girl Out" the story of a high school girl who a popular clique of mean girls turn against and make her life a living hell by calling her fat and easy. And with that basic concept the filmmakers decide to call for fascism all because of their ridiculous slippery slope theory. In the world they live in, to pick on a fellow student leads directly to said student attempting suicide. Further more, their idea of a happy ending is when the principal steps in and outlaws teasing (so much for free speech). Plus, all this is on top of the fact that the victim in question, Vanessa (Alexa Vega), is weak, needy, and straight up duuuuum. The only reason the torture in allowed to endure for the entire film is because she keeps begging for it. Of course the general idea is that she just needs the approval of her peers so much that there is no limit to the amount of times she will let them crush her. Throughout the film the aggressors keep sending her links to a "Hating Vanessa" website. Vanessa, dim bulb that she is, not only takes part in her own abuse by opening them, also acts genuinely shocked by what she finds and bursts out into tears. Late in the film one character makes the fairly obvious observation of "She is so pathetic." This comes after Vanessa has cut off her hair, showed up to a nonexistent party, skipped school to avoid the harassment, and ODed on sleeping pills all while pining to be best friends with the popular girls in school. . .so it goes without saying that I agree with the statement.The filmmaking itself was textbook Lifetime schlock. They take an issue they don't like and attack it with a stone cold seriousness. It is kind of like a Public Service Announcement only 180 times longer and minus the camp value. I would argue that their fear of anything light does hurt the point they are trying to make. For instance, the girls doing the bullying were painted as spawns of Satan without any appealing qualities. Why would Vanessa want to hangout with these humorless droids. In "thirteen" Nikki Reed's character was at least somewhat cool. It also follows the exact same formula of every other film just like it. Girl has cool friends, cool friends turn against girl, we're supposed to feel bad that girl doesn't get to have cool friends any more. I was a victim of bullying in school (who wasn't) and I think that I am a stronger person now because of it. Our public school system now only peddles uniformity not education, so all these kids can hope to really learn is people skills. How to deal with bullies, office politics, etc. After all, suffering makes us who we are. And for these irresponsible filmmakers to serve up the idea of limiting free speech just to prevent hurt feelings to an audience not known for their free thinking skills is borderline evil **1/4
The cell phone is the main character. The most interesting part of this action movie is the centrality of the cell phone. The movie is a Nokia product placement, highlighting what awful danger you are in if you are not connected and, conversely, what a phone can do for you if you have one. The plot centers on Jessica (Kim Basinger) who is abducted because the bad guys think she has something that they need. Mystery #1: What is it?After lots of running/driving in various parts of L.A. the bad guys round up Jessica's family, while on the other end a pretty guy turned superhero and a would-be day spa owner cop are trying to help them. Mystery #2: how will the cell phone save the day?Mystery #3. Watch for the credits at the end of the film. They show up on a...? Yep, you got it
Worst. Movie. Ever. OK I have seen a lot of bad movies but this one takes the prize for worst movie ever. I am generally a big fan of 80's movies, especially 80s high school movies and chick flicks. But this was just so horrendously unfunny, pointless, dull and banal, with unsympathetic, flimsy characters and a weak plot. It tires so hard to be funny and emotional but fails miserably. I mean, the part where she says about how she's with Lloyd because he told her there was glass on the ground is just so artifical and contrived, yet it is supposed to be profound and emotional. I was actually embarassed to return this piece of garbage to the video shop. The two leads have no chemistry whatsoever and I fail to see what on earth John Cusack's character saw in the selfish, stuck up Diane. I can not understand how anyone can give this movie a high rating, I can only assume that you 1. have all been smoking crack or 2. are all the same person. Thank goodness Cameron Crowe's films got better. Please, don't buy this pile of junk if you have any brains! It will be two hours of you life wasted
The Return...of BOOORING!!!!. How can so many people rate this as a good movie?!?!?It was downright horrible. It took over thirty minutes for any action to take place, if you want to consider her continuously walking to a bar as some action. Then a co-worker tries something with her, mind you, a CO-WORKER, whom she WORKS WITH. That just seemed like someone threw that scene in to show people that the main hero can fight.The characters seem to not have aged in 15 years since the accident, her father, and the hero she ends up sleeping with. Come on, absolutely no reason why anyone with good movie tastes should rent this. I did and it was an absolute waste of time.
My first review was too harsh (2.5 stars). When I first wrote a review for this movie I will confess that I was angry that it did not have any demons or evil monsters from hell, but upon further review I must take back my previous opinion, and say that though Doom the movie does not carry the spirit of doom into it it is still a pretty good movie. I believe that if the movie had been more original then I would have liked it (except for the first person part of the movie wich is why the rating is not higher aside from not being original). Overall as much as I hate to admit it this is a pretty good movie and worth watching (yes this is leaving a bad taste in my mouth) so go ahead and watch it it is by no standard the best video game based movie ever but decent overall.SORRY ABOUT MY FIRST REVIEW
I saw this with a Holocaust survivor. We enjoyed the early parts of the film because of the humor, but my friend, a survivor of Auschwitz Birkenau and a forced labor camp, was finally outraged by this treatment of the Holocaust, as was I. A child in Auschwitz would have been gassed to death immediately so there would be no chance to make a game of the camp experience! My friend would have been gassed to death, because he later found out they gassed all kids under the age of 18 soon after he left for a labor camp. Watch Divided We Fall instead! Or for a very good depiction of life in the camps, watch Fateless or The Grey Zone
I GIVE IT ONE STAR ONLY BECAUSE RALPH FIENNES IS IN IT. This movie has been terribly hyped-up, for reasons unbeknownst to me, perhaps politically, I presume, in the usual Hollywood fashion.  It has got to be one of the most slow-moving, boring, uninteresting movies I have had the pain of having to waste my time on ~ while attempting to sit through it.  However, the one and only good thing about it is that Ralph Fiennes is in it ~ but that is all.  Don't waste your money and time on this dud, as I'm sorry I did
A rotten musical. This film represents the low point in the splashy Grable musicals released by Twentieth Century Fox during the war.  The story/script is really appalling and Bruce Humberstone, a frequently poor director, adds nothing.  Grable plays a secretary doubling as a night club performer.  As far as plot, that is about it.In typical Fox fashion, the colour and sound are excellent. Grable looks attractive but the makeup is quite heavy, particularly the bleached blonde hair.  She was pregnant during shooting and the costumes have been designed to hide this. One would hope that Martha Raye and Joe E Brown would help but the material is so bad that they are just noisy and distracting.   Most of the songs are lousy too - duds like "Don't Carry Tales".Two redeeming feature - the song "Once too Often" as Hermes Pan and Grable perform a tame Apache dance and the title tune, nicely sung by Grable in close up.The film represents Hollywood cynicism at its worst.  Fox built a film around Grable's status as THE pin up of World War 2 but neglected to give her a script or a decent leading man. Not to worry, the public will come anyway and, of course, so they did.  In the long run, though, junk like this chips away at the reputation of this appealing star who barely holds the film together by sheer star quality, her pretty face and her sense of humour.  If you are not an ardent Grable fan, you'll hate the film."Pin Up Girl" really supports the view that Betty Grable made poor films which don't warrant revival.  In fact many of them are first rate entertainments but certainly not this one!  It should, however, be noted that the print of the film in this DVD is excellent and among the extras is an entertaining deleted number which can be seen already in the Hidden Hollywood series
Lucas Strikes!. NOTE: This review is not about the trilogy (which is great). This review is about the many DVD releases.The worst thing that ever happened to George Lucas is when Peter Jackson released the Extended Version of LOTR. Jackson showed fans we could demand, expect, and receive more from Hollywood. The impact of Peter Jackson sent shock waves among fans, who released a four-disc edition of one of the greatest movies of all time. Even old Hollywood guards, like Ridley Scott and James Cameron (no surprise they are not Americans) took notice and improved their DVD releases. This change has been powerful, except in the case of Lucas and to some degree his pal Steven Spielberg, who continues to stick to their old habits by being dinosaurs when it comes to business and satisfying the consumers.The many re-releases shows greediness, stubbornness, and lack of respect for fans. No one is upset with him for cleaning up the original version, but please allow fans to have the 1977 version and the updated version with better picture and sound quality. In addition, please stop using the "Limited Edition" you like to use to get fans to buy new copies of Star Wars; it is both false and tiring. Release these films in Anamorphic Widescreen with 5.1 Surround Sound and allow the 1977 version of the movie be release.Lucas's creditability has gone downhill to some degree because he is only known for his Star War movies. Unfortunately, his latest releases have only damaged him further because the quality of the prequels has been less than stellar. His shady practice of video/DVD releases of his past glory has resulted in some fans losing respect for him.One must wonder what went through Lucas mind when Peter Jackson won an Academy Award for Best Director and not him. Maybe if he focus on making quality films (like he once did) and not playing the DVD re-re-re-release game, then he could win one.
1st Star Wars related thing I didn't realy care for. This was really bad. I had to force myself to finish the first "feature film." I now realize why this only lasted a short time. There was really no point. Compared to the Clone Wars this was bantha poodoo
No Rhythm Whatsoever. This film is an absolute piece of garbage, but according to the Academy, this was the finest film of 1951.  I would rather watch Strangers on a Train, A Streetcar Named Desire, The African Queen, A Place in the Sun--I'd rather watch myself drive off a cliff.  Gershwin may have rhythm.  Gene Kelly definitely has rhythm when he dances.  But whoever threw this film together had no sense of cinematic rhythm.  Here's a basic rule of thumb:  when you're making a narrative film, don't take leave of the story--especially at the end--for a 17 minute (no joke) dance number that is only nominally related to the plot.  I don't care how good you might think Gene Kelly danced and choreographed that number.  You know Kurosawa directed a hell of a fight scene at the end of Seven Samurai.  Why don't we throw that in this movie too?  Because it would be stupid and make the film uneven, right?  That's right.  And that's exactly what this 17 minute dance number does to An American in Paris.  An unfair comparison?  Okay let's take the Karate Kid.  It's the end of the movie.  Daniel-san is hurt bad.  But instead of having Mr. Miyagi do that voodoo hand slap and rub combo to fix Daniel-san's leg, Daniel just stares in thought.  We now understand what we are seeing is what he is thinking about.  And what do we see?  Seventeen minutes of Kurosawa's Seven Samurai battle sequence.  Then when that's done, we fade back to Daniel-san staring at  nothing.  He stands up and his leg is fine and the karate tournament is over and he's won the thing!  You would think that movie was pretty stupid right?  That's essentially how the 17 minute Gene Kelly dance sequence feels.  Seventeen minutes of talent, to be sure, but what the devil is it doing the middle of the film?  No wait not the middle.  It's at the end.  It's replaced the climax of the film--and doing a poor job of it I might add.  Then it ends, Gene Kelly's daydream is over, and everything is okay.  The end.  Lame.  And don't try to tell me that the dance sequence was the climax--that it resolves the film if you interpret the symbolic dancing right.  Whatever.  A film with such an amateurish plot hasn't earned the right to suddenly become cerebral.  An American in Paris is like our Karate Kid with Kurosawa tacked onto it--a cheesy average film with a chunk of talent thrown in the mix without much rhyme or reason--or rhythm.  Would our Karate Kid-Seven Samurai hybrid deserve the Oscar for best picture?  Neither did An American in Paris.  Just because it's got Gene Kelly and some Gershwin tunes doesn't make it a great, or even a good, film.  Remember, Mike Nichols made The Graduate and Birdcage
Getting Older Not Better. The Prisoner of AzkabanYoung Harry suffers as an adopted child and family servant. An insulting relative is blown away, and Harry leaves too. A magic bus takes him away. The special effects are extravagant, but seem senseless. The oddities are like something out of "Star Wars", amazing but irrelevant. The `Hogwarts' school seems to be overproducing the amount of wizards needed for their economy. Or do they have a short life in their future? Great power may create great faults.The computer generated images are what makes this film interesting. The hippogriff looks great! Let's hope it doesn't drop anything on the students. Sirius Black has escaped from Azkaban, where they keep the wizards who have gone bad. Black is said to be going after Harry Potter! This time we see the game of quidditch played in the rain. The winter scene and the invisible Potter recalls "The Invisible Man". Overall there is a creepy feeling to the adult characters in this film. The story begins to drag in the middle, but a big black dog shows up to drag Ron into his underground lair. A tree comes to life and attacks Harry and Hermione. Then they find a secret tunnel that leads to the castle and a surprising revelation. [Does any of this make sense to you?]Special effects are no substitute for a good story. It seems confused and meaningless. Can the wing loading of a hippogriff support three people? All seems to end well given the prior events. Professor Lupin resigns, his secret life-style has been found out and the parents of his students won't approve of this behavior. Parents don't like a teacher who exploits the students."Harry Potter" panders to children in giving superhuman powers to a select few who aren't fit to handle these powers. Or is this a subtle criticism of the aristocratic ruling class?
Don't waste your time. What conceivable reason could there be for making this movie?  We all basically know the story and we all know that the "true story" behind it is bogus.  Moreover, the movie isn't all that long--about 80 minutes not including the credits.  This is basically enough to skim through the story without any real depth or development.  The acting is fairly mediocre--the babysitter being the exception--and can't say much for the dialogue either.  In the end, not all that frightening, and not really worth the time.
Looking forward to the Final Credits. The production and performances in 'Final Stab' are good. What brings the movie down is the characters. Within the first 10 minutes of meeting this self-obsessed, apathetic group of characters, I found myself rooting for the killer. The premise of the film is basic and unoriginal. An obnoxious woman (I am being kind) puts together a mystery weekend for her just as obnoxious friends (primarily getting all of them there by extortion). She has hired an actor to play a masked killer for the evening, but alas, a real killer has invaded the evening and they all still think the deaths are just good acting. One of the funniest scenes has the Brittney Spears wannabe approached by the killer, whom she thinks is the actor, and remarks (paraphrased) "Is this going to be messy?". As the killer is stabbing her, her boyfriend is watching from a window and is seriously impressed by her 'good performance'. 'Final Stab' is not poorly made, just poorly conceived. It is difficult to like a film when there are no characters to like. This is too bad, since with some character development and a less disjointed story they could have had a good movie; the basic ingredients were there.--Bo
The second worst dinosaur movie. First off, special effects mean nothing compared to actual quality. But at least this is better than the abomination that was JAWS.The only dinosaur movie I can think of that's worse than this is RAPTOR, which consists of parts of the three Carnosaur movies cut & pasted together.It has some redeeming feature in that Ian Malcom and John somedoy (I forget his last name... the guy who owns the park) were actually interesting characters. I guess Steve Speilberg finally realised that monster/animal attack movies only work when you have characters people are going to give a monkey's rear end about. Unfortunately, the boring, stereotypical Alan Grant was the central character in this.If you want to watch a Steven Spielburg movie that's actually good, watch E.T. or something. Or "The Lost World: Jurassic Park" (even though recommending a sequel may seem lame, the sequel is a million times better than this)If you want to see a dinosaur movie, then watch either the sequel to this movie, or Arthur Conan Doyle's "The Lost World". I would also recomend the 'Carnosaur' movies but I think they're out of print.If you want to see a movie where Sam Neill plays an interesting chracter, watch 'In the Mouth of Madness' or 'Triangle'But definitely avoid this movie. The only reason I even own it is because it was sold in a box set with "The Lost World: Jurassic Park
Pretty Revealing. This DVD exposes the Ultimate Warrior as 25% postitive and 75% negative.I do believe that Jim Hellwig does suffer from narcissm in relation to his ongoing identity crisis.  Just another case of a wreslter who couldn't seperate himself from the character, and even still till this day as he is retired give speaches to colleges.  The only thing that bothers me is that Jim Hellwig wasn't involved in this dvd to give his perspective and opinions.  He was offered to participate and again offered to make his story heard before and after the fact.  Jim Hellwig declined, & used it as another opportunity to initiate a lawsuit.This guy did make an impact in the wrestling world, but it was too shortlived.  Fans can chalk it up as a cool memory, but unfortunately not one linked with any high level of respect like we can with Flair, Piper, Hogan, and the most respected of all The Undertaker
Anderson begins to lose his grip. The first few times I saw this film, I thought it was great.  The use of music, the color, the sets, I thought they were all wonderful.Then I saw films by the directors Anderson was copying.  Now, immitation is the sincerest form of flattery, and this is prevelant in the Coen brothers' first 8 films, but Anderons just relies on the ideas of others, hoping people will buy them as his own.The use of color-KubrickThe seemingly lifeless character-Name a french new wave director, you got itThe use of music-JarmuschSo, all in all, this is basically Anderon's "hey, look at the directors I like, and watch me try to copy them." film
Great Family Show But Poor Transfer Quality & No Extras.. Now don't get the wrong impression of my rating because this is an excellent family show and it gets 5 stars it that area, but the 2 rating is my opinion of the poor way that this quality show was put on DVD.. First i noticed that this is a bare bones transfer with no extras but you would think since we are paying good money for these dvds that they would at least make sure the trasnfer quality from film to dvd is excellent, but sadly its not, it seems like there was not much care taken in the transfer process. Let me explain, during the opening music i noticed that it fades in and out something that i did not notice in the previous 3 seasons. Also on a few episodes i just watched, it appears like there was little cleaning up of the film done before transfer to get rid of all the spots or floaters that sometimes appear on older films, it would have been nice if the time was taken to remaster the film for good dvd viewing. It also would have been nice to include a closed caption feature for the hearing impaired for those who need it. In closing i really enjoy watching the Waltons and I am very pleased to have it on DVD, but if a little more care and extra work was put into the transfer process this could be so much better and i would feel i am getting the most for my money spent...
Costumes were good. Jennifer Jason...Can someone PUHLeeze tell me why she ALWAYS plays the same role! ANd why all of her characters have seriously bad elocution!The so called ~Bostonish...or upper crust--east coast accent does Not include..slurring your words as if a consonant was too much WORK.  It as if her upper lip is never engaged at all..Not even to smirk!  Does she have a BOTOX complex..USE YOUR FACE..Including your upper lip...But then again...Maybe she was acting JUST like Dorothy Parker..WHo ahem..happens to be dead..!  ( no disrespect intended..)Jennifer Beals played her little tiny wee part with so much more depth and nuance..WHY didn't she play Parker..I believed her character!  Gwyneth..Love her..!  Bit part..but she added a much needed warmth to the film..I cared for one character..And the best part was his bit giving a financial report..I thought that was BRILLIANT..! BRavo..But Mr. Benchley was the most endearing and 3 dimensional character..THANK YOU..WIll someone Please make this film over..And Do it right..!  And don't just call up your buds..for a tupperware party and say..HEY..Lets make a movie..!  Dorothy Parker deserves MUCH MUCH better..I can't EVEN imagine the biting remarks she would print..How about..  'It's all about me..And I hated it..!But the costumes were nice..
Visual Inverse Proportions. I was thrilled to see a style of dance that I don't have access to made available to me via DVD and went ahead and gave it a go.While I admire all of the performers for getting in front of the camera, which takes a lot of courage for some, I couldn't help noticing that the worse the dancer, the more special effects I was bombarded with. The best dancers performed on a bare stage with a plain backdrop so that all you could focus on was them - there was no need to disguise their lack of technical skill with computer generated overlays of CHEESY headstones, iron crosses, and gothic cathedral windows, peat bogs, or swamps (Give me a break!). Other performers projected the attitude of "Ooooh, look at me, I can do figure eights and I'm wearing a black corset!" (So what. Take off the corset, put on a choli and attend a few dance workshops and then show me what you can do.)Overall I came out feeling like I'd witnessed a Jr. High talent show where the "popular" girl and her synchphants got up and flopped and swished their way through a choreography to the latest Black Eyed Peas song that they threw together the night before over pizza and M&Ms with everyone applauding when the music stopped because it was the nice thing to do. (You know, like in "Napoleon Dynamite") Either that or I'd just witnessed a lot of first year Film Student's final project videos.As a dance movement, Racks Gothique is pretty legit, and I think that with a little more effort, a better representation of could be produced than this one.
poor mr. king,will they ever get one of his short stories right??. so bad that i will just say this,read the book night shift and find out what this movie should of and could of been!!! skip this mess!
Take out your hunting knife and gut the book. Never have I seen a movie violate a book so badly. John Grisham's Runaway Jury is a moral microcosm of free will versus addiction, in which the widow of a life-long smoker takes on Big Tobacco in the courtroom. The movie Runaway Jury is a slapped-together suspense chase, in which the entire premise is changed into the widow of shooting victim taking on gun manufacturers.This movie is, at most, a caricature of the book, and not a flattering one at that. Hackman transforms Fitch's quiet menace into arrogant buffoonery; a man who waves his arms and throws phones at the wall. Parts of Marlee's life-altering past are tranformed into vaguely impersonal events. The most interesting aspects of the story--jury selection and Nicholas Easter's manipulation of the court--are grudgingly presented in minute-long montages in order to get back to the yelling and frantic running around.If I had never read the book, I would consider this a run-of-the-mill flick, rent-worthy at best. But knowing how atrociously the screenwriters have butchered the concept makes the movie all the more empty and sad. Even if you aren't a lover of fiction, I highly recommend buying the book instead.
Just not gripping. Admittedly the film is clever and the acting is good and it has it's moments of entertainment, BUT overall it's long and pretty boring.  It seems it would have been better suited as a play, which apparently it was originally.  I had just finished re-reading Romeo and Juliet when I rented this, thinking I was still in a Shakespeare mood, but this didn't do it for me.  I suppose if I had just finished reading or watching Hamlet, it would have been better.  My favorite parts are Oldman's silent scientific discoveries, completely amusing.  Couldn't wait for the movie to end, honestly
Universal is asleep at the wheel. Not what C.B. deserves.... OK. So Universal, with an impressive library of Paramount movies from the 30s and 40s, and a less-impressive but still significant library of its own films from the classic era decides finally not to smoosh films onto DVD-18s like they are cattle, and give a more "proper" presentation" to some of the jewels in their vault.So applause to them for even knowing that they own THE SIGN OF THE CROSS, and releasing the restoration that UCLA did on the film, along with some other notable DeMille classics in a multi-disc set (along with a rather boring turkey [FOUR FRIGHTENED PEOPLE}.The marvelous Kevin Brownlow created an epic biography of DeMille, but is it to be found here? No.Did Universal create any extras for this set? No.Did they even try to find the 1960s TV special about the man?No.While it's commendable that instead of the annual re=release of FRANKENSTEIN or 16 CANDLES that they dug into their vault a bit, these acceptable transfers with no supplementary materials are pathetic compared to what kind of presentation they could, and should have been given....which only means they'll be re-issued with proper extras in a year for less money!
Say no to dubs. Even though fans of HK cinema have as a whole come a long way since HK films were generally only seen in the states on Saturday afternoon television, some studios are still refusing to provide buyers with the option of seeing HK films in their original language with subtitles.  This film is available from Columbia Tristar only in a dubbed format, and for that reason I won't be getting the Region 1 release of this film
The entire Escaflowne universe in a can... First off, I am a fan of the original series - Escaflowne. It's by far up there in the top 5 of favorite anime. It had a lot of memorable characters, good action and a pretty decent story.This is not an original Escaflowne. It does not take part before or after the series. It doesn't take place somewhere in the middle. It takes most of the main characters from the series and totally retells the entire story to fit into a movie. The result? Not a fan. Basically, because the entire movie you see a 30 second introduction to old characters in suped up animation with no depth. For example, the twin cat girls that were so fond Lord Falcon, show up instead for a brief 30 seconds as singers on stage in a bar. Ummm yuck. Lots of the more memorable characters are subjugated to this. Perhaps, if you seen this first it would be a decent watch. For myself, I was very disappointed.The good points of this movie is the animation is upgraded and the soundtrack is well done.Even as a standalone product, the movie has no flow or depth to it. It's basically just a compressed retelling of Escaflowne. I'd rent this and skip it as a purchase. If you want to purchase something, get the Escaflowne series. You will be much happier
Decent but lacks a sense of wonder. Whenever you think of Disney films, you typically think of cutesy, happy-go-lucky 80 minute comedy musicals with pop culture jokes to appeal to adults and a sappy ending to make the kids happy, but Disney's The Hunchback Of Notre Dame is quite different from that.  It's surprisingly a much more darker and more serious film than Disney's usual cartoons.  Although none of it is ever graphic, there is a surprising amount of on-screen deaths for a G rated Disney cartoon.  The movie also deals with several adult subjects like racism, persucution, and even religion.  The film is mostly serious but there are some comical moments performed by Quasimodo's gargoyle friends.  Unfortunately, as funny as the gargoyles are, none of them were really all that memorable and I actually find myself having trouble remembering any of their names and while they did have their laughable moments, there were also times were I felt like their presence felt intrusive, especially in the later more dramatic moments of the story.  I didn't like how they had the gargoyles help fend off the soldiers near the end of the film, either.  What made the gargoyles tolerable is that they were kept seperate from the rest of the "real world" of the story and were only used when Quasimodo was alone, as part of his imagination.  By having them fight the soldiers, it feels like Disney is trying to mesh the realisim of the story with the fantasy elements, which works fine with most of their other films, but feels really out of place in this more serious movie.  It's like Disney wants to push the G rating as much as possible, but they aren't brave enough to truly make this a dark film, so they had the gargoyles included to lighten things up for the kiddies.  Perhaps if this movie was rated PG instead, Disney would've been more free to explore the darker sides of this story and the gargoyles could've been used a lot less.Aside from Qausimodo, most of the other characters feel very Disney stereotypical.  Esmeralda is your average spunky Disney heroine, Phoebus is the typical dashing Disney hero with a big head who falls in love with the heroine, and Frollo is Scar from The Lion King in human form.  Despite a rather small cast of characters compared to Disney's other films, very little development is given to any of them aside from Qausimodo.  I couldn't really connect with any of the other supporting characters because not enough time was spent developing them and it didn't help that most of their personalities are Disney stereotypes.  The Hunchback Of Notre Dame also lacks that magical sense of wonder that other Disney movies have.  The storyline is entertaining but you just don't really feel drawn into it.The Hunchback Of Notre Dame does have some gorgeous animation, though.  I loved the detail designs of the churches and this film has some of Disney's most stunning animation, easily rivaling any of their classics in the visuals department.  The background music is beautiful as well, but other than "Out There" and "Hellfire", most of their songs are pretty forgettable, and even those two noteable tunes get rather old after a while.  Don't get me wrong; The Hunchback Of Notre Dame is far from being a bad film and I enjoyed it a lot.  I loved how Disney attempted to show a darker side for a change, Qausimodo is one of their more likeable heroes and one that anybody who's been a social outcast can easily relate to, and the animation is gorgeous, but the film just doesn't connect to the viewer and some of the comedy scenes felt very out of place.  Still, older viewers who think they're too grown up for Disney's more childish movies but still love animation will enjoy this film, and diehard Disney fans will want to add this movie into their collection, but casual moviegoers should pass this up and stick to something like Beauty And The Beast instead, and most of this film will probably be uninteresting to younger viewers due to its lack of magical fuzzy creatures and its more serious undertones.
Even for a Kid's Movie, This Film is Lame. Ouch! We can add another batch of compost to the trash heap that is Macaulay Culkin's career.  While he may have been somewhat entertaining in HOME ALONE, by the time RICHIE RICH was made, Culkin's lack of real depth is on full display.  While I won't say that this is the worst kid's movie I have ever seen, it is definitely up there.I agree with other reviewers that speak about the film's mixed messages.  For example, we are supposed to believe that a man who has singlehandedly built an empire that could topple other nations is completely disinterested in money & wealth, choosing instead to lock up his memories in his secret vault and spend all of his time canoodling with his wife.  Moreover, there is a problem surrounding Richie's dilemma.  It is an old one: the rich kid with no friends.  Richie just wants to play baseball like everyone else.  The movie is, to a large extent, a resolution of that problem.  What's the solution?  Have your father build a baseball diamond in your backyard, furnish your friends with uniforms, and allow you all to have a ball (complete with an in-house umpire).  The message: money can't buy you love.  But, oh boy, does it help!I remember really enjoying the cartoon while I was a kid, but this film fails to recreate the "feeling" of those comics.  Instead, it exploits the few talents Culkin has and goes for the classic, boring family movie.  Don't bother with RICHIE RICH.  You're better off sticking to other gems in Culkin's trash-pile, such as HOME ALONE or HOME ALONE 2: LOST IN NEW YORK.
Just not the same "Hound Dog". I have the original Fox and The Hound and have watched it many times.This new sequel does not tug at the heart like the first, therefore, this new storyline seems rather silly.  Do see the original first, otherwise, you may miss a wonderful family film
Shame on You, Amazon. Okay, I bought this because I read the specifications on the product page and saw that it featured a Japanese language track. "Finally!" I thought, "I'll get to see Pocket Monsters as it was intended to be seen!" I guess I should have known better, but I was nonetheless furious when I popped in the first disc and the butchered English version was the only language track available.I think I'm most angry at Amazon for the blatant lies that are featured on its product page. Shame on you, Amazon, for flat-out lying to your custsomers. Had I known only the English track was available, I would have never preordered it. The only reason I bought it in the first place was so that I could enjoy Pocket Monsters in Japanese. Thanks for nothing, guys; I'm returning this disappointment as soon as possible.
Makes Michael Moore look like a moderate. This is a classic example of what liberals resort to ever since becoming unable to win at the ballot box.
EH... AS FAR AS HORROR MOVIES GO, NO BIG DEAL... ... there's a strong made-for-TV vibe about this movie... 'nuff said
Caves, what caves?. This is the most misleadlingly (is that a word?)titled movie I have ever seen. Amazing caves? What caves? The first 15 minutes of this reletively short 40 minute film don't take place in any cave. All they do is talk about them. Then when they finally enter a cave they are there for a few seconds. The few and far between cave scenes are interspersed with lots kayaking scenes, laboratory scenes, and classroom scenes. Was this film funded by the pharmasutical industry? The lead scientist in the film is always saying how she does this cave dwelling stuff to find exrtremophiles that will create new cures for diseases. Blechh! I wanted a movie about caves that showed beautiful caves. Granted, the latter half of the film provided more cave time but it was too little too late with too much of an environmental-disease-curing propaganda feel to it than I could stomach. It should have been titled "How To Search for New Cures in a Few Caves while Being Environmentally Conscious." Somehow I don't think that title would have sold many IMAX tickets or DVD's
I'm scarred. The carebears big wish movie was horrible.  THey never should have used CGI to make what use to be a wonderful show.  I'm scarred i'm scarred for life there is just no other explination for it.  They killed the carebears!  The carebears big wish move is on disney right now and it has gone CGI.  WTF they ruined it.  They really killed them there colors are all wrong( cheer bear isn't even pink and tenderheart isn't brown),the only facial expressions that they can do is open and close there eyes and mouths, Carealot looks like a barren wasteland instead of warm cuddles of clouds and joy,and the stars look like demon monsters.  I hate it.  What have they done!  Carebears are suppose to be cute and fluffy and cuddly and not look like emotionless statutes.   I hate CGI with cartoons i prefer animation.  sure live action special effects use cgi but leave my cartoons alone **crys**  WHAT HAVE THEY DONE
Not so HD. The movie is simply a classic, and a must for any Sci-fi fan.The HD quality was less then good though. I probably did something wrong, but I never really got it to work in a anything that even resembled Hi Definition af 720 or 1080.
Weak and Unfunny Romantic Comedy Starring Gallo and Cox. A little-seen film starring Vincent Gallo and Courteney Cox, directed by Justin McCarthy (brother of actor Andrew of 'Less Than Zero'), released from marverick indie company Lions Gate, which also released quite impressive 'Bufallo 66' directed Gallo.But this film is a disappointment.  I like Gallo, and watched almost all of his films (including notorious 'Brown Bunny'), but 'Get Well Soon' suffers from too many things.First, this is about the popular midnight TV personality Bobby, played by Vincent Gallo.  Sorry, but I don't believe it.  Gallo looks never the kind of the character he plays here, because Gallo's talent (as musician, film director, whatever you pick) is not to be found in mainstream media like TV.  He is not Letterman or Leno, and that's his strength, isn't it?And Bobby comes back to his town, where his ex-girlfriend Lilly lives, and Bobby tried to make up for the past wrongs done to her, with a help from her brother who is now in a mental institute.  This quirky romantic comedy follows the process of love between them, with some episodes about the immates of the instutite, who tries to steal a dog of Matthew Broderick (who does NOT appear).Lilly is played by Courteney Cox, whom I love to see in any films, but somehow she lacks the charms she showed in other films of his.  The biggest problem is still Gallo, whose dangerous charisma was sensational in '66' or 'Palookaville,' but not here, only looking like sleepwalking.  Sorry his fans, but he is totally miscast.Perhaps more damaging is the director's poor direction.  The characters are annoyingly unfunny, trying to be funny, and the jokes are as fresh as last years's news, recycling those jokes about gays or mental institute.  For die-hard Gallo fans only; others, skip it.
There's Got to Be a Morning After....Please. The most surprising aspect of this 2006 thrill ride of a movie is that at ninety minutes, it is almost a half-hour shorter than its 1972 predecessor, a blessing really given that director Wolfgang Peterson seems only interested in filming the action sequences. An inspired choice for the remake, the veteran director has already proven a sharp acumen for providing exceedingly cramped, seafaring adventures with his classic WWII submarine movie, "Das Boot" and the more recent fishing trip-gone-wrong, "The Perfect Storm". The offsetting problem, however, is that Mark Protosevich's trite screenplay abbreviates character development in favor of banal dialogue and stock responses. The net result is that there is little concern for the fate of any of the characters, especially the women who look interchangeable when soaked, no matter how dire the consequences.Peterson wastes little time, barely fifteen minutes, in setting up the ten key characters for the big tidal wave. From that point, he combines predictably spectacular CGI effects with outsized set pieces to dramatize the familiar journey this group takes to find their way to the hull where they seek safety. The one indisputable improvement over the original is the way Peterson effectively shows the fast elevating water level in a more realistic way, especially in having the characters swim a lot more through the submerged air shafts. Less realistic is the way all the characters appear to swim at Olympian levels in their ability to forego oxygen for lengthy periods. But the set-up gets repetitive, and the only diversion, albeit a minor one, is figuring out which character will be killed next.As the alpha male, Josh Lucas cuts a reasonable action figure playing the Gene Hackman hero role though a more mercenary type given that his character is a professional gambler. Relegated to second lead, Kurt Russell seems to be inheriting Ernest Borgnine's role but not as a blowhard cop but as the sensitive former mayor of New York (huh?). They argue periodically about what path to take, but that's the only relationship that has any semblance to reality in the film. With no one as colorful as Shelley Winters or Stella Stevens this time, the rest of the actors barely register, including wide-eyed Emmy Rossum playing Russell's conflicted daughter and Jacinda Barrett as the brave mother of a predictably precocious son.The biggest waste is the normally colorful Richard Dreyfuss cast rather pathetically as a gay, suicidal architect who barely says a word once the action starts. The climax gets quite convoluted in its technicalities, and then it simply ends. There are nine minutes of end credits at the end listing the multitudes who worked on the special effects. The two-disc 2006 DVD is strictly for aficionados of this genre of film with several "making of" featurettes and a History Channel documentary which looks at the possibility of such waves wreaking such havoc. Surprisingly, there is little reference to the 1972 inspiration directed by Ronald Neame. And consequntly, there is barely enough to hold interest over the course of two discs. An unmemorable viewing experience overall
One Star For Violence--Five Stars For Heroism. I "enjoyed" viewing this film and seeing "the good guy" win. But, "there must be a better way" to resolve conflicts, "a better way" to punish bad guys,  "a better way to deal with evil" than just go out and kill everyone involved!  We live in a violent world with terrorists and suicide murderers and car bombings and killing our troops in Iraq and The Sunnis killing the Shiites and vice versa, etc..etc.   I always believe there MUST be "a better way" besides everyone killing the other guys.  So, that's what I have against this film.As for the film itself, I enjoyed the musical theme and the acting of Clint Eastwood and the acting of all the other members of the cast. It is a "good film" except for the violence.   And, yes, "the good guy" does win in the end---I'm happy about that!  And, I enjoyed the photography also.  So, yes, definitely SEE the film but as you do, could you possibly think of "a better way" for resovling issues rather than the violence depicted in this film?  Email:boland7214@aol
Fine film ruined by voice-overs on this DVD. A solid documentary with interesting new footage and invaluable testimony from participants in the battle and related events is ruined by loud voice-overs by poor actors. Both the narration and the voice-overs of interviewees are mediocre at best. If you are averse to dubbing of fictional films, you will understand that overdubbing of non-fictional work is particularly onerous. Clearly a decision was made to create a version that would be accessible to those averse to reading subtitles. But in the age of DVD it is fairly absurd not to include the original version of the film.
Package Deal 2!!!. WARNING!!! I do love the show and its well worth buying, but be sure you are buying this at the right price! It seems that Amazon has placed a price on the complete series set at $818.99 Well what any smart shopper will notice that seperatly five of the single season sets go for $55.99 and season three and four going for $62.99 These can all be purchased seperatly here on Amazon for these prices. Figuring this out in a calculator shows that by buying the seasons seperatly you will spend around $406. How nice of amazon to package the whole thing together for us then double the price!!! Be careful, there are several of these "package deals" on Amazon
Very old techniques. Unfortunately Mr. Gould is teaching tennis methods on this DVD that have been completely debunked over the past 5 years.  All the top tennis academies now teach the Oscar Wegner method of an open stance, not running with the racquet back, and moving naturally to the ball.  All professional tennis players also use the Wegner method and not the Gould method. I strongly discourage any parent from using this DVD to teach their children the modern game of tennis
SAME OLD TRANSFER. This DVD has new packaging but uses the same old non-anamorphic transfer and Dolby Digital Surround sound as the old version.  MGM needs to release an anamorphic version with 5.1 Dolby Digital!!
One of the weaker seasons of Buffy. I find Season 6 to be a somewhat tough one to get through, though I will grant that for many people, it is the best season of the series.From my end, the season shines in the episdoes "Once More With Feeling" and "Tabula Rasa," both of which demonstrate the sheer genius Joss Whedon is capable of, and additionally the often wonderful chemistry of the Buffy cast.Additionally, Season Six plays to several strong points - the ever gaining complexity of Xander's character, and the beginnings of Dawn maturing into a more adult-like person.However, the season begins to falter on several points.Some people may like the tortured redemption-seeking conflict that takes place within Spike.  I find that it often works, but occasionally gets somewhat ponderous ("We get it.  You want to bite people, but can't").  Additionally, while certain aspects of The Trio's hijinks are a needed comic relief, they fairly quickly lose their ability to hold one's interest and simply become an annoyance.Perhaps the season's greatest flaw is that it frequently plays to the actors' weaknesses.  Alyson Hannigan does not play junkie nor bad guy terribly effectively, and consequently Willow's development and conflicts in Season 6 don't feel terribly compelling.More problematic, Buffy's constant depression and self-pitying schtick becomes little more than petulant and irritating after a while.  As the season hinges around our identifying with Buffy's pain, confusion, and anger, it becomes hard to sustain our interest or sympathy after a few episodes.All-in-all, this is one of the weaker seasons.  While Season 5 is arguably weaker, one still has to wait until Season 7 for the return of a stronger Buffy season
Grating!. I must repeat what some of the reviewers have said about this film.  It is most unfortunate that a talented director Jules Dassin, Hollywood black list runaway, director of a very influential heist flick, Rififfi, should cast himself as the goofy American that wants to educate his real life wife, Melina Mercouri.  He is awkward in the role.Unfortunately, this saucy prostitute that Melina plays started to grate on me early on.  My parents talked of this movie when I was young and they thought it sexy in a 1950's way.  There's not much actual skin, as we know R rated films today.  There's tight fitting, long skirts that make the chunky babes look especially pear shaped.  There's a lot of haughty drinking of the ouzo and the Zorba dancing, but really, the premise of Ancient Greece corrupted in the symbol of this smiling whore to be reformed, Greece to be restored to greatness are so fuzzy, Dassin and Mercouri must have cooked it up in the Mediteranean sun.  Two bottles of ouzo and the investors fell in.  It just doesn't ring true.
How Many Times Can This Story Be Filmed?. YOU, ME AND DUPREE is a formula film, a template designed for teenage guys who feel the need for potty mouth, noisy, crude guy things movies.  There have been a lot of these films of late (all spinoffs of The Wedding Crasher image) and one wonders if there is a saturation point.Relating the story is rather pointless as it is a one-line joke (?).  Dupree (Owen Wilson playing Owen Wilson) is the best man at his buddy Matt Dillon's wedding to Kate Hudson (the You and Me) and subsequently moves in with them, causing all manner of mayhem and bad taste and faux pas and grim situations (think toilet problems etc).  And that is it.  Michael Douglas was brought in to play a flat role as Kate Hudson's father who objects to her marriage blah blah blah. Ask directors Anthony and Joe Russo for the rest.We know that Hudson, Dillon and Douglas have much better roles to offer (Wilson seems to have found his niche), and the only reason films like this keep getting made is because they make money (for some reason) at the box office.  The film is silly, tacky, tired and should only be rented if the shelves in the video store are otherwise empty...   Grady Harp, November 06
What's up Charlie Brown?. This was a wishy washy attempt at the truth. The facts are there in parts and pieces, but it was not really put together well. Some of the choices of material are questionable as being truly valuable to the topic. This DVD had an agenda and is not unbiased, and I think it failed at it's overall agenda. There is more than enough information pre-9/11 and post-9/11 to put together something more worthy and accurate than this DVD has attempted to do. If this is the best contrasting evidence to the bush administration that can be produced after all that has happened in the white house and beyond, we are truly in trouble. The truth is out there, and I think this DVD tripped over them and kept walking without looking down and gathering all the facts together. There were plenty of important facts and things said worth listening to on this DVD, but this DVD is maybe worth a glance, but not a long hard look.
Love Half Baked; Hated This DVD. If you already own "Half Baked," don't waste your money on the "Fully Baked Edition" DVD, because the extras are a huge waste of time -- the added comedy bits are so poor it's embarrassing, like something high school kids would produce.  The director commentary is also thoroughly uninteresting -- unless you wanted to play a smoking game with it -- take a hit every time she says "That was funny."  You'll get lifted in no time.  When you watch the deleted scenes, you'll say, "I see why they deleted that."  There's nothing of value here.Dave Chapelle had nothing to do with this edition -- he's not on the commentary track or in any of the bonus materials, nor are any other actors from the film.Don't be confused -- I LOVE LOVE LOVE Half Baked -- and I HATED the extras on this DVD.  Total waste of time and money, a big disappointment to Half Baked fans.Sampson gets me lifted
lost opportunity. I would love to have seen this subject handled by a more insightful and skilled filmmaker. It's regrettable that this tedious mess will be part of Ram Dass's legacy.
Bad DVD release. The series is brilliant. This DVD release is not. Both the original and the replacement that amazon sent me were defective. Scenes would skip, certain episodes would "stick" every few seconds, some episodes and special features wouldn't play at all and would just kick you back to the main menu, and disc 1 on both copies was completely unplayable. (I would get "cannot play disc" errors.)I was afraid that maybe my DVD player was being finicky, but then I bought the first-run, individually released seasons through amazon marketplace sellers and ebay. They play just fine, with no problems. I'm not sure what happened with this release and why there are so many glitches, but my recommendation is to find some copies of the originals and buy those. They're always some used copies floating around on amazon and ebay. Mine are used, and they play great.BTW, you get pretty much the exact same extras and features with the first-run releases, with the exception of maybe a couple of things, so you're not really missing a whole lot. Plus, the boxes are sturdier
I didn't like it.. Simply put, I didn't like it. Emma Thompson was too old to play a 19 year old. Not only did the movie leave out a/o change alot of what was written in the book the movie left out a/o changed the characters. So, once again I must say, I didn't like it..
Couldn't have destroyed the story worse... I suppose if you never read the book, you might think this movie is good... maybe even charming.  But having gone into the theatre with this as my favorite novel, I was so grossly disappointed I can't tell you.See, the book is about two people - Novalee and Willie Jack.  They head West together, until Willie Jack abandons her at a WalMart.  They part ways on more than one level - his life goes as low as a life can, and her life rises beautifully.  It's a study in contrasts, and it's done impeccably in the novel, with a plethora of complex characters to richen the journey... but it didn't translate because of Hollywood's froo-froo mentality.Hollywood cut Benny Goodluck - a main character in the novel - completely out and shaved Moses(another major character) down to a bit part while making Novalee's one-visit-mother a major player.  And they DESTROYED Forney... who is supposed to be eccentric, late-thirties genius, withdrawn and strange... they turned him into a twenty-something easy-going stud type with a crooked smile.  SO. NOT. FORNEY.  I never wanted to jump thru the screen and slap people so badly in my life.  That horrid.  And Lexie... she's supposed to be a size 22 with four kids and white-trash tendencies... and they put ASHLEY JUDD in the role.  Hello...?!?!  Does that picture at the top look like a size 22 with four kids and white trash tendencies to you? That's just the biggie complaints, too.Read the book, don't watch the movie.  You'll be amazed at how inept Hollywood was at telling this story
Fantasy, not to be confused with facts. This telplay is supposedly based on the possibility of an asteroid hitting the earth. That possibility is real, and many people take the issue seriously. One commercial film, Deep Impact, also included some real effort to "get it right". However, there is nothing in this film that relates to the real concern about asteroid impacts. This is pure fantasy and thus a turn-off to anyone who has thought seriously about this issue
I never received the video!. I read the statement: Will send in two to three business days. It's been almost one month. I never received the video.  I'm not happy
REINVENTING THE WHEEL. The flight into New York had been a long one; but I was gently revived when Kirsten Dunst met me at the airport.  She was to be my escort that night at the Lincoln Center where the President would present me the Distinguished Writer's Cross-the highest award this nation can bestow on an author.  I quickly slipped my only suitcase in the backseat and sat next to her as she drove her Mercedes S class sedan to the Waldorf Astoria downtown."I have to admit that I didn't you who you were until I read STARLESS GRASSLANDS.  I don't mean to embarrass you; but that book changed my life."I tried to be polite and gracious toward the compliment.  For the remainder of the trip we had a nice conversation while I approved the fluid motion of her hands and legs as she maneuvered the controls of the automobile.  I very much approved of her legs.As I departed the car, Kirsten leaned toward the open door to catch my eyes."Don't forget.  I'll be by at seven so we can go to the ceremony together.  Please be ready."I expressed gratitude for her generosity and promised to be waiting for her seven sharp.  The hotel staff greeted me and soon I entered the elevator for a quiet ride to the eighty sixth floor.  As I entered the suite, the steward took my request to have my suit blushed, prepared and returned in a few hours.Finally, a bit of peace.  I poured a small measure of whiskey into a chilled tumbler and then walked over to the large window looking out over the city below.  For a few moments I contemplated the remarks I was to make at this evening's formal ceremonies, then I heard the hushed movement of stocking feet behind me across the room.I turned around and out of the bedroom to my left in walked Sandy Bullock dressed in a black sheer see through cat suit."Well, Crabby, aren't you glad to see me?"Before I could recover from my surprise another set of feet wisped across the floor from the sitting room on the right.  It was Jennifer Aniston dressed in the same black sheet cat suit."Sweetheart, don't look at her.  Come here to me.""Get out!" screamed Sandy."No, you get out.  It's not fair.  I left Brad for him so I get him!"The two of them stood in angry silence staring at each other for a tense moment.  Then Sandy leapt at Jennifer and instantly they were in a bitter fight hissing and scratching each other.  It was a ferocious sight as pulled hair, shrieks of pain, and nylon tearing could be heard.  Then almost a quickly as it began, the fighting pair disappeared into the sitting room.  Several sharp punches were heard then a definite thump as a body fell to the floor.Sandy marched back into the room victorious.  I ran to the door of the sitting room only to see Jennifer laid out on the floor out cold, spread eagle and naked.  Before I could think of what to do Sandy tapped me on my shoulder.  I turned around and there Sandy stood.  A little worse for wear.  Trying to catch her breath.  Nude with her torn cat suit draped across her feet."Forget her.  She won't bother us now."Sandy brushed the stray hairs out of her face, smiled and stepped out of her nylon costume.  She posed standing and anticipating my admiration."Now I'm all sweaty and warm.  I need a shower."  Sandy turned her lithe body and walked into the bedroom and into the bathroom beyond.I turned around and wondered what I should do for poor Jennifer still laying unconscious on the floor.  Then I heard Sandy calling."Crabby, why don't you come and help me?  You could soap up my......"OOPS!!!!  Sorry!!!  Err...just a little fantasy of mine.  I meant to honestly review this movie but my more realistic nature took over.  I swear my pitiful fantasy is actually much better than the story told here.  You see, the cover of this DVD displays Ms. Bullock prominently with her name in big font letters.  But in truth this movie focuses on Tate Donovan as the main character and only on Ms. Bullock as his unlikely love interest.As much as I "love" Sandra Bullock, I have to admit her filmography has not been kind to her.  Her best films have been WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING, WRESTLING ERNEST HEMINGWAY and the much-unappreciated HOPE FLOATS.  Unfortunately for each of these gems are several terrible movies like FIRE ON THE AMAZON, HANGMAN, SPEED 2 and this movie.The plot revolves around two "losers in love" who are unappealing both in looks and personality.  Donovan comes across a love potion from a gypsy woman (an unrecognizable Anne Bancroft) and soon both Donovan and Bullock have the most desirable members of the opposite sex at their feet.  All goes well until others find out their secret and Donovan and Bullock discover that their true love is actually between each other.The story is predictable and unfortunately not very funny or all that sweet.  Chances are you can find a copy of this DVD fairly cheap and it is not a bad way to kill some time while you're waiting for your own boyfriend or girlfriend to get off work-or your friends to wake up from their naps-so you can really do something worth wild.
Worst Case of Sequel Gone Bad, I've Ever Seen. I recently rented both of these movies at the same time. Big mistake. Obviously, the sequel was never meant to be seen in the company of the original.how can a serious screenplay writer ever even think to end the 1st movie one way, and re-write the 2nd move to completely discount that 1st ending?Given the storyline and the writing of it, you can't blame the actors, but the writers.Brian Krause and the rest of the cast did a great job with what they had to work with; a badly written storyline with too much of the same thing as the original.There was not enough difference in it to make it worth watching.huge disappointment
He was fired from GM for calling off and showing up late. what a joke...people believe the stupidest things...do some research and you will see that this is a joke.  I hated it
ONE FOR THE DOGS. This direct to video release is another one of those rich people who die and leave their fortunes to the family pet and one of the relatives decides to kidnap the dog and demand a ransom and/or get ownership by making the kindhearted guardian look irresponsible.  It's been done a lot of times and this is not one of the more successful attempts.Dean Cain doesn't look comfortable in his role as a bespectacled nerdish kind of guy; Dean needs to stay in action movies where his good looks and physique are better utilized.  Tim Curry and Jennifer Tilly chew up the scenery shamelessly and although they're fun for a while, their shenanigans become redundant and overused.  Bailey is a pretty dog and the kids are insufferably cute, but the movie is really rather boring.  For younger kids only
VERY disappointing. I love Sesame Street and I love watching it with my 16 month old daughter.  However, I found this video to be a major let down.  The people are so annoying.  I found the flashing lights (used to make it look like American Bandstand) distracting.  I can't imagine that they were good for my little one's eyes.  Fortunately I rented this one from Netflix before buying.  If you want a dance along Sesame video, try Zoe's Dance Moves
this one deserves a big fat zero. this has got to be one of the WORST, most unrealistic movies to date. i never have high expectations for lesbian flicks--rarely are they done well. this one, however, takes it to a whole new level. what was courtney love thinking?!you'll regret wasting your money on this. i can't even fathom why it's gotten decent reviews so far
Simplistic. This is a poor performance, poorly written and produced for a youthful audience. It is not adult fare
Entertaining but not authoritative. The two stars are for the entertainment value of this series. There's no doubt that Penn and Teller can put on a show. However, this series proves very little. They employ the same techniques they blast as B.S. to make their points: questionable "experts", misdirection, and even petty name calling. I have no doubt that most of the things they investigate really are B.S., but to say that Penn and Teller "prove" them wrong is stretching it. If you want to have a good laugh and see some wonderfully pathetic examples of human gullibility, watch this series. If you want to see well thought-out, unbiased skepticism, this isn't it.
Avoid like the plaugue. During the late 1980's and 1990's,The Looney Tunes stayed a float thanks to the brillant writing and direction of Terry Lennon and Greg Ford.That era came to a screeching end with "Space Jam". The only thing funny about this movie is it's laughable plot,why on god's green earth whould the Looney Tunes need Micheal Jordan's help? Most of them are clever enough to fight any sort of enemy on there own, well at least they normaly are. This film made them all look like a collection idiots,the only one that didn't look stupid was Bugs Bunny. Now I know that not all the LT gang was ever as smart or clever as Bugs,but put them all together nad they can all handle themselves.I think the biggest hit was Lola Bunny,who is simply not funny or interesting at all.I suppose she was created just to statisfy the P.C. police. The laughs in the film are few and far in-between. There was one moment during the basket ball game were the Looney Tunes gang actually corporated and were actually funny and in character,but that ended mighty quickly.Avoid this movie like the plaugue.
SPARE ME THIS CRAPPY GARBEAGE!. I repeat, the original had no room for a sequel. What a waste of film and talent. This stuff is worthless. Enough said
All censored. I have some Surrender Cinema stuff and they are really good softcore. But, this DVD is not. It's completely censored, if you buy it, you're gonna miss all the good parts. It lasts only 70+min when it's supposed to last 90. Don't buy this unless you get a really uncut version
not for the easily offended, the squeamish or horse lovers. This review is for the Criterion Collection DVD edition of the film."Matresse" or "Mistress" in my opinion, is one of the worst three films to be released on the Criterion Collection. The only reason I watched and reviewed it is because it was released by Criterion. The film contains very explicit depictions of sadomasochistic activity some of which involve nailing body parts to blocks of wood. There is also a graphic scene of a horse being slaughtered for meat as well as numerous scenes of people eating horsemeat that horse lovers may be highly offended by. It got an X-rating by the MPAA and was banned in many parts of the US.The film is about a woman who secretly operates a sex dungeon in her basement. When her apartment is broken into, the burglar falls in love with her.The only special feature on the DVD is an interview with the film's director, Barbet Schroeder
help. I was trying to watch it, but can not open de DVD because it is the wrong country code????
Strawberry Shortcake. I was very dissappointed with this movie.  The animation was stone-age and it had characters in it that have not been introduced to this new generation of Strawberry Shortcake lovers.  If I had know what I was purchasing I never would have spent the money
Could have been much better. I enjoyed the "Open Water", but this sequel fell flat.  It's really a shame, because the film makers had all the right elements in place to create a really good film.  The title should have been, "Open Water 2: Wasted Potential".The characters were interesting until their IQs were reduced during the film.  The concept of the film was great:  6 people may die in spite of being able to touch their muli-million dollar yacht.  Safety is inches away, yet they cannot reach it.  Wow, that really had my interest.Some reviewers said it was a good movie if you can just overlook the stupidity of the characters.  That is probably very true.  Unfortunately, I just couldn't do that.  Every time they had a chance, they did something stupid.  Often, all 6 let something stupid happen without even one speaking up.  I watched 100% of the film, just to see what happened, but I was completely disappointed with the film.It wasn't terrible, just very weak
Femme Fatales or Very Lame?. Terrible direction, terrible writing, it almost feels like the director didn't know what he was working with. Although this movie wanted to be in the same race and quality of the movie CLUE, it fails to realize that the plot and characters are incredibly riculous and not funny ha ha but funny stupid. It was a total watse of good celluloid
"Art" from another pretentious Yale grad with no connection to reality... This review is for Cremaster 4 & 5, although I can't imagine that 3 would be any better...  Cremaster 4 (and 5) might have been tolerable if the running time had been cut in half.  Let's just say that this "film" wore out it's welcome very quickly.  All one has to do is watch the "trailer" on Barney's website to get the point.  There is art, and then there is crap.  Cremaster is pure, unfiltered garbage.  References to human reproduction (genitals, sperm and ovum) aside - this non-feast for the eyes was pompous, annoying, and the intentional grossness is demonstrated through the use of excessive slime, Vaseline, and globs of mucous encased gonads.  Cremaster 5 has a higher production value, but is equally uninteresting, laborious, and tiresome.  I can appreciate the absurdity behind the work of artists such as Damien Hirst - the dark humor and wit, a connection to substance abuse and death - the darker side of life that many can relate to and others can appreciate.  Barney makes a living out of creating "art" that seemingly has no connection to anything of value.  A pretentious load of bull.  But then again, he did go to Yale
Pointless remake!. New Rule For Hollywood= If you can't do something new with it, quit remaking older movies. Without Gregory Peck and Lee Remick this loses most of the power the original had. Other than Mia Farrow's stunning turn as the nanny this is one big waste of time to me. I know others may like it and if you do that's cool, I just can't recommend it
Lousy follow-up. This is pitiful. How do you maximize profit? Easy, minimize quality on every level and capitalize on the brand name. In other words, raise expectations through the roof with a superior detective series and use this momentum to sell an inferior follow-up series under the same name.Ghost in the Shell 2nd Gig says "Cheap" from the opening credit montage to the bare bone ending credits. The colors, unlike the first season's which were deep and juicy, are dry and monochromatic at times. The inventive little things that embellished the high-tech philosophy and look of the first series are completely lost on this one which seems less specific and more abstract. Even the presentation shouts "economy". The first season's packaging included a booklet, this one, nothing. Oh, I forgot to add that the art for both boxes look thrown together. And let's not forget the animation. There are a lot of clever things being verbalized but by it being called "animation" I don't expect to sit through ten minutes of dialogue to see something, anything move. Another clever little trick to save money.The look of the characters, from Batou to Kusanagi have been altered considerably. Kusanagi's eyes are bigger and her body seems shorter and less voluptuous. Batou's arms are shorter. The lean, chiseled features of Aramaki which made him appear old and wise are now younger and fuller. The mecha and weapons in this series are also vague. The individual eleven are not as interesting as the laughing man plot of the first season's series.I had high hopes for this series. There was a lot of thought and creativity behind the first season of GITS. It was better, in my opinion, than Samurai Champloo (though not as popular). I still believe that as this current storyline spins out that it will be better than most of the series out there. Unfortunately, this one will not even come close to the first season and this will probably be the last season for this franchise. Too bad.
Another MIRAMAX "Hack Job"! (Don't Say You Weren't Warned). *[[IMPORTANT NOTE!: Amazon has regretably been combining ''ALL'' of the reviews of the two different films mentioned in this review-- "THE LEGEND OF ZU" and "ZU WARRIORS" --into one lump group of reviews (extremely confusing & annoying!). So please be aware -- If you are reading this review on the "THE LEGEND OF ZU" ("China Star") import DVD page, that this is a review of the ("Miramax") 'Region-1' DVD, "ZU WARRIORS" and that this review does not apply to the import DVD.]]*It should come as no great surprise that MIRAMAX is in the habit of destroying decent films -- (they have routinely overstepped their bounds of reasoning ever since the company was bought out by DISNEY all those many years ago). Add THIS movie to that long list!"ZU WARRIORS" is a "hack & attack" piece of "re-editing" of the ORIGINAL Hong Kong version of this film, "THE LEGEND OF ZU" (which is the official English "dual title" to its original Cantonese title, "SUK SAAN CHUEN" (trans.: "Zu Mountain Legend").Not only did the "brains" at "DISNAMAX" needlessly change the title, but they went so far as to change it in such a way that would allow it to become easily confused with an earlier Tsui Hark movie about the "Zu" legend called, "ZU: WARRIORS OF THE MAGIC MOUNTAIN" (dual Cantonese title, "SUK SAAN: SUN SUK SAAN GEEN HAP" - trans.: "Zu Mountain: New Zu Mountain Sword Heroes") -- a couple of unfortunate examples of just how much damage this "name change" caused can be readily discerned from the Amazon "customer reviews" of this film by "Mojo Jojo" from Dallas and the reviewer calling him/herself "Bumbo clot," both of whom clearly having never seen this film but are very familiar with that earlier film: so as a result they both attribute things related to that earlier movie over to this one -- things which have no relevance to this newer film whatsoever; "Bumbo" even going so far as to apply that first movie's original titles to this one! (Sorry "Jojo" and "Bumbo," but it was not my intention to pick on you, but merely to show just how easily "Disney/Miramax" set everyone up to be so effortlessly misled -- it was THEIR fault for changing the title in the way they did, NOT your fault for being caught off guard because of it! That's the only point I'm trying to make by using your reviews as examples, and I only picked yours to highlight simply because they were the first of however-many that are likely to follow that were posted.)In addition to this, if there is one thing I have learned about American film distributors, it is that whenever they change the title of a "foreign" film-- ESPECIALLY one from Asia --you can reasonably expect that they have changed other more IMPORTANT things about the actual content of the movie itself. And, sure enough....This "hack job" version of "The Legend of Zu" was so bad that it had been left sitting on the distributors' shelves for several years after they had "test screened" it on at least one occasion (some sources say a couple of them) and found itself being booed right off of the court. No $#!T, Sherlock??? What did those geniuses at DISNAMAX honestly expect would be the audiences' reaction??? Rather than showing their test audiences the movie in its original 'unadulterated' form (then editing afterwards, if necessary), they instead insisted on showing their audience a version of the movie in which they had stripped out around 20 minutes worth of celluloid (from a movie that the larger number of viewers already find confusing enough as it is). They had also covered over the original actors' own voices with a "dubbed" English track (rarely a good idea for Asian movies). Then to top it all off (as if all that were not bad enough), they proceeded to engage in the same kind of sneaky and sleazy "false marketing" tactics that American film distributors have of late become unashamedly guilty of when marketing lesser-known Asian films to American audiences -- by "giving credit" where such credit is NOT DUE (for instance, such as when "BANGKOK HAUNTED" ["Pee Sam Baht" - trans.: "Three-Baht Ghost"] was credited as having been directed by "Oxide and Danny Pang" [the brothers who co-directed "THE EYE"] when, in truth, ONLY a single 'vignette' of the entire movie had been directed by "OXIDE" Pang alone): In the case of "ZU WARRIORS," the transgression comes in the form of an announcement or "implication" that the very lovely & popular ZHANG ZIYI is the "STAR" of this movie, when, in fact, hers is a very MINOR (almost peripheral) role!If you don't mind having your intelligence insulted by DISNAMAX, then go right ahead and waste $21 bucks on this diced & shreaded bastardization -- Lord knows you could just as easily waste it on something much worse! But if you are at all like me-- or like those 'test audience' members who PANNED this remolded abomination --and you really want to see this movie for what it was MEANT to be, your options are to find a "region-compatible" official release DVD from the Asian market, or snatching up any one of the many "all-region" pirate DVDs on eBay, or tracking down a VCD version -- all of which, in either case, will cost you CONSIDERABLY LESS MONEY than what Disney/Miramax is expecting you to shell out for their "Region-1" 'shicken-chit'.
Am I missing something?. I can't believe how many people think this movie is a masterpiece. I had such high expectations of it and was extremely disappointed. When the film began I was interested for about 20 minutes, but then as it went on I started to have doubts. After a while I was debating whether or not to turn it off, but towards the end I decided to leave it on just to see how bad it was actually going to get. And it really did get bad! The ending was so predictible and hackneyed. It was just another crappy cops and robbers story, but with a high budget and an all-star cast
awful. worst opening sequence of a movie ever conceived..you kill off a female character in the first 10 minutes...and she didn't even do anything to deserve it?! The only way to do this movie justice would be to parody...oops, been there done that
Tasteless humor. If you rather bypass lackluster comedies along the line of Adam Sandler's "Water Boy" and Chris Farley's "Almost Heroes," then do not waste your time watching "Rocketman.""Rocketman" has comedian Harland Williams as Fred Randall who can land a NASA team on planet Mars. Randall does not appear as your typical rocket scientist. His personality resembles Dennis the Menace, always poking his nose in places he does not belong. We are expected to laugh at this misbehavior, but the tasteless humor is nothing we haven't seen before and the outcome of every incident is easily predictable. Except for one scene when clumsy Randall loses the American flag down in a canyon. He then pulls out his USA boxer shorts to mark the territory that carryover live on national television.The site of Mars looks adequate to its dull counterpart. Only sand occupies the orange planet. In contrast, it'd have been interesting had Mars inhabit alien life form shown in "Ghosts of Mars" or "Total Recall."William Sadler as commander Overbeck is more like Randall's baby sitter. Every stupid question Randall has to say gets turned down. It's not funny when a grown man imitates a child by saying, "Are we there yet?" They never get along with each other-Overbeck takes NASA seriously whereas Randall is a complete nutcase.Jessica Lundy as Julie Ford is surely adorn by male hormones. Her wholehearted blue eyes and fireball red hair unquestionably makes her the real star in this comedy, although the chimpanzee came close at second.Not a memorable comedy for adults to watch. Children should enjoy the outdated comedy because to them its humor will be fresh.
A TRUE LOSS OF FAITH. Faith Hathaway had just graduated High School and was one week away from going into the army.  She was full of hope and life.  Robert Willie( the man this movie was based on), along with his accomplice raped and murdered her.  She was raped, stabbed 17 times, and raped after she died.   The director of this movie denied requests made by Faith's mother, and gave all the attention to the only person who deserved to die.  Where was the mercy for Faith?  Where was the compassion for Faith?  Where were the people protesting for Faith's life?  Finally where was the story about the mercy which was denied to Faith?  What about her suffering and that of her family?  Barely a foot note in this movie.  Ohh and Sister Prejean has been discovered to lie when it suits her case.
Total nonsense. "The spy who loved me" is the oddest of Ian Fleming's Bond novels. It is basically the slightly risqu (for the time) story of the sexual awakening of a girl, Vivienne Michel (the story is told through her eyes and Fleming even credits her with co-authorship of the book). James Bond? He turns up about half-way through the book to rescue her from a couple of baddies at a motel in which she is working and share his, er, experience of life with her.So, what has this to do with this film? They have in common the title and a character called James Bond; there all resemblance ends. In this regard, it's a bit like the Fleming Bond short story "Octopussy", which shares the same fate.The film has thus to stand on its own merits, of which there are precisely none. This is the most appalling hokum, silly story, woodenly acted by Roger Moore (who did once have the honesty to say that his acting talents went all the way from A very nearly to B) and others. Now I know that the Bond films are not really meant to be nerve-tingling thrillers, because you know that our hero and his panoply of ever more absurd gadgets is indestructible and equal to anything, but are more droll comedies with miscellaneous stunts and explosions thrown in, but I didn't find this one funny at all. (Makes solemn resolution never again to watch any more Bonds in which Roger Moore appears).
Pointless film!. When you decide to adapt a classic film you should take warning several aspects: Has the story aged? How has the suspense's concept altered for the new audiences?We know about the professed sympathy of Cimino for Rourke. We saw him in The year of the Dragon. And somehow Mickey doesn't look credible as the distorted mind criminal. He is too rational and cold to represent that hard character. The illumination is another serious problem. The whole drama looks extremely theatrical: Anthony Hopkins looks uncomfortable with the role and Mimi Rogers is inexpressive. Elias Koteas is simply out of context and perhaps that's why the insipid dialogue. Maybe David Morse shows certain wild tendency. There is a rigidity in the dialogue. Obviously you assist to the common places: the internal disagreements in the policy procedure. Lindsay Cruise is assertive in this role. But the initial sequence of the getaway is terrific. It looks too artificial and the viewer' adrenaline simply is not emanated. The sumptuous photography saves the film of the collapse. The music didn't help to maintain the suspense. It is not easy to readapt a classic film of the fifties. Something similar happened with Cape fear `s remake.The question might be around the new approach of the suspense and the new technologies. Bogart looked extremely old for the role and Rourke looked too elegant to be a convincing ex con.Good entertainment for teenagers in a pop corn rainy weekend.
War and Boredom. King Vidor's rather contrived adaptation of Tolstoy's epic riddled with miscast actors, a boring script, and a hurried screenplay.  In short, another one of those 50-year old films that have outlived their audience to slowly sink into Hollywood's vaults of oblivion.The story follows the main characters of Tolstoy's novel such as Natasha (Audrey Hepburn), Prince Andrei (Mel Ferrer), and Pierre (Henry Fonda.)  The film is too short for the novel and the acting stinks: particularly that of Henry Fonda as Pierre.  Henry Fonda is as stiff as fossilized wood in this film; his pondering stare and preaching voice reminds me of a bad Charleton Heston film.  As far as the battle scenes so greatly praised by the main reviewer, they are as sparse as they are realistic.  All of the costumes and props in this film are horribly fake.In short, the only thing that remains impressive about this film is the fact that Hollywood bothered to put it on DVD.  Apart from that, the acting is as worthless as the contrived screenplay and shallow dialogue.  Don't buy this film
Missing scenes. The DVD is missing some of the scenes that are in the TV version. There are no deleted scenes either. Where did the scenes go and why? I expected the DVD to have more, not less than the TV version
News flash: families are messed up. Who cares?My wife and I sat through disk one, and were done with the series. We just didn't care. The only thing that was really interesting were the comedy commercials for various funerial gear in the first episode. After that, they disappeared. What's the point of taking the best part of the show and removing it?So we really need another soap opera? Seems the only marginally original aspect to this one is that one brother is in the closet, even though very few people seem to be fooled--and any that are, are also terminally clueless. Ok, the show is set arround a funeral home. Slightly different, but they don't really make it all that interesting either.The petty squabbles and such really don't do anything for us. Don't know why the show ever built up any acclaim, because there's nothing in the first 3 episodes that makes me want to watch any more
Both sci-fi groups might have a "meeting of the minds" here!. Back in the late 60's there were two camps of thought in regards to two shows: those that favored "Lost in Space" and those that favored "Star Trek".  My sister belonged to the latter and I, the former.But enough about familial disagreement.Though I would've preferred that the entire third season had been presented intact in one set (thus, the reduction of two stars), there are some recommendations that can be made for the purchase of this set.It's coincidental that the second half of "Lost in Space" has some stories that have a casting connection with installments from the first season of "Trek".  "The Flaming Planet" features character actor Abraham Sofaer who appeared in the "Charlie X" episode of "Trek" as a one of the members of the mutant's race.  The infamous "The Great Vegetable Rebellion" guest stars Stanley Adams, an actor that will forever be engrained in the collective consciousness of "Trek" fans as "Cyrano Jones" of the classic "The Trouble With Tribbles" episode.Though much maligned by fans and critics alike, "The Great Vegetable Rebellion" boasts one of the series best non-John Williams' scores, music by Joseph Mullendore.Also, two of the remaining episodes are quite good and elevate the bar somewhat for the campy series.  "Target: Earth" is probably the closest the show in its later years came to "serious" drama, even with the over-the-top theatrics of Jonathan Harris.  The show made a simplistic commentary about the desire to express one's individuality - a theme that was on the minds of every "flower child" of the day.  Thus, like "The Promised Planet" episode, this installment was a reflection of the times.Who said LiS had no redeeming social value???Another bit of trivia involves "The Time Merchant" episode.  Guest star John Crawford appeared, at some time or another, in most of producer Irwin Allen's productions, including the theatrical films "The Poseidon Adventure" and "The Towering Inferno".Arte Johnson, who would later be part of the comedic ensemble that made up TV's "Laugh-In", is featured in "Princess of Space," along with Mrs. Irwin Allen herself, Sheila Matthews.  Matthews had also appeared in the second season episode, "Space Vikings."And the future "Sgt. Phil Esterhaus" of "Hill Street Blues", veteran heavy Michael Conrad, appears in pre-Planet of the Apes-inspired makeup in "Fugitives in Space".  Coincidentally, Conrad's future co-star, Daniel J. Travanti, appeared in an earlier LiS season three episode, "Collision of the Planets"...as a space hippy, no less.Therefore, six of the nine episodes in this collection have something going for them and make it a worthy addition to a sci-fi/fantasy/Irwin Allen/television history fan!It's still too bad that Twentieth Century Fox skimps on the extras that we DVD buyers expect, causing the disc to lose its third star.'Too bad the four-star series was shackled with a two-star package
Origins, the DVD experience. The book version of "Origins", which I think Scientific American or maybe The Economist rightfully recommended as THE essential general science book for 2005 is the next step from David Bodanis's equally splendid e=MC2.  And because it's one step up, it's just a tad harder, especially if you're also an economist/accountant/car dealer who'd really like to understand quantum mechanics (and maybe basic string theory and how it's possible to cope with dimensions beyond the currently now unfashionable four) but skipped science at school and uni.For this particular (nano scale) niche market, the DVD was a big disappointment because it didn't even hint at the exitance or relevance of the reeeealy interesting bits like anti-matter, dark energy & matter and the current inability of anyone to reconcile Alberts General Theory with the sub atomic or even why it matters.However, all's not lost as the really smart 10 year old (not mine) who watched section 2; part 1 with me was totally enthralled as I imagine any one of any age who hadn't thought about or encountered astrophysics before would be.So the questions are;was it OK or better?  YESdo I want my money back?  NOwill I watch it again?  YESwould I lend to anyone?  only with a cash deposit upfrontwould I recommend it?  ABSOLUTELYwill it drive the creationists into an early demise?  ABSOLUTELY!'nuf said.
Seems like a forgettable made for TV movie. This is not a horror movie, more like a police drama with some graphic images.  The police receive an email invitation to play online poker from some loony who calls himself The Card Player.  The wager in this game is a girl he's kidnapped.  Cops win and she goes free, they loose and she dies.  Naturally to create some excitement the killer starts going for the police.  Yawn.Good for a few chuckles (especially the music in the  grand finale), but for the most part boring.  My favorite scene is when some cops are looking at a map of the United States but Atlanta is located in Arkansas and Dallas is way over by El Paso
bummer. How can I review the movie "Second Chorus" when I have never received it
Fact is stranger than Fiction. I am a fan of historical fiction, and this has to be one of the most historically inaccurate films I have ever seen! What bothers me the most is that the general public, who hasn't read the Tudor biographies like some of us have, will believe this stuff because it is their only exposure to the subject! I won't go into all the inaccuracies since other reviewers have already touched on them. Why tamper with history, when it was actually more fascinating than what was portrayed in this movie.
Texasville vs The Last Picture Show. What excites one about Texasville is that it has been made by essentially the same team as made The Last Picture Show. The surprise then is that almost nobody seems to be aware of the previous film, though, in the case of the performers, they were in it, and though, and most damning, in the case of the director, he made it.  Perhaps there is no way to follow up or catch up with these characters.  MacMurtry has a better and more honest chance at it because it is only on the page. The first thing one notes is that Texasville is not shot in black and white as The Last Picture Show was. To do so would be a mistake; color was "too pretty" for the original, but these sequel needs to be pretty. Less glum, less oppressed, but therefore less than... The hyper realism of The Last Picture Show is replaced by a not completely light hearted series of set pieces.  We're looking at a comedy-romance this second time around.  And on its own terms, it might be all right.  The problem is the two movies do not present the same the world, not even a world where twenty years have passed.  Texasville is full of contrivances, from Junior roping the oil well to the kids starting an egg war. There was no such contrivance in The Last Picture Show.  Though both films have wonderful performers, Texasville is marred by its children performers, especially the twins, who are acting cute for the camera, and Jimmy Howell, who plays Duane's son, is fairly awful and impossible to believe as someone that the girls just fall all over ("one in a million").  His heroics contrast sharply with the realistic vision offered by The Last Picture Show in which none of the boys were really heroes; they didn't win football games; they didn't really get all the girls; they were bumbling around.  Only one of them still bumbles and only his story suggests the heavy sadness that hangs over the original, and that is Sonny.   It's worth noting that Cybil Shepard has not aged well; she looks good, but not when you remember her from The Last Picture Show and Taxi Driver, when she was terribly beautiful.
love lost in space. always loved lost in space now i can watch it anytime i want t
since when did wesley and woody become lovers?. take 2 ugly men and toss in an overhyped horrible singer/actress and youve got another razzie.minus j-lo and this might have been a 2 star movie
Add one star if you haven't seen "ROCK Around the Clock". "Twist Around the Clock" (1961) was hurriedly made to capitalize on the new dance craze, the Twist. Columbia was in such a hurry to cash in that producer Sam Katzman simply took the script of the 1956 smash hit "Rock Around the Clock" and refilmed it almost verbatim. Most of the storyline and many entire dialogue sequences are lifted bodily from the older film. If you know "Rock Around the Clock," you'll find yourself reciting "Twist Around the Clock.""Twist Around the Clock" is pretty low-voltage, despite guest-star turns by Dion (who lip-synchs "Runaround Sue," "The Wanderer," and "The Majestic"), The Marcels (not shown to best advantage with a mediocre rendition of "Merry Twist-mas"), Vicki Spencer (a Connie Francis wanna-be), and top-billed Twistmaster Chubby Checker. Chubby only has a few lines of dialogue but he is quite ingratiating in his limited role; his fans will be disappointed that he doesn't show up until the middle of the movie, and he doesn't sing his record hits "The Twist" or "Let's Twist Again." The plotline is handled by uninspired unknowns; John Cronin and Mary Mitchell do not distinguish themselves as the romantic leads, although Alvy Moore of "Green Acres" gets a chuckle or two in a deadpan comedy-relief role.If you have to choose between the "Twist Around the Clock" and "Rock Around the Clock" DVDs, "Rock Around the Clock" is easily your better bet. "Twist Around the Clock" fares badly on all counts: the music is monotonous (not one of the "twist" numbers is memorable), the story portions between numbers are leaden, and the predictability of the whole enterprise will have you reaching for the fast-forward button. All this has going for it is an archaeological value: curious viewers can observe the Twist phenomenon in its original context, and film buffs can see for themselves just how much was stolen from an older and better movie.
Pure utter crap. Blue Underground have done it again. They've dredged up old bootleg footage and are selling this as an "x-rated version." Quality is junk. I will never buy a Blue Undergound DVD and would warn others not to. The inserted footage is merely that inserted. I think the inserted footage came from a fifth generation bootleg VHS. This film is junk. I also am really shocked at amazon carrying porn, and also I think Blue Undergound are actually breaking the law because this film is sold in all 50 states. There are many communities, locales, areas and states where adult material is specifically prohibited by law. Even if this is 35 year old porn - it is still porn. It would be great to see Blue Underground busted for selling this smut -- because they have done a really rotten botched job and are outright liars in deceiving us
Not remotely as good as the book!. I might have enjoyed this movie more if they hadn't gutted the book, which was a pretty good read. The best character in the book, FBI Special Agent Pendergast, isn't even in the movie, and New York City police Lt. D'Agosta is just a comic caricature of the book's character.Another criticism of the movie is that almost every scene is so dark you can hardly see anything. If the purpose was to create a moody, scary atmosphere, they went way too far.See if you must, but don't expect too much
Craven Hits Rock Bottom. There certain names in the film industry that just get hyped beyond reason, and sometimes I just don't understand why. Wes Craven is probably the perfect example of this. "A Nightmare On Elm Street" was lame and "The Last House On The Left" was weak and ridiculously poorly made. But "The People Under The Stairs" just took Craven to a new level of putrid, wretched tripe.Now don't start rolling your eyes and saying "Oh god, another horror-hating elitist.", I am a huge fan of the genre. But Craven's films are just plain awful, especially this one.The story is about a young African-American boy who lives in the ghetto with his large family and ill mother. They have insurmountable money problems and their apartment is being foreclosed on by greedy landlords who want to tear it down and erect an office building. The boy's older sister has a thieving, jive-talking boyfriend who tells the boy that he knows where the landlords live and that they have a stock-pile of a golden coins that will solve all of their money problems several times over. But what makes the boy nervous is the fact that the landlords are the people everyone in the neighborhood considers crazy, and their house is the one children cross the street to stay away from. Once inside, the boy encounters unspeakable horrors as the psychotic landlords try to track him down and keep him away from their sheltered, untouched daughter.The film is bursting at the seams with racial stereotypes, horror clichs, poor acting, atrocious writing, and every form of inane stupidity you can imagine. The overly cheap score doesn't really help either.If you're looking to get into horror films, stay hell the away from Wes Craven and stick to someone who knows what they're doing, like George A. Romero or Lucio Fulci. If you're looking for a fun adventure film, check out something like "The Goonies" or "Raiders of the Lost Ark". Just make sure you avoid this heap of garbage at all costs..5/1
Boothill Disappointment. Buyer beware. The Boothill DVD in this collection was cracked! So I guess we'll go with...the product quality stinks
One of the worst films of all time. This film has some of the worst acting ever filmed by a major studio with a major star like William Holden. He is not the real problem, butNancy Kwan and the others, and the director, Richard Quine, who would go on to direct Paris When It Sizzles with Audrey Hepburn and Holden, are. (Paris When it Sizzles, with that cast..Audrey's first major flop, and it was witheld from release for years). But here in this film,  even Holden cannot act his way through this mess, and the story is so childish at best, from a watered down play that had France Nuyen in the lead..what happened there?Nancy Kwan in her love scenes, or when she finds out about her child, or when Holden finds out she is a prostitute...these scenes are excruciating. It is all unintentionally hilarious, but not enough to warrant purchase. And the ending..it all sort of stops, as if they had run out of film, which may be the truth. Avoid, and buy The Counterfeit Traitor wh. Holden made around this same period for Paramount
Yawn!. The obvious attitude of the producers of this mess was clearly one of superiority.  I mean, &quot;After all, we're shooting in IMAX 3D instead of the nefarious over/under format!&quot;  Well, whoopdeedoo!  I'll take THE BUBBLE, METALSTORM, or AMITYVILLE 3D any day over this.  There is some nice computer graphics work here, but there's really no story to speak of.  And their so-called &quot;history of 3D presentation&quot; is superficial at best.  While surely impressive in Imax, ENCOUNTER looks stupid on your TV screen 'cause everything is covered in a long shot or a medium long shot.  Yes, that may work on the giant behemoth Imax screen, but reduce it in size to your TV (even my big 36-inch JVC) and it's pretty unimpressive.  Not only that, but if you're watching it in alternating-field 3D with liquid crystal glasses, then you're watching it in half the normal resolution you normally see on your NTSC screen -- so there's next to NO picture detail.  If you want a good 3D DVD movie, search the web for one of the alternating field DVD's of something like IT CAME FROM OUTER SPACE, HOUSE OF WAX, or DIAL M FOR MURDER (sadly only available in 3D via pirated editions because the US distributors don't care enough to bother -- so were only left with legit DVD's of crap like ENCOUNTERS and amatuer videos of murderous clowns on the rampage).  I would have given this two stars because it features (very briefly) Cassandra &quot;Elvira&quot; Peterson -- BUT THEY COVERED HER ONLY IN LONG SHOT TOO!  They were REALLY stooopid, so they get one star.  Boo
waggy mcwaggster. Man! this movie is soooooo boring. I literally slept through this movie. If I die not having watched it again ill be happy.   i dont even know what its about cuz i watched it when i was like 5 yrs. old, but i dont care cuz just thinkin bout it makes me wanna cr
Very Poor Quality DVD. Love the movie, but the quality of the DVD put out by Alpha Video was so bad it was very difficult to watch. The sound was scratchy and muffled and the picture looked as if the brightness was turned all the way up. If you don't want to be disappointed and feel like you've been ripped off, wait for the remastered cut before you buy this one
not quite as enthralling as I had hoped... Granted, I should have seen this coming, having read Louisa May Alcott's predictable preteen novel before buying the film version. I guess I was hoping that the movie would fix up all the flat characterizations and narrow plotlines I had lamented while reading Alcott's early piece. Alas, I put too much faith in cinema. The movie did absolutely nothing to improve upon the book. The main female character is far too demure and morally perfect to connect in any real way with her audience (which actually seems to sell more books than I would think, as per Janette Oke) and the female antagonist is villified to the extent that she no longer seems human. The male love-interest is the traditional tall, dark, handsome, and vacuous one who, though faithful to his love, lacks any sort of purpose outside of wooing her.Overarching these characterization flaws is a general lack of cinematographic care that relegates this movie to the "made-for-TV" genre, which, though not dominated solely by poor films, is not known for its quality. To me, it was much like watching a Lifetime movie: predictable, entertaining for lack of an alternative, and not terribly significant.Don't read me incorrectly. This movie is great for anyone who is just plain bored. If you don't enjoy actually watching the movie, you will probably enjoy laughing incredulously as each character delivers horrible lines. Hey, it's only 6 bucks, anyway. Why not buy it and see for yourself? It's what I did, and just because I was disappointed doesn't mean you have to be
Sub-par issue of Excellent series. The Decalogue is one of several excellent TV series by European directors that puts US TV to shame. Like Bergman's "Scenes from a Marriage" & "Fanny & Alexander," von Trier's "The Kingdom," Fassbinder's "Berlin Alexanderplatz," Kusturica's "Underground," and Petersen's "Das Boot," The Decalogue was initially conceived as a series on television and eventually brought to US viewers' attention on the large screen via a limited art house run. Unlike these other series, Kieslowski's was conceived as ten separate stories that were only tied together by the fact that the stories all involved people in the same housing block (and characters from one episode may pop up in another).  The stories of The Dekalog are morality plays, but they are not re-enactments of The Ten Commandments, but rather inspired by them, and ultimately it is left to the viewer to decide the connection between the two.  Kieslowski & Piesiewicz wrote the ten screenplays and decided to do the 10 stories themselves (instead of contracting 10 of Poland's best up & coming director's to do each, as was initially planned), and instead hired a different cinematographer for each of the stories.  I won't comment on the content of the stories as many have already done so, and I feel that that would minimizes the impact of the experience of watching them, so I will comment on Kieslowski's style. Kieslowski has stated that his intent is to highlight personal consequences of a dramatic nature.  His films often tackle issues of political import, however he intentionally avoids making "issue films," but rather focuses on the personal consequences of those affected, as he feels that politics solves nothing & that films do not really change the political culture. His views on film stem from his experience as a director who stayed in Poland before, during & after the Solidarity movement. Initially he started as a documentary film maker, but as he saw that audiences were more interested in fiction and that documentary film-making has an impact on the lives of its subjects, he switched to his unique fictional style.This Facets 3-disc set of The Dekalog is apparently an improvement over the 2-disc version previously available, in that the picture quality is a little better, however it is still a far cry from what it could have been if Criterion had released this series. First, Facets has a mandatory ad for itself that automatically plays when you insert a disc & you have to let it play out before you can get to the menu. To add to that, you also have to watch another ad each and every time you select an episode to watch & after the end of each episode, very annoying. Then the picture quality isn't as good as it could be. Not only is there evidence of flaws in the film (scratches and blotches), but the film isn't a true digital copy of the original series, but rather a copy of someone's PAL tape of the broadcast, so the image is no better than watching a VHS tape.  The picture is also cropped from the original, especially on the bottom. The picture at times jitters, especially during the ending credits. The English subtitles are minimal, at times missing dialogue, and can not be turned off. There are some nice extra features, particularly a broadcast from Polish television of an interview of Kieslowski with a number of Polish journalists. However the quality of the picture of this is worse than on The Dekalog, and the entire dialogue is spoken over by people in English with no option to turn of the English dub & use subtitles instead. Apparently all of the other (imported) editions of The Dekalog are of better quality & offer more extras than this edition, which is inexcusable given the price
Only one star because I can't give it none. Michael Moore Hates America. This is evident in all of his movies and also proven when he goes oversees to make money by badmouthing us here at home. If you want to waste your money to see a film so horribly slanted in his own opinion, with quotes taken out of context...then by all means buy this collection. If you want to really find out what Michael Moore is up to...go to Moorelies.com...or read "Michael Moore is a Big Fat Stupid White Man." You can find the book here at Amazon.com and I promise it will be a better way to spend your hard earned money.
Oh my, what an inexcusable fiasco from universal!. When I received this for Christmas the year of its release, I was unaware of the framing issues.  I had to ship parts 2 and 3 back to them for replacements.  On top of that, there were warbling sound issues with part 2, and the Michael J. Fox interview ran about 8 chapters before kicking you off and back to the main menu.(This was reported on many websites)  Also, the trailers were all full screen, not widescreen.  Apparently all of these issues have been fixed in the 2005 re-release.  The thing that angers me the most is that since I couldnt return part 1 to universal initially, ive got a disc with the trailer in fullscreen instead of widescreen....ughhhh.  I can live with it in fullscreen and I am not gonna exchange the set for a 2005 set because who knows what more crap ill have to go through with Universal.  Thanks for nothing......pass this one up until its reissued with new features!
very sloppy disc here,mine was just bad. i took a chance on this because i love wagon train and hoped for a better transfer than the ones i had.well that didn't work out to good because the transfers were the worst i have seen. sound drop-outs,blurry,and the sound the rest of the time seemed to be off some from the speech. i may have been just me but do be careful
A Fraud. I totally agree with the below-named commentor. I have all the seasons, except the latest ones that have not come out yet, and I feel that I was so cheated on season 5. Of course that does not matter because they are off the air, and opinion might not matter. They will matter if they are aired for others that are considering buy the DVD's. I say don't waste your money on five because if you are not a Karen and Jack Show fan, you will be totally lost.
Awful Awful Awful. This is probably the worst war related movie I've ever seen. I am particularly incensed by several actors who are featured as being in the film are present for as little as a single minute or two. Time spent watching this film is time you'll never get back and have nothing to show for it
Fabricating History. Few leftist icons are looked upon more favorably than professor and activist Howard Zinn. Like many radical ideologues, he is the darling of students, the professorate, and the glitterati. Indeed, Hollywood star Matt Damon provided the narration for a hagiographic documentary about his life entitled, Howard Zinn -You Can't Be Neutral on a Moving Train."You can't be neutral" is a reference to Zinn's belief that all history is skewed by the mind that conveys it, and that the best historians must be "engaged" in political and societal matters. Therefore, it is non-remarkable when their discussion of events always manages to be harmonious with their worldview. Such a post-modernist outlook is quite popular today, but prevalence is not always an indication of value. Zinn informs viewers that no work is ever completely objective, which then allows him (and other activists) to avoid using research and citations which do not substantiate their pre-determined suppositions.That no historical account is ever 100 percent objective cannot be doubted, but an automaton's level of clinical impartiality is neither possible nor expected. One commits a black-or-white fallacy by pretending that it is as nothing can ever be 100 percent objective or subjective. Good history doggedly attempts to be unbiased. When it abandons its detachment, any amount of distortion becomes acceptable; history gets alchemized into propaganda. Zinn minimizes his own lack of scholarship in The Peoples' History of the United States by claiming that it was not written with an academic audience in mind.As a man, Zinn appears to be more celebrity than egghead. He isn't one to quibble over the nature of secondary or primary source materials, he'd rather illustrate his points by quoting lyrics from a Woody Guthrie song. No doubt that the directors of this film ascribe to their subject's view of fairness as not one of the individuals interviewed uttered a single negative syllable about Zinn. Uniformly leftist luminaries like Noam Chomsky, Alice Walker, Marian Wright Edelman, Daniel Ellsberg, and Tom Hayden spent their segments exalting the importance of his impact upon society.Their depiction of Zinn's personality was most revealing and in keeping with the tendencies of leftists in general. According to his friends and associates, he possesses a "steely anger," and "an endless capacity for moral outrage" which is representative of the whole. Dr. John Ray's key psychological components of the leftist are discernible in Zinn as his need for fame, praise, power, and attention are quite pronounced.At one point, Zinn's perceptions appear utterly astonishing. As a Jew in the Air Force who was sent to fight the Nazis during World War II, he found himself in a position of, what should have been, absolute moral clarity. If ever a person was placed into a position where war was morally just, this was it. However, his reminiscences are confined to indignation over his unit's bombing an enclave of German soldiers. He lamented the action as the men in the French village, "weren't doing anything to anybody"--except defending the boundaries of a genocide state.Perhaps the best way to sum up Howard Zinn is through words he applied to Uncle Sam: "limited, opinionated and with special interests."
Wretched!. Like many of the reviewers here, I am an Anne Rice fan. However, I knew that there were going to be liberties taken and was comfortable with them. I mean, few of the "Dracula" movies throughout the years have had anything to do with Bram Stoker's novel. All I wanted - and expected - was a flashy, no substance guilty pleasure movie, a la "Dracula 2000." That alone should tell you my expectations.But QotD failed even as a guilty pleasure. The storyline didn't make a lot of sense when taken on it's own, and the acting was bad to bland. I also take issue with the badly-done look of the vampires. Rice's vampires are supposed to be beautiful, whereas this bunch looked like Eurotrash or people at a Halloween spook house.However, one good thing about this movie is the music videos for Lestat. SInce the videos are included on the DVD, it earns 1 star
Fatally Flawed. Sure, this movie is a classic. But is it any good? Frankly, I found it to be tedious in the extreme.It's certainly pleasant to look at. The sets are quite amazing, and the cinematography is absolutely beautiful.The story (as described in detail in many other reviews here) has potential as both a thriller and a thought-provoking essay (ultimately it is neither).The acting is top notch, as are all of the special effects. Those of us who cut our teeth using teletype machines always get a kick out of seeing them in all their anachronistic glory. In fact, all of the computer stuff is believable for the era and pleasantly nostalgic.But the whole thing never rises to its premise. Its "thriller" aspect is artificial and not tied to the central plot line, and entirely predictable from the moment our friend is handed THE ONLY KEY THAT CAN STOP THE NUKE! The resolution is an afterthought (a quick fix in the extreme), and barely even mentioned in about two lines of dialogue after the artificial danger is (narrowly, whew!) averted. The characters are thin at best, and stock at worst.This movie is really a slow survey of what people in the early 70s thought technology would be like in the mid 70s. Yawn. (I must laugh at the whole bell/paper bit. It means nothing to the plot, and is the ultimate contrivance.)If a deadly virus actually came back from space, there would certainly be action on many fronts, with plenty of interesting conflict to go around. Some people would try to understand it, others would want only to kill it. There's some potentially interesting tension right there. Some people would argue to keep the danger hidden from the public, others would want to warn them. Again, that could have been a good source of tension. Someone would surely have suspected that the military wanted to harness it as a biological weapon (mentioned in passing, but never developed), while others would try very hard to prevent that. More tension.I'm just saying that this movie is littered with missed opportunities for something more than the collection of boring experiments and pointlessly slow-moving scenes which it actually contains. This movie is the poster child for boring science fiction, and it would not have had to be that way.I haven't read the book, but I bet it's a lot better. At its core, this movie is a boring dud.
No Habeas, not much Corpus, and definitely not Delictus. I hate lawyers.What is a lawyer, anyway? Basically: it's a telemarketer in a decent suit, a guy who would be hawking the latest Ronco Hair-in-a-Can super-duper late night special to folks in Akron over his plantronic headset, only he won the genetic lottery and got shot out of an upper-middle class womb.Shakespeare said it first and best: "First, let's kill all the lawyers!". Former Enron uber-dealmaker John Wing put a little fast-times Houston spin on that one: "get all the lawyers in a room---and shoot 'em!---in the mouth, so you *can't* miss!"Exactly. Anyway, "The Firm" is a flick that purports to make the world of high-priced yappers jaw-rippingly exciting, so I was probably all amped up to despise it.But not really: back before I dug into a gig with the Dark Side in high finance, back when I was hefting a backpack over the sodden campus of my old alma mater, I briefly considered going into law: briefly, for about an hour. It was a desperate time, and I needed money.Why did I consider walking Hell's Highway, if only for an instant? Because John Grisham, boring lawyer-turned-ripping-potboiler-writer-turned-back-into-boring-lawyer, a kind of Tom Clancy for the paper-pusher and green-eyeshade set, made it all sound pretty damned funky (and lucrative! Hey, dig that BMW 7 series, baby, beep beep!) in his engrossing little novel "The Firm": granted, I've read better prose on the backs of cereal boxes, but it held my attention.I mean, seriously: you're 19, and the whole flying out on the corporate Lear to Grand Cayman and switching out briefcases full of cash sounds kinda cool. And strippers, man, plenty of strippers. Oh, and did someone mention a BMW?What's the difference between a lawyer and a snake? The snake at least has the decency to hiss before it sinks its fangs into your a**.Now it's true: Grisham writes like Kim Jong Il sings, but---in "The Firm", anyway---he was a master craftsman at moving things along at a bristling pace, from the pedestrian---hotshot Law School whiz kid gets picked up by a Memphis white-shoe law firm---to the Pretty Damned Atrocious, all while keeping the pressure ratcheted up with a dense, suffocating sense of malice.Grisham, like Michael Crichton, isn't a prose genius: he's not even mediocre. But he writes for film, and "The Firm" cried out for cinematic treatment.So it's baffling that, with all the right Stuff---Tom Cruise as winsome lead Mitch McDeere, Gene Hackman doing his chain-drinking Gene Hackman thang as the corrupt (but ultimately worn-out and pathetic) senior partner, and Sydney Pollack helming it up---that the big-screen treatment of "The Firm" is such a yawner.Talk about contempt of court.Pollack takes all that intricately woven little Grisham-plot and barfs big ugly chunks of it up on the screen. At its guts, really, "The Firm" was really nothing more than the Big Career Nightmare: I've bet the farm on this gig, I'm getting big money, I'm working like a fiend, my wife is having trouble remembering my name, and evidently I'm not doing tax-deals for loaded clients---I'm doing money laundering for The Mob.Pollack just mangles the whole thing, convolutes the simple, and renders up a flick that will have you checking your watch and yawning. Casting is part of the problem: Cruise does his thing, running around Memphis with his briefcase. Hackman drinks a lot and exudes pure Armani-clad sleaze: "The Firm" is all funny-wrinkles when he's onscreen, but hey, a man can only do so much.Jeanne Tripplehorn (Cruise's squeeze), who plays Lara San Giacomo when she's not playing Tripplehorn (seriously, google the two of 'em: astounding!) is a bitter old battleaxe who made me want to stick forks in my eyes. Wilford Brimley is just plain wrong as The Firm's security chief: too bald, too cracker, too rotund, too silly, too low-end, to do the role justice.Holly Hunter is even worse: Hunter is one of those eighties thangs who got pumped up as Something Sexy, which is baffling, given that she's about 3'8, and has all the sex appeal of an Oompah-Loompah. It doesn't help that she's a big, ugly Southern stereotype, the caricature most denizens of dumpy Michigan towns imagine Southerners to be. You want her to die: she doesn't. Pollack wants us to think she's clever and funny. She isn't.Ed Harris, I think, is in this movie. So is Hal Holbrook, which kinda ruins everything, because everytime Hal Holbrook is in a movie you know you're dealing with a bunch of friggin' crooks.Anyway, the coup de grace to the stupidity is the entrance, Deus Ex Machina, of Paul Sorvino (Don Morolto---what kind of Goombah name is dat, anyway? Somebody call Tony Soprano!), who takes this juggernaut of boredom from the merely stupid to the totally ridiculous.If you wanna see Tom Cruise running around Memphis with his briefcase for two hours, by all means belly up to the bar.Otherwise, case dismissed.JS
couldn't finish watching it. this book is really cool, but this movie was just awful. The animation is like all blue all the time, and the acting is really cheesy. I was hoping my brother and I would like this movie, but we turned it off after a while
Good production, but absolutely pointless. I should say first that this should be a good movie, at least on paper.  John Hurt and Richard Burton turn in solid performances, and everything about the production -- set design, costumes, etc. -- looks just as it should.  But there is something lacking in this adaptation that makes it pale compared to the book.Orwell's _Nineteen Eighty-Four_ was, largely, _about_ reading and writing, and the power they give to people.  As such, it is a thrilling novel, and a great pleasure to read.  Seeing John Hurt writing in Winston Smith's diary doesn't quite cut it for me; the essential spirit is lost in the translation to film.Beyond this, there are also some more mundane elements of the plot and characters that were cut to fit the screening time.  What I missed most was Smith's growing frustration with Julia being "only a revolutionary from the waist down" and his schoolboyish admiration (affection, really) for O'Brien.The only real highlight of the movie is the constant voiceovers coming from the telescreens regarding the progress of the war and the rooting out of traitors.  Orwell's vision is captured perfectly here, and the woman who read the "news" voiceovers gets the tone exactly right.All in all, the movie is nowhere nearly as compelling as the book, and isn't really worth the trouble.  In the time it takes you to procure and watch the movie, you could be halfway through the book
Good product but not worth the cost - FRAUD. Pros:- Very informative- Cool graphics- Educational and non-violent- Suitable for kids of all agesCons:- They are charging $15+ bucks for something that is available for FREE on cable and Dish- It was not specified that the DVD contains OLD episodes- Total diappointment for my son as he had seen these episodes on TV already (and still exist on our DVR)- I won't trust Disney's prices anymore. They are ripping off consumers
Strange Movie. This film was fairly interesting in parts, but the plot didn't make any sense.  Brenda Marshall plays an interesting person- a woman scientist- which was rare in the 1940's.  However, the film loses credibility when she has an accident and is disfigured.  She has plastic surgery and changes identities. However, she looks the same as she did before, but  no one seems to recognize her.  That particular item spoiled the movie for me.Ruth Ford plays a tough blackmailer and Hillary Brooke portrays a really bad lady.  William Gargan is very ineffective as Brenda Marshall's love interest.  His usual vibrant personality is really subdued here.Anthony Mann is the director and he does a credible job, but the writing is amateurish and the whole production looks very shoddy.The print itself is pretty good and there is a certain film noir feeling to it.I liked the fact that Brenda Marshall played an intelligent scientist and that the women had very strong roles, but the overall impression that I went away with was disappointmen
Good for beginners only. I go to abs classes frequently and wanted to get this DVD to help mix up my routine and give me something to do if I didn't want to leave the house.  I was a little disappointed in this DVD.  I love Self Magazine and their workouts and the amazon reviews made it seem very promising.  The routines are broken down into four separate workouts.  The only one that involved any effort on my part was the Pilates-inspired section.  As for the rest, the other sections would have you do too few reps, I felt, to get your muscles warmed up, let alone reshape them.  I think this DVD is great for beginners.  Its simple enough to follow and it won't scare you away too soon.  But if you're like me and you workout on a regular basis and just want a new routine, this probably isn't the abs workout for you
Not for the beginner. I rented this DVD because of the glowing reviews here and because I wanted a better understanding of the origin of the modern problems in the Middle East. Overall, I was disappointed by this offering because it didn't give sufficient background and seemed to speak primarily to those who already had a knowledge of the subject. (It also seems to me to be *a bit* biased in Israel's favor vis-a-vis the Palestinians, but that flaw could be accepted and filtered appropriately.)For instance, the documentary jumps right into the last Zionist Congress in 1939 (or whenever it was), but they never define what the Zionist movement is or where it came from. I know some of this from my reading, but it would be nice to have a summary here -- especially as it relates to the main players in the rest of the documentary. I wish the documentary would have at least started with WWI and the British occupation of Palestine after the fall of the Ottoman Empire, rather than picking up at WWII and mentioning some of the WWI details later. Doing so would have answered questions like, "Why are the British so important here?"Another example is keeping track of the people, places, and organizations, which are often named in Hebrew or Arabic and are unfamiliar to the uninitiated. It made the sequence of events hard to follow because we had a hard time keeping track of who was doing what and where. Using more text on the screen, more maps, more recaps, and perhaps more English translations would have improved things greatly, methinks.The film certainly has value, not least because it is told by a participant and first-hand observer, but it is not for those without much familiarity with the people, places, and issues at hand
This sucks on ice!!!!!!!. This is the worst shark film i've ever seen. All of the shark attacks in the movie are done with shark fodage. And all of the shark fodage is outa all the Shark Attack films. The directer should be ashamed of himself. And one more thing,the sharks growl just like in Shark Attack 2&3. Do not buy this movie at all!
Really a flat note with me - all but totally unfunny and amateurish. I had several friends INSIST that I rent this film. I'm glad I did instead of buying it. I was not bowled over as they obviously were - quoting lines from it and all but wetting themselves remembering scenes from the film.Now, I'm not a hard guy to make laugh, but there was only one point in this film where I actually laughed out loud. Other than that, I found Sordid Lives to be just tediously amateurish and more than a bit forced.I love Southern humor and even poking fun at Southerners: I can't tell you how much I love Greater Tuna, Fried Green Tomatos, Steel Magnolias, etc. but this just didn't cut it for me.The cast is a who's who of excellent character actors: Beau Bridges, Bonnie Bedelia, Leslie Jordan, Olivia Newton-John (for pete's sake!), Erik Krieger, Delta Burke and gobs of others. No, it's not a shortage of talent that this film lacks. I found that it was a lack of a cohesive direction that made me wince more than once.There's a scene with Ty (an out of the closet to everyone but his parents young man who lives in West Hollywood) talking to his ex-girlfriend in the reception area of their therapist...well, as a theatre director, I can only tell you that the performances during this one scene are so painfully badly acted and the pregnant pauses between the lines are so large you could drive fleets of trucks through them.There are various filming techniques that Del Shores (the director) uses that are just hackneyed: filming from behind a person's back so that only the back of one person's head and the facing person are seen. Why? It feels like a testimonial "video" from MTV's Real World rather than an actual film.Frankly - and this is not always a bad thing - the whole film felt like it was a play converted to film. It can be a great thing! Look at Altmans' Come Back to the Five and Dime Jimmy Dean and you'll see how a good stage to film movie is done. But this...well, it's just amateur hour from my perspective.In all, the film felt like a poor man's Greater Tuna (two quick change artists playing 16 characters living in Texas' 3rd smallest town), which WAS a stage play and WAS filmed for HBO as a stage play rather than attempting to make it FEEL like a film.I wanted to like this film, but I just didn't
Brigham Young. I was disappointed with the way the movie portrayed Brigham Young as being unsure about whether he was the Prophet or not.  From what I know about the history of the Church, he was very self confident and forthright
Highly Disappointed. I have yet to actually watch more than the first 10 mins. The quality is so bad I refused to go any further. For the life of me I can see how any Studio worth its salt could release anything so poor; where has "Pride In Your Work" gone. I could hardly make out the actors in this movie.I skipped forward by chapters just to see if some change had taken place, but to my dismay there was none. I am not one of those critics always writing bad reviews, in fact this is probably my second ever. I just had to warn other buyers so they don't get shafted like I did.In all fairness the movie itself may actually be great but for me what is the use if its un-watchable. Its almost like a bad bootleg movie (I refuse to watch those too). I am sure they could have spent some more time and money to remaster it and get all the graininess out and bring clarity to this film.All in all this is just my opinion and I hope it helps someone save their money, however if you don't mind the picture quality get it because I love the Trinity Saga
Poor value, not much additional material. This movie is not all that it is hyped up to be.  The story-telling of the movie is poor, and the characters are not well-developed.  It's only strength is in the music and the constume drama, if you like such movies.Additionally, this 2-disc set unnecessarily expensive and the second disc does not have much material on it.  Other than the 48 minute documentary on early music and viola da gamba players, there is less than 20 minutes of additional material related to this film.The making-of-featurette consists of Gerard Depardieu laughing at inside jokes and getting make-up applied to his face in 10 minutes of home-movie quality footage.  There is a 60-second TV interview clip with the director, a 5-minute TV interview which includes a long clip from the movie itself (so it is really only about 60 seconds of new material), a 2-minute TV clip of viola da gamba playing, and the original movie trailer.By no means worthy of a second disc
Bad misfire. I've never read the Balzac novel this movie is based upon, but if Balzac wrote a coherent story, it didn't make it to the screen this time around.  The settings and costumes are glorious, leading one to expect somewhat high-brow entertainment, perhaps on the order of Merchant/Ivory.  Not to be.  A sophomoric joke repeatedly cropping up in the film is Elizabeth Shue's naked backside.  Huh?  Wouldn't the Gendarmes come running, in 1846 Paris?  Sacre Bleu!None of these people are very nice, but they don't deserve the mischief Cousin Bette inflicts upon them.  And what is Jenny Cadine's motivation for letting herself be used in Bette's schemes.  Nothing makes sense, and the whole movie was just bad misfire.  Avoid if possible
Horrible Dancing and horrible work out!. This video is all hype and delivers nothing.  I love dancing.  Dancing in this video is horrible.  For the latin section, there was hardly anything LATIN about it!  It was like she took some aerobics moves and added latin words to them.  Ick!  Not too mention it's hip hop music in the background with a small segment of horns added.  I love Latin dancing and didn't enjoy this at all.  The other dancing sections were equally cheesy.  They were soo cheesy I just felt like an idiot doing them.  If you are not at a stage in life where you still go to clubs/go out, i.e. 40+) then you MIGHT enjoy this.  If you do currently go out dancing it's just going to be torture.As for the workout, very low-intensity and lots of lulls as another reviewer said.  Definitely not for anyone who enjoys real dancing (because this is horrible) or an advanced exerciser because the workout does not keep your heart rate up.  I wouldn't even recommend this for a beginner because the choreography and direction are way too clumsy.  I think that would make a novice exerciser feel awkward when really it is the video and instructor that are the problem!  Don't waste your money....  there are lots of better vids out there.  This is awful
TACKY  SEX  DRAMA... Nicolas Cage was either broke (or whatever) when he made this New Orleans filmed trash. There's no other excuse. He plays a "tortured artist" flinging with the wife of a friend (Judge Reinhold). She is Zandalee (Erika Anderson). Zandalee---what a name. Zandalee loves to----and she likes it as often as possible. You see, she's a "free spirit" and her hubby's a bore. No stretch for Reinhold. But no matter who's naked or how often this is an awful movie. Not even worth the one star. It's so bad I watched it going "oh BROTHER". There is no acting in this movie. Just really bad dialogue spoken by the ones being paid to do so. Marisa Tomeii is somewhere in this mess too. But who cares. It's all pointless. Directed by someone named Sam Pillsbury
jazzman. A very deplorable, highly offensive, insensitive, profane,and depressing piece of garbage.  The dialogue is jaw-dropping embarrassing and so horrible, you want to coveryour ears. Also, very pretentious and unrealistic.  Justwhat kind of people enjoy watching crap like this?  TheONLY positive thing I ever got from this film was thesoundtrack by Gato Barbieri, the great jazz saxophonist.I wanted to smack the s*** out of that wimp French boy-friend of Schneider's. Brando's not much of a man in thiseither. An artsy-fartsy work for the New York/LA filmschool crowd, I suppose.  Give me "Cool Hand Luke", thankyou.
Negative 20 stars. CRAP.That's all I can say for this annoying movie, Amanda Bynes is a pain in the a** once again.If I had a wider range of ratings, then I would give it -20 stars out of 5
Best watched at 8x Fast Forward!. OK, so I'm a Zhang Ziyi fan.   Not a huge fan, but enough that, one day, out of sheer boredom, I decided to get this movie while surfing through Amazon.com.The best part about this movie is that Zhang Ziyi is in it.  And that's it.  This is not one of her better movies, definitely.The plot is not that difficult to figure out.  What is hard to figure out is how and why things happen the way they do in the movie, since nothing much makes sense.  What the filmmakers have tried to do here is disguise an incoherent and unrealistic plot as film noir, by using dense layers of atmosphere.The story starts in 1928 in Manchuria, with Zhang's character, Cynthia, at the end of a love affair with a Japanese man, Itami, who is heading back to Japan.   Zhang appears in classic schoolgirl dress with pigtails.  In the next scene, her brother, who is involved in some sort of newspaper or anti-Japanese organization, gets murdered by a pro-Japanese terrorist. Tears from Zhang Ziyi in both scenes.Cut to 1931, in Shanghai.  We meet Szeto, and his girlfriend Yiling.  Like an old war movie clich, this brief scene of their happiness together is meant only to set up Yiling's tragic death in the next scene.Szeto leaves on a brief trip, and then on his return, as he hurriedly leaves the train, he accidentally grabs the jacket of a Purple Butterfly operative (presumably a professional brought in to perform the assassination of the Japanese agent Yamamoto).  Mistaken for the real assassin by the other Purple Butterfly members waiting at the train station, they hand Szeto a briefcase containing info on Yamamoto and his organization, and then chaos and shooting breaks out.  The original assassin, realizing that Szeto has taken his jacket, chases after him, and is mistaken for an enemy by the other Purple Butterfly operatives, who kill him.  Szeto is packed into a car by the Purple Butterfly operatives as they make their escape.  Yiling, who has gone to the train station to meet her boyfriend, chases after Szeto, and is shot by Cynthia, who has been watching the scene unfold.  Cynthia shoots some other people also, all to help cover the escape of the Purple Butterfly operatives who have Szeto in the car.  Just three years later, Cynthia has become a seasoned Purple Butterfly operative, with the look of a mature young woman.Confused?  Baffled? That's only the first quarter of the movie!  Like I said, it's not hard to figure out what is happening in the movie.  What's harder to figure out is how and why things happen the way they do.  How does a schoolgirl get from Manchuria to Shanghai and in just three years is involved in killing people in public places?  Just what the heck is the Purple Butterfly organization?  Their goals and methods seem to be more along the lines of a quasi-governmental death squad rather than a resistance/liberation/terrorist organization.  But the movie states later on explicitly that they are not affiliated with the government or any other organization.  Why arrange to have this meeting and hand-off of a crucial mission assignment in a crowded, chaotic train station?  Why have the only form of identification be this non-descript suit with a Purple Butterfly over the left chest?  It seems almost to be a parody of spy movie clichs to have this sort of Mission Impossible style mission assignment go wrong like this.The rest of the movie goes along similar lines.  The pacing of the movie is excruciatingly slow.  There is very little dialogue in this movie.  Much of the movie is filled up by long tracking shots of people walking from point A to point B to point C, as well as long close-up shots of their facial expressions.  I'm guessing that these boring interludes are meant to convey some sort of a Deep Meaning.   I got more deep meaning out of this movie, in a much shorter time, by watching it in Fast Forward mode.  8x speed was about right - I could still read the subtitles at that speed.A few other comments:A particularly odd feature of this movie that I noticed was that the three main male characters have this ectomorph body type that just isn't seen much anymore in either Western movies or in the Chinese martial arts movies, where the male actors are built more sturdily.   These are REALLY skinny guys, with some seriously narrow shoulders.  In a number of shots, their heads look to be much larger than their torsos, making them look like bobble-head dolls.The final scenes are from classic film clips of war atrocities and other carnage inflicted on the Chinese civilian population by the Japanese invaders.  This is heavy duty stuff, and remains an unsettled issue in Asia to this day, a source of deep anger among the Chinese people, and continuous denial by the Japanese.  It's too important of a subject to be casually tossed in at the end of such a lightweight and confused movie as this one.
Eat Drink Man Woman. This is an excellent story well told in script and action. However, it is quite different from the version I saw on a big theater screen. This DVD has speeded up the action  and the English translation dialogue is presented in such rapid changes that it is virtually impossible to read and follow the dialogue. I was very disapointed in this DVD version and would not recommend it to friends
Not Much Plot & Poor Editing - Avoid. Avoid this one. The bad reviews are not kidding. The plot is almost non-existent. The action scenes are not enough to make up for the poor editing. The writing has drawn the characters very thinly. Sadly, a reason to watch this movie is to be amused at how badly it is put together
2.5 stars:   only the effects save this bloated money machine. I actually think Cameron is a good technical filmmaker, but this is my choice for most overrated movie in history.  The older black and white movie is much better drama.  What we have here is really a teenager flick with remarkable and very expensive special effects.  The acting is at best wooden and the Winslet/Di Caprio (both superb actors) sublot is excruciatingly awful.  I could go on but there are plenty of previous reviews which summarize the lowlights.  The undoubtedly great effects do make this worth seeing, however
a comedy routine !. unwatchable  !!!!!--over rated poet-- singers who sing off key---- aggrandizing this mediocrity is ludicrous---
garbology. Main Line, Main Line.... those Main Liners.... You like to look at those Main Liners, don't you Ginger... I mean Kitty?  You the suffragette who just got offa the suffragette wagon...  the same wagon that was seen rolling by in The Story of Vernon and Irene Castle... wait a minute... that was the exact same footage!  I guess the makers of this fine movie assembled it out of stock footage.  In fact Wynn, the MAIN LINER seems to be assembled out of stock footage of Bill Clinton.  Did you know allabout the MAIIINNNE LIIIIINNNEEE????  Seems the whole worl knows about the MAIIIIIIINNNNEEE LIIIIIIINNNNNNEEEEEEE "Philadelphia Aristocracy"  See, in Philadelphia, they're old skool, dig.  They even got a Queen of Pennsylvania, who sits on a throne and stuff.  Played by Margaret Dumont when she's not getting scandalized by Groucho Marx.  And I believe there is a duke and duchess of Bakersfield.  And just the other day I had tea and crumpets with the Viscount of Compton.  Of the Night Train...  I mean Wild I... I mean Yeah, he was drinking Ripple back when Redd Foxx was merely the Duke of Cornwall.  He was in line to the throne... or was that waiting for the mens room... See, over here in the States we take our aristocracy just as seriously as our Prussian counterparts.  We are always to be seen marching around with those spiky helmets on, saluting the statue of Kaiser Bill's moustache
Poor quality, somewhat entertaining. The special effects are very poor. The mixing of horror with humor and a teenage type script just doesn't do it for me. Not recommended
Too Slow Paced. I bought several of Vicki Regon's tapes. She seems to be a very fun teacher and very good dancer. But the instructions are too slow-paced. There are a lot of repeats which are not necessary for DVDs and video tapes. With only 4 or 5 steps taught in each tape, if you are a beginner, I doubt "you can dance" comfortbly on the floor after you've learned from those tapes. In terms of steps per dollar, you can find much better deals on market than this series.
frustrating!!!. I'm mad to have paid for this DVD! Mr. Pozo only teaches and demonstrates the man's part for most steps, which is frustrating since the woman's part is exactly the opposite. He goes through everything so quickly we kept having to stop and back it up. It doesn't teach you to dance, and it especially doesn't teach you in minutes.
Another Nicolas Roeg Train Wreck!. There must be some movie buffs out there who like this film for whatever reason, like it enough that this movie has been classified as a "cult classic" of sorts. Obviously this is a candidate for inclusion in the Criterion Collection, they have a cross selection of everything from the works of Bergman, Antonioni, Fellini, Godard to the bottom pit of hell with Michael Bay's The Rock and oh dear god, Armageddon! The Man Who Fell to Earth is therefore prime Criterion fare, but is the film itself any good?Nicolas Roeg is truly a pale imitation of a director. Has he ever made a satisfying film that was not deeply flawed? This David Bowie vehicle is no different with it's oh so 70's mileau. I especially love how time changes throughout the film, you see characters getting older except Bowie who is an alien. Decades pass and the characters age but we are still in the 1970's! Awesome, really!It goes without saying that this film is another of Roeg's many exercises or rather fixations on the concept of alienation and modern malaise, capitalism, consumerist spending, etc. That these ideas are packaged so blatantly, ( the movie about alienation with an alien! ), and ineptly is shocking to connoisseurs of fine art cinema. If you want to watch great films about the concept of alienation in the modern world, there is no better director than Michaelangelo Antonioni with L'avventura, La Notte and L'eclisse for starters. Nicolas Roeg by compasion is painfully incompetent.The best part of this film is it's sense of humor, it can be funny in a tacky, empty sort of way. Plus we get lots of nudity and sex, so that's fun, supposedly. Directors by the 1970's were over the whole censorship of the preceding decades and had as much nudity and sex in their art-house movies as possible, because lots of sex and nudity equals profound insight into the human condition! Right? Ugh...The DVD is high-quality Criterion Collection work, but the quality of the movie is your call. I find it to be utter junk but worth a look, you may have a different opinion after this pretentious mess robs you of 2 hours and 20 minutes of your life. Nicolas Roeg is a fraud, we have to face up to it
How can anyone LIKE this pile o shart??? IT SUCKS!!!!!. Definatly one of the worst movies ever.  The dialog is so boring I had an A.D.D. attack trying to watch it.  I usally never turn a movie off in the middle but I had to do it with this one. I tore it out of my laserdisc player and smashed it, so I would never have to suffer through this again.  The characters are so lame I did'nt even care about who was threating his life.  I wanted the stalker to go ahead and kill them all already.  Man this movie is making me enraged just typing about it. IT FU**IN SUCKS!!!!! And it is really dated
"Last" trip to "Troy". Epic adventure flicks come in two varieties -- there's the "Ben-Hur"/"Lord of the Rings" type, and then there's the "Alexander" type. Sadly, two of the much-hyped adventures of 2003 and 2004 were monumental duds, both artistically and critically."The Last Samurai" tells the tale of a alcoholic officer-turned-mercenary (Tom Cruise), who is dragged to Japan to train the emperor's troops in Western warfare. But when he is captured by a samurai rebellion force, he begins to respect them and their way of life -- even to the point of fighting alongside them."Troy" goes further back in time, to ancient Greece and Troy. The beautiful, married queen Helen (pretty but wooden  Diane Kruger) has run off with Trojan prince Paris (Orlando Bloom), prompting all the Greek kings to lay siege to Troy in an effort to bring her back, with doomed hero Achilles (Brad Pitt) at the front lines.Oddly enough, these two films suffer from opposite problems -- "Samurai" romanticizes history to the point of disbelief, while "Troy" strips away all mythological trappings. And it doesn't help either movie: the former is turned into a dewy-eyed star vehicle, while the latter loses many of its layers, and feels thin and undernourished. Achilles isn't much fun without his goddess mom and flawed invulnerability, is he?Admittedly, the costumes and scenery for each are spectacular. "Troy" is set in an arid Mid-Eastern setting, and has some truly spectacular battle scenes between the Greeks and Trojans. And "Last Samurai" was filmed in New Zealand, which gave it plenty of green, dewy expanses and forests. Too bad each film is burdened with very clunky dialogue.Tom Cruise plays a P.C., rather annoying version of a soldier, while Orlando Bloom and Brad Pitt do seem to be giving it their all, but are hampered by their thin characters. The supporting actors are given better roles and do a better job, most notably Eric Bana ("Troy") and Ken Watanabe ("Last Samurai"), both of whom shine beside the A-listers."Troy" and "The Last Samurai" were attempts at modern Hollywood epics, but with difficult storylines and thin characters, neither one works. They're nowhere near as bad as "Alexander," but nowhere near good either
gentle ways to train your dog. I was pleased at the methods used to train your dogs from puppy to mature dogs.  IT covers several different styles of training, clicker and others. I would highly recommend it as a excellent resource in your inventory of training methods.  I am using it on my 9 week old rat terrier and he will fetch, come sit and down with a little help and yes even shake hands
Boring!. Why would Whoopi Goldberg be starring in such a stupid movie, and why would Alexa Vega starring in this movie. I can't believe this movie was ever made
One of the worst moderately high budget movies ever. I am not in the habit of giving bad reviews, but this one deserves it. Watching the movie made me wonder if Roger Moore was going to actually say "I'm only doing this for the money".There are better action movies, better thrillers, and better political commentaries.Catch this some late night on an obscure cable channel, save your money
Ain't nothing like the real thing baby... Good performance by Aykroyd still doesn't save a weak plot that tends to drift, the big screen version just doesn't measure up to the TV series
A CARBON COPY OF I KNOW WHAT YOU DID... Boring and like most every other new horror movie. Lame mask,I think the awful movie Cut used this mask also,who cares I suppose. This goes with all the other pathetic new era horror movies(Scream,I Know What You Did,Valentine,Urban Legend,Cut etc..) so bottom line don't waste your time,stick with 80's Slashers
Completely Fails To Live Up To It's Reputation !. I have put this film off for years for no particular reason,just didn't get around to watching it until recently. I had heard plenty of good things about it & had definitely planned on buying it at some point because of all the positive reviews I'd read. I am so glad I got to catch it the other night on the IFC channel because it is truly one of the most overrated horror films ever made! Not the worst ever made but nowhere near as good as people have made it out to be. There are some good effective scenes,I do particularly think Dee Snyder did a pretty decent job as a twisted lost soul addicted to pain,torture & his love affair with death,ranting & raving about society while he plays with his victims but there still wasn't enough of that good creepy stuff to cover up how illogical the whole story was. It seemed very rushed & unfinished wich intern provides a ridiculous amount of plot holes. Most of the acting was alright but the lead Detective & his annoying partner were aweful(no grip what so ever on ther character's). In the end "STRANGELAND" felt like it was a bad rushed sequel to a better movie. This film is made out to be so much better than it is,a perfect example of how low the standards were for what passed as a good horror film in the 1990's compared to now!
5 stars for Frampton and his band on this night - Zero stars for this DVD version. A great, fun performance by Frampton and his backing trio is marred by awful DVD mastering. The audio constantly changes volume levels. The disc kicks off promisingly with Frampton's sole guitar scorching through the amps, but when the rest of the band's instruments join him, the volume of the DVD shifts. This happens throughout the two-hour concert, making it unlistenable. The camera work is a bit too frantic at times, but I could forgive that, had the DVD's audio been mastered at the same sound level throughout the video. But it's not, and it's a shame. It pains  me to write this, because Frampton is such a wonderful, underrated musician. I think he sounds better on this DVD than he did in the mid-1970s, and he sounds even better today. Check out PBS's "Sound Stage" concert with Frampton on TV. The guy is a beast on the guitar.Hopefully Universal/Hip-O will remaster this DVD with consistent audio levels
Medicore at best. I really felt like I had to give some real insight to the people who are wondering whether they should watch this or not.You people writing the reviews are being waaay to generous to this movie.With how slow the movie started off you would think that the relationship between the two main characters would slowly and steadily build up-from a close friendship to a romantic relationship.The guys don't even display a close friendship at the beginning, how are they gonna jump from "a guy you see during soccer practice and around your building" to "hot and heavy can't live without each other love"?It's not believable, and doesn't make for a good coming of age love story that this movie tries to be.The movie just hits you with an abrupt and sudden love scene, and from there they are suddenly in love and everything.In fact,there is no indication that either character is gay until that scene.I mean it would have been nice if the movie showed that one guy was into his neighbor or checked him out from time to time, or even was interested in guys in general but as I said before the movie doesn't display any type of interest the guys may have in each other or just guys in general until the love scene.Don't get me wrong,I enjoyed the movie but the reviewers here aren't really giving an accurate representation of the movie and are HIGHLY overrating it.So if your in the mood for an ok gay teen movie by all means grab some popcorn sit back and enjoy.If you're looking for a masterpiece of cinema involving a gay relationship.Look somewhere else.This is not the movie
Which version is reviewed?. There appear to be at least 3 different versions of this DVD for sale on Amazon, each with a different price. Some reviews say the video quality is good, some say it is terrible.  It would be helpful if Amazon would indicate which version of this movie each review is associated with so that customers could decide which one to choose
Pathetic Gangster Style Movie. I've read a lot of reviews for this movie stating that it is an excellent film and some even call it one of the best movies of all time.  I couldn't disagree more.  I found this film to be a disappointment.  Tom Hanks & period-gangster style films just don't go together.  When I see Tom Hanks, I see him in Big.. not as a serious actor.  In "Road To Perdition" Hanks plays Michael Sullivan, a born and bred gangster in the 1930's, who is forced to abandon his lifestyle when his wife and one of his sons are killed and he is forced to protect the elder son, a witness of a killing.  The story does leave something to be desired. Predictable and hackneyed plot, with pretty weak story development.  I'm a big fan of movies like the Godfather & Goodfellas but this one just plain stinks
HOW I WISH I HADN'T SEEN THIS!. A WOMAN SCREAMING AS SHE'S BEING BRUTALLY RAPED WITH A LIVE CHICKEN BY A MANSONESQUE LUNATIC. HOW CAN ANYONE USE THE WORD "FUNNY" TO DESCRIBE THE TORTURE OF A POOR ANIMAL STRUGGLING IN VAIN TO FREE ITSELF BEFORE IT'S BEATEN TO DEATH? POLYESTER WAS ONE OF MY FAVORITE MOVIES. I DON'T THINK I CAN HANDLE WATCHING IT, OR ANYTHING ELSE BY WATERS AGAIN.
The Unfunny Woody Allen. This is a truly pathetic excuse for a movie.  The dialogue is rambling and often incoherent (Keaton looks high much of the time and moves a hand constantly toward her nose), the story is confusing and unconvincing (and has to be explained, twice), the camera work is labored, and the artisie illusions and music are oh, so obviously "in".  Worst of all, the film isn't funny.  It should be no surprise that Woody Allen soon moved into a much darker genre of film making to occupy his later years
TERRIBLE DISAPPOINTMENT. I viewed this movie when I was young when it first came out and was overjoyed to see it was available on DVD.  I received it today and I am very, very, very diappointed.  It was made in Malasia by the chinese I think, and it looks terrible, like a bad quality VHS.  It was likely copied from something, and I am surprised Amazon would carry something like this.  I will be sending it back
Fluffy, contrived crud. I'm not sure which is worse- the concept of the bar "Coyote Ugly." or the movie about it. I suppose both. A lot is made about Piper Parabo's performance, as it were. But I just don't see it. I mean, you'd have to be able to act to receive such an accolade. And in this movie, Parabo is a strident, sell a little T and A as far as one can w/o becoming a stripper, with as much a grasp on the real world as 3rd grader. The movie is a toy for high school/college age mopes who find places where the worst kept secret in the bar business- hiring hotties to sucker young, naiive men into spending money they can't afford- interesting places to hang out at. This is "Cocktail" in reverse, to an extent. This is one of those movies that creates a non-existing, pure utopia of a bar. The place where everyone basically laughs, cheers and sings in unison at a contrived, silly atmosphere that only exists in the minds of Hollywood execs, and college campuses to a much lesser extent. The dialogue to is equal to that of "Coctail"- pointless, been there before, dense dialogue. If you're young and have yet to be in touch with real life, see  this. It's a fantasy flick for escapism. If you're a quality film lover, run the other way
not worth your time or money. I saw this movie 'cause I love horror, and I love Halle. But this movie just sucked
I Call Shenanigans!. Shame on you Disney, for trying to bleed me of my hard-eard money.I call Shenanigan
If you like the back of William Hurt's head... The only good thing in this movie was Ms. Howard's performance, she is innocent and believable.   I can't understand how good actors like Weaver, Hurt, and Phoenix would let themselves be wasted on this. The 'plain' dialogue among the 'elders' is painfully numbing, choppy, and stilted.  And the directing drove me crazy, especially since M. Night...insists on filming group scenes as is he was just passing through, or following them without ever bothering with close-ups. These scenes make me feel like they were done by an amateur filmmaker with a his first video camera.   If you like the back of William Hurt's head, you'll get plenty of it in this film, the camera seems to avoid his face like the plague; which is too bad, since when he finally has a good speech, we are deprived of the anger I imagine was in his eyes.  I agree with others, I would have worked better as a 30 minute Twilight Zone episode.  Rent it first before you buy, and save some money for a classic thriller, like Psycho
Good Movie - Horrible Recording. Artisan has released a horrible recording of a very good, sophisticated comedy that questions the values of marriage.  The DVD I got from the start had poor sound quality, faded color and was actually out of focus.  To add to this this disc started skipping, freezing and even getting the vocals out of sequence with the picture.  Don't waste your money on this release.  Wait for a better release
The cell phone is the main character. The most interesting part of this action movie is the centrality of the cell phone. The movie is a Nokia product placement, highlighting what awful danger you are in if you are not connected and, conversely, what a phone can do for you if you have one. The plot centers on Jessica (Kim Basinger) who is abducted because the bad guys think she has something that they need. Mystery #1: What is it?After lots of running/driving in various parts of L.A. the bad guys round up Jessica's family, while on the other end a pretty guy turned superhero and a would-be day spa owner cop are trying to help them. Mystery #2: how will the cell phone save the day?Mystery #3. Watch for the credits at the end of the film. They show up on a...? Yep, you got it
The Nadir of Many A Career. Movie: *1/2  DVD Quality: ****  DVD Extras: ***Don't be fooled by the pedigrees of the distinguished cast and crew members; "In Dreams" is without doubt THE career low for director/screenwriter Neil Jordan as well as actors Annette Bening, Aidan Quinn, Stephen Rea, and even Robert Downey, Jr. (who's made a handful of turkeys throughout his rollercoaster career).  The film aspires to be a psychological mystery-suspense-thriller in the vein of "Psycho" and "The Silence of the Lambs", but is completely undone by a cut-and-paste script filled with unlikeable and unbelievable characters; uninspired direction; shallow performances; choppy editing; and a grossly ineffective musical score.  Only one scene in the movie is played convincingly, and that's the one in which Annette Bening finally begins to go over the edge mentally; pitching her voice in a lower tone and undergoing swift changes of emotion, Bening gives a brief and tantalizing glimpse of what she might have been able to achieve with a similar character in a better movie.  Unfortunately, that one scene does not make the chore of sitting through the other 97 minutes of pretention and tedium worthwhile.In terms of technical quality, the DVD presentation of this bomb is more than acceptable.  Picture quality is clear and sharp; the sound is a bit fuzzy in one or two spots, but that may have been the intent of the filmmakers - I was so bored and so eager for the movie to be over that I didn't stop to replay the bits of dialogue in question.  The DVD extras are so-so: thumbnail cast and crew Biographies that mention much better movies; several lackluster screens filled with "Production Notes"; and finally, the Theatrical Trailer, which is probably the best thing on the disc because it's short and features quick flashes of the film's visual highlights.  "In Dreams" is not recommended viewing, even for those viewers who enjoy bad movies for their camp value
Leave on the &quot;Shelf Fighter&quot;. As far as Ice T vehicles go this one is pretty good.  Ice T gives a totally believable performance as a former rap artist desperately trying to parlay his past sucess in the music business into a career as a bad actor.  His acting is probably improving though, but who can tell?  Unfortunately Science cannot yet measure the miniscule improvement in his talent and Amazon does not provide me with the option of anything less than one star... All that aside, Ice T is not totally to blame for this movie's garbage-ness.  The script is pretty weak and the supporting cast is not very supportive.  Maybe I couldn't suspend my disbelief, but in certain scenes, like all the ones where people are being stealthy, they are not stealthy, they are clearly in plain view of the people they sneak up on.  The Stealth Bomber featured in the film spends most of its time parked in a garage.  And when it attacks targets it certainly doesn't &quot;smart bomb&quot; them...nor does it make any effort to go unseen.  It actually attacks in broad daylight.  I guess we are supposed to chalk that up to Ice T's lack of flight experience.  Bottom line: if you name your movie &quot;Stealth Fighter&quot; then by definition it should have some stealth in it.  Maybe its ironic.  Maybe the quality of the movie is &quot;stealthy&quot; making it appear as if it is without quality.  Bearing that in mind I give it no stars but it gets five stars--all in stealth mode
The cave in. What a disaster. Don't waste your time with this one. Nothing grabs you in the beginning, the plot(if any) is poor, and yes there are some nice sets, but that doesn't make a good movie.
Outrageous; Beyond the common Limits of Human Intelligence. "Blood Dolls" is a confounding freakfest about which little of worth can be said... It begins with a quite literal indictment of corporate ethics as a pair of unscrupulous complicitors in an unethical business enterprise enter the world of a business "genius" who wears a long-discarded X-Files prop (literally copied from the episode "Grotesque") as a mask, has a morose clown for a butler, and keeps a dwarf around for no apparent reason other than to keep the general sideshow aura amped to an extreme level. This dwarf routinely tortures his encaged, all-female rock band, who, beside being surprisingly technically adept, do little more than provide nudity. Shortly into the proceedings, the cornball bloodletting starts, the billionaire reveals the disproportionately small head beneath the mask, and one of the complicitous nobodies is transformed into a "blood doll." These must be parodies of "Puppet Master," but since that film might as well have been a parody itself, that isn't saying much. The film exudes an air of sadism amid the camp, and occassionally meanders into utterly senseless philosophical musings culled pretty much directly from the sources they cite. The acting is awful; the characters and story, absurd. However, it's also pretty damn funny, in an Ed Wood-let's take this seriously even as it becomes increasingly absurd to-kind of way. Worth a rent for a camp conoisseur, but little else
Lucas Strikes!. NOTE: This review is not about the trilogy (which is great). This review is about the many DVD releases.The worst thing that ever happened to George Lucas is when Peter Jackson released the Extended Version of LOTR. Jackson showed fans we could demand, expect, and receive more from Hollywood. The impact of Peter Jackson sent shock waves among fans, who released a four-disc edition of one of the greatest movies of all time. Even old Hollywood guards, like Ridley Scott and James Cameron (no surprise they are not Americans) took notice and improved their DVD releases. This change has been powerful, except in the case of Lucas and to some degree his pal Steven Spielberg, who continues to stick to their old habits by being dinosaurs when it comes to business and satisfying the consumers.The many re-releases shows greediness, stubbornness, and lack of respect for fans. No one is upset with him for cleaning up the original version, but please allow fans to have the 1977 version and the updated version with better picture and sound quality. In addition, please stop using the "Limited Edition" you like to use to get fans to buy new copies of Star Wars; it is both false and tiring. Release these films in Anamorphic Widescreen with 5.1 Surround Sound and allow the 1977 version of the movie be release.Lucas's creditability has gone downhill to some degree because he is only known for his Star War movies. Unfortunately, his latest releases have only damaged him further because the quality of the prequels has been less than stellar. His shady practice of video/DVD releases of his past glory has resulted in some fans losing respect for him.One must wonder what went through Lucas mind when Peter Jackson won an Academy Award for Best Director and not him. Maybe if he focus on making quality films (like he once did) and not playing the DVD re-re-re-release game, then he could win one.
Sooooo Bad. I took my 14 yr old grandson to see this and not only did I think this movie was bad, so did he. I think it should get a Razzie award for worst movie of the year. I wouldn't recommend renting and definitely not buying this movie
WELL INTENTIONED, PERHAPS -- BUT SIGNIFICANTLY FLAWED. There are some good things about this film -- it gives audiences an idea of how insidious the Nazi propaganda machine was, for one thing. It also shows the main character, Antoine Moreau, a (fictional) famous French mime, having his eyes opened to the reality of the Nazis' 'final solution' to the 'Jewish problem'. Brought to a Czech town that has been 'given to the Jews' by the Nazis in order to stage a performance that will be seen by the Swiss Red Cross delegation, hopefully persuading them that the Germans are not as monstrous as they have been portrayed, Moreau changes his original idea for the performance, hoping to get a 'silent' message to the Red Cross that will let them know the true fate of Jews (and other 'undesirables') at the hands of the Nazis.I'll briefly mention a couple of less-than-positive observations, and then get into my main problem with the film.  The production values reminded me a bit of a made-for-TV movie -- and from time to time it seemed that the sound was a little out of sync with the picture. The image quality on the DVD could have been much better as well.  Also, the Shanachie DVD release is version of the film that has been dubbed with English.  This is, in the case of this film, not very well-done.  The cabaret singer, for instance, comes across as completely unbelievable in that her voice doesn't match her face or ethnicity in the least.  Everyone in the film winds up with an English accent, which detracts from any authenticity that might have been retained using subtitles instead of clumsy dubbing.Another reviewer below brought up the dubbing problem as it apples to one of one of the children, Stella (portrayed by Linda Jablonska).  Her voice does not sound at all like that of a little girl. She develops a bit of a crush on Antoine, which in itself seems like a pretty natural occurrence under the circumstances -- here is a famous artist who has come to the village to stage a show, with her as one of the leads, who is kind and supportive and friendly to her, who listens to her ideas and feelings with attention and respect.The problem I had was with one scene in particular.  Stella has been caught on the streets after curfew and chased by police.  She bites one of them and manages to elude them by squeezing through a break in a fence.  In the process of getting away, she gets muddy, scrapes herself bloody in a few places, and tears her clothing.  She goes to Moreau's hotel and climbs to the ledge outside his room and taps on the window.  When he opens it, he is shocked at her condition, lets her into the room, and begins to try to clean her cuts and scrapes, asking what had happened.  He then draws a bath for her, so she can wash herself.  As Moreau sits down, still in a bit of a daze over what has happened to her, she steps into the bath.  Just before she pulls her dress over her head, she says to him, `No looking.'  He shakes his head to bring himself out of his daze and says `Of course', then repairs to the adjoining bedroom, where he lies down on the bed to have a smoke, allowing her to conduct her bath in privacy.  A moment later, he hears a noise and looks up to see Stella emerge from the bathroom, completely naked, in a full-frontal nude shot.  Moreau gets up from the bed and lifts the covers, suggesting that she warm herself.  She climbs into the bed; he covers her up, and steps away to the other side of the room.  There is nothing about the scene that implies that anything improper occurred.  He has simply offered her care and comfort and sympathy.This shot only lasts a few seconds, but I feel that, regardless of the director's reasoning for shooting it in the first place, it could have been left out.  If the point was to show that Moreau has either had morals all along, or that he has acquired them, it could have been demonstrated in a variety of other ways.Earlier in the film, Stella had witnessed one of her caregivers, semi-nude, in Moreau's hotel room (Stella saw this from outside).  Given her `schoolgirl crush' on Moreau, it seemed natural for her to become upset over this.  As a result, however, the scene after the bath comes across as a young girl inappropriately mimicking adult sexual behaviour.  This, combined with the `adult' voice dubbed over Stella's, makes the scene even more disquieting.There are some viewers who might argue that, in Europe, `standards' involving nudity and sexuality are not as reactionary as those in the US.  In many instances, I would wholeheartedly agree with them.  There is much hypocrisy in the dynamics of American culture and moral values, and not a little bit of neurosis.  However, the sexual objectification of children is something about which I feel very strongly...and I think the scene in question in this film amounts to exactly that.  Don't get me wrong -- I'm not so prudish that I turn away from even full-frontal nudity in a film, if it's not gratuitous and it's an integral part of the storyline...but here, it involves a prepubescent girl, and could have easily been left out.  It worries me bit that this point has not been made by other reviewers.  Have we become so numbed in respect to nudity in films that many can't recognize an instance where it's not only unnecessary, but potentially harmful?I'm glad I've seen the film -- and I'd recommend it with a bit of praise and some strong reservations, as noted above. With all of the ridiculous claims from some quarters that the Holocaust never happened, I think it's vitally important for films on the subject to be made and seen.The Czech film ALL MY LOVED ONES is an excellent film about this horrible time that has not gotten the attention it deserves -- seek it out.n.b. -- This is the second time I have posted this exact review.  I noticed today (6 April 2006) that it has, for some reason, been removed from the site.  I've re-read what I've written, and I don't see anything objectionable or offensive.  The issues I have with the film are discussed straightforwardly.  If anyone objects to anything I've written here, I'd like to know what it is.
Master and Commander. CThe biggest problem with this movie is "Crowe" he cannot act! The story is a little far fetched and not believable
pretty cheesy. Big fan of Nas, but this moive's a bit over the top and have some good messages that suffer because of it. Visually flashy, vacant plot, and messages are reduced to sermonizing. Skip this and watch Juice instead
not for three year olds. This is a great movie with a mistaken rating.  If your three year old is enjoying this movie, please re-think what you show your children.  REALLY
Thanks for the nihilism, Eastern Europe!. Nothing more than a retelling of the Merry Melodies classic, "The High and the Flighty." In the 1956 toon, Daffy Duck sells torture devices to both Barnyard Dog and Foghorn Leghorn who have drawn the lines as if battling over territory -- or perhaps just intentionally aggravating one another -- in the manner of the "Lord of War"-friendly Israelis and Palestinians (even so direct as Foghorn uttering the line, "This, I say, this calls for massive retaliation," after getting hit in the head with a watermelon). Except that in the cartoon, the two warring parties eventually unite against the "Lord of War." Cartoon director Robert McKimson presents a much more optimistic view on humanity. Nicolas Cage should be ashamed that he signed on for such an unoriginal and weak-spirited project. Er, never mind, he's sort of left a guinea-pig turd trail of stinkers: "Honeymoon in Vegas," "Con Air," "8MM," "Gone in Sixty Seconds" and "Leaving Las Vegas," just to name a few
Knee-slapping funny!  Top knotch comedy!!!. Robin Hood and his merry gang of revelers frollick happily through the forest on an unforgettable tale of love, betrayal, and just plain, old-fashioned fun
Dismayingly bad. It's not just that If lucy Fell is a bad film. 90% of what comes out of Hollywood is uninspired, formulaic dross just like it, and usually you can just shrug it off and forget about it. What makes this movie memorably, remarkably bad is writer/director/star Eric Schaeffer's nauseatingly immense sense of self-regard, which arises from every frame like the stench of yesterday's roadkill. The mere fact that the photogenically-challenged Mr. Schaeffer should have the likes of Elle MacPherson tell him he's "cute" speaks volumes
A DISGRACE ..DO NOT WATCH THIS!!!!. ALL THIS TYPE OF MISINFORMATION DOES IS FURTHER EMBOLDEN THE ENEMY ...THEY ARE LAUGHING AT US  ..WE ALLOW THIS TYPE OF RUBBISH TO GET AIRPLAY ..ALL THE ENEMY HAS TO DO IS WAIT AND WE WILL DESTROY OURSELVES !!!..WE ARE IN THE TOUGHEST WAR IN THE HISTORY OF THE WORLD ..WITH IRAN ...NORTH KOREA ...SYRIA ...PAKISTAN ON THE BRINK ...WE ALL NEED TO WAKE UP ...BEFORE IT'S TOO LATE
Visually appealing but little else. Visually appealing but without much of a plot or acting talent.  Not nearly as good as "Valerie and Her Week of Wonders"
AN UNBEARABLE ENDING !. The ending to a horror movie can make or break it & just like 'I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER''URBAN LEGENDS' & many more flops since Wes Craven's original & excellent slasher parody 'SCREAM' Craven's follow up 'SCREAM 2' is ridiculously broken by its ultra lame ending. It was a decent slasher flick most of the way through & then destroid by its ending! I truly believe that this is one of the movies that marks the beginning of Wes Craven falling off the great horror director wagon! I mean come on look at his most recent flops 'RED EYE' & the absolute intolerable 'CURSED'. What happend Wes!
I can't say! My order was defective in dvd's. I received this 3 cd set and didn't open it right away, busy with other things before I got to it. Once I did, I discovered that I had TWO Dvd's of  "Episode Three" and one, of Episode 'One.' I wrote amazon and they promised me wks ago, that they'd send me a shipping label, postage free and refund my acct. Well? NOTIHNG thus far, actually its been more than a few wks since this email they sent me, saying I'd get their refund processing label + postage. Now.. I am NOT blaming amazon for this defective packaging necessarily but I am blaming them for not getting a label back to me about this order, and I spent over $44 for this three dvd set, and I'm stymied. Over the yrs I've had wonderful experience with amazon til this happened and I hope this gets their attention so that this matter can be taken care of asap and that I get refund. YES things can get packaged wrong but no, they didn't remedy this to date and I been waiting for too long now. sorry amazon, but weeks and weeks later and this loss is a bit much for me
SLOW. I think this is the slowest movie I've ever seen.  The characters aren't that believable and the characterizations are lean.   It was boring
Things I learned from watching this movie. I learned quite a few interesting things about life from this movie.  This movie seemed to have quite a lot of plot holes.  Anyway, here is what I learnt about the world from this movie -1) The yakuza (they play the bad guys in this movie) have nothing better to do than race cars.2) If you are a car racer, you will never have to do jail time for any crimes you commit.3) If you cannot drive at top speed and make hairpin turns through a car park without crashing into something, you are a loser.4) Only gorgeous girls and guys with perfect bodies can drift.5) Everyone in the school is either rich, gorgeous or a gangster.6) It is perfectly okay to offer your car to a total stranger in a race - just to see what he's made of.7) Even if you get in a race containing three cars and drive at top speed through a full city, and end up killing someone, then the police will do nothing about it.8) If you are beautiful and blonde, it is a good idea to offer yourself up as the prize for a race, so your boyfriend gets involved in a race with another guy and almost kills all three of you.9) It is an even better idea to scream at your boyfriend that he doesn't love you when he is neck-and-neck with another car, so that he rams into the other car on purpose.10) If you walk away from a fight, you are a loser.
Jason Takes Your Money. As a general rule, any film with a large number of Roman numerals behind it is going to suck, and the eighth outing of the F-13 franchise, JASON TAKES MANHATTAN, obeys this rule to a fanatical degree. This movie is terrible, an utter embarrassment, and is noteworthy only as a study in corporate greed and marketing deception.By the fourth installment of the series, the ironically titled FINAL CHAPTER, this formulaic slasher franchise was as exhausted as an old, blood-soaked boot. Jason Voorhees had outlived his usefulness and it was time for his rotted a*s to hang up the gaolie mask and retire. But the movie industry is an industry first, and when THE FINAL CHAPTER turned unexpectedly into a cash cow the studio execs at Paramount continued to flog their exhausted serial killer into progidies of meaningless violence. THE FINAL CHAPTER was followed by three more absolutely asinine sequels, which saw Jason improve the Crystal Lake gene pool by slaughtering legions of pot-smoking teenage dimwits. By this time P-mount was beginning to get embarrassed by their deformed, kill-crazy stepchild, yet the lure of an easy payday drew them on.I still remember seeing the preview for this flick in a movie theater back in 1989. The audience ate it up. We actually believed that the producers had decided to tweak the exhausted series by loosing Jason in a place where he would probably feel right at home: the Big Apple. One could only imagine the bloody shennanigans Crystal Lake's least popular citizen could embark upon in New Yawk City! People were laughing out loud as they imagined him loose in the City of Lights. He could slay obnoxious Volcanoites! Teach rude cab drivers the errors of their ways! Annihilate the snotty salespeople at Tiffanys! Cut down on panhandlers! Convince grafitti artists to stay out of dark alleys! Run for mayor! We sixteen year olds LOVED the idea.There was just one problem. The gang at Paramount had no intention of delivering on their promise. The ad campaign, like the title of the movie, was a fraud, and the only thing that got "taken" in this film was the money of a lot of bloodthirsty teenage dupes.First of all, the first 60 minutes of this 90-odd minute movie are not set in Manhattan, but  in Crystal Lake and then on a ship called the Lazarus (get it?) which is conveying the usual cargo of teenage acting-skool dropout slasher fodder on a graduation cruise to New York. Jason, accidentally revived from the depths of the Lake by a jolt of electricity, stows on board the ship and proceeds to ch-ch-ch, ha-ha-ha his way through the doltish grads and the suspiciously small crew until the survivors are pursuaded to take a rowboat to Manhattan Island. Unfortunately "Manhattan Island", with the exception of a couple of second-unit establishing shots, is largely an unimaginative-looking soundstage on the Paramount lot populated by Central Casting New Yawkers, including the usual mixed-race mugger team and an Irish cop who says things like, "Well, ye seem loike foine peeple, so I'll not be arresting ye."There is not a single scary moment in the whole film, and there are not even any particularly interesting kills. Kane Hodder's plodding, rotting, thoroughly over-rated Jason looks almost bored, as if he signed onto the cruise by accident, and then got talked into doing his mass murder shtick by the ship's entertainment director. To make up for the lack of any kind of suspense, the writers threw in a lot of gratuitous pleading for mercy from the female characters, and added nice little moments like a ship's crewmember talking warmly about his baby son right before Jason runs a harpoon through his body. Classy stuff, but really, everything about the movie is stupid, from the crazy deckhand who mumbles prophetically that the voyage is doomed (shades of Crazy Ralph), to the annoyingly cute little dog who has more acting talent than most of the victims. Hell, the climax of the film features a chase through the New York sewers, which, we are told, flood with radioactive toxic waste every midnight. (Does Rudy Guilani know about this?)I realize having expectations for a Jason movie is silly, but even by the cellar-low standards of the franchise, this flick is a ripoff, a fraud, a dreadful fake, utterly stupid, appallingly bad, useless, terrible, and horrible. ZERO STARS.
A Poor Example Of High Definition.... Disc Picture:As intended by the filmmakers, the stylized VC-1-encoded 1.85:1 HD DVD picture features differing color schemes depending on the location. The entire presentation is void of highly resolved fine details.Soundtrack:The Dolby Digital Plus 5.1-channel soundtrack is not overly exciting, although bass is delivered well through each of the channels, although the noise floor is low, dialogue and effects are generally well recorded, and the sound matches the storytelling nicely.
Miserable acting, horrible script, inane directing. What a mind-numbingly inept end chapter to a series that began with the greatest horror-comedy of all time, The Re-Animator.  Continuing in his deluded quest to claim the Re-Animator series for his own, and to convince us that he can direct, producer Brian Yuzna has managed the opposite.  Beyond Re-Animator merely confirms what was evident about the Yuzna-directed Bride of Re-Animator, that Yuzna knows nothing about directing actors and story.As with Dagon, Yuzna seems to have secured financing from Spanish sources for this film.  Unfortunately, the problem is that they also tried to force in a mostly Spanish cast.  This is a story set in Massachusetts, for crying out loud -- why would the warden of the prison, the reporter coming to cover the story, the guards, and a good 90 per cent of the inmates all have Spanish accents?  It wouldn't be as howlingly horrible if these guys could act, but they can't.  Simon Andreu as Warden Brando and Elsa Pataky as love interest Laura Olney get the most screentime of anyone in the cast, but their acting is so bad, and their ADR-afflicted lines so glaringly off, that they manage to sink the film every time they open their mouths.  Yuzna seems to pick his leading ladies based on their willingness to take off their clothes (witness the gratuitous "nurse nipple" scene in this film, or Fabiana Udenio and Kathleen Kinmont in Bride of Re-Animator), and Pataky makes for one of the most unsympathetic love interests I can remember.But even Pataky and Andreu pale in incompetence next to that blustery, seething mass of bad acting that is leading man Jason Barry.  Based on Yuzna's shoddy history with actors, one might be tempted to blame it on the director, but the fact is that in this film, Jason Barry is incapable of pulling off a single believable moment, basic elementary acting.  His every internal and external beat rings false, his dialogue delivery sounds like a cold reading, and even his basic body movements look like amateur theatre.  Most high-school students do better than this.  Jeffrey Combs as Herbert West, seasoned pro that he is, gamely plays along, but the script puts West's character so far off to the sideline in favour of the vomit-inducing Pataky-Andreu axis that Combs is unable to save this film.On a strictly technical level, the cinematography looks good, the score is all right (though often too serious-minded for its own good), and the film doesn't look low-budget.  But when the "story" is such a mess and the actors so inept, no amount of slick lighting and camera moves can save a film.  Yuzna really should stick with producing, because on the Stuart Gordon-directed Dagon, at least there were some good moments.  But Beyond Re-Animator is beyond salvaging, possibly the worst film sequel I've ever seen, and way up there in the list of worst films I've ever subjected myself to
Poor quality garbage. Let's make this quick -Several of these shorts are sourced from other vendor's dvds, specifically the "One Week" short, which only comes from one source. This may not be illegal, but it sure is a crummy thing to do to those good guys who actually source and restore silent films. Buy the Kino set of Keaton to support that kind of work.Several of these shorts are from inferior copies. They are also poorly encoded, so the quality suffers even more.And then there is a watermark in the corner, because, even though these are just copies of other people's productions, heaven forbid somebody copies these versions!! So you get to see a watermark during the entire set. Annoying. It's amazing that companies that have everything to lose when it comes to being copied won't put a watermark on THEIR dvds because they know that quality comes first, but some tinpot garbage vendor is willing to slap his logo all over the place.Don't bother. There is nothing worthy here. Get a different set from Image or Kino, who actually have done something worthwhile. And get me something to control my blood pressure while you are at it. Remember, I bought this so that you don't have to!!
Surprisingly bad. I bought this because it is made by Cannon Movie Tales and I love "Puss in Boots", which they also made.  Because "Puss in Boots" was so good, I thought this would be, too.  Alas, I was disappointed.  "Red Riding Hood" has almost no relation to the story we are all familiar with.  The plot in the actual fairytale is more of a parenthetical remark than the main story line in this movie.  Add to this that the acting was rather painful and the special effects were anything but special and you are left with 1 star.  The one thing it had going for it was that it was perfectly clean and not very scary for youngsters.  Since small children are easier to please in the cinematic area than adults, perhaps they would still enjoy this adaptation to "Little Red Riding Hood"
Worst movie I have seen in  a long time. There are dozens of clever, offbeat films worth watching, but this isn't one of them. Makes Pootie Tang look like an Oscar winner
Where's Richard Pryor when we need him?. eddie murphy is a comical guy, but is he really the right guy to play in something as stupid as this? Of course, who is the right guy for it? One of the questions i can't stand to think about in this movie, is how Dolittle hears the animals speak, but their lips move and nobody notices. Can't they connect the dots? Obviously not. And obviously, the filmmakers couldn't either
Don't buy this compilation...... These 3 movies are indeed landmark movies in Chinese Cinema and definetly for Jet li and Movie Kung fu.However, I watched 10 minutes of te first movie on this compilation which DOESN'T have english Subs ( I don't mind, but every other DVD I have ever seen has this )Also, in the first ten minutes, there have been 2 incredibly bad awkward translations. For some reason, Cousin Yi is now Aunt 13 and Chu's bird is now Chu's Beard. This is Crap. Do NOT buy this, buy the movies seperately, you can probably find them each for 9 bucks, and they would be more satisfying that way
Another Mess. This is not a review of this item, but the whole series.  Not only are the films in this bundle not all musicals, this bundle is sent intstead of the purchased bundle.  Until Amazon straightens out the mess in titles, forget ordering Alice Faye and Betty Grable bundles:  Particularly MARQUEE MUSICALS.
Turgid. Boring, plastic acting.  Considering some of the actors involved, I really would have expected better.  It must have been an easy pay day..  It's fairly obvious reading the other reviews that the Billy Zane/Timothy Dalton fanclubs have been on the prowl as well
very bad and poor. Sorry but i totaly disagree with all these positive reviews.I'm a fan of war classic films but this one is a mess.Nothing is moving,action is zero and filming is poor.we are very far away from dirty dozen,battle of the bulge,midway,enemy below etc....a total waste of time and money
Paris When It Fizzles. In 1964 when this movie came out in the theaters the reviews it got were not good.  I was 14 at the time and remember my mother reading about it in the newspaper, and the headline for this movie was "Paris When It Fizzles."  There was little chemistry between Hepburn and Holden.  When I finally saw the movie.  They were right.  I simply like both actors, mainly because I liked them in "Sabrina" but, like the critics said; it fizzled
Shatner's Ego Ruins the Show. The show is awkwardly charming at times, but William Shatner's greedy need to be a superhero with all the lines and all the action scenes drags the show down. I'm surprised he didn't demand the ability to fly on the show. Everytime a bad guy needs to get caught, Shatner sends his underutilized partner Adrian Zmed to do some menial chore, so he can be the hero (EVERY SHOW!). If this weren't bad enough, all the stories are basically the same; very uncreative. The show opens with the bad guys doing something bad, then Shatner and Zmed chase and lose them, then Shatner's superhero police skills slowly but surely lead him to the bad guys, then he tells Zmed to call for back up while he singlehandedly jumps on buses, grabs onto helicopters, uses sharpshooting skills, ju-jitsu skills, and his holier-than-thou speeches to get the "scumbags" and "maggots." If Adrian Zmed is lucky, he gets an action seen where he gets to tackle someone, or he gets shot in the arm by the bad guy. The show is totally ridiculous, totally repetetive, and simply a vehicle to propel William Shatner to Clint Eastwood-like status. I love the 80s, and I thought this would be good (I have good memories of it)...but it's pretty bad. Watch the pilot (it's very good), maybe the first 6 or 7 episodes (they're decent) and then move on to Airwolf or something.
Offset dialog screens. Story and picture quality aside, it is very annoying that the film seems to have been transferred off center. From the opening titles to the dialog boxes, anywhere from one to three letters of the printing are missing on the left side of the screen. I guess you get what you pay for
IF you paid a buck for this, then you paid 99c too much. Absolutely do not buy this video.1) The fights are not fights. they are boring and tiresome staged tapping, pushing and pulling matches. Nobody wants to hurt anyone, and nobody wants to get hurt.2)Jerry Springer fights are 10 times better than anything on this video. These girls keep their clothes on , and tussle like 4th grade girls at a sleepover.3)ModelFight.com has their name on the box and these girls are not model quality and they don't fight.4) The most violence these girls can conjure up is to giggle and smile into the camera and say "you better get out my room ! *smiling* *No, You get out !* says the other girl while pushing the other girl on the bed.Complete waste of time and money.You want chick fights, look elsewhere.
disapointed. Found this presentation very poor. After reading many of his books prior to seeing him deliver this speech, I was a greatly disappointed. It was a mumbled fumbled repetitive delivery with the most important facts obfusicated with a line like -I think you all know what im referring to here. I suggest read his books they are much better structured and more to the point. I give this dvd one star and repeat- read his books! dont be lazy and expect to get much out of this, I ask myself how can he be an MIT professor with such poor teaching skills, an off (ice) prof ?
A Real Drag. I saw this movie years ago, but didn't remember much about it, except some of the songs, and the basic story.  I also saw "Nights of Cabiria", from which the story was taken. I love musicals, and Ithink Shirley MacLaine is very talented.  She is very sweet as Charity Hope Valentine, and one can't help wanting a happy ending for her.  So why did I think this movie was awful? First of all, some of the dialogue was so repetitious it became irritating-- how many times can you listen to Charity say "Fickle finger of fate" over and over without wanting to hit the mute button?  Also, some of the scenes went on and on and on-- especially the elevator scene.  And-- the intermission was totally unnecessary. But the worst disappointment for me was the musical numbers. I didn't like any of them--- they were so far over the top as to be silly.  Bob Fosse must have thrown everything into them that he could--- instead of letting the dancers and the songs carry the numbers, he had so much busyness in all of them-- too many people, costumes that didn't fit the story, silly moves-- and they all went past the point of enjoyment.  I fast forwarded thrua couple of them just to get them over with.  I have never done that before with any movie. This could have been so much better-- the story was good, the charactors were good-- but the whole thing should have been toned down. The movie could have been 30 minutes shorter if there had been some trimming. It was entirely too long.   Also--- all that stop action-- what was that all about? I know, I know-- it was to show the progress of the story, but it was a distraction.I didn't like the movie and was glad when it was over.
Meet John Doe. I purchased this DVD a while ago - FYI - A documentary of the anaconda was in the case and not the movie.  I went to the web site to complain and my profile could not be found.  Here, years later, when I'm finally placing another through Amazon They found my account and noted that I purchased Meet John Doe.  I guess it's a little late to complain now
Based on a true story. I was surprised at the ending of this film that I didn't see the above caption at the beginning of the film. This movie to me was comparable to American television movies where something terrible happens to a family and how they cope with it. It was an Italian film, but on the whole it was of the same viewing quality as these movies, maybe a little less slick in appearance.Also some of the scenes were so banal. Like just before the boy drowns a sense of danger is created by the girl on the moped kicking one of her friends on another moped, the close passing of a truck as the father drives to his patient etc. Or when the boys' casket is nailed shut and is screwed shut interchanged with images of the mourning father. How fat can you lay it on?Especially the beginning of the movie is excruciating. A very one-dimensional portrait of the family, if they were black, they would be called the Huxtables. This is of course to offset the second part of the movie with the first. First routine and happiness, the second chaos and sadness.The above are just some things I noticed about the movie which didn't make sense to me. I won't even go into the storyline which is rather unplausible at some points even though it is completely predictable. What bothers me most though is that all of this must have been done on purpose, but why? The end result is a bland film which may have been made with a lot of care, but just doesn't come across. This is the first movie I have seen by this director. I have heard that his other movies are better. I hope so, because this film hasn't made a great impression on me
NL  BOMB !!!!!. I just purchased this film and viewed it.  It is the BIGGEST WASTE OF MONEY !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!Buyer beware !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!I Love National Lampoon, but this was not a hit.
0.5 STARS: "Final Joke" is more like it unfortunately. This movie should not be named "Final Terror", but should be named "Final Joke" instead because it sucks so bad.  First of all, I'm not one to criticize DVD transfers, but the picture quality is horrible with this DVD.  Second, this movie lacks cohesiveness and dexterity.  The scenes do not move well from one scene to the next...the movie has no fluidity and almost zero character development.  Also, there is ZERO suspense in this movie and no scares whatsoever...the directing is horrible as well because all of the scenes come off looking generic and wooden.  This movie lacks substance and style, and when I saw the killer, I burst out laughing because it was such a joke.  Despite some decent actors in this movie like Rachel Ward and Daryl Hannah, the movie fails in almost every respect.  The kills are lame when you can see what's going on, the production values are very poor and there is virtually no theatrical structure to this movie...it just does not flow well.  I wish I had not bought this trash, but I am on a mission to see every horror movie and I obviously have just about seen them all if I am looking to this kind of trash to find some decency in the obscurity of B-movie horror.
Read The Book. My first viewing of Fahrenheit 451 since its initial release in 1966 was last night via DVD.  Any casual film fan who watches will fall to sleep very fast. Based on the novel by Ray Bradbury, the clever idea of the future sets the stage for an interesting movie. The vehicle that the 451 unit drives is one of the most unusual devices science fiction will ever see.  The plot, the sound and the characters are all completely uninteresting, minus Montag, whom Oskar Werner plays very well.  The moment with the lady with the hidden library was probably one of the silliest examples of what books meant to some. FAHRENHEIT 451 may be considered a classic to some, but without a remake quick, this is a boring artifact to science fiction theater.In the future, the government outlaws books and promotes people to do nothing but watch TV and take drugs. Miserable firefighter Montag, set for a promotion in the 451 book burning unit, takes up the suggestion from a fellow monorail passenger to read a book. His life then goes upside-down from there.Skip the movie and read the book instead
poor adaption of excellent British product. Compared to the British series of the same title this is a very bad rip off.  The acting is of poor quality as well as the dialogue.  I would not waste my dime on this, instead I would get the original
A young Vanity - nude - weird movie. This is a very bizarre movie.  Some Ape creature becomes friends with Vanity on an island where only she and her lover are.  Her lover becomes jealous and then later the Ape creature and he battle over Vanity.  Appears to be a dream.  Vanity is cute and nude in the movie, but she hardly looks like herself.  Very odd movie, if you are looking for Vanity nude, you are better off getting a copy of 52 pickup a better movie or Action Jackson.  She shows skin in both.  Here she does have a full frontal scene, but it is not all that long anyway
Dissapointed. 'If these walls could talk' was dissapointing. It was too disjointed for me to gat any real understanding of the message. I would not suggest any of my peers to purchase the dvd
The Chopped it up. We saw the movie in the theatre and loved it. The DVD we just purchased was horrible. They chopped out so much of the movie it made it un-watchable. It is only good for a coaster under my drink now
Unadvisable. I thought I was going to see something of Roy Orbinson.  It was only in the title of the name.  I could not watch it when it became vulgar with offensive material.  It is too bad to have a good story with great actors lowering its potentially good quality with such degrading vulgarity. There are better ways of getting this aspect of the story across with such depiction.  Silly me, I should have checked the rating.  I "assumed" it safe as it would involve our beloved Roy Orbinson.  I was sadly and horridly disappointed and cannot in conscience recommend it to anyone at anytime.  By the way,I destroyed the tape in good conscience.  Watch at your own eternal risk
Don't waste ur money. Buying this would not make sense if you A. Bought Batman The Animated Series: Volume One or B. Batman TAS The Legend Begins. If you have one or the other and hopefully not conned by Warner to buy both and think you would want this then you would have 2 and if ur that rare case of ones who bought BOTH A. and B. then you would have 3 Christmas' with Joker. Now I would urge you to buy Volume One and later 2 then to go question yourself if you have this episode and why is this episode on both DVD's. Be safe and read before you buy
1.75 STARS: It's hard to give this movie any credit. After watching "Anthropophagus- The Grim Reaper", I came away with mixed feelings.  On the one hand, "Anthropohagus" had its moments (albeit quite few) where it was somewhat chilling.  The Anthropohagus, himself, was rather effectively creepy as a horror movie villain.  Some scenes did fairly well building up to a moment of horror, but the problem is that these effective moments of horror are few and far between.  Unfortunately, the majority of this movie is beset with horrible acting and a very cheaply made horror movie, and for some reason, it is just very difficult to get over this fact in "Anthropophagus" probably because these weaknesses are so glaring."Anthropophagus" may even have outdone itself with some of the gore scenes, so the gore-hound shouldn't be disappointed with this flick.  However, with that being said, "Anthropophagus" simply is not all that scary except for the few moments that deliver a scare or two to the audience, and even those moments are fairly pedestrian when compared to the classic horror movies we have come to know and love.  Ultimately, what you have in "Anthropophagus" is horrible acting, a poorly written screenplay, uneven and poorly developed plot and action, below average plot execution, just a couple of scary moments, some laughable scenes, a fairly decent amount of gore and an absolutely disgusting, deplorable and depraved scene of violence (fetus scene) that really crosses all boundaries of horror movies that I've ever seen and which really offers nothing as far as the merits of the movie are concerned and certainly offers nothing to cinematic horror.  If that kind of thing appeals to you, this could be right up your alley, but it doesn't do much for me.  I would rather find a really compelling storyline and a scary movie that delivers atmospheric tension, suspense and a scary story, and you simply do not get that in "Anthropophagus".  To answer a few questions that could be asked about this movie...did "Anthropophagus" bother me? No.  Did I think it was scary?  Certainly not, laughable at some points in the movie but not scary, and nor did I find it disturbing.  However, it can certainly be said that what else do you expect from a low-budget Italian-made horror flick? Touche!In my search for a great horror movie lost in the annals of cinematic horror like a needle in a haystack, what did I find in "Anthropophagus" but another shock and gore horror movie with horrible acting and a barely watchable storyline.  Indeed, it is very difficult to give this movie any credit.  A word of advice, if you have to try to make yourself like a horror movie even after repeated viewings (like I did with this one), it probably just sucks.  For all intents and purposes, that is the case with "Anthropophagus-The Grim Reaper".  Nevertheless, sadly, I've seen much, much worse.
Avoid. DO NOT BUY THIS MOVIE. Sounds good on paper but throughout the whole film, NOTHING HAPPENS. Unfortunately, I kept waiting for the payoff. Believe me, there isn't one
All lies, an attack on america... For what purpose these lies about the life of this man? Are the liberal film makers racists who don't believe that there is a good black man to depict on film so they have to lie? If someone wanted to write fiction about a badass black fighter on the cusp of super stardom who is framed for a murder then be my guest. Hurricane carter is not and was not that man.Facts:In the movie denzel washington is shown in military garb with more medals on his cheat than colin powell. They want to drive home the point that here was a man who served his country and is now about to be screwed by it. Fact is carter was kicked out of the army after being court mashalled 4 times!In a title fight scence with an italian american fighter named giodello carter is depictied as beating this man pillar to post only to be screwed out of the decision he so richly deserved. Fact, giardello deserved to win that fight according to the overwhelming number of experts who have viewed it then and now on tape. The depitction is another lie.Another lie is this notion put forth in the movie that hurricane was on the verge of getting that title before mean white bigots framed him for this murder. Fact is that carter's boxing career was going down hill and he had only won 8 of his last 15 fights. As carter's boxing career failed he became more militant in his political views and hated white people. While in prison he was diagnosed to be psychotic. Yeah a psychotic racist is the model for black america. Shame.Norman jewison must not think much of black folks to make a movie of lies like this. Denzel washington should be ashamed he participated in such trash. Those who produced this trash bet that the average public would be gullible enough to believe these lies with no attempt at knowing the truth and hollywood didn't care; they just like the message. Looking at these reviews i have to say they made a good bet. America bashing and race baiting is alive and well, earning oscars and making for big box office. A shame.
Gag me with a spoon!!!. I found this film to be a total waste of otherwise good talent.  It should be rated X.  I didn't know "Johnny" could stoop so low.  It made me want to barf!!
Utterly Bizarre. When Alejandro Jodorowsky's debut Fando y Lis was originally released back in 1967, a full-scale riot broke out in the audience, the director barely escaped the theater with his life, and the film was banned. That has got be the best, most intriguing publicity I have ever heard of any picture receiving. Of course, when I heard about this, I simply had to see it. I mean, what could this film possibly contain that could provoke such an extreme reaction?After watching it, I honestly have to say that I really don't know.Fando y Lis is by far the strangest, most bizarre film I have ever seen. There is no cohesive narrative, no coherent style, and in the end, no real point. The movie feels like some incredibly strange spawn of The Texas Chainsaw Massacre (1974), Eraserhead, and 8 1/2, though it is very different (and far more bizarre) than any of those films. This is an art house flick, through and through. Fiercely experimental and filmed on a shoestring budget, its unbelievably loose (almost non-existent) plot follows Fando and his half-paralyzed girlfriend Lis as they search a wasteland inhabited by hoards of...erm...interesting characters for the mythical city of Tar, a paradise on Earth. Or are they even on Earth? In this film, nothing is for certain.When one watches an obtuse art film such as Fando y Lis, one's first reaction is most likely to try and decipher it and unlock its "message" or "meaning", so to speak. However, there is no such thing in Fando. Jodorowsky himself said that he finds what he doesn't understand to interest him the most, so in reality, no one is going to understand this film, because I'm not really even sure there is anything to understand.That said, there are still some rather intriguing visuals and scenes in Fando, such as an incredibly striking sequence involving black paint (at least I think it's black paint - the black and white cinematography makes it hard to tell). Actually, this brings me to the point of the cinematography, which, in my opinion, is the most unsettling aspect of the film. Though it was filmed in the 1960s, the black and white is bleached and brightened to an uncomfortable degree, giving one the impression that the film was shot in 1920s. For some reason, it gives the whole picture something of a disturbing aura.Unfortunately, the fact that this is Jodorowsky's first film really shows. The whole thing seems more like a big experiment than anything else, and some rather amateur editing and borderline laughable sequences ruin a lot of the interesting segments. That's not to say the film is without worth; it makes for a rather interesting watch. But overall, it just feels like a heavily experimental student film with no real purpose. It can be hard to sit through occasionally, but at 93 minutes, it doesn't drag for too long, and it is worth viewing if only for its historical value
It really sucked. Horror movies are a dime a dozen now, and nothing really speical about them anymore. Sad to say, considering its probably my faviorte genere. This movie was a disappointment from the start. Whoever did editing on this movie needs to be fired. I mean they are standing there talking, and it just cuts away when you think something is going to happen. I didnt watch the whole movie, it sucked that bad. I bought this movie used, and I'd gladly give it back to the owner free of charge.
The American President. Great movie, excellent acting!  Annette Benning is priceless as the love interest in this film about a widower in the White House.  He seeks a relationaship with an environmental lobbyist, of all things, and though their relationship is open and above board, the politicians use it against the incumbent during his run for reelection.  Politics are ugly, but truth prevails in this optimistic movie.  My husband and I love this one and we have watched it many times.  We always love the ending because we enjoy love winning and truth being stronger than bad politics.  Easily one of my favorites.
the unspeakable. Utterly predictable plot and indulgently plodding direction sink this movie.  I happened to watch it soon after seeing MYSTERIOUS SKIN, which features the same issue, same state (Dorothy wouldn't recognize Kansas, though the various Capote movies would), some similarly indulgent editing in the cereal scene, but in contrast to THE UNSAID is worth a visit.  HUFF blows this paltry meller out of the water
Makes Plan 9 From Outer Space seem like Shakespeare. What a great cast!  I mean looking at this line up you just have to watch this movie, right?  After it starts it is so mesmerizingly awful that you still have to watch it, although you are shaking your head in disbelief!  Stunning!  You've never seen anything quite like it!  If you are a fan of the campy awful, you may see it as a masterpiece, if not you will still have a unique viewing experience.Proceed at your own risk!  Borrow or rent it before plunking down your hard earned cash to buy it.Did I mention the great cast?  So many of my favorites...even Goodman can't save this clunker
Represents an ad nauseam theme of post-60s Hollywood. Like so many Hollywood movies -- especially anything made after the late 60s, when America's teen-agers and collegiate students started taking their typically youthful antiestablishmentarianism with them into the future -- this is another passionate rage against the allegedly oppressive machine.  See The Shawshank Redemption, see Dead Poet's Society, see With Honors -- filmdom's lock-step march against authority is a mainstay of the past three or four decades.  Naturally, this movie is revered as something of a paragon if not a modern pioneer of the trend.  In regular Hollywood fashion, Nurse Ratched (the chief antagonist) and the cuckoos' restrictive environment are portrayed with just enough ambiguity to deflect charges that the movie is a paranoid feast for leftist sensibilities -- which it is, of course.  Unlike most fare of this sort, it is at least very competently crafted (the director and the actors sympathize with the source material enough to give it their all), which no doubt explains how it won one or two more of those little golden trophies than it would have gotten otherwise.  -- M. Cooper
Can i not give a no star??. BAD, BAD, BAD.... Does not deserve the one star i gave it. poor acting, cheesy lines and a dismal plot. Infact I found this film so intresting that half way through I reallised that I had missed 10mins while thinking about a good film!
Poor movie. Well as if this movie wasn't yet another lame attempt at portraying Jesus wasn't bad enough the acting and production is one of the worst ever.   The real blunder is what seems to be the norm in these movies, like The Passion, Jesus of Nazareth, is that it bring you up to the cross, then takes maybe a step after, then "blink" the movie is over.    As if this was just another senseless murder that has gone on through history.Look, if your going to make a movie about a man who, its clear if you just read his story in the gospels, clearly said he came to die, and that everything "everything" that he is focusing on while here on earth is all about the resurrection.The gospels are only the start of the New Testament, then it goes on was longer after that.    With plenty of information and stories about after the resurrection.Now, you don't have to believe in it, that is your free will.But this is "His" story, and how it's told.    So if you're going to do a movie on "Him" then you can't just clip out one half.The Cross is one half; the resurrection is the other half.You can't have one without the other.It's as simple as that.Do it right or leave it alone.( ps, if you want to really laugh and I mean really bust a gut, see "the Green Pastures"  its just out on DVD.   look it up here in amazon.   I found this on accident and well, its about a black heaven, and its made along time ago, but its so wordy, you will have to stop the dvd all the time because because you are laughing so hard you miss what they say next.  I wrote a big review on it.  I was nearly on the floor nearing the end of the movie, and have had to watch it several times just to take it all in. )
Edited to Death. I remember seeing this movie when it first came out; I was intrigued to find it on DVD. However the DVD edition has been edited so harshly that it has totaly trashed the context of the story. I didn't recognize what I was watching; yes the great desert scapes are still there but the story and plot have been destroyed by the editor
Nope-Nada ... won't play on mine, either. The first HD disk that I can't watch. I can't even get to the Image Entertainment website, today, to see what's wrong with it. This is the first product I have ever had to send back to Amazon ... a real Xmas bummer. :
In a word: horrid. It pained me to sit through this movie and I would have turned it off after the first ten minutes if I didn't have to write a comparative analysis between it and Shakespeare's "Othello." The writing is terrible, the acting is so-so, the music is the pits, there is WAY too much emphasis on race, and the relationship between Odin and Desi is a joke. I'm supposed to believe he went stark-raving mad over a girl he had been dating for four months? Give me a break--I ended up laughing through the majority of this movie simply because it was so bad. This is teenaged melodrama at its worst
1 Star because it SUCKS!!. Why would you get this haphazard DVD with only six cartoons cut and censored, while you can get the 32 cartoon, uncut, uncensored, AND Bonus Features in the Walt Disney Treasures Series.  Save your money on this one, and look around for the Mickey Treasures.  Horrible
Waste of time. I got this film because I'm from Detroit where this takes place. It's a pretty typical revenge flick. Four brothers want to find their adoptive mother's killer. Usual smartass remarks, guys talking BS, fights, shootouts, blah, blah, blah. I guess these kind of movies will always be made and when made well they can be fun to watch. This script was mediocre at best. Give me a Clint Eastwood or Bruce Willis film any day over this tripe.
Couldn't be much worse... Oh no it's a soft porn! Nothing worse than a creature of nature movie gone wrong...Actually I rented the damn thing because I thought it was about sharks. Guess I should actually look at the box next time right? I saw Lake Placid so I figured&quot;okay, no big deal...&quot; well, it sucked anyways, so it wouldn't have mattered if there had been sharks. Good thing was the gators could chase the bad actors..hahaha. Skip this one. Even if you LOVE alligator/croc movies. Trust me. Try Komodo instead
Hilarious! Oh...it's not a comedy???. There is so much wrong with this movie that I don't know where to begin, so let's start with the obvious; why is Keanu Reeves in this movie? Who thinks this robot can deliver any credibility in any movie? Winona Ryder is equally horrid and her role is that much more vital. Her gasping doe-eyed schtick is woefully inadequate to convey the power and allure of the woman Vlad pledges unending blood lust in search of. Furthermore, were there no Brits that could play these two roles or were British accents really necessary at all? If so, why in the name of Bumblebee Man did they have to use these wankers who can't keep one going consistently? Gary Oldman - an actor whose work I usually enjoy - is sadly over the top in a role that cries out for subtlety, especially when you consider how much of a cliche this character has become. His garbled accent and the hokey theatrics make me want to giggle more than stay engaged. In fact, my sixteen year old daughter and I cracked up so many times throughout this that you'd have thought we were watching a comedy...and that's not a compliment. There is just so much to laugh at and mock...On the plus side, I thought Coppola's back story of the romance and all was interesting, but in the end, who cares? It is nearly impossible to immerse yourself in the story because Reeves, Ryder, Oldham, and Hopkins are so wretched that you end up wishing it was a comedy - it works better on that level. If you want a good untraditional vampire movie, go rent The Hunger instead.
Beware 25 years old does not mean it is tame for kids. I purchased this movie as it was labeled an epic film and someone even compared it to the best love story since Gone with the Wind.  Give me a break!This movie had an agenda 25 years ago, and it still comes across that way in 2006.The rating of PG is a joke.  Please do not watch this movie with your kids!  It is certainly has a more mature theme than what you would think.The plot is lame and I am sorry I spent the money on it.  I plan to get rid of the movie and exchange it as used somewhere where I can get something that is entertaining, this certainly was not.  I did not even reach the end of the first disc before turning it off.For top names in the industry making this film, all I can say is they got paid a lot of money for nothing.
a no-talent director & no-talent stars make a mockery of johnny cash. i had given this a second star, but then i thought to myself: why? this movie is abominable. its not just the amateurish performance by joaquin phoenix as johnny cash -- i never thought anyone could sing flatter than the REAL cash -- or the squeaking by reese witherspoon as june carter. its the whole damned show! how often have you ever seen a musical when the songs actually STOPPED the action (i can only think of richard attenboroughs dreadful interpretation of "a chorus line")? but the REAL villain here is james mangold, the director who previously gave us that alltime classic "girl interrupted". its bad enough that hacks are given millions of dollars to make movies, but i urge you to listen to this guys commentary on the dvd; he is a pretentious jerk who honestly believes he has made a significant work of art. at least the hacks in old hollywood knew they were hacks and were willing to work within their weaknesses, thus often turning out fine professional work. this guy mangold is a moron -- the technique of a buffoon and the limited talent of an ed wood (without the freak show imagination). i cut this down from 2 stars to 1 because i resent that i gave up a few hours of my life to watch this stupid unprofessional ugly movie!
Historically---but not comically---significant Chaplin. This 1914 film is considered the first feature-lenth comedy ever made and, as such, is worth viewing just for that.  The film on its merits, however, is less interesting. Sure, this is slapstick, but I personally found the Tillie character to be quite ridiculous; ridiulous, moreover, without being particularly amusing. She's made up to look like---and seemingly acts like---a guy in drag pledging a fraternity.  Marie Dressler, then 45 years-old, playing such a supposedly youthful character as "Tillie", to boot, is less comical than it is distracting.  If you are going to take the time to see this film, in other words, you ought be doing so simply to see a historically significant film.  So, no, it's not a film you'll most likely want to own and watch again and again, unless you're simply enamored by anything and everything Chaplin has done. If you haven't seen anything by Chaplin don't start here! And if you are a discerning Chaplin fan you'd be better served (if you care to be amused) by sampling some of his much greater efforts.  For the curious, I offer a brief synopsis of Tillie's Punctured Romance: "What's this he's got---one of Ringling's elephants?"  So remarks Mabel Normand's character (so to speak, in this silent film) as she spies Chaplin's 'City Guy' arm in arm with "Built like a battleship" Tillie.  Tillie has "got a bankroll as thick as herself", Chaplin's character later explains to Normand, his old partner in crime.  Then once successful in lifting said cash from Tillie, Chaplin flees with Normand.  Upon hearing of Tillie's apparent inheritance of 3 million dollars soon after, however, he returns to her and begs Tillie to marry him ASAP.  They later whoop it up with many quests (with Normand working as hired help) at a celebratory party at Tillies's "new" home, until her uncle---thought dead---returns to claim it back, throwing them out into the street as he does so.  A keystone-cops-like chase ensues all through town and seaside along a boardwalk and then ends with Normand and (a soaking wet) Tillie agreeing that Chaplin's favor is hardly worth pursuing anyway. Curtain. Cheers!
a crappy movie from a crappy time. GA. how can anyone stand this drivel? worst movie i ever watched repeatedly. worse than watching "walk tall" 8 times in a row. worse even than watching the home shopping network. eww. EWW
fake "Dog Whisperer" - studious ignorance. Cesar Milan, the so-called 'dog whisperer', bases his training methods on a dog behavior model that is so out of date as to be archaic - from the dinosaur age. He teaches that dogs base all their behavior on their pack status, and that you need to use painful 'corrections' to convince them that you are Alpha. This idea hasn't the slightest shred of evidence going for it.Yes, dogs do have dominance roles, but that hasn't the slightest thing to do with problem behaviors. Dogs do 'bad' doggy behaviors because they work. Dog guards his food bowl? Dog wants to keep food and knows that growling keeps you away. Dog pulls on the leash? Dog wants to get somewhere faster and knows that pulling speeds things up. The dog doesn't care whether or not you're alpha; he only cares that what he's doing works to get him what he wants.Technically, Cesar's methods work. But they use force, fear, and pain to teach the dog, when you can teach the same things faster with the proper positive motivation and non-forceful techniques. I have three hyper, active, highly driven Border Collies, and they're all very obedient and mannerly. They don't haul me around the leash, nor do they leap at guests, nor do they ignore me when I tell them something. And I don't need to be 'Alpha' to get them that way; neither does anyone else.I strongly suggest that you don't buy this item. Good books to start with are Karen Pryor's 'Getting Started: Clicker Training for Dogs', Melissa Alexander's 'Click for Joy!' (also with a great problem solving section), and Jean Donaldson's 'The Culture Clash'. You can easily have a happy, obedient, well behaved dog without causing him fear and pain
Great Acting Ruined By Politics. Stellar performances by all actors and actresses involved in this movie are ruined by the sheer ignorance of the topic. Not one single "fact" about guns contained in this movie was true and at the end of the film I had nothing but an overwhelming feeling that the bad guys had clearly won. What a crock
Very Poor Quality DVD. Love the movie, but the quality of the DVD put out by Alpha Video was so bad it was very difficult to watch. The sound was scratchy and muffled and the picture looked as if the brightness was turned all the way up. If you don't want to be disappointed and feel like you've been ripped off, wait for the remastered cut before you buy this one
Poorest Ashley Judd movie ever... I am a huge Ashley Judd fan, but this movie was the most disappointing movie I have watched in ages!  I would not recommend this movie to anyone I know and it is not even rental worthy in my book
Emerald33. If I had seen this in the movies, I would have walked out and asked for a refund.  It was indescribably terrible.  I returned this DVD because I really, really didn't like what I saw
Poor delivery from Allen and his cast. Match Point may offer a change of locale and style for Woody Allen but it does nothing to redress the continuing decline of his work. It's not bad, more flat, partially because of some awkward dialogue (Allen really doesn't have an ear for the British dialects, going either for Dick Van Dyke or Medieval King-speak) and some uninspiring lead performances. Social climbing tennis pro Jonathan Rhys Myers, the poor man's Jude Law, says all his lines correctly and with almost perfect diction without ever convincing there's anything but an actor who'll never fulfil his early promise underneath, but it's Scarlet Johannson who is the film's most surprising casualty as a struggling actress. Faced with such awkwardly on the nose dialogue and such a stock character, she visibly flounders for much of the first half of the film as if cast adrift by a director afraid of interfering with the actors by ever directing them no matter how apparent it is that they need help. Supporting players are mostly left to do their best with one-note parts to varying degrees of success (Matthew Goode, Ewan Bremner Alexander Armstrong), laziness (Brian Cox, Paul Kaye) and embarrassment (James Nesbitt and a startlingly inept Colin Salmon). The second half does improve, though there's the definite feeling that Allen is dodging the issue in the potentially promising but unintentionally laughable closing scenes, and some of the dialogue is painfully amateur. With its shades of A Kiss Before Dying via the Martin Landau plot strand of Crimes and Misdemeanors but without the interesting bits, this never really feels quite like a proper movie. A bit of a plodder.
Gilbert Gottfried:  Dirty Jokes. Absolutely filthy. The title indicates jokes but there is nothing in here that resembles a joke. It is a continual litany of filthy statements. I am sorry I purchased this and only give it a 1 star because that is the lowest choice. I would give it a 0 or lower
Different yet Hollywood ruined it. I am kind of in the middle of the other reviewers.  It DID have a "different" and unpredictable story line.  i took it that he was dreaming, since the state names and money werent real.  the kid was great.  the problem, as usual, is Hollywood ruined it...what could have been a great movie my kids could watch, they throw in a sex scene in the kid's car back seat while he is sitting next to the car, and then of course they have to have the kid throw in a couple of "F" words.  And of course Hollywood doesnt let us who object to that buy a version that has that edited, or permit DVD players that allow you to skip those parts.  if it wasnt for the trash above, i would give it 4 stars for its uniqueness.  If you are morale and have children, you dont want this movie
Rent this movie before you buy it. I know that everyone wants to hear how great a movie is.  Well, I can't say The Thin Red Line is a great movie.  On a scale of 1-5 I gave it a 2.Maybe my expectations were too high.  After all, I bought this movie after watching Band of Brothers, Saving Private Ryan, and A Bridge Too Far.  So, I was expecting The Thin Red Line to be on that level.  After all, with 7 Academy Award Nominations including Best Picture, a cast that includes many of the top names in Hollywood, and a huge budget, the bar was set pretty high.And I guess if you're into artsy, "message" films The Thin Red Line will be what you're looking for.  But, if you're looking for a "war" movie you can forget it.  Buy When Trumpets Fade or Saving Private Ryan if you're looking for action.  Or better yet, splurge for the Band of Brothers set.  You'll seldom make such a wise investment if you're really interested in knowing what happened.  I'm just not interested in watching a World War 2 movie that appears more interested in all this sort of introspective business.  Save that for Dr. Phil.I've warned you.  If you're into history and World War 2 in particular, rent this before you buy it.  Seriously.
Seasons are on DVD. I didn't buy this pilot episode, but wasn't this the first episode in Season 1?  I've been reading the reviews of certain items and wanted to let everyone know that you can buy the seasons on DVD at http://www.quantumdvds.150m.com/bhillsdesc.htm I can tell you it's not cheap, but you get all 10 seasons.  It's worth checking out.  If you're a true fan and if you're watching the season in re-runs on FX
tisk tisk tisk. I am truly shocked that there are people out there that thought this movie good, and for saying it could be a reality? I mean the plot of this movie is sooooooooo pathetic it was almost enjoyable to watch. But the dog jumping the police cars, and climbing trees, swallowing a cat whole, and turning colors so well that it became invisible, were pathetic. this movie would be enjoyable to those who like really bad horror/sci-fi films. I would only recommend it to watch so you could see how stupid it is
Same as the HBO special. It is minus a few changes the same as his other one
Robbed my time. Burglar is your typical D movie.  It has more bads than goods.  Actually, it has a ton of bads.  When I sat down to watch this film, I didn't expect Oscar worthy material.  But, I did expect something that would at least halfway amuse me or even keep my interest.  I didn't get either of them.  Yes, the acting was all right.  Whoopie Goldberg is a great comedic actress, but she should really be a little choosier when it comes to picking what movies to be in.  Burglar moved at a snails pace, and that is putting it lightly.  There were way too many coincidences.  There would just happen to be a bag with valuables in it laying around, or there would just by pure coincidence be a motorcycle with the keys in it parked in an alley practically yelling at you to be stolen.  Also, the directing was terrible.  The director did not explain things well at all.  The only reason I stuck around to the end was because to see if my prediction of who the killer was right.  And of course, I was right.  The plot was paper-thin.  I don't like a movie when I know the ending a quarter into the film.  Overall, Burglar is a definite waste of time that now has the title of &quot;most predictable movie ever.&quot;  1 Sta
Super Troupers review. Too much conversation mixed in with tunes .A concert DVD should be music performed on stage with conversations at the end as an extr
ughhh!!! shave them 'pits Kate. they be stinkin'!!!. movie was fairly boring.Beckinsale is also pretty dumb.What kinda actress doesn't shave her armpits when she knows she has to do a nude scene.A total turnoff!!
Looks Like he Didn't Make It. I have say that I am pretty disapointed in the over all production of the DVD. It would never stand up against the David Mallet attention to detail of the "Music and Passion" DVD.  First of all the video is way over saturated thoughout because the concert is not really lite for television at all. At best it's a 4 or 5 camera shoot with no crowd flybys or jib shots. It looks worse if you watch it on an HD monitor. The audio is even worse than the video. It sounds like they took a 2 channel board mix and attempted to peel off a 5.1 surround mix which is not very clean. The audio is very thin with a weak mid-range and a very poor bass mix. I had to crank my sub-woofer all the way up just to hear the bass and it still is not that great. Finally, Barry Manilow in the round is really nothing to watch. I love him and would rather see the band behind him rather then in a pit off stage. He looks alone and the composition of the shots are flat and unbalanced. He also looks uncomfortable because it.The production numbers are hard to watch and average at best. Dave Koz is big help on "Brooklyn Blues" but hard to see because they never throw a spotlight on him. At least not a good one.Barry is strong as ever though. I guess I got my 13 dollars worth but given the chance to but this DVD again knowing what I now, I wouldn't buy it.  Sounds like I'm a snob but I'm not. I'm spoiled on HD and have high television standards. Quality sound and video are a must these days.I hope he teams up with David Mallet again. I'll buy that DVD.Sorry Barry. This one just doesn't stand up to the others.S.
A Must-See for Miike Fans . . . Others Should Proceed with Caution . . . I am a big fan of Miike's work. "Happiness of the Katakuris" is an irresistible, charming work of art. Similarly, "Audition" is a chilling cautionary-tale. But "Ichi the Killer" is not as engaging as Miike's other films . . . many people will try to convince you otherwise though:)Foremost, it must be noted that much of the gore is laughable (intentionally) . . . the face sliding down the wall, the tongue being severed, the pimp being "split" . . . funny stuff, I admit!! Moreover, it does not appear that Miike was overly concerned about these moments appearing "realistic" (most of his films have a "dreamlike" quality). Granted, the suspension scene and subsequent scalding solicited a fairly visceral response . . . which was pretty impressive! One other aspect of the film is ALL TOO REAL . . . check IMDB for a horrific bit of trivia on the opening sequence!! (I cannot mention it here!!)I noticed that some people are complaining about the over-dubbing. Leave it to Americans to select the over-dubbing option!! When you select over-dubbing, you obscure artist-intent . . . you destroy the tone of the film . . . if you are watching a film in a language with which you are unfamiliar, it is your obligation to READ the subtitles. So, stop embarrassing the rest of us and click that "subtitle" button.The plot is pretty convoluted (which is not necessarily a failing point), so it may require more than one viewing . . . or, at the very least, pay close attention during the initial screening. SPOILER: Nonetheless, the plot is a bit of a Palahniuk rehash. So, the ending should not surprise the viewer (even though it was intended to).This is a tough call. While many claim this piece is "one of the most violent films in existence," they fail to acknowledge that Miike's work is amusing (again, intentionally!!) So, it is not that this is a TENSE film that has you on "the edge of your seat."  Personally, I thought it was a little tedious (I actually fast-forwarded through segments).I gave this film one star . . . simply because I feel it would be dishonest to inflate the rating. It is not a "good" film by any set of standards (even unconventional ones!!) STILL, if you love Miike's other films, watch this one . . . just so you can see this man's tremendous RANGE!! And so you can engage in this debate!
Best show ever, but DVD has problems!. I bought this the day it came out and watched a couple of episodes without incident and then began watching "The Bend In The River" when the problems started. At 1 hour 10 minutes and 43 seconds into the episode right when Hannibal says "sure" the dvd just stopped and went to the main menu. The rest of the episode was missing...it just stopped so I tried it out on two other dvd players I have here and then figured I got a bad copy and went up to the store to exchange it. Well, once I got it home the second one did the same exact thing, so I exchanged it a third time. The third copy actually plays through the episode but freezes for about 5 seconds in the exact same place that the others were messed up. I haven't even gotten to the other 5 DVD's but my assumption from reading the reviews here is that they are going to have problems too.I can't understand how they release these seasons of the A-Team so painfully slow at Universal and can let something with this many errors reach the stores. In the 10 months since the release of Season 2 could they not have had some type of quality control make sure that the Season 3 DVD's actually played?This release has absolutely no bonus features unlike the Columbia House collectors edition ones, which have some outtakes and other things. And I have to wonder with this release just like the other two seasons why can they not put chapters in where the commercial breaks are instead of having to fast forward to get back to the spot I left off? Just like Season 2 these are double sided DVD's which scratch very easily and make all kinds of noises in the DVD player, I would have liked 6 single sided DVD's much better. And one last problem is that when you put the DVD you absolutely have to watch the Universal Studios introduction for about 10 seconds because you cannot skip it and access the menu.There are two good things I can say about this release the first being that it's the A-Team, which is the best television show of all time and this is probably my favorite season. The second good thing is that a coupon is enclosed for $5 off of Season 4 when it gets released. To have released this Season with this many errors and problems on the DVD's is an insult to A-Team fans everywhere who have waited 20+ years to buy this on DVD. Universal needs to recall all of them and issue working copies.Update: I have just gotten off the phone with Universal and they have said that they will replace the DVD for me and others who are having problems. You can call them at 972-293-5903 or email ushe.consumerrelations@worldmarkinc.com and put A-Team Season 3 replacement in the subject line. I have added a star to my review since they're customer service was friendly and returned my call promptly, but I have still subtracted a star for each trip I have made to the store.
Doris Day and Danny Thomas and music. Doris Day works for a sheet music company where singers look for new music and where songs are published.  Danny Thomas is a down-on-his-luck, persistant lyric writer who tries to persuade Doris to at least see his music.  He then shows up at her home.  Boy, what a pest.  But she does like one song, quits her job and helps him get a song published.   Not even Doris Day in "black face" can save this film.  Fast moving, but not the best film for Doris Day and not the best of Danny Thomas.  Mary Wickes and Jim Backus also in the cast. The young children Robert Lyden and Bunny Lewbel are a delight
Creationism masquerading as science. How is it that an abundant and continually-growing body of testible and reproducible evidence (what we call real science) that continues to indicate conceptual errors to much of the biblical (old testiment), evangelicals and neo-cons continue to try to dilute science with pseudoscientific babble.Non-sequiturs in relatively good presentations about the marvels of the universe suddenly are 'proof' that we could only be on this designed planet.  How one jumps from explaining the historical context of expanding discoveries of thousands of stars, to millions, to millions of millions of potential planetary systems to 'this is the only one created for life -- and us' seems to be turning a blind eye to the math suggestions that directly counter Ross' conclusions.  This isn't just pseudoscience, it is bad science.  In effect, the narration attempts to teach that science is about jumping to conclusions with little regard to facts.  That should be left to politics and religions.  It is all well-and-good to promote one's faith, but don't pretend that science is validating personal myths.  Woolly thinking of this nature insults both the faith and the science -- might pass for entertainment, 'though
1 of the 8 films to die for...out of boredom!. I generally steer clear of low-budget horror in that those films, while trying to be cutting edge, usually smack of just "trying"...too hard.  I gave "The Hamiltons" a go since it received the most hype.  Wasn't impressed.  Yes, the ending has a nice little twist, and I was intrigued by seeing Lenny--although once the twist happened it was easy to see it coming--the film lacks dramatic tension, contains mundane dialogue (victim: "help me"; predator [whining]: "I can't!), and characters are pretty much stock caricatures. 86 minutes drrrraggged by.
Spaced Out Reviewers. I usually trust Amazon reviewers on movie reviews, but this time ....NO WAY!   This silly, totally predictable film left us playing with the cat for our evening entertainment, hoping the movie would liven up.  Sadly, it didn't. To those who rave about the film...you must be in another dimension or something.  Thumbs DOWN.
Movies like this make you ask, WAS THIS SEQUEL REALLY NECCESSARY. The original Jungle Book was inventive, whitty, uplifting and charming.  The characters had depth and a beauty that in its time was unique and wonderful.  The original Disney Jungle Book story was told with great feeling that was a source of fun and inspiration to me growing up as an autistic child.  I can honestly say the original Disney Jungle Book movie was the only movie I loved that also touched my heart.Jungle Book 2 is is just a very badly executed attempt at recreating the awesomeness of the The original Disney Jungle Book.  Jungle Book 2 fails in all attempts to recreate any of the magic of the original Disney Jungle Book.  Jungle Book 2 is endlessly bland overall filled with nothing at all to justify wasting a moment of your life watching.  You will be better and more deeply entertained for hours watching newly poured cement dry compared to watching a moment of Jungle Book 2.  Don't Waste your time wacthing this garbage it is not worth anyones time or money.  It gets one star only because the amazon system does not allow me to post zero stars or better still stars in negative numbers
HAS SOME DECENT ACTING, BUT... A REGGAE MUSICIAN BEGINS TO DEAL DRUGS FOR A DRUG KINGPIN SO HE COULD GET THE MONEY FOR STUDIO TIME. HAS A DECENT PLOT, BUT MOST OF THE ACTING ISN'T GOOD, AND MOST OF THE CHARACTERS WERE JUST CLICHED CHARCTERS THAT YOU'D USUALLY SEE A JAMAICAN ACTOR PLAY. I DO AGREE THAT THERE IS QUITE A BIT OF THINGS TO LAUGH AT WHEN WATCHING THIS MOVIE. NOT THE WORST OF ITS KIND, BUT, I DON'T THINK ITS REALLY WORTH BUYING
One of the worst films ever made?. What alternate universe did the makers of this film come from? It doesn't even deliver on the ick factor like Ilsa She Wolf of the S.S. did. It's just plain embarrassing
only one dvd?. For something that spanned so many years to sum it up in 90 minutes is just rediculous. There wasn't enough commentary by enough wrestlers and there wasn't enough clips of good moments from both sides.
Like All Gossip: A Lot of Talk About Nothing!. A very boring and stupid film about college freshmen with a kindergarten maturity level. The movie is horribly slow to get to the point and is riddled with nonsense dialogue: I've heard better lines in 'Fast Times At Richmond High' thank you.Altogether a very forgettable film that has a lot of talk about nothing. Don't believe the great reviews about this film: the film might appeal to the 14-17 year-old crowds fantasizing about how 'cool' college life might be with all the 'cool' people and 'parties.' If you're not in that category, skip this boring film and save both your time and your money.
Where is the salsa?!?!?. So I bought this movie because some of the reviews said that the acting was terrible but the dancing was amazing.Well, anyone who thinks that the salsa dancing in this movie is amazing, awesome, good, or ok, has never actually SEEN salsa dancing!!I am a salsa dancer, and this movie was HORRIBLE!!!  I have seen amazing dancing, and good dancing.  This was TERRIBLE dancing!  And there was hardly any salsa!It was 80s dancing to salsa music!  That's IT.  The only time there was actually salsa dancing was when the main character was training with the club owner.  Other than that, it was just 80s dancing to salsa music.  That's it.If you want to see salsa dancing, I DEFINITELY DO NOT recommend this movie.If you want to see horrible acting, and old 80s dancing, then I recommend this movie...There was only one thing that I liked about this movie.  The appearances made by Tito Puente and Celia Cruz.  That was great to see, but not worth buying the movie for....Oh, and the story line?  What was it again????Yeah...I love movies, good ones and bad ones.But this one???  The WORST movie I have seen so far...To the best of my knowledge, there aren't actually any movies with really good salsa dancing.Hopefully, someday, there will be
Not Even Worth Finishing. Saw the previews of the first movie, but I wasn't expecting too much from that. I tried to finish both the first and the second, but that didn't work out too well...I felt these films didn't deserved to be watched all the way to the end. I don't know how some of y'all were able to sit through this poor excuse of a movie, and that includes the first. All I really have to say is you if you like this movie or maybe a better version of it...Y'all should really consider watching Cops and those insane police chases shown on TV. After all this is just another episode of Cops with guest actors in it
Good Movie Collection, but... Don't buy this set!  My comments have nothing to do with the movies.  I love all of the Bond movies, but this set is an absolute RIP OFF!!!!  I have purchased all 3 sets in this collection, and have bought the Volumes 1 & 2 in the Ultimate Editions (UE'S).  After watching the 1960's quality of the volumes in this set and the amazing restoration of the movies in the Ultimate Editions, not to mention the great special features, I can say BUY THE ULTIMATE EDITIONS.  For crying out loud you can almost buy all 4 sets of the UE's brand new for the same price volume 3 will cost you used in this collection.  I wonder if these reviews here saying this is a "MUST HAVE SET" isn't written buy those who are trying to rip you off selling this at $188.  In addition to the poor picture and sound quality in this collection, my copy of "A View to a Kill" had a tiny blemish on the disk causing it to skip like 2 min. of the movie.  Of Course, no reply from MGM when I tried to contact them.  Anyway, BUY THE ULTIMATE EDITIONS!!
"Be TWICE as afraid"...but for the right reasons. Ok... I get where the other review authors are coming from here, giving this DVD, particularly Troll 2 five stars and a MUST BUY status... irony and sarcasm, and I do understand their views. I thought I'd keep it real though.Ok, so I bought this double feature DVD for the sole purpose of finally ridding myself of the crappy VHS copy of Troll (1) standing in my shelf beside all the other DVDs. I was surprised that there actually was a sequel to this movie, which, in my book is an 80s classic. Little did I know the horrible truth that was about to unravel before me on the screen. For Troll 2 has to be, THE crappiest movie AND the crappiest sequel EVER made! I don't even know where to start explaining, so that you good people who read this will realize the Supreme suck factor of Troll 2.All the usual clichees like "low budget" and "bad acting" simply don't suffice! Low budget, for one, is not even synonymous to bad movies. Troll 2 is almost beyond MST3K material. I don't know how else to explain it. Instead I can only ramble on. It's almost like you SHOULD watch this movie if not only for the purpose of study. A study of the precision with which they have managed avoid everything...ANYTHING that makes a good movie. My only comfort is that Troll 2 doesn't relate to the original Troll in any way. Another thing that saves this DVD is that it's cheap, and Troll (1) is actually worth the price. I just wish that Troll 1 would be available on a DVD of its own. The sequel is a damned insult
same old story, borring, poor acting. this is a sad waist of money, move has the same old high school story line and could have been a good move, but it is drawn out and the acting made me sick
Not really. VP1 was an astonishingly good representation of the impact of the 1960's on the next decade...it had a great car and a good cast; great soundtrack and good scenery as well as a "feel" for what a lot of the USA and its inhabitants were like (low budget so it used a lot of real people and locales). Kowalski had tried the straight and narrow and then the crooked and lowdown. He had failed (not always his fault and did have some successes...medal of honor ,e.g.)at each...had suffered the loss of his love,so, all that was left was death.VP2 has the Dodge Challenger R/T and a vapid, inane plot. What a waste of a great repro/rebuilt classic muscle car! Get VP1 and see if,even after 35 years, it does not hold up...
I hated this movie. Yes hated.  I'm at a disavantage having not read the book, but I have to say this movie was not what I expected at all.  I have never felt prompted to write a bad review EVER until now (sorry Sean Bean - whose work I usually love). I hate I bought the DVD instead of renting it first.*The below review is my opinion and contains spoiler info*I'm not the kind of movie watcher who has to have a happy ending because I understand it doesn't always happen in real life, so it doesn't have to happen for me in a movie. In addition to that, I also love a great character study even if some of the characters are of ill-repute. However, this movie was long, drawn out and ALL of the characters REALLY got on my nerves.  I found myself not caring for, wanting to understand or LIKING any of them early on.  I have no problem watching movies where in order for the story to unfold, the viewer must get a little dirty as he/she follows the characters.  I found the characters exhausting in just TRYING to find any reason to care what each one did or didn't do next.  The end result was disturbing in which you wanted to watch Brady Bunch afterwards just to get rid of the dark filthy oppressive feeling you had afterwards. Neither character was believable in their diligence to maintain or obtain what each lived for. Neither character was someone I could sympathize with (which is saying a lot since one of them was held down by a group while being raped! All for love?) I don't see how this movie can benefit anyone on any level.  Again, I can only write an opinion based on this movie version, as I have not read the book.  For all I know, the book may incite compassion and sympathy from it's reader towards one or all of the characters whether they are the victim or the victimizer. This movie does not. It makes you angry that you were ever introduced to either character, angry that it was ever put on film and angry that you wasted any of your time watching it.
Good idea...poor acting. As much as I would like to recommend this movie, I have to admit it is not one of the best movies of Jesus life. It does follow the text of Matthew's gospel essentially word for word, which is, at times, a useful tool.That said, the acting is mediocre. Bruce Marchiano as Jesus is a flop. He just doesn't pull it off convincingly. I often teach a class where I show people clips from different Jesus movies. Marchiano's poor acting often evokes laughter in the group.If you what the best Jesus movie ever done, nothing beats Zeffirelli's TV mini-series Jesus of Nazareth.The two other parts to this series, Acts and John, are done very well.
Cheap Sopranos rip off falls way short. I like gangster movies and am from Philly so I gave this movie a chance. What a mistake. The creators painstakingly tried to rip off the Sopranos but wound up with a very weak imitation.It starts with the horrible theme song. It's obviously trying to sound similar to the A3 song that serves as the Sopranos theme, but is chock full of horrible lyrics and sounds like someone threw a Casio keyboard down the stairs and recorded it.The cast is filled mediocre actors, trying in vain to save a stupid script. One funny thing is that everyone in the film has a different accent, and with the exception of one guy, no one can do a south philly accent.Sal Mazzotta is trying real hard to be James Gandolfini as Tony Soprano, but I'm sorry... he may be a nice guy in real life, but the guy couldn't act scared in a graveyard at midnight. And come on; this guy as a gangster? Maybe as Lurch in the Adams Family.This movie is also plauged by choppy editing and poor camera work. I mean in a few scenes the camera is actually going in and out of focus while people are talking. Don't they teach that in film school? And usually when two people are talking their heads will be turned to one angle for the wide two person shot, and at completely different angles for close ups, like maybe the close up stuff was done much later.Save your money. Wish I could get mine back. It's been a long time since I saw a movie so bad I felt angry and ripped off for having seen it.
glittering, empty mess. It's 1984, 10 years since glam rock star Brian Slade (Jonathan Rhys Meyers) staged his own death and effectively disappeared from the public eye.  To mark the anniversary of this event, Arthur Stuart (Christian Bale), a youngish newspaper reporter, is assigned the story: "Whatever happened to Brian Slade?"  Stuart was a devout fan of Slade in the 1970s.  Like others of his generation, he fed off of Slade's image and saw hope in the musician's freedom of sexuality and personal expression.  At first, Stuart is reluctant to revisit Slade's (and his own) past, but - before long - he is interviewing Slade's former manager, wife and lover (alla Citizen Kane) and piecing together the truth behind the elusive icon.It is no secret that the character of Slade is based *heavily* on real-life musician David Bowie (and that Ewen McGregor's character is based on Iggy Pop): the same music, the same outfits, the same hair, very similar stories ... but the Slade character seems to have been equally derived from author Oscar Wilde (who is referenced several times in the film).  Both seem to espouse the concept of art for art's sake and live lives of aesthetic decadence - hell, when Slade speaks (which he rarely does), he speaks primarily in Oscar Wilde quotes!As the film delves deeper into the story of Brian Slade, his career, and the people he inspired, it addresses the concepts of art, desire, image and reality.  Pretty interesting, right?  Well ... wrong.To begin with, for me, Velvet Goldmine was simply a boring film.  With all those bare butts, orgies, and men in makeup, you'd think I would be riveted.  But - I wasn't.  I think I was bored because the characters are boring.  Aside from Slade's wife (played by the ever wonderful Toni Collette), they are all dull and thoughtless (not unkind - but, literally, there are no thoughts in their heads) - driven entirely be greed and lust.I also felt the film was entirely too disjointed.  Okay.  I understand that it's got to cut from present to past, given the concept (a reporter piecing together facts from 10-15 years ago).  No problem.  But the constant jumps in time, the manic editing, the shifting from reality to surrealism - - it made the movie unnecessarily confusing and frustrating to watch.And lastly, I was somewhat angered by the Slade character.  He rarely speaks; he always has an empty (though lustful) look in his eyes; and he seems to care very little for his music (as he is all about the FAME).  I know that this movie is fiction and that Brian Slade is not David Bowie - but - if you are going to borrow that heavily from a real life man, I think you owe him a bit of credit.  Though undeniably mindful of his image, David Bowie was a musician first.  Hunky Dory, Ziggy Stardust, Aladdin Sane ... his music could absolutely stand on its own, without the platform boots and leotards!  Moreover, David Bowie is far more intelligent, warm, charming and self-deprecating than the despicable Brian Slade.In conclusion, though Velvet Goldmine is ambitious and potentially interesting, in my opinion, it winds up being a flat, messy, unfair and soulless film.  I would have given it 1 star, but I have to give it props for the music and costuming
"2" STARS FOR THE "DVD" AND NOT THE MOVIE... I just purchased the 2 disc, special edition of this movie, and here's my problem(s):First off, I don't speak Italian, so my only options are to watch the film with the English dub, or with the Italian dub with the English subtitles, but here's the problem; the English dub is out of sync with the film, sometimes being only slightly so, but other times being very noticeable and distracting (i.e. during loud sound effects, such as a chair being knocked over, or someone knocking loudly on a door).And so my other option is the Italian bud with the English subs, but here's the problem with this, the English subs are missing during the scene where Peggy is reading the diary (about 30+ minutes into the movie).Now, I had noticed missing subs during the first part of the film, but these where usually during background conversations, or occasionally a line would be missing from someone's speech, but could usually be figured out, and these where only slightly annoying, but the missing subs for the diary entry is inexcusable (and is also missing from the other subs as well) as this is an important bit of info to the plot of the story.Also, when you set up the audio option, from the main menu, there's no problem, but I found that if you use the audio button on your DVD remote, the Italian option gives you the French soundtrack and the French gives you the Italian one. It's nothing serious, but it's an annoyance all the same.So, does anyone else notice these problems, or did I just end up with a bum disc
No sir, Idont like it. It goes way too fast////i do like the abs workout section but the aerobic section isnt good. I will never buy firm tapes agai
Drink lots of coffee before watching this. I am a student of third reich history and when I heard of the release of this film I managed to see it at an independent theatre.  While there is a great deal of interesting documentary footage and fair analysis this has got to be about the dullest documentary I have ever seen.  There is no style to the directing or editing.  The narration is even worse.  The good points are negated by the overall stale production.  This is certainly not a film to even rent let alone purchase.  (Unless you are an insomiac.
this DVD stinks....extremely poor resolution ...remaster soon?. Hi folks,Don't  get your pants in a bunch at the low review...its NOT for the movie..its for the appallingly bad DVD.  Grainy and soft...I can't believe they couldn't produce a finer representation of a multi award winning and in general beloved piece of work by all concerned.  This isn't even VHS quality...but then ARTISAN isn't known for  quality...its cheap enough to get anyway and throw away when  a REAL quality version  is released.
A Genuine Disaster Movie. From the producer who gave you "The Towering Inferno" comes this hilarious killer-bee invasion with a "Hollywood Squares" cast (including Fred MacMurray in his final screen role). "The Swarm" is another Irwin Allen schlockfest mired in ludicrous dialogue and unspecial effects. This cinematic turkey inexplicably cost a whopping $21 million, which makes you wonder about creative bookkeeping. A definite must for bad-film aficionados.
THIS MOVIE WOULD HAVE BEEN ACTED BETTER IF THEY USED REAL RETARDS!!!!!!!. I can't give it any less than one star but what the heck, The girls were hot so there's the one star. Other than that I am literally dumber after watching this movie! I swear to god! I passed out after watching this film because I got so stupid I forgot to breathe! They should stop beating around the bush and hire retards from the mental home to play the lead roles because lord knows they would have done a better job! Even if they just ran around the set yelling "1,2,3, Potato Salad, March!" The dialogue would have been 1000 times better. Message to the producer:Give it up loser!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
What the hell is this movie about?. So ummm...is this about werewolves? Native American shape shifters? Or a pack of ordinary wolves on the loose in NYC?Damned if I know and damned if the director, screenwriter, cast and crew know either. Wolfen is one of them there horror movies where the true face of terror are Things That Aren't Really Explained Or Make Much Sense.This can be an effective device in movies, go watch any David Lynch movie to immerse yourself in a sense of mystery and enigma. In Wolfen however, the effect is mostly that of people wandering around doing stuff and saying things and then there is some action at the end and then the movie is over. Maybe they were going for some kind of Kaffkaesque feeling of dread, but this came out a year after Chaddyshack, so frankly I doubt it.Albert Finney joins the distinguished ranks of obviously foreign actors playing a big city American cop-he does Ah-nuld proud! Gregory Hines plays a guy who jokes a lot, I'm not sure but he might have been a cop too. Edward James Olmos plays a Native American construction worker who smiles a lot and knows more than he is saying, He would play a better version of this character a year later, in Blade Runner.I'm sure there are some people reading this who are enraged and consider me obtuse and unsophisticated for not picking up on the nuances of the directon and the script. At least, I certainly hope such people exist because maybe one or more of them could track me down and explain to me what the crap is going on here.I eagerly await your responses!PS- In case you are wondering, no I haven't read the novel the movie is based on. I suppose I could but Whitley Strieber has said in inerviews that his horror novels are metaphors for his alien abduction experiences, so I most likely won't get help there..
Not the best. I got this movie because James Darren was in it.  He was good as was France Nguyen. They play the only likeable characters in the main cast and neither makes it through the whole movie.  Of course I knew that when I bought it.
Bob goes Greenpeace. Bob the Builder used to be this innocent kids show where our Bob Villa-esque hero fixed roofs and built barns for his neighbors, but in this new series Bob looks like he's been hanging out with Captain Planet a little too much.  The familiar "Yes we can!" motto takes a back seat to Bob's new warcry of "Reduce, Reuse, Recycle," which is repeated no less than 50 times in the first episode.  The first episode, which includes a scene of a barefoot, tie-dye wearing Bob, centers around Bob killing a tax revenue-producing vacation development in favor of community (because "city" is a dirty word) built on reverence to the environment.Bob and his crew of presumably low-emission construction machines are charged with building the community, and are joined by new character apparently inspired by Homer Simpsons' ill-fated "Poochy" personality (Hey kids... Recycle to the extreme!!)  And most of the familiar characters are voiced by different people: Bob, Lofty, Spud, and Mr. Bentley have all new voices.All I can say is the pre-school set is a little young to be pushing a political agenda, and all this is a little much for someone older than the target audience to take. The one star is mostly for technical advances over previous Bob releases, and for keeping the kickin' Bob theme song.Of course, my 3 year old loved it, and we'll probably get the next Project: Build It video when it's released in November
Rip-off!. As a Ghost Hunters fan I loved the First Season Dvd.  This "Best of Ghost Hunters" Dvd was just recycling previous (inconclusive for the most part!) shows - certainly not anything new or exciting at all.  The previously deleted footage should have stayed that way!  Don't waste your money on this Dvd.  Buy the First Season and look for the Penitentiary and the Lighthouse episodes
starship troopers 2 its not pretty, what a waste. troopers 1 is oktroopers 2 is not.do not buy troopers 2 rent it.what a muppet i am for buying this rubbish,must look on amazon first before purchasing !!!!First the good points:the digital effects are good,im pleased shots actually splatter the bugs a big improvement on the first movie that bit.the actors have flashes of talent, i liked the hero tough guy.the plot does kind of make sense, perimeter guard tower all good.butthe camera framing, quality suck.  The gore fest sucks. The production quality is just not there, how to totally screw up a good franchise.  Forget trying to ape the horror movies.  Try something original, and have clever solutions rather than arbitary deaths everywhere, its tired its been done and its not good enough.The film careered around genres trying to grab anything it could, but taking the worst bits of those genres, so very sad.third rate horror, third rate porn.As for the second rate soft focus almost porn(there is no actual porn, before some sad case buys it for that), i was almost expecting some seventies funk music,dont waste actors talents like that its criminal. It didnt quite plunge the depths but it came real close.I cant believe i wasted my money on this.(slaps head repeatedly)
I really love Kubrick...I really do... I have seen almost all of Kubrick's films and I have to say that my favorite would have to be either 2001: A Space Oddessey or Dr. Strangelove. The only ones I haven't seen are Killers Kiss, Spartacus, Fear and Desire, and Paths to Glory. I saw the killing a few days ago and have to say it was the worst movie I have ever seen. It was an embarrassment to every thing Orson Welles has achieved in the film style known as noir. The ending wasn't even an ending though, it was more of a, "Game over," sign when you lose at a video game. Sterling Hadden isn't a very good actor, I liked him in Dr. Strangelove, but he's acts too much the same in The Godfather and in The Killing.
Too kid-friendly. I think the only strong points of "The Phantom Menace" is Darth Maul and the lightsaber duals, which I thought were well done, and the visual effects and scenery.  But other than that, "The Phantom Menace" was just an unfortunate mistake.I think the problem is that Lucas broke one of the unofficial science fiction filmmaking rules: You've-got-to-keep-children-out-of-science fiction-stories.  Or at least show them as little as possible.  How can we take a space dogfight scene seriously when you have a little kid who doesn't know how to pilot a fighter, buzzing all around the battle and saying things like "this is intense?"  I never understood why they felt they had to go that far back into Anakin's life anyway.  Why not just begin the story with Anakin in his twenties and already under the tutelage of Obi-wan?  That's when all the important events began.  And Jar Jar, well, we know the consensus on him.Well, at least things got more serious again in "Attack of the Clones," and would continue to improve with "Revenge of the Sith.
I wish I could have seen it!. I was unable to view my DVD of Ballet Russes since the message on the screen said - not available in this area - or something like that. I have sent 3 Emails to Amazon to tell them I was unable to view it, and despite the fact they promise replies to Emails within 24 hours, I have heard nothing. So I am not happy at all. I will let you know how good the DVD is when you send me a copy I can view
DO NOT WATCH THIS MOVIE if you like Anne of Green Gables. I made the mistake of watching it after seeing how many stars (4) it received from other viewers. The plot was butchered, the characters twisted, the story ruined, a pure agony.Marilla is fat and ugly. Wasn't it supposed to be Rachel Lynde's character? Matthew is sly and conniving and very outspoken. What happened to endearing shy Matthew? Rachel Lynde had been merged with Mrs. Barry, Dianna's mother, and hence Mrs. Rachel Barry (Oh brother). Dianna is a petit blond and not a dimpled raven black haired damsel, who gets married behind the scenes without her bosom friend who was sent to Queens at 18 as a punishment. Anne and Gilbert are secret lovers brutally separated by Marilla who is crossed with Gilbert's father for stealing Matthew's sweetheart many years ago. Get the picture?This movie has no merits as related to the book. It might have some as a stand-alone creation but I haven't found any. I wasted nearly an hour and a half of my life and was bitterly disappointed, irritated and nauseated. The creators of this movie were definitely not kindred spirits! Do yourself a favor, if you really like the Anne books don't watch this movie.Oh, and I do wish Peter Jackson (Lord of the Rings) will fall in love with the books and make proper and ACCURATE movies out of them. Do you hear me Peter?
Amazon Missed the Mark. Normally the prices on here are competative but I agree they're off base hereDeep Disciunt DVD is over $100.00 less for  this set and free shippingC'mon Amazo
Kundera was right to object. The movie doesn't at all reflect the original book story in its core concept. If I didn't read the book before I wouldn't be able to guess what is the movie trying to explain. I doubt anybody, based on the movie only, would be able to understand what happend in 1968 in the Czech republic and what was the consequence for the entire society
even king can't turn his great short story into a good movie. mr. king can blame no one but himself for this lifeless take on his great short story,"trucks" because he wrote and directed it. PLEASE MR.KING DON'T DO IT AGAIN!!!!!!!the worst!!
Loved Steve John Shepherd. Hated everything else.  It's a boring, irritating, slow piece that isn't nearly as clever or fun as it seems.I loved the lead (acting, body language, look, everything) and didn't mind his best friend, but the story takes way too long to unfold and there are a whole bevy of uneccessary and unimportant (and uninteresting) characters which confuse the sloppily-told story and you'll be reading the synopsis to find out what the director was trying to tell you.  (Because it isn't at all clear.)Unfortunately the story spins totally out of control with unbelievable and impossible story twists that ruin whatever small amount of empathy you might have for the characters.  Nobody comes out of this looking good.Then there is the violence and homophobia which the director seems to think we enjoy watching.  As entertainment, this stinks, and it's actually offensive at points."Forgive" might be worth watching for Steve John Shepherd and to see for yourself how you feel about it, but as entertainment, it's awful
Repeat:  this is NOT Ruby Cairo!. "Deception" is the edited version of "Ruby Cairo," which is not a great movie but which is better than this one.  It isn't just the sex scene that was edited out, but a total of about 20 minutes.  The movie makes more sense in the RC version, and the sex scene, though dark and in Andie's case a bit airbrushed, is worth seeing, especially if you are a Viggo Mortensen fan.  I don't think it was the nudity Andie objected to, though, or not entirely.  The scene ends in an act of contempt that would sting any woman.  It effectively lets you know what the man's character is really thinking, but it's brutal in a subtle way.  There is also, of course, the (apparent) age difference between the two characters. He looks about 10 years younger than she does, even with a beard
But Why is it Called Belly?. The American Dream is an appealing myth, no doubt. The idea that anybody can come from anywhere and strike it rich in America sounds great. The problem, as George Carlin put it, is that you have to be asleep to believe in it. So instead of representing opportunity for everybody it has become code for greed at all costs. And that is where "Belly" comes in, an ode to thug live and all the riches that come with it. This urban drama stars DMX (perpetually rapping), Nas, and Method Man and they would have you believe that they earned their cash by selling drugs and pimping as opposed to selling out to record companies. The story barely exists and seemed like a burden for the director who just wanted endless shots of people having sex and smoking drugs. When the plot does poke its head up I picked up on a criminal enterprise that moved shop from Queens to Omaha. Once there the cops get involved and people start getting shot. One couple tries to escape to Africa, but find it easier said than done. And Tommy (DMX) is sent on a mission to kill a minister. But really this film is about selling a lifestyle that doesn't even exist. Come on now, I've known drug dealers in my day, and they didn't live in large gaudy mansions . . . rap stars do. Rather they live in shacks or their parent's basement.If my response to the film seems lukewarm it is because it is. The directing by Hype Williams isn't that bad. He is able to capture some beautiful images and uses a few creative camera tricks. The lighting never seems quite right, but I'm gonna let that one slide. As a man who has always called for more sex and drugs in films I can hardly complain about their presence here. There people are living life to the fullest and are certainly not being weighed down by bourgeois conventions. All that said this film still fully deserves the big no vote that I am going to give it. As the most nihilistic person I know I am surprised to report that this one really seemed lost. Any image they could flash on the screen that would appeal to the wannabes in the audience was used. The N and F words are used to comedic proportions. Their palaces that represent their gluttony are turned into war zones and destroyed for no good reason. And then, on top of it all, we have to listen to the characters wax philosophical on how leading this life somehow places them on a higher plain than the rest of us. Sorry man, but just because you sell drugs instead of stocks doesn't make you any less slimy than those Wall Street hacks. You're still a businessman. This film is not worth watching. Any social point that is made is made accidentally, and any filmmaking skills the director may have are lost under his love fest for all things gangsta. **1/4
Try not to compare it to the book.... Jonathan Safran Foer's book is a truly literary work and this movie is not a book. And, as many have already said in Amazon's ratings, this movie is not like Foer's book.  It is, unfailingly, cinema and with that in mind it should be judge upon cinematic criteria. Thus, although I will grant the impressive visual beauty of this movie (the cinematographer captures an oddity, serenity, and disturbance) I cannot agree with those who give it high marks.  The plot is sparse, as is much of the character development.  I am especially disappointed with the portrayal of Alex and his grandfather.  I found myself empathizing little with the grandfather or Alex in the movie's final dramatic scenes.  The grandfather's emotional turmoil seems underdeveloped as does Alex's reaction to his Grandfather's action.  Morevover, the parallels between the JSF character and the Ukranian characters seem forced.  The only things they share are contrived connections in the narrative's backstory.  Overall, I felt untouched by this movie.  And one last note, why is it even called "Everything is Illuminated?"  That title illuminates little within the movie
Come in, Ladder 49 - your time is up. Hey, you know something?  You know those guys that jump into burning buildings and rescue people? Do you know they happen to be rather brave?Well, if you did, you can walk away now because you've basically seen the entire point behind "Ladder 49: Firefighters Are So Brave, Aren't They?"Call me a cynic all you want, but I want the movies I watch to have a little more story than that. Oh, wait - OK. Come back - there IS a story behind Ladder 49 after all. It's just not a very good one.So, Brave Firefighter Joaquin Phoenix joins up with other Brave Firefighters, and the majority of the movie is centred around them, and the ha-ha-larious "manly" antics they get up to, including an "induction" ceremony that only the most stupid, gullible people in the UNIVERSE would fall for, and throwing beer kegs over one another. 'Cos they're guys, see? And all the while the worst possible fires break out (with no explanation why.. Jeez, you'd think there would be some little fires or cats to rescue from trees or something?) and every time Joaquin's moaning wife's worried face is shown because she's sure he's going to die THIS time.And that's basically it. The thing is, the characters are so bland and uninspired, the plot so Cut-Out-And-Keep that we can't help but feel we've seen this sort of thing a thousand times before. Its more like a mid-afternoon TV movie than a big budget blockbuster, and having great actors like John Travolta and Robert Patrick in dull co-worker roles is such a waste of their talents that it beggars belief.Big stars, big money - on a movie that's as exciting as a ladder in a pair of tights. A real waste.The_Curmudgeon_Hates_You@yahoo.co.u
good idea blown away. This was a clever idea for a movie: the trail of lives touched by a wedding dress.  Unfortunately, in the screenwriter's apparent desire to put as many unexpected, even quirky, turns in the story as possible, he forgot that a story is supposed to be appealing.  A few moments were.  Most were either routine daytime soap-opera material or just boring.Also, the casting was incredible.  It's as though someone tried to win the prize for who could cast the largest number of unappealing actors and actresses in a single movie.  There were one or two exceptions, like Margaret Colin, but the other eight or ten--or however many there were--ranged from off-putting to repulsive.Apparently, a number of people liked this movie, so maybe you will too.  I don't really understand why.  I like a good human-interest story.  Unfortunately, this was not one.
Total TRASH! Don't even think about wasting your money!!. The 1st "movie": Fist of Fear, Touch of Death is so bad I didn't even watch the next 2. The uninitiated will possibly not know that the footage that purports to be about Bruce's life,  family and ancestry is all rubbish and was actually taken from 2 different movies: The ancestors "cuts" in color are from a colossally poor period piece that would be funny if it didn't seem to be taking itself seriously. While the black and white parents-and-family "cuts" actually are truly a young Bruce in a Hong Kong film that he made before returning to the U.S. to live. However the scenario is totally misrepresented. All of the other participants are actors as well and not correctly identified. Nor is the dubbed dialog related to what is really being spoken (in Cantonese) by the actors. Yet a third source is tapped for the "supposed interviews" which are not with the speaker at all, but with someone else regarding the work Bruce did on the "Longstreet" TV show in '71 and once again the voice-over not only is not really Bruce and is again, not accurate (and he was speaking English during those interviews). One would be better served to buy the "Legend" DVD from the -Bruce Lee Master Collection- or the more recent "Bruce Lee: The Warrior's Journey" to see and hear in Bruce's own words and voice what the NON-"What's Up Tiger-Lily" version is of the early Hong Kong (black and white) and what the "Longstreet" interviews have to reveal about him.If this is meant to be a spoof and they just forgot to mention that anywhere, then shame on them. I don't find it even remotely humorous, not to consider the generations of people who might not know any better since his untimely death 32 years ago.
Cliche ridden, predictable, mainstream mellowdrama. From the moment that we are introduced to the main characters in Annapolis, it becomes apparent who is going to do what and what is going to happen.  Annapolis revolves around Jake (James Franco), a ship builder's son with big dreams of being a naval officer.  Naturally, he's the underdog who seeks to come out on top, with Tyrese Gibson providing his superior officer and rival who lets him know that he "won't make it".  Throw in an annual boxing tournament and everyone involved, and Annapolis transforms into Rocky in the Navy; only the real loser of the bout turns out being the viewer.  Franco and Gibson are stiff and wooden, the screenplay is cliche ridden, predictable, goes out of it's way to be politically correct and inoffensive, and sometimes just non-sensical (apparently eating candy bars wrapped in Wonder Bread can help one achieve a chisled physique) while the inevitable outcome will surprise no one at all.  Jordana Brewster is here for looks and not much else, and poor Donnie Wahlberg and Chi McBride are two of the very few bright spots in this otherwise boring crowd pleaser.  With Justin Lin directing, Annapolis is a disappointment considering how surprisingly lively Better Luck Tomorrow was, but then again, I wasn't expecting a whole lot out of this film to begin with, and you shouldn't either
My Expert Completely Disagrees With This Person!!!!. After taking my dog to a true dog behaviorist, he told me thatCesar's "style" is something I should not adopt.  His "one size fits all...gotta show 'em who's boss" mantra is completely wrong.. My dog behaviorist is renowned in this part of the country and gives seminars on dog behavior in Japan, as well. He also heads the training for dogs who are taken into our local hospitals. I trust him completely... so I definitely question now what Cesar the "dog whisperer" has to offer. The person I am working with operates solely on the "reward" system.
I can't believe what they're saying... I didn't think this movie was even worth commenting on, but after reading all the people that have been praising it, I just couldn't let it slide. First, the basics. I am nineteen (so you know where I'm coming from). Actually, I don't expect any good or bad votes on this comment because I don't think anyone knows this movie exist... not a bad thing. I'm pretty sure it went straight to DVD and sold for a couple bucks (not a good sign). My brother brought this movie over while we were chillin with some friends. We have always had good movie experiences with Ryan Reynolds so we thought we would give it a shot. That was a mistake. Well, Reynolds had some funny moments that actually saved the movie from getting a one star ("I love bowling"). But my brother was able to predict the entire movie (in detail) within the first 10 minutes. I have never seen that done before!  Honestly I don't see what genre this movie fits in with. It's cheesy enough to be played on the Disney channel, but there are some bad words tossed in that make it JUST too inappropriate for little kids. And anyone who is older than 15 probably wouldn't be caught dead watching it. We sat through the entire movie just to see how bad it could get, and we were not disappointed. I guess it's a comedy because the acting was funnier than the jokes. Man, that was harsh
A courageous man,but a dull depiction of his acts. I am extremely interested in heroic tales of the Holocaust Era.Though this film is good from the informational aspect, it is just plain dull viewing.The life of Wallenberg would best be suited to more skillful hands than those who directed and produced this one.Swedish actor Stellan Skarsgaard (THE OX) never comes to life at any time as the defiant diplomat Raoul Wallenberg.An earlier made-for-TV version of WALLENBERG was far superior in all ways.Too bad it has never been released to tape to my knowledge.For those interested in the Hungarian-Jewish slaughter of WW2,I would recommend MUSIC BOX or SUNSHINE.Though these films do not specifically address the 65,000 Jews of the Budapest ghetto,THESE films are at least engrossing and DO communicate the atrocities to some degree that occured in Hungary in a much more engaging  and compelling way for the screen
. This is worse than my eighth birthday party. Some kid brought his pet Teradactyl and let go of the leed. Also, the hired band 'The Caz Dolowicz Experience' didn't show up. Something about a hijacked subway train. They think we're mugs? Anyway, the photography in GC was worse. Everbody too big in the frame and sort of artless and wobbly. How does Rachel Leigh Cook manage to appear in so many disasters? Does she have a homing beacon in her nose? It's a very small nose which just goes to show how amazing technology is today. Stallone looks like he's on Dialysis. I didn't watch the end. It either ends in a friendly game of Jim Rummy or a blowtorch enema. Gosh, I wonder
Beware! Close-out-goods/Amazon are DVD Pirates. I just want to let potential marketplace buyers of SALO that the seller: closeoutgoods and other Amazon marketplace sellers are selling pirated (bootlegged) editions of this movie and other Criterion DVDs. If Amazon were legitimate, they would ban these marketplace sellers from their website. Every potential buyer should report these crooks to the FBI and Criterion
No wonder so many red staters despise Hollywood. If you like hateful, dehumanizing, ill-conceived, pointless dialogue, this is the movie for you.Can't believe it part of the Criterion Collection. Unreal! Koyaanisquatsi!Did Kevin Smith post the majority the positive reviews here, or WHAT
I wish I could go lower than this. This is horrendous movie. I will never claim it as the movie of my generation. It's one of the many reasons why I absolutely hate the "80's". The others are:Breakdancing, The Yuppie lifestyle,Power hungry businessmen/women, Women with manly handshakes, New Wave Music, and junk movies like this. I know that the main character is nothing less than a manipulator who is only concerned about himself, and what he can get out of life. He ridicules his friend because he's sick, and doesn't feel like driving Ferris around...especially in a Ferrari that mysteriously gets lost in the parking garage, so what am I left to believe I have to wonder if this is where Ice Cube got the inspiration for "It Was A Good Day". I don't care what decade it was, or what was cool back then, or now manipulating your friends is "NOT" I repeat"NOT" cool. I know with John and Johnette Q. Public this is something of a sexual relase. I could picture private parts of men and women everywhere getting soaking wet from this movie, and I find it so repulsive that everyone out there finds this funny.
Depressing. The good thing about this movie is that it didn't last more than it did. Not that it's bad, no, it's a fine depressing movie. It may be very well acted -Duvall is great all right-, with nice songs perhaps, well directed if you like... But unless you feel identified with these characters -and I don't- there's no way you can enjoy watching this.This is what I saw: All the characters here are self-centered individuals, conceited, self-pitying, deplorable and depressing. Duvall plays a drunk who quits drinking to start (perhaps) a new life. That he in the past was a sucessful country singer makes no difference to me, it just adds to his self-pity. I couldn't find anything positive in this story. Even the kids that show are aggravating with their persistent questions.The picture we have here is that of a bunch of losers and dreamers. Everybody seems to blame someone else for his miseries. The children their parents, the wives their ex-husbands (& viceversa). Death, either thru war or car accidents, plays a major role too. It seems people have trouble getting over it, looking for someone to blame it on. Then the scenes in the church... I'm not sure what they are intended for. The three main characters (Duvall, Harper and the kid) go to church; him and the kid even get baptized, but they have no idea what church is all about; to them it's a social ritual (a tradition, a superstition?). This is not a movie about faith. It's about the troubles of these guys; the lady needs a man because she's young and lonely; the man needs... he needs to grow up; the kid needs a father and some homework. Nobody cares for others, only for themselves.Honestly, the irony about this movie is that it's so realistic and its characters so phony. I understand why Duvall went immediately to make 'The Apostle', where he plays a role opposite to this one
0 STARS:  Sorry excuse for a vampire movie. When I first saw "Bordello Blood", I was so disappointed in Dennis Miller...he is a good actor in certain situations, but for his to do garbage like this is inexcusable.  In fact, Miller looked more ridiculous in this movie than he did as a MNF analyst.  This movie was supposed to be a vampire movie and while there are some vampires in it, one can easily see that this movie is a total joke and the crypt keeper and others involved in the making of this movie had to laughing when they made it knowing it was not scary and not any good.  This is a waste of a serious horror movie fan's time...if you want camp humor and lame comedy fine, but don't call this a horror movie.  Thank you.
Should not have had the same title as original. When I heard that Timecop had a sequl coming out I couldnt wait to see it. Then I found out it wasnt John Claude Vanne Damme.Why bother making a sequl with no returning cast members? Especially the star. Vanne Damme is replaced by Jason Scott Lee (Jungle book) as the hero who travels through time to prposly change things around here and there. I saw reveiwa that this was a movie for sci fi geeks to enjoy. I didnt see much on the sci fi side apart from time travel, but it makes me wonder why they didnt just name it something else and make a seperate movie instead of calling it a second installment to a great movie
Not a great DVD at all. The languages and images don't connect. We were given this as a gift because of the linguistic value, but instead the entire dvd doesn't offer it. The other dvds in this collection are great. This one failed to teach anything
LOVE the Cosby show, HATE this set. All the episodes are hacked to bits.  It's not worth the money.  I hope they release Season 1 episodes uncut.  It seems that many, like me were very disappointed with the release
Michael Flately is not Irish step dance. As an Irish step dancer who is always trying to set the record straight about what exactly we do, this movie is really frustrating.  Riverdance, and even the first Lord of the Dance, were much better representations of Irish step dance.  This "Gold" is not.  ...  Michael Flately *used* to be the best we had to offer.... To any serious Irish dancer, he's a joke.  Yes, he's brought Irish step dance to the forefront, but most of what he does personally is a combination of many different styles.  At least in Riverdance, he kept to mainly Irish choreography.  Movies like this give such a wrong impression to anybody who is not personally involved with Irish dance. ..
Disappointed. This film tells the story of a great battle where a group of village of Thai villages held off a major army from Burma history. The story itself, I found well explained. I found the story line appeared to be weak. The acting I thought was poor. The action was okay.If you are going to do a movie like this, I think you need to spend more money then what people did on this movie
Not an Alternative 60 Minutes. I bought this expecting news stories on par with the books--with the occasional interview (as in the books).It's not.  It is a farce, sensationalism over fact.I don't recommend this for serious disinfo fans.However, I do agree with Stealth Kitten. There are few interesting stories (She highlights most of them)
Highly Disappointed. I have yet to actually watch more than the first 10 mins. The quality is so bad I refused to go any further. For the life of me I can see how any Studio worth its salt could release anything so poor; where has "Pride In Your Work" gone. I could hardly make out the actors in this movie.I skipped forward by chapters just to see if some change had taken place, but to my dismay there was none. I am not one of those critics always writing bad reviews, in fact this is probably my second ever. I just had to warn other buyers so they don't get shafted like I did.In all fairness the movie itself may actually be great but for me what is the use if its un-watchable. Its almost like a bad bootleg movie (I refuse to watch those too). I am sure they could have spent some more time and money to remaster it and get all the graininess out and bring clarity to this film.All in all this is just my opinion and I hope it helps someone save their money, however if you don't mind the picture quality get it because I love the Trinity Saga
Lowenstinks. This film was dreadful.  Streisand is absolutely unlikeable.  To enjoy this film, you would need to buy into the romance between Streisand and Nolte and I just can't see how that is possible.  I couldn't believe it when I found out how critically acclaimed this film was.  Along with The English Patient, this is one of the worst 'critically acclaimed' films I have ever had the displeasure of viewing
It [wasn't good]. It [wasn't good]. It's about a man walking on a roof fell off a roof. this man ate a piece of pie in a dream he had after he died and turned nto a ghoast. After that the pie came out of his dream,woke him up in real life,attacked him,and then killed him. Then his dead spirit which makes know sense because he's already dead sinks into the ground. Then the pie shoots it's self
The movie is good but the dvd sucks. This is a good movie, but the DVD works like a cheap bootleg. My DVD player   was fresh out the box and for some odd reason this DVD kept skipping parts of the movie.
HORRIBLE!. i went to see this movie when it first came out, and i nearly fell asleep watching it. THIS MOVIE IS NOT WORTH WATCHING. it's so fake, & it's easy to tell whats going to happen next
Spins its wheels real hard, but doesn't make much progress. I had my doubts about this film when it came out and now that I've finally seen it I know why:  It's manipulative and unrealistic.  Penn does a decent job playing Sam, the mentally handicapped single-father.  Pfeiffer's not bad as his high-priced, high-strung lawyer.  But neither can save the script from its pitfalls, namely, an unrealistic portrayal of a grown man with the mind of a seven year old.  None of the characters come of seeming like real people so much as types. Even his daughter (the annoying Fanning) is more HOllywood precociousness about her than real-life childlike qualities. More time seems to have been spent on product placement that developing the story and characters.  The saving grace is the slight ambiguity of the ending; I thought for sure they'd settle for the cheap, easy ending just as they settled for the cheap and easy everywhere else in the film
ORIGINAL IS BETTER~!. If you want UNCUT ORIGINAL version, ALWAYS look for ORIGINAL LICENSED Production. NOT US Release. Its a foreign film, it should not be US version to begin with~! HELLO!!!?? Why settle for LESS with US Version where they edit and cut so many excellent scenes especially with Jackie's Fighting Scenes. And US Release ruins the speed and sound as well. I have been collecting Jackie Chan's movies both HK and US Release Version for quite some time now. I found HK Version to be MUCH MORE in enjoyable, and HIGHER in Quality. American Market always like to "Americanize" and "Control". Regional Code Regulation thing is one of the example to CONTROL the Market. Why not let everyone enjoy the same HK Original Release move the same way ENTIRE WORLD enjoys it ?? No one makes Hollywood American movies to "French version" or "Chinese Version" ~! This what Americans are doing~! Well, enjoy the cheap "American version" then~! LO
Turn off your brain and enjoy. Despite my one-star rating, this is an acceptable time-killer: good-natured, forgettable and not real bright.  Poor Hilary Swank - from that movie where she was a boy to this in a few short years.  Of course, her fall wasn't as steep as Cuba Gooding's (from Jerry Maguire to Boat Trip in one movie) or Jamie Foxx's (from Ray to Stealth in one movie).  She looks like Jolene Blalock - T'Pol from TV's Star Trek Enterprise, and it wasn't until the credits that I realized it was actually Swank and not Blalock in the movie.  Perhaps Swank was trying to camouflage herself.The movie begins with a space shuttle landing in the LA River, which is interesting, but has nothing at all to do with the rest of the movie.  Next thing you know, the valiant pilot is recruited to some mission to drill to the center of the earth to restart the core, which got some spyware or something and stopped working.  As a result, the Coliseum and the Golden Gate Bridge get wiped out by lightning.  Don't ask.  The Feds then assemble a team to take a magic vehicle to the core, drop some nukes, and reboot the earth.We learn some interesting things on the way, such as: Molten rock is completely clear.  There are really unconvincing sets with big fake crystals deep inside the earth.  And, if you're a jerk, you'll get killed by rolling nuclear weapons and then repent.You can guess how it ends.  It's not great art, but it's dumb fun on a rainy day
If I want to see a boring and pointless dream sequence I'll rewatch Dallas. Roger Ebert, a review I greatly respect and normally agree with, raved about this flick.  Roger, I love you, but you missed the boat on this one.I'm not going to review the plot because it's been done by several reviewers already.  Suffice it to say, David Lynch didn't get enough of symbolism interpretation in freshman English ("Okay, class, who wants to discuss the meaning of the impaled pig's head on page 72 in Lord of the Flies?  David, how about you?") and now want to inflict it on you, the unwitting movie watching public.  Thanks, Mr. Lynch, but I'll pass.  I didn't enjoy figuring out the obscure symbolism in page after page of Crime and Punishment and I didn't enjoy it in scene after scene of Mulholland Drive.To add insult to injury, Lynch prides himself on putting scenes in his movie that make absolutely no sense, rationalizing it by saying life often doesn't make sense.  This habit of his is less noticible in this film than, say, Twin Peaks, mostly because the whole film is for the most part senseless.  Yeah, it's true that a lot of things are absurd in my own life, but more along the lines of "...I would've won Powerball this week except I spent my lottery money on a scented candle at the RenFaire, what the heck was I thinking..." or "...I wasted 2 1/2 hours of my life watching this dumb movie, what the heck was I thinking..." but I've yet to be visited by scrawny cowboy or a wheelchaired dwarf.  I must live a sheltered life or something.Lynch also forbids chapter cuts in his DVD, believing his movie must be watched in its entirety, or not at all (I'd advise the second.)  To be fair, in this case I don't think he's motivated entirely by a exaggerated sense of importance, but rather by the knowledge that every male, if given the chance, would overshoot most of the movie and focus on the hot chick on chick action.  C'mon all you 5 star givers, admit it!  You find the movie pretentious and silly, but the topless scenes more than make up for all the drippy pseudo-art!To reiterate, if I wanted to see a boring and pointless dream sequence I'll rewatch Dallas - if I wanted to see a nice rack I'll take my top off and look in the mirror.  Who needs Mulholland Drive
Anti-Southern Propaganda. This movies rates right up there with "Schindler's List" . . . in terms of unapologetic propaganda.  Fortunately, Ted Turner showed some remorse for this hatchet job by making "Gettysburg," and the even better "Gods and Generals."If you want to see a real, accurate depiction of the War For Southern Independence (aka, The Civil War), watch "Gods and Generals" or "Gone With The Wind," and stay away from movie garbage like "Andersonville."Also watch for the extended version DVD of "Gods and Generals" coming for the Christmas season of 2005.
Hips, tighs and Abs. It is ok I think but too many tools are needed to do it properly. I travel a lot and can't take things with me all around, so don't use it much but if you have all the tools at home it is effective. The abs section is at the end and very short too, mostlly focused on hips and tighs
West Wing 2nd Season. The series is very good however not all of the disks played well on the dvd player.  Am not sure what the problem is, but it is with these particular disks as all other disks play without a problem
Excellent show on lousy disks. I read other reviews about the poor disk quality but thought I'd get luckly, which I didn't.  The very first episode skipped and finally stopped altogether near the end.  I tried it on 2 different players with the same result.  Cheap double sided dvds.  I expect more of the same on the other episodes.  A great show treated shabbily with cheap disks.  If you haven't bought Hart to Hart yet get that instead.
ONE OF THE WORST I EVERY PUCHASED. VERY DULL MOVIE! UNINTERESTING CHARACTERS IN A PLOTLESS MUCK OF INCIPIDPOLITICAL PROPAGANDISTIC DRIVEL. SAVE YOUR MONEY!!!
Bad. But good. Cube Zero (Ernie Barbarash, 2004)NOTE: this review contains a really, really major spoiler. If you're planning on watching the movie, be warned.Cube Zero is a movie so unspeakably horrible, so ineffably awful, so utterly insincere to the mythology around which it is based that it breaks through the ceiling of the thoroughly awful and may even come to inhabit that special place that one holds dear in one's heart for films so bad you can't help but feel affection for them-- Night of the Lepus, for example, or Gymkata.While it's impossible to believe that a movie this inept could have possibly come from anyone even remotely involved with the Cube franchise, it's true: writer/director Ernie Barbarash wrote and produced Cube 2: Hypercube. This is his first (and, if there is any justice in the world, it will be his last) directorial effort, and he comes off as the Jamaican Bobsled Team of directors; he may perform something else behind the scenes of a movie reasonably well, but the man should never be allowed near a directors' chair again. Ever. To expand on his own talent, Barbarash recruited a production team so skilled that he might have had to dole out minimum wage (for the rest of us, not Hollywood) to the whole lot of them. But maybe they all took one paycheck and just split it. For with the exception of makeup wiz Scott Hamilton (I, Robot), unless Barbarash's utter lack of talent simply eclipsed anything else, no one on this crew is worth a thing. "Shoddy" doesn't even begin to describe it. The set design was conceived by a rabid wombat (who, I might add, had obviously never seen either of the first two films), the dialogue was written by a drunk sloth, and the costumes were rented from the local dry cleaner, who I'm sure promised they could have them for free as long as they were back by nine the next morning.The worst travesty, however, is in the casting. (I warned you about a spoiler. I will do so again. If you haven't seen the movie, and you plan to, skip the rest of this paragraph.) The box lets you know it's a prequel. What they don't tell you is that in order to preserve the suspense-- or, more likely, simply because some asinine copywriter forgot to do any fact-checking-- they changed some names around. Why I prefer the second interpretation in the last sentence to the first: when they recreate a key scene from the first movie, the actors portraying the characters in the first movie not only don't look like their first-movie counterparts, they couldn't possibly be more different. While that may have been intentional, it comes off ludicrous at best. The production team were either insulting our intelligence as viewers, or trumpeting their own stupidity ot the high heavens. More probably, they were doing both.So given all that, what could I have possibly liked about the movie?, you may be asking. And you'd be right. First, the dialogue and situations are so insipid they often inspire unintentional hilarity. The "exit procedures" scene is one of the funniest I've seen in a movie in quite a while. It's always fun playing "spot the inconsistency" in a film based around a popular mythology. And as woefully miscast as they are, Queer as Folk's Stephanie Moore and Dog Park's Zachary Bennett have a kind of earnestness about them in the lead roles here that hearken back to Ray Milland and Sam Elliott squaring off in Frogs.Cube Zero is a stupid, stupid film, but if such a thing is possible, it's stupid in a good way. While the original Cube quite rightly became a bona fide underground smash hit, this one has a chance to become this generation's Reefer Madness or Red Asphalt. Yes, folks, it's that bad. *
Fuzzy filming. Not sure why the disk was so low quality.  The picture was fuzzy and sometimes pixelated.  I cleaned my dvd player and tried it again.  still the same problem.  so i tried it again on my other dvd player on a different tv.  still the same problem.SG-1 is a wonderful tv series and would recommend the series to all sci-fi fans
Rear-View Mirror Propaganda Piece. I'll cut to the meta-chase since plot and story have already been well outlined in previous reviews...The basic message of this film seems to be that state controlled "education" is worthy of resurrection and total dictatorship is the way to achieve it. Though the latter point is probably true, the former is questionable indeed. Why try and save an obviously moribund and mindless system of government indoctrination from its own demise? Don't blame the kids, you have only to look at the state of the world to see the utter failure that so-called educated people have already created everywhere, with world fascism now its ultimate fruitage, and the kids at some level know it...Clearly we urgently need a new vision of education altogether, but this film only asks us to glorify what has already died...
Another one of those silly 80's movies. The jokes are pretty much what you would expect and there are a lot of slap-stick sight gags. I normally wouldn't have bought a movie like this but I needed it to make my Johnny Depp library complete
good movie, bad copy!. good movie, bad copy!I ordered it because it was cheap.However, picture quality is POOR; fuzzy, washed-out, blurry.It looks like it's recorded in superlongplay.The shortness of the tape would seem to confirm this
Why do people like this version?. I think this is an awful corruption of Bronte's book.  Little Cathy curtseys to Heathcliff and says "I am your slave" although the book makes it clear their relationship is just the opposite and she's a willful child with no qualms about slapping him upside the head.  When Heathcliff runs off with her sister-in-law, Cathy wants Edgar to KILL him??? Since when?  Why write a script that doesn't match the book when the book's dialogue describes the characters' relationships perfectly?  The backless dress that looked like it was going to fall off at any moment certainly made the most of Oberon's looks and, as far as acting, I think she carried the movie but Olivier just posed. This isn't Wuthering Heights--it just borrows some of the plot. I like the 1992 version with Ralph Fiennes and Juliette Binoche best; it's the most faithful to the book and the acting is superb. My second favorite is the 1998 T.V. version with Robert Cavanah and Orla Brady.  I recommend that anyone who is considering buying the 1939 version rent it first
Are you people crazy?!?!?. This DVD sux!! (Compared to what else is out there that is...nothing RHCP really sux!!) It is further compounded by the simple fact that the VHS DOES have complete songs, several of them. At least the one I have does, I have had to prove it to doubters several times in the past.But the real issue is WHERE ARE THE DVDS FOR "Positive Mental Octopus" and, especially, "Psychedelic Sexfunk Live From Heaven"?!?!?! I have had both on VHS for 15 years and, in my opinion, nothing I have seen tops Sexfunk live. In fact I broke down, bought a capture card and made the DVDs myself. But they're only stereo so I would be more than happy to buy both as official releases in 5.1 sound!!! Until then, nothing else really matters (but I like Stadium Arcadium quite a bit and I hope they put out a DVD of one of those shows!!)
Don't Even Woof At This Dog!. This is the kind of film that gives soft porn a bad name. A juvenile "plot", poor dialog, and wooden "acting" - Ed Wood movies are better produced. Yes there's several naked women and a naked man, but except for "Valerie" they're not very attractive, and completely un-erotic. Don't waste your money: this French picnic needed more bread and wine and much less cheese
Horrible sequel to PD1. This movie was so disappointing. It was completely different from the first movie AND all the books. Where in the world was Michael
Boring. Highly acclaimed. That, I knew. I watched the first 30 minutes, which is 1/4 of the movie, before I decided to hang it up. New lady moves into a conservative French town and opens a chocolate shop. This upsets the local church, even before she begins unleashing secret desires and so forth with her sinful chocolate. Okay. Can you really carry 2 hours with this single plot? Nope. This one's boring.
Boring. Boring. Boring. This is the fourth Friday 13:th movie. The first was rather lame, borrowing the style of music and some of the story from Psycho. The last 5 minutes were cool. The second was better, with more distance and awereness of not being unike, while not falling into the irony trap that later would poison movies in the 90ies. The third more or less cuts to the chase, with a mindless killer killing not so mindful teenagers.I don't know what they tried to do in this one. Skinny dipping. Making out. Jason appears, kills, and disappears. Shower scenes. Watching old black and white nude movies. Maybe the ending is good, but the rest?! Dignity, can we have some dignity?The one cool thing about this movie is that Halloween 4 might have borrowed from both it's beginning and it's end. But now you know, so you can still skip this one. (And now you know that I'm a nerd.
plot holes. The first half hour of this 90 minute movie is actually quite good.  In fact, it is enthralling and has an interesting twist in that we don't know the real fact behind whether a young woman was violated by her boyfriend while unconscious.  According to the rumor (the rumor being a school experiment conducted by three roommates) she was, however, but we the audience don't know that.  However, the young woman is quick to think she has been raped.  Why there is no attempt at a physical exam, is unexplained, especially since the young woman involved has the reputation of being a professional virgin, however it turns out she isn't, so that's why the movie lasts longer than 30 minutes.  Fortunately, we're not dealing with unwanted pregnancies, either, so this doesn't turn into a soap opera.  However, we do have the dreamboat "hero" who dreams up the rumor about her being raped, and who exhibits unlikeable traits throughout. But that's true of the three leads - the roommates are all unlikeable, being insufferably full of themselves.  The last half of the film, 'dreamboat' takes the turn as lead character, and it's his story we're following, whereas his female roommate had the first half of the film, and basically it's her introduction to the audience of all the characters. Turns out 'dreamboat' and the young woman victim have a history together; which means issues they have to work out, and everyone else (in a way, the entire student body and its faculty and local law enforcement) is sucked into their story and mutual thirst for truth, though the characters don't have the same truth in mind - it's about vengeance; not justice.  And vengeance when it's not the comic book variety, isn't fun for an audience, it's just distasteful.  In other words, the man and woman should have been shut up together in a room so they could have worked it out for themselves, and left the rest of us alone.  So from a brilliant first half-hour - and btw how does the roommate penniless art student have the dollars for all that tech equipment? - we degenerate into a constantly weaving pattern of lies and deceptions that seems more pointless than clever.  There is merely too much story, so it becomes ridiculous.  A basically good premise is ruined.  If you are a fan of any of the stars involved, it might be worth viewing, if only once, but the film as a whole will probably leave a vile taste in your mouth.  Perhaps that's the ultimate message on a film about the dangers of spreading GOSSIP, or in this case deliberate lies, is that what goes around comes around, and also it will leave you feeling sick to your stomach.  I almost recommend you watch the first 30-45 min then quit midway, but anyone will watch all the way thru at least once, just to be sure where this is headed
Better Off Never Made. I found much of the humour in this movie to be downright silly and stupid.  In no way does this movie compare to others in the genre from the same period, such as "Ferris Bueller's Day Off" or "Sixteen Candles".  Just no comparison.  So I'm totally dumbfounded that many of the reviews here speak so highly of it.  If what I read is true, Cusack is very much justified in regretting participating in this movie.  It's a blemish on what has been a pretty good movie career so far
sandy. scaredy pantsI was a teenage garysquidward the unfriendly ghostimitation krabswelcome to the chum bucketfrankendoodlethe secret boxband geeksmy pretty seahorseidiot bo
I want my $10.00 and 45 minutes back!. Went to see this movie at the IMAX in San Antonio this weekend.  I have to say I actually laughed most of the way through.  The effects were decent, but most of the time I had trouble making anything out due to the fuzzy 3D effects.  That was when I wasn't having to "look around" the bird statues and gargoyles that popped up in the foreground of the shot in blazing white about six inches from my face making it completely impossible to focus on the actual movie.Some of the torture scenes and the Faustian plotline, along with the hideous firey face that is Mr. D make this movie too dark and scary for anyone under the age of 10, but the terrible plot along with the worst voice-acting I have had the displeasure to hear in my life make the film unbearable for anyone over the age of 10.Basically, I guess you could say I was slightly displeased with the movie.  I do have to admit that I got a hearty laugh when the main character, Johnny (played by Jasper Steverlinck, an up-and-coming rocker and lead singer of the band Arid, a decent rock group that was featured at the end of the movie in the only bright spot I could find in the movie) throws his guitar into the fire and begins singing opera to defeat the evil Mr. D and destroy the haunted castle.  Unfortunately, the scene was designed to be serious
John Tucker lives???. Okay the person that puts this movie in the same catogory as "Bring it on", "Clueless", "Mean Girls" and, especially the superior "Heathers".. is painting a false picture of what this movie is.. I'm sorry but, "John Tucker Must Die" is no where close to being as sharp or clever as these other mentioned films. These other films have a balance that allows more adults to enjoy them as well as the intended target of younger teenagers. "JTMD" appeals more to that teen crowd and has older viewers wondering if this has anything new to offer.. and wonder is all I did. This film tries taking alot of plot lines and ideas from other teen films and brings them all together.. the results are one BIG mess. 2.5 stars is all I can give.. the other films mentioned above are the ticket. "Heathers" = 5 stars. "Mean Girls" = 4 stars. "Bring it on" = 4 stars. "Clueless" 4.5 stars. All four of these movies have something that "John Tucker Must Die" doesnt have..
Disappointed. I purchased this DVD mainly for the Hip Hop sections.  I was very disappointed to find out there is no Hip Hop dancing on this DVD.  Madonna Grimes is the instructor for the Hip Hop section but it is basic aerobics and floor exercises.
Never Give a Sucker an Even Break. I chose this Fields title for this review because Amazon seems to be employing it as a business practice. I dearly love the movie of that title and would like to add it to my DVD library. So I entered it into the "search" field and clicked on "go." I was delighted...at first...to see this collection pop up and I 1-click ordered it immediately. Then I discovered the movie is not included; the set is merely the same old collection of shorts that have been issued and reissued over and over by other companies. I tried to cancel the order but was informed that it was already being processed and could not be cancelled or changed. It arrived and I returned it immediately.Maybe some day NEVER GIVE A SUCKER AN EVEN BREAK will become available (hopefully issued in the quality restoration it well deserves). But don't let Amazon sucker you into buying this set if it's the movie you're after. We deserve an even break
Overt Child Exploitation That Never Redeems Itself Satisfyingly. A well-acted, well-portrayed, sickening, overt example of an adult whose sole desire for a child is based on getting that child to meet his own selfish needs.  He has little or no love for the child based on who the child is in her core, and sends her the basic message that she does not count as a human being aside from being an object to gratify him.  If the child does not mold to his expectations and desires she gets rejected, and this is the horrible tension of the movie.Although the movie has some twists and turns that shake things up, the man's character never develops much in a satisfying way, and nor do the basic themes of adult selfishness and cultural repression.  As such the movie is essentially non-redemptive, and portrays a sad and tragic side of humanity.Although this movie is set in an outer province on China in the 1930s, it's actually a good metaphor for Western culture, much as Western cultural norms do not allow parents to exploit their children so overtly..
Bad First Disc AsWell. Just like the reviewer before me, the 1st disc of The Batman The Complete Third Season would not play. At first I thought the problem was a fluke and returned it for a replacement but the replacement has the exact same problem too. At this point I'm getting refund, which is a real shame because I was looking forward to the 3rd season. I'll probably wait a few months for this problem to be fixed and try again. Two stars simply because the 1st disc is not functional.
no title. What a disappointment!  I remember Siskel and Ebert raving over this romantic comedy.  Romantic, maybe, but comedy - never.  Very predictable plot from beginning to end.  And Rosie Perez was truly offensive.  A few times I couldn't understand what she was saying.  There is no way I could buy that she and Cage's character were attracted to each other.  Maybe critics liked this movie because it had no sex, violence, or rough language.  Although Cage does get shot in one hold-up scene.  It was just that you knew what was going to happen every step of the way.  I am beginning to Like Cage more and more as he ages. [ spoiler] I was really disappointed at the end to find out that the real people whom this story is based on were always happily married to their original partners.  Either they shouldn't have changed it so much or they shouldn't have let us know about the real story it was based on.[end of spoiler]  But Fonda and Cage were very engaging together
Disney is a joke. Disney is a joke and this movie is a joke.  I wish I could give it zero stars.  Why does Disney keep instisting on taking these dark, disturbing tales, such as Pocahontas, Alladin and the Huntchback of Notre Dame (which, by the way is really Notre Dame of Paris) and making them into cutsey kids films?  And, oh, lets give it a happy wappy, cutesy wutesy ending.  Screw that; this is a dark, sad and disturbing tale AND THAT'S THE WAY THIS STORY SHOULD BE!  What the heck story is Disney going to try to adapt as a children's film next?  The Scarlet Letter?
Funny But Sadly Lacking. After Matt Dillon's phenomenal performance in CRASH, most will probably rush to pick up a copy of FACTOTUM to see if Dillon is for real or simply got a lucky rebound from a great script.Well, Factotum certainly has its moments, but the plainness of ...everything will most likely turn viewers off. However nothing should be taken away from Dillon. His performance is wonderful and full of excellent deadpan humor, proving he's a solid actor with significant chops; it's just a shame about the directing and script.The story is about Henry "Hank" Chinaski (Dillon) and his refusal to conform to anything resembling normalcy. He quits or gets fired from jobs in mere minutes, only to find himself back in a dreary pub meeting even drearier women while trying to write a nonconformist novel. We never really know what the novel is about except that it involves "everything" (cancer, movies, you, me).Skipping from workplace to workplace and constantly returning to Jan (Lili Taylor, THE HAUNTING), a loser girlfriend who's just as dispiriting as himself, Hank tries vainly to discover what his life is supposed to hold for him. Whether he ever learns what that is is up for interpretation. Some may say that he never does, while others might argue that his life is simply a path to obscurity.Regardless, there's not much substance to Factotum even with Matt Dillon's fine performance. The story meanders through Hank's life without much thought given as to where to take the audience. And that's a shame. Dillon's performance would've shone even brighter if given a decent script.
An unrealistic and horrible influence on today's children. Having a curiosity in the entertainment that kids and teens are being given today, I happened to watch this film on TV a few days ago.I could be biased and say that movies aren't what they use to be for kids, but this movie went beyond that. This film is a depressing example of how horribly some of today's youth is growing up. I would NOT recommend this film in anyway (unless for laughs at its stupidity).The film starts off with our four 'rich girl' characters strutting down the street with arrogance beyond words. The arrogance, perhaps a normal thing for some teenagers. However, these girls do appear to be filthy rich of which very few kids could relate to leaving them to wonder why can't they be rich little kids too?The goal of these girls of course - To become famous pop-singers. An unrealistic dream for most but it seems to be a moral to the film: "to have a good life, you need to become famous".The plot moral, not a great one. The characters little lessons, appalling.'Raven' is so caught up in the 'becoming a pop-star' experience that she becomes completely self-absorbed. This is probably one of the few morals that are presented well. Don't become a self-absorbed idiot.Moving on. Our second character fails entirely at bringing in any good ideals. After some time working on 'the cheetah girls' upcoming career she comes home to throw a tantrum about her mother not being there (rather, she's out with a boyfriend). The real-estate agent rings about her mother's interest in selling the house, the daughter picks up the phone, rudely yelling to the agent how this house is not for sale 'Because I say so' in pure teen angst. Now she decides to go out and abuse her mother's credit card for all the money it's worth because of this small episode.Of course when mum comes home, she is not happy. But apparently it's all ok when the daughter cries out about how her mother should be there more for her. Perhaps if this were a REAL case of child-neglect, this may be ok. But this kid was just a selfish brat who needs to find better ways to get over minor issues.I really hope kids won't think its ok to throw hissy fit next time they discover their parents had to go out.The next character is perhaps the most insulting to the 'real world'. Raven makes an occasional comment to this character about how trashy their fashion looks (and yes, their fashion looks perfectly fine actually).Later in the film we realise that our 'trashy' girl is actually an orphan living in a poor foster home. It's a good idea; however, this girl looks NOTHING like a real 'poor' girl. Perhaps a 'money isn't everything' moral would have fitted nicely here, but instead we're handed the perfect fix: Get your rich friends to buy your clothes.The forth character I won't comment on as I can't remember anything significant about her.The process of becoming pop-stars of course, is very unrealistic, aside the sell-out factor and the lip-syncing.'The cheetah girls' are torn between following their original dream or selling-out just to get the exposure. Their friendship hangs on the line because of this as Raven refuses to compromise.We are given a few inspiring quotes from other characters about which road Raven should take on this matter, then its all up to the wonderful climax to do the rest.The climax. Toto has fallen in a hole and has got dirty (horrifying experience for a dog bearing a perly white coat)Poor Raven is so frantic, this is obviously the worst kind of tragedy that could happen in life. God forbid we learn anything realistic like the death of a family member or even of this poor little pooch. Perhaps in that case we'd even had the President of the United States turning up to comfort Raven, but no, it's just a dirty dog stuck in a hole, it only calls for the whole neighbourhood, police, fire fights and the local television news crew. Such a tragedy can only resolve in the reconciled friendship of 'the cheetah girls'.And there we have it. Entertainment... maybe. Any benefits otherwise, I would personally hope NOT, as they're not the kind of things I would like to see in kids and teenagers these days.Normally, If this film was aimed at a higher audience (ha) I wouldn't see as much of a problem with it. But this was a Disney film... you know, the ones that are meant to be inspiring to kids, or at least teach them some values in life? This just gave us an insight to Disney's own greedy mind.
Warner Brothers was up in arms over this movie..... It might not have been that widely reported in the press but when Disney was releasing this movie, Warner Brothers and DC Comics was up in arms over the title and direction that this so called movie on the life of George Reeves was taken, so to avoid legel difficulties, the movie was edited and it's title was changed to avoid court proceedings.Aside from that this is a tasteless movie about the life of an actor who ment much to the generation of Superman readers who watched the TV show (the offical verdict of history is that the actor's death was a suicide and this tasteless movie does nothing to change or prove otherwise).  George Reeves should be remembered more for the part he played on film and leave his private life alone.  Case Closed
Bad spot on dvd. We rec'd the Splash dvd and were quite a way into viewing it when it just went digital garbage -- all our other dvd's seem to work alright and we have a laser disk cleaner and try to run it through regularly -- i already threw away the container -- we will run the cleaner thru again and see if it clears up the problem - this is the first time we've bought a dvd that had a problem - we've always been very satisfied with the amazon service -- and products as well.thanks for askingpgammon
Stan and John Create Surface Tension. This dvd first caught my eye with high expectations and a low price.  The price turned out to be too much.  Stan Lee and John Buscema are two of the greatest comic book creators that have ever lived, but this dvd just isn't good enough to meet their standards.  It offers much in the way of comic book jargon, but displays each business element very poorly.  The main focus of this "visual" video is verbal instruction.  There is a very limited amount of important hands-on drawing, barely even enough to teach a learning artist anything.  I think that HOW TO DRAW COMICS THE MARVEL WAY could have been done a lot better and should offer a great deal more.  Unless you are an avid comic book fan, I do not recommend purchasing this dvd.  And, even if you are, I would give it some serious thought
Description VERY Misleading. This is NOT a story about Black River Falls, as the description indicates.  It is a film about stories from around Wisconsin as reported in a paper from Black River Falls, with some hokey footage of modern (1990's) day Black River Falls.There are very few photographs from the period and the film footage is mostly an attempt at what I can only call "modern art".  Cut out about 20 minutes of "filler" and this would be a somewhat better film.Basically, it's a collection of "strange but true stories" that have no connection to each other, except they took place around the same period of time and took place somewhere in the state of Wisconsin.  And the modern footage makes no positive contribution at all.  In fact, if I was from Black River Falls, I would be upset about how the town is portrayed.A complete waste of time and film
Overdue For An Ending. It always amazes me that how some quality television series gets cancelled halfway through the first season while some mediocre show seems to go on forever.That is not to say that Dawson's Creek started out as a bad show.I believe the trick to produce a good character driven drama / romantic series is to write flawed but generally likeable characters, and let these characters develop and grow (for the better) as they slowly draw the audience into the show's universe.The creator and original writers of the series have created a show with a heart. We were introduced to the universe of Dawson, Pacey, Joey and Jen throughout the earlier seasons of the show. The show did not hold back in showing these characters' strenghts and faults, and in return lured the audience to empathize with them and even like them.But somewhere along the way (proabably at some point after the original writers have left the show), we see these characters slowly diminishing into two dimensional versions of themselves, acting more as supporting elements for the show, padding out empty shells the writers proudly refers to "episodes" week after week as the show slowly sinks into the bottom of the sea we call boredom.The show rises above water every now and then between episodes, but it is quite obvious that it has been converted into something entirely different from what it started out as:A teen soap opera where in every few weeks the network tries to shove a new character with a pretty face down the audience's throat.As if that is not enough, the writers slowly turn Dawson from a passionate, idealistic and good hearted person into a selfish, self-absorbed and self-righteous snob while Joey was turned from a strong, self-reliant girl into an angry, antagonistic and fickle woman.The relationship between the two oldest best friends, Dawson & Pacey was literally put in a box and thrown into the ocean ever since the Joey/Pacey betrayal, and the story was never resolved towards the end. I find it unbelievable that two childhood best friends would bicker for a life time over a girl like Joey.Also, it's even more unbelievable that a character like Pacey could actually fall in love and remain crazy about a character as volatile and fickle as Joey for all these years, even with all her charms. Had the show have continued into seasons 7 and 8, we will most likely see Joey, after marrying Pacey, cheat onhim for at least 5, 6 times with Dawson and different versions of Eddies, and rationalizes her behaviour with enough run-on sentences to drive Pacey to jump off the Brooklyn Bridge.Pacey and Jen have somehow survived the onslaught throughout the series, but only to further substantiate the fact that the writers were too busy introducing so many new two-dimensional characters into the show to fill up the episodes with cliched storylines.The final episode was definately a saving grace, with the original writer back on the helm attempting to give the original show its much deserved ending, although it only made the entire season 6 look so much worse in hindsight.The final season does have its better moments (last episode aside); episodes like "The Castaways", and that christmas episode are definately worth a second watch, although there were just too many episodes in the season where you just want to hit the fast forward button and get to the point when someone actually utters something intelligent.Worth buying if you are a hardcore DC fan, otherwise, I would suggest renting the better episodes from a store.
Not the Worst Movie Ever Made. First of all, this is NOT the worst movie ever made, nor even the worst movie ever made that was given a budget and some name stars. The worst movie ever made was "Autumn in New York", but that is a different review.No, this not a great movie, but it is very interesting. And for once, thank God, it doesn't end with everything tied up in a pretty Hollywood bow where everthing works out for everyone. It has a gritty sort of realism that transcends the walk through performances of the stars of the movie. And the scenery works well for the overall feel of the movie, bleak.More interestingly for me and others of my generation who grew up with the brat pack, this marked the end of these actors forays into trying to do the teenager thing. For Molly Ringwald, she didn't do anything of note again until "The Stand" six years later, and for Andrew McCarthy, well it could be argued that he still hasn't starred in anything of note again (although he probably made some money from "Weekend at Bernies" I & II).Anyway, probably better to rent than buy, I am only buying it to complete my 80's collection.
P.U.!!!!. Edward Burns is a talented actor, but as a writer/director he seems to specialize in myopic boorish "male chick flicks" (McFlicks?).Halfway through this film I thought ,"hey,noone's going to give me back those 45 minutes" and put the DVD back in the box.You've seen it all before,and if you care about these shallow clichedcharacters,perhaps you'll have a good time (watching the film was like being with relatives you don't care for). Me,I'll look for him in "Private Ryan" and kick myself for opening the DVD!
Rent It First!!. A dismal disappointment. I think you should rent it and find out for yourself before you actually own a copy. When I see the high ratings, I wonder if people have some investment in the selling of this product. The original Lonesome Dove mini series was unbelievably well done. A complete multifaceted joy. I was so excited when I saw there was a sequel and the joy of Lonesome Dove would continue. Well it didn't and you can read why in more depth in other low ratings
Americo-trash. This is the dumbest, most predictable, horrible waste of time i've ever ever seen.  This movie tried very very hard to be funny and simply wasn't.  It took a pretty good idea and butchered it by cliche jokes and feel good high school humor that's supposed to encourage all of us angsty youngings to go to europe, drink, and copulate with any random gorgious blonde that happens to walk past us.  After watching this movie I felt incredible stupid and regret being apart of a culture that could make such main stream trash.  my only hope is that our european friends didn't seen this for it would most certainly cause an international incident
Lame and corny. When I was a kid, this was one of my favorite movies.  Now that twenty years have passed, all I can say is that it is so lame and corny that it's kind of embarrassing admitting that I used to like it so much.  Sure I still get a kick out of state-of-the-art (back then, at least) aircraft steaking all over the place, engaged in dogfights and all that... but that's about it.  The whole story is really half-baked, and not much good can be said about the acting.  If you haven't seen this movie yet, trust me, you haven't missing much and I'd recommend not wasting your time on it
Shooting for Hip, Hitting Pointless. Oliver Stone proves to be just as reliable as a social critic as he is a "historian."PLATOON and BORN ON THE FOURTH OF JULY were great films but JFK, though brilliantly made, was a sign that something was off about Stone's mental processes.NATURAL BORN KILLERS could have been a scathing indictment of our media's obsession with violence and decadence...but instead it's just Exhibit A in the indictment, wallowing in the filth it tries to satirize
The legend reworked... To be fair, the legends of Herakles, as they were originally written, have little to do with this movie, but maybe that's for the best.  Having grown up on Superman, Batman and the Justice League, I have a hard time calling a person like Herakles a hero.  In the original legends, he was a warrior, but also a brute who eventually wound up killing his wife and children in a fit of rage.  He also wasn't, as far as I can tell, as strong as in this version.Therefore, interpretations of Herakles are, I think, to be judged not on whether or not they deviate from the legend, but on where and why.Disney has attempted to take Herakles (or Hercules, in the Roman) and make it a story about a true hero, and a perfect one at that.  There's nothing I like more than perfect heroes.  They inspire me.  Conceptually, I like the idea.Instead of Herakles being the illegitimate son of Zeus and a mortal woman, he's conceived in love by Zeus and Hera and turned mortal by a potion.  Not bad.  As changes go, it works better than most.Herc meets Meg at the beginning of his hero carreer and falls instantly in love with her and she with him (another deviation from the legend, and a very good improvement.)  Of course, because Hera is his mother in this version, she can't be Herc's enemy, so they make his opponent Hades; lord of the dead, which could be worse, as changes go.  I've never seen Hades as being all that bad of a guy, but that's how it goes.  Then there's the Hydra, which is, if anything, much larger and more powerful than it was originally, so that's good too.  Aside from this, however, I have to say I was disappointed with most of the changes.The titans, to start with, were underplayed considerably.  It might have been premature to mention that they were Zeus' predecessors, but they could at least have given them powers similar to what they actually had, and a roughly-similar appearance.  Oceanus, for example, lashing out with blasts of water from his hands like a fire hose, or Cronos reversing the movements of his olympian enemies would have made for an excellent action sequence, particularly since Hercules didn't beat the titans alone in the original stories, nor does it make sense that he should in this one (grabbing a whirlwind?  Come ON now.)I actually didn't mind Hades' used-car-salesman demeanor all that much, though I didn't see a reason why he should have flame-based powers when that's clearly Apollo's territory.  Further, I thought most of the Gods and Muses were given no credit at all in terms of their innately glorious nature.Why is this the case?  I think Disney made the mistake, in this film, of not just trying to make the legends clean, but FUN as well, and there's nothing fun about war.  I'm not saying they couldn't have made the concept work.  In fact, I'm saying they could have made it work if they'd toned down the comedy and given the characters a bit of respect (Justice League style.)Still, for what it's worth, this is one of the few movies left in the world that isn't afraid to dwell on the concept of a hero, and for that it's worth at least one viewing.  Rent it from your local video store, in my opinion, before you make your decision
2 out of 10. Volunteers is a film I wished that I never saw. It is so bad that I was miserable after finishing it. Was it supposed to be a comedy or an adventure? Throw in bad jokes. Add psychotic John Candy. Steal the idea of The Bridge On the River Kwai. What do you have? I don't know. The greatest disappointment in this film was John Candy. That wasn't the definitive John Candy that I know. Before viewing Volunteers, I was expecting tons of crack jokes. After viewing Volunteers, what a let down! The anticipation of boredom was the last thing on my mind. I am gravely disappointed in this film. Worst part also is the supposed romance between Tom Hanks and Rita Wilson. Really, what romance? I don't see the chemistry
Horrible DVD. There is not one reason to purchase this DVD.  Neither kids or adults will enjoy it.  I was hoping for something along the lines of America's Funniest Home Videos (WITHOUT Bob Saget) but it did not even live up to that weak standard.  A total disappointment.  Avoid at all costs unless you enjoy watching overweight folks perform pig calls at a county fair.  That is the type of material (I kid you not) that is on this DVD.  I only hope I can get rid of it on eBay so I don't have to look at it in my DVD collection
Really awful movie about wealthy/cheating/old gay men. Really awful movie about wealthy/cheating/old gay men and the boys they seduce. This movie was disgusting. A 40 year old pianist who has a partner of similar age, meets a boy of 18 who admires him and has sex with him while on a business trip. Likewise, his old partner also hires prostitutes while the pianist is on the road. I guess if you have an open relationship, or if you think cheating on your partner is cool, or if you're an older guy who fantasizes about younger guys, you might like this movie. The boy also plays piano, but always gets selected for the "page turner" role. Mom doesn't know the boy is gay, but later figures it out. At the end of the movie I got the impression that the boy may have been trying to sleep his way into the music business, but I wasn't 100% sure about that. No matter. The infidelity between the old and young generation was disgusting...even more so because of the cheating that went on. Don't bother renting this movie.
SCARY MOVIE 4. ALL I CAN SAY IS THIS....STUPID, STUPID, STUPID....THEY TOOK WHAT WAS SUPPOSED TO BE A GOOD MOVIE AND RUINED IT WITH THE STUPIDEST OF THINGS....LIKE THE GIANT IPOD....CMON....NOT EVEN FUNNY....TO ME NOT WORTH THE MONEY TO BUY OR RENT...
Amateur Effort By A Budding Genius. A good dozen years before his spectacular films of the late 70's and mid 80's Allen got his name on the directorial map w/ this piece of fluff.  You gotta start somewhere.  Tiger Lily is more of a dry run for his later, real comedies than an original film in its own right.  Allen's early work does tend to be stand up material thinly disguised as film.  Many of the jokes are funny but the one note premise wears thin quick.  A must for Allen enthusiasts and people who like quirky cultish so-bad-they're-fun movies
Not a sequel just another werewolf movie. For those that waited all these years for a sequel to the classic American Werewolf in London, the wait is not over.American adventurers looking for thrills across Europe decide to bungy jump from the Eiffel Tower.  But there is a beautiful woman who is going to commit suicide by jumping.  One of the boys jumps to her rescue.  But her secret is she is a werewolf and accidentally infects him.Well, it turns out that there is a pack of werewolves in Paris and they feed on Americans. (Let's talk obvious stereotyping.)  While at times it is good (especially when Julie Delpy is on screen).Don't waste your time watch the original!!
Does not live up to the hype. It is not good as  a mainstream movie , it does not have a good plot , some scenes are not relevant .Even as a soft-porn movie, it does not do a good job. Try watching "I like to play games" , its a much better soft-porn movie.
2 Whole Stars...I Must Be In A Generous Mood. Like the title says, I'm being mad generous by giving this movie two stars...it really deserves none. Subspecies is an excellent, 4-part series written and directed by Full Moon Studio's Ted Nicholau (Actually, the first three Subspecies are allright, but the fourth movie sucks in my opinion). However, Vampire Journals is nothing more than a feeble attempt to portray a different side of the Subspecies archetype.The characters, scenes, and acting in Subspecies Part 1-3 were superb. Yet this movie has an insipid plot and the actors are novice at best. The vampire teeth/fangs look horrid on most of the actors, and I was bored for the last 1/3 of the film.Essentially, the plot...if you can even call it that pertains to a vampire named Zachary, who wants revenge for unwillingly being turned into what he is. So Zachary (Whoever thought to name a supposedly wise and powerful vampire Zachary anyway?) sets out to destroy an ancient and extremely lame vampire cult headed by Ashe, a fledgling of the main antagonist (Radu)of all the Subspecies films.In addition to this, Zachary tries to rescue a female pianist named Sophia, who has been kidnapped by Ashe. Because she is a gifted musician...or something, Sophia is being forced by Ashe, a  fervid music lover, into becoming a vampire as well. Really there's not much else to go into, except that you should definitely not waste your time or your money on this film. So unless you're a die-hard Subspecies fan, or you basically just want to get drunk and have something to make fun of with your friends, try watching Subspecies 1-3 because they're the best you're gonna get from director Ted Nicholau
Missing minutes?!. I would like to say thankyou for the first two seasons - all original episodes! I will not be buying this third season until all the episodes are the original.
For Sale: $1.00 plus shipping. Alright, so maybe a dollar is a little steep for this, so just send shipping costs and you can have it.I couldn't even watch it all. It's unauthorized because no director, producer or Nickelback themselves would authorize its' release. No music,terrible documentary and not worth .10 cents. This is the worst DVD in my collection, but, I only own 674 of them ! This is only my opinion though, buy mine and decide yourself
Ju Dou: Razor D. E. lo-fi remix. Ju Dou is a great movie, I'd only previously seen it on VHS borrowed from the public library and was so looking forward to this release, but sadly I concure, this DVD is as bad as the other reviewers have previously stated.  Worse than the old VHS recording I saw 7 years ago.  So bad, that it's gotten someone like me, one who never writes reviews, to comment on it.  This DVD should not be sold in the United States, or anywhere.  Unfortunately, I picked this DVD up on a whim before reading any reviews.I'd suggest you just cherish your memories of this wonderful film until a better transfer is made available.  It was good to be reminded of the story, but very sad to see how carelessly Razor Digital Entertainment handled this transfer.It really baffles me how terrible this transfer is.  A few moments here and there the picture actually looks acceptable, but then the rest of the time it's blurry, washed out, monochromatic yellows and browns, lines and dust marks everywhere, and occasional digital glitches.  This dvd has probably any bad transfer cliche you can imagine; more than I've seen anyway.Yimou Zhang is a great director, Li Gong a wonderful actress, and it was from two beautiful films(seen only on VHS :( ) that I discovered this, Red Sorgum and Ju Dou.  But heed the reviews, this DVD lo-fi remix of Ju Dou by Razor Digital Entertainment is a nightmare
Has it's strengths but... My major gripe about this film comes down to the issue of easily exploitable weaknesses on the part of the vampires. These extremely frail villains get reduced to ash with the flash of a u-v lamp, vaporized with the slightest touch of silver on their skin, and melted down in less than a second by the light of the sun. Vampires are supposed to be scary, but how frightened of them should I be if one can be taken out by throwing a clove of garlic at him. Writers for future vampire movies should work on making these creatures of the night a bit more formidable. The first Underworld movie would be a good model.
An insult to marines. As soon as this movie started and I saw "WWE" on my TV screen I said "This is gonna suck." And it didn't disappoint. This movie sucked! Bad! It was one of the worst movies I have ever seen in my life. The story didn't make a lick of sense. You got these bad guys who kidnap a random woman whose husband turns out to be Rambo. The marine chases after these guys, killing them one by one. You'd think they'd just give him back his wife. She means nothing to them. Give her back and they can go on with their criminal business. But no. They hold on to her.The marine runs/jumps in slow motion away from explosions at least 4 times in this movie. This movie is filled with every single action movie clich and it didn't thrill in the slightest. It wasn't even bad enough to be good. It was just bad. It stunk
This video makes me NOT want to visit Big Sur. I wasted my money on this?The video quality was horrible; no doubt filmed with someone's personal video camera.  It becomes obvious that this is the case when you see the pan and zoom of the camera.The editing was terrible.  There are several places you can see that they tried to add too much saturation causing the poor video quality to be even worse.The Hearst Castle segment was less than a couple minutes long.  It is obvious that they did not have media access which would allow them to stage properly.  In fact, you can see members of the tour that they were on.There is a segment where they set the camera up in a car and drive aimlessly down the road to kill time.  Why?I could go on and on...The impression of Big Sur that I had when I was done watching, is that it is a place that I don't need to visit in my lifetime.  Having been to all the places they filmed, I can say forsure that they did not do Big Sur justice.  Rent or buy another movie.  This one is a waste
soundtrack ruined it. Oh man, this movie was so hard for me to stay interested in. The story had potential to make a adequate drama/thriller, if only it had been directed right.A lot of times you hear people say, such and such movie "took itself way too seriously." Well in this case I don't think this movie took itself seriously enough. I felt detached from the movie the instant my ear drums vibrated as that RIDICULOUS soundtrack made way into my head. Every moment where it had the chance to build a little bit of tension, this goofy music would kick in, or a wacky Looney Tunes type sound effect would "boing," or do something similarly zany, totally leaving me uninterested. I don't understand why they would go for that type of comical atmosphere with a story like this. It's not like the story itself was clever enough to be able to pull off being told in such a manner. The tone of the movie and the tone of the soundtrack conflicted with each other, not a good thing. The one part of the soundtrack I did like was the hollow, ambient type of music they played in many of those desert scenes, that created a good mood I thought.A random point- Remember the scene where Jennifer Lopez almost got pushed off the cliff? Ask yourself, would a normal person react that calmly, or make such a quick witty comment about their situation, when their life hangs in the balance?
child didn't like. My daughters ages 4 and 9 own this dvd and don't like it.  They also own the billy blanks tae bo for kids and love it.  My 9 yr. old especially likes the tae bo better.  I bought this thinking that it would give them another kind of workout, but they don't want to do this one at all.  I thought they would, and I'm sure as the other reviews have stated, love it but they didn't.  I guess it just depends on the child
Are You Serious?. I watched this movie with my 7 year old daughter, and regretted it about 10 minutes in.  After reading Queen Bees & Wannabees, I can't help but despair whenever I look over the precipice and get a glimpse into teen girl world.In Barbie's envisioning of this world the central theme is to "be yourself", but in the end they only seek themselves in a banal existence of dress shopping, chasing each others' boyfriends, inventing lip gloss disguised as a highlighter, deciding what to wear to an afternoon of watching cute boys practice football, and halfheartedly pursuing a career as a rock star.  While I realize that this is teenage girl reality, is this what needs to be held up to pre-teens as a personality blueprint?The popular girls look exactly like the unpopular girls, so it's not like the criteria for who gets to set foot on the "popular lawn" is really clear, other than you have to be mean-spirited and backstabbing.  But at least they somewhat captured the spirit of what it's like to be on the outside looking in.Of course, there's the "magic diary" aspect of the story, which seemed the only tie to the "other" Barbie world (Fairytopia, Mermadia, et all).  I realized then what I was really watching...a marketing cry for help from Mattel.  The target demo for Barbie has shrunk to 3-6 year old girls, and they're trying desperately to expand back into the 7-11 range that other brands like Bratz are chipping away at.  I promptly dumped all Mattel stock from my 401k.
Find Better Ways to Spend Your Time. Just horrible. Not worth more than a curious peek...then turn it off
Rose is a good actress but this movie was not for her. I bought the movie on accout Rose was on the cover. I got home and watched and in the end I was disappointed and in tears. This movie is not for people under eighteen cause of some of the stuff she doe
Please tell your children the history is different. I realize historical accuracy was not the intent of the filmmakers here, but as a history teacher, I feel the need to beg you to tell your children that this is not the way Jamestown really went down. An unreal number of students enter high school believing that this film is a historical documentary, and the first step to teaching Jamestown is to convince the students otherwise.Perhaps good can come from this film, in that it can teach young people to be critical of secondary sources
NO STAR NEEDED. ONLY REASON I'M RATING THIS IS BECAUSE IT HAS TO HAVE A RATING,ONLY REASON.....ALL I WILL TELL YOU W/O GOING INTO DETAIL ABOUT THIS DVD..."DON'T BUY IT"....IF YOU DO YOU WILL BE DISAPPOINTED...VERY DISAPPOINTED
Awful !. I cant even give this a NO rating ! This movie if you want to call it that was just awful I mean awful ! And stupid ! Silly ! Bad acting !What were these people thinking ?The original was so MUCH better ! There was mystery ! Whos calling the girls ?  Where is he ? Who is he ? Did they get him at the end ?I am so disgusted with this remake !If youre smart you'll rent this at the Redbox for a buck and its not even worth that much , DO NOT buy this if you saw the original as a kid and were scared out of your mind !This cheap remake is NOTHING like the original and what the hell was the hospital scene about ?Where were the police telling the girls or girl " the caller is coming from inside the house " ?This is trash ! And poor Andrea Martin she was in the original as the student in this shes the house mother and it doesnt go over very well , but I still love her !These other so called actors , um why dont they go to commercials like um Lee nail press ons
Awful. I thought this movie was absolutely awful.It is one of the worst movie's I have seen in quite a while.You keep waiting for the movie to get interesting, but it never does.I don't recommend this movie, especially not to a guy, he would be bored out of his mind by this one
Getting pretty dull. This is the dullest of the CotC films so far, but it's too late for me to turn back now.  Much like the last 2 ones, it doesn't seem directly related to the original film, but just another variation on the basic setup.  The corn matters again this time, however, and He Who Walks Behind the Rows is back, though this time as a fire in a corn silo, for some reason.  For most part nothing really happens.  There is a plot, of sorts, involving the main characters brother who joined the Corn Cult and so on, but it's just another basic re-do where a pack of young people stumble into a town full of evil children.  They stand around for a long time, eventually some people die, but not in a particularly intriguing fashion.  David Carradine makes a brief appearence, and he's passably amusing, but the film hasn't got a whole lot else going for it.  Also, the head evil kid isn't very good, as has generally been the case in this series.  It's tough to make small children scary or intimidating, I guess.  The film does have an amusingly pointless stinger at the end, and once the killin gets started it's sufficiently amusing,  but it's mostly a whole lotta nothin.Grade:
Too Much Too Little. I did not like this DVD at all.  It requires too many props such as bricks, belts, towels, blankets, chairs, etc... Each pose takes too long due to lengthy explanations.  As a beginner I find this too boring and studio based and unable keep my attention.  I feel it was a waste of money and don't recommend it
This is a Complete and Utter Rip off. I bought "Mexico City: An Ancient Mystery of Passion", another travel guide DVD by Acacian Tales.  If you want to watch a slideshow of fuzzy pictures with crummy music playing (nothing is ever said), this is your DVD.  If you don't want to be ripped off, stay away
Devilishly addictive, but not much payoff. This program is evil. It is easy to get sucked into watching Gantz, because of the unique and inexplicable situation that the main characters, who have all died, find themselves in. They have gone to purgatory, and purgatory is like an all-too-real video game. One feels compelled to continue on with the series to begin to answer some of these mysteries.The art direction is decent. Visually, it doesn't look cheap. The English voice acting is embarassingly bad, especially the main character, but not as bad as the dialogue, internal and vocalized, that this character has been given to speak.The worst thing about this series, apart from the juvenile humor about breasts and boners, is the "action" scenes. These inevitably play out with the people in danger standing around arguing and philosophizing about what to do, when the obvious course of action is to take the guns that are in their hands, and shoot at their alien adversaries like there is no tomorrow. After you witness a few of these frustrating situations on the video, if you don't feel like banging your head against the wall, you are made of stronger stuff than I.This first set of episodes leaves the viewer with more questions than answers, and more frustration than satisfaction. Save yourself the pain.
Zzzzzzzzzz....... A pretentious bore of a movie. Some hot babes with unspoken lesbian tendencies in a repressive Victorian era boarding school spout romantic poetry, go on a picnic, venture up the phallic symbol Hanging Rock (THRUSTING out of the earth as a result of a violent volcanic ERUPTION), take off their shoes and stockings (oooh, naughty!) and, after awakening from a siesta (I took one myself), promptly march in zombie-like fashion up and away and disappear into thin air. Poof! Nothing is resolved, so you are left to fill the void (personally, I think they were kidnapped by aliens). High-minded critics heap praise on this tripe. Ugh
FAILED ATTEMPT AT A GOOD MOVIE. I bought this movie because I love to see an old tale tespun and retold. If it is done well there is nothing better to read or watch. This movie is not a retelling of "Beauty and the Beast" as its title and premise would indicate. I own several versions of "Beauty and the Beast" on DVD and in print. And after reading the reviews here I was really looking forward to adding this movie to my collection and I was excited to have the chance to watch this movie. I thought it was going to be great! BUT IT IS THE WORST MOVIE I HAVE EVER PURCHASED. I was prepared for the horses and I was prepared for the nudity and the eroticism. I was not prepared for the filmmaker's mangling of "Beauty and the Beast".  That is what the blurb on the box suggests. But instead of getting the Beauty and the Beast message of the redeeming power of love, you get a half-hearted sermon against bestiality. I didn't know that was such a problem in this world. I mean I have never had the urge and I don't know of anyone who has. There have been no reports on the news about people sexually assaulting livestock that I have heard. I am sure I would have heard something if such was the case. There is no excuse for what Borowczyk has done here. The movie starts out slow, I can forgive that, I have an attention span (too many people don't.) The story starts to pick up momentum and promise when the beast appears. Then the story heads for the cliff and unhesitatingly dives off! I saw the kernel of a good movie here. WHAT HAPPENED? Do yourself a favor. Skip this one
DON'T WASTE YOUR MONEY!. The movie on the second disc is billed as the original theatrical release. This is only partly true. It was shown in 1977, but this was after it was cut to a commercial length. I am not a die hard purist, so don't get this wrong. However, the movie I loved was the one that existed prior to the commercial cut late in 1977. The moments with the character "Biggs" is an important part of the story, now lost. It supports Lukes longing to leave, but it also shows his longing for someone to look up to. Without these scenes this simply isn't the movie I loved-the initial release of Star Wars before it was cut to commercial length. I guess George Lucas just doesn't care about those of us who cherished the first release, which sadly now no longer exists for those who desire to see it. Shame on you Mr. Lucas!!Moral: Don't waste your money
Dopey 50's sit com. This has not aged well. The scripts are silly, the acting is of the "chewing up the scenery" variety. Gale Storm no longer seems cute; she comes across as annoyingly perky. Spend your money on something else
Hollywood's Ragpickin' Band. I was disappointed by this film. Tyrone Power, who is apparently devoid of musical talent, portrays a bandleader. Alice Faye, who can't carry a tune, is his Chantoozie. Ethel Merman, the one singer in the cast, never got to sing the title song! In later years she made it famous, probably to stick a finger in the eye of the producer. When "Alex" takes his band to Carnagie Hall in 1938, it is three times the size of the actual Benny Goodman orchestra that played the real gig the movie copies. Perhaps the saddest scenes of all are when Alex Haley, a decent hoofer, has to pretend to be a drummer. Good thing the beat was faster than his sticks! The one saving grace of the film is it was shot close to the period it portrays - so at least they got that right
Beyond bad. The fourth entry into the Howling series finds that after three films the series had already outstayed it's welcome.  The story is similar to that of the original film, involving a colony of werewolves that has one thing on their mind.  Howling IV: Original Nightmare, isn't original in the least, and despite some solid makeup effects, nothing can save the film from the atrocious acting (from Romy Windsor and Pretender's Michael T. Weiss) lackluster directing, and predictable story.  It's a terrible film, but believe it or not, there would be more Howling films on the way after this, which would get even worse!  Do yourself a favor, skip every Howling sequel and stick with Joe Dante's original tongue-in-cheek classic, because no Howling film after that is even worth seeing
Disappointing, Half-baked Film. This smarmy Kevin Costner vehicle is a trite half-baked movie.  I found this movie nearly unwatchable.  If you're looking for outstanding movies with a baseball theme try Bull Durham and Eight Men Out
Role Model?  Far From It. Jessica Simpson is a talentless bimbo.  She is more concerned with shopping than she is with being a singer role model - a title that she so proudly proclaimed after bashing Brittany and Christina for showing too much skin.  We all know now that the hypocritical Jessica Simpson would shed her clothes if the price were right.  She is NOT a role model and her songs/tv specials are lower than below average
How are people rating this 5 stars. I should first say that I have not watched the series, but will follow that up by saying that this movie has not persuaded me to do so. I am a casual anime fan and for reference will say that the anime's I have enjoyed include Dragon Ball Z, Outlaw star, Cow boy bebop and Ninja Scroll.  If you have only seen 2 movies in your life time and the other one was "Big top Pee-Wee", then maybe (and I stress maybe) I could understand a 5 star review. If you are a die hard fan of anime and if all it takes is a couple of bloody scenes this may be for you. If you are 15 years old you might be impressed with this. However if you expect depth of character, story evolution and strong plot, skip this.In a nut shell some girl is depressed and wants to disappear/Die, what ever, so she disappears and shows up in Gaea as the Wing Goddess. Two separate factions have been warring with each other over a dragon armor suit that holds the fate of the world. The girl is the key to the suit in a way it goes to whom ever she decides; the good guys get it the end. Believe me when I say this is the better telling of that story and the less painful one.The Good: a couple of good fight scenes and the animation were pretty good.The Bad: The tone of a movie is very important and this story was way over dramatized. The characters aren't developed at all so you can't really bring your self to care about them, or want to pay attention to them. The movie felt like they were trying to squeeze the content of a long draw out series into 95 minutes and they failed miserably. I considered turning this off several time but felt that I should finish and form a complete opinion about it. Well I have and it aint good.
Are  you people serious?  I think you need to see it again now that you're older. For some reason I do remember seeing this film as a kid, and I thought it was great.  But now, seeing it again, I don't know, I think it's really kinda dumb.  I can't remember what the appeal was back then.  Maybe it was because I thought Carol Kane was hot. And Gene Wilder was still kinda popular at that time.Try watching this again, believe me, it's not so great.  I should have rented this dumb thing first.
help. I was trying to watch it, but can not open de DVD because it is the wrong country code????
Terrible!. I have never not been able to sit through a rated G movie.  However, my sister and I rented this thinking it would be a funny show, and it was so terribly BORING that I was forced to leave the room.  I couldn't believe it because I love movies.  I can see how this movie would be funny for a 6 year old boy to watch, but don't count on the parents or older siblings being able to sit through it
Bee boop, boring!- Not for Cardio Lovers. Searching through the Amazon FIRM DVD's, Lo and behold! New ones! I was very excited to get this. Once the DVD arrived, I rushed to play it. It started with a "boogie/hip hop" kind of warm-up.... and kind of STAYED there. It just lacked any intensity. Now, there was some latin dancing, some disco dancing, and a boogie/hip hop cool down, but nothing to break a sweat with.I would recommend this for someone who is just beginning to work out, or someone out of shape.I was really disappointed, because it was hosted by Allie DelRio, in my humble opinion the best of the best. Her smile was wonderful, following her was easy, but it just lacked that FIRM energy. Plus, the workout cast had only Allie and Allison. The other folks were people never before seen in FIRM videos. One lady in the back even did these mini-dip twist things with her knees over her toe box! (A HUGE no-no)Recently, Goodtimes video, the company who used to own the FIRM, was just purchased by Gaiam (The folks behind AM/PM yoga). If this is what they are doing to the FIRM, I am going to stick with the old ones I got. I sure hope not-As the owner of 30 FIRM workouts, I am used to quality and excellence with the FIRM
A Parent's Review for Ultimate Avengers 2. I am a cartoon, and a comic fan.  I have been for years.  I think it is great that marvel has finally started putting out some great cartoon movies to show us in motion what these heroes can do.  The first Ultimate Avengers was cartoon-violent at times, but I thought that is was ok for my 5 year old daughter to watch.  But the second Ultimate Avengers, I thought this one took it a little too far.  There is a lot of hacking and slashing, a lot of really brutal fight scenes, and not alot of the Avengers.  Usually hero violence is punching the badguy out, or throwing him through a wall, but in this film they are trying to kill, and that is hard to watch with a child in the room.  I watched it once with my daughter, and ended up covering her eyes for portions of this film.  For me, I kinda liked it, but I won't watch it very often.  For my daughter, I wouldn't want her to watch it again
clint runs afowl of the cold war again. maybe it's because he is such a stright shooter(pun ment) or something but clint doesn't do cold war thrillers very well(remember firefox). while well directed and acted this spy thriller is dead most of the way through and while the climbing scenes are good they don't cover up the fact that it was a good book that doesn't watch as good as it read.some may like it but i found it to be a let down
It's hard to buy into this one. We all knew form the previews of this movie that Tom Cruse is a hit man and Jamie Foxx is a cab driver. And, that Tom commandeers Jamie and his cab for a night of killing. The problem, for me was when the mild-mannered, soft-spoken cab driver turns into a macho operative and then a super hero.Max (Jamie Foxx) has been a cab driver for twelve years. Although he has dreams and aspirations; that's about all they are. After twelve years he is still a cab drive. Yet, when he picks up a sophisticated lady lawyer, he charms her with his quick wit and knowledge; to the point that she gives him her phone without him even asking for it. I did not buy that for a minute.His next fare is Vincent (Tom Cruse). Vincent wants to hire Max's cab for the night and is willing to pay well beyond Max's usual night-time take. Yet Max resist. (Why? I don't understand this.) Reluctantly Max agrees to Vincent's request but only after Vincent really pushes the issue. Then, everything changes when Max -- by accident -- finds out that Vincent is a killer. And, that Vincent plans on killing more people with Max as his wheel man.Remember, Max is a mild-mannered, passive type of person. So he not only fears for his life but he is scared out of his wits. And so, he allows Vincent to intimidate him into going along on the killing spree.Of course all does not go as planned.Without giving away the plot (if you can call it that) Max is forced by Vincent to confront some very bad people -- on his own. Yet, while being scared out of his wits and surrounded by gun wheeling henchmen; Max is able to bluff the very bad man by putting on a macho act. I did not buy that for a second.After more killings, Max is still scared but decides that Vincent must be stopped. So, without regard for his own life (anymore), Max makes an all out effort to stop Vincent. That, of course, does not work. Vincent leaves Max in a precarious situation and continues to go after his next victim. So Max, in his now obsession to stop Vincent, overpowers a police officer who is arresting him, takes the police officer's gun, and goes after Vincent to stop him. I did not buy that for a millisecond. And I am glad I did not buy this movie.
Not a Remake, More Like a Sequel. When I heard they re-made the classic 74 version I was real pumped to get to see a new take on it. That means that maybe they would delve deeper into the family in general. Like the hitchiker and cook from the original and how they along with Leatherface got into the whole killing business.But this version has a really lame and uninteresting family. A cursing sherriff, legless old man, extremely obese woman, and an awful acting job by Leatherface himself ruined it for me. This family doesnt scare me at all, I would much rather have the old family back.The casting of the main stars also was a bad move. How can anyone relate to a Seventh Heaven star? When we see her everyday on tv, its hard to imagine anything but her, meaning you see Jessica Beil and not Erin. The rest of the acting is also average at best.I didnt want a scene-for-scene remake but I also didnt want a totally different movie. Why not just call this Chainsaw Massacre 5 or something? That wouldve been more honest. As a sequel this would have been better. I wanted to see a whole new take on the original, seeing different actors play the same characters from the original and at least the same plot.I guarantee this movie wouldnt have done so well if it was a sequel. So the big wigs decided to call it a re-make. Another bad thing was the cinematography, why do new movies have to have the camera like an inch away from the actors face all of the time? Also during action scenes the camera has to shake wildely, and during kill scenes the camera is also right on top of the action, making it difficult to even tell what is going on
No closed-caption, no subtitles, bad audio. The reason for the low rating is the lack of any subtitles on the boxset and Amazon's mistake in the product description. Folks, all seasons of this series are shipped in DVDs with no subtitles and no closed-caption.
I was Mislead or it was my mistake. I was looking for the Jungle Book 1 by Walt disney's production. As I have Jungle book 2 in my collection, i wanted to purchase Jungle Book 1 to complete the series. Unfortunately, I got the wrong one. What I received is not a Walt Disney's production. Appreciate, if you could help me with what i wanted.best regards,Ses
Don't buy this DVD!!!. This DVD is horrible, wasted my time and money, I didn't enjoy watching it. It was worse than pulling teeth. The movies from this collection is extremely horrible. The dubbing and translation was horrible and Jetli was maybe shown for a total of 10 minutes? I don't know how they can sell this DVD. I would give this 0 stars but amazon's rating won't allow it. Do yourself a favor and buy something else
Horrible DVD transfer. This is the WORST transfer of a movie (that is not a tape-to-tape before DVD bootleg) that I have ever seen.  Many scenes in the daylight show a jiggling reflected lights, or so it appears, and lines dance around with the sound.  It was so bad I thought it was in individual damaged DVD, until I read other reviews here and on IMDB.This is far worse than most cheapie transfers that are no longer owned but are in the public domain.  At least in those instances they usually have the excuse that the print they are working from is old and worn.  I have a much better video of Exodus on VHS tape in EP!And this movie is currently being offered at Amazon for $14.95.  Don't bother!  Tape it off TCM and you'll have a far higher quality visual record.As for the movie itself, despite good actors and one of the most wonderful music scores, it's very flat.  Kirk Douglas would have been a far better choice than Newman, who acts like he just came off a binge after a losing pool streak.  Nonetheless, it should not be sold with in lousy visual copies
what rubbish. want to watch a sexy comedy about young teenage boys fantasising over their older female housekeeper? then don't bother watching this, it's cute and stuff, with a few shots of breasts, but really, any movie with Jason Biggs is far better, i mean this isn't even sexy or funn
plot holes. The first half hour of this 90 minute movie is actually quite good.  In fact, it is enthralling and has an interesting twist in that we don't know the real fact behind whether a young woman was violated by her boyfriend while unconscious.  According to the rumor (the rumor being a school experiment conducted by three roommates) she was, however, but we the audience don't know that.  However, the young woman is quick to think she has been raped.  Why there is no attempt at a physical exam, is unexplained, especially since the young woman involved has the reputation of being a professional virgin, however it turns out she isn't, so that's why the movie lasts longer than 30 minutes.  Fortunately, we're not dealing with unwanted pregnancies, either, so this doesn't turn into a soap opera.  However, we do have the dreamboat "hero" who dreams up the rumor about her being raped, and who exhibits unlikeable traits throughout. But that's true of the three leads - the roommates are all unlikeable, being insufferably full of themselves.  The last half of the film, 'dreamboat' takes the turn as lead character, and it's his story we're following, whereas his female roommate had the first half of the film, and basically it's her introduction to the audience of all the characters. Turns out 'dreamboat' and the young woman victim have a history together; which means issues they have to work out, and everyone else (in a way, the entire student body and its faculty and local law enforcement) is sucked into their story and mutual thirst for truth, though the characters don't have the same truth in mind - it's about vengeance; not justice.  And vengeance when it's not the comic book variety, isn't fun for an audience, it's just distasteful.  In other words, the man and woman should have been shut up together in a room so they could have worked it out for themselves, and left the rest of us alone.  So from a brilliant first half-hour - and btw how does the roommate penniless art student have the dollars for all that tech equipment? - we degenerate into a constantly weaving pattern of lies and deceptions that seems more pointless than clever.  There is merely too much story, so it becomes ridiculous.  A basically good premise is ruined.  If you are a fan of any of the stars involved, it might be worth viewing, if only once, but the film as a whole will probably leave a vile taste in your mouth.  Perhaps that's the ultimate message on a film about the dangers of spreading GOSSIP, or in this case deliberate lies, is that what goes around comes around, and also it will leave you feeling sick to your stomach.  I almost recommend you watch the first 30-45 min then quit midway, but anyone will watch all the way thru at least once, just to be sure where this is headed
Not What I Expected. I have the DVD of this program and it's quite good.  I thought the CD would be the same workout so I could do it while watching TV.  However, it was not.  I'm looking for a good indoor walking CD.
GREEN DEATH ?. GREEN NAZI ZOMBIES COMING FROM THE BOTTOM OF A SWIMMING POOL TO FEED ON THE LIVING? AUGHH!!! BAD ACTING, BAD DIRECTION, TERRIBLE GORE, TOO LONG FLASHBACK HORRABLE DUBING AND THE PORN MUSIC IN THE BEGINNING OF THE MOVIE TELLS YOU WERE THEY WANTED TO GO WITH THIS PICTURE. DAMN THIS MOVIE SUCKS.....
boring 2 pack set. viewed it 1st was disappointed knodded my head in disbelief while watching,waiting,hoping!!!,the second time i tried to keep awake but could not keep my eyes open long enough, must of been those gravity waves in interstellar space out there in umm well you get the picture.My advise is for you to save your money and buy comos (the best imo)To be honest, i couldn't wait to sell it used at a $10 lose through amzn.the following week(they get a commission for sold items)nonetheless,i am content i no longer own it.Next time i will rent before purchasing on amzn. Just So you know, "cosmos" i can watch over and over for years as this was my first box set from amzn..the late carl sagans"cosmos" blows away "the astronomer"
The worst film adaptation ever?. I absolutely abhor this film. Want to know why? Because it labled 'Valley of the Dolls' and everything Jacqueline Susann ever wrote into 'great campy fun'. Now I don't know this for certain, but I don't think Jacqueline Susann wanted people to see her books as cheesy comedies. I think she wanted people to take her work seriously, and with this awfully made film, no one did. To others, the film might be so bad it's funny, but to devoted fans of the book it's just depressing. The movie was made in 1967, a year after the book was published and you can see that Jacqueline Susann was ahead of her time, because the film is poorly adapted and very censored. You know you have a problem when the book would receive an R rating if transferred onto the screen, but the movie is only rated PG. Besides the sex scenes, language, pill popping and other thematic elements that are left out, important details to the plot are also missing. Anne's hatred of Lawrenceville, Helen Lawson's screen time, Jennifer's complicated and somewhat absuive relationship with Tony, Allen and Gino Cooper, Henry's character development, Jennifer's relationship with the Senator (and the reason she committs suicide), the tragic ending, etc are all either missing or are shortened down. I don't care if the movie would have been almost three hours long, I think if they had stuck close enough to the book, then everything would have been fine. What a shame. And please don't mention the casting of actors. Save for Patty Duke, I thought everyone else did a horrible job. Some of the actors didn't even look the physical part (in the book Anne is actually a blonde, Helen Lawson has dark hair and Jennifer is curvy). The thing that really gets me though is why has this film never been remade? It's almost forty years later, and I think that this story definately deserves to be given justice and have a proper film adaptation. How about Kate Bosworth as Anne Welles, Scarlett Johansson as Jennifer North, Keira Knightly as Neely O'Hara, Joaquin Phoenix as Lyon Burke, and Liza Minnelli as Helen Lawson? Well I doubt that will ever happen, so in the meantime I recommend reading the book instead, and taking it seriously the way Jacqueline Susann had intended it to be
Prepare to have your IQ painfully sucked out of your brain. How can a movie get this many elements wrong?  Diane Keaton overacts to a painful degree (we've seen her talent in other movies, so we know she is much more capable than this).  The writers think that the "comedy" element of "romantic comedy" can be accomplished with silly sight gags like cakes falling on people's heads.  The overall plot has one seriously crippling flaw--Mandy Moore's character two-times men to a level in which she's getting engaged to one and considering moving in with another!  The viewer is expected to overlook her major indiscretions because she's cute and gets bossed around by her family.  The writers would like to have us treat it as if she was going on a few too many dinner dates, not seriously manipulating the lives of two men.I went with a female friend to see Because I Said So in the theaters because I figured I could handle a slightly silly romantic comedy, and I was willing to overlook minor flaws to get a few good laughs.  I had to look long and hard to find redeeming qualities to the movie.  Actors Gabriel Macht (as Mandy Moore's loveable, guitar-playing, easy-going romantic boyfriend) and Stephen Collins (as the father of Gabriel Macht's character and a foil to Diane Keaton's mother role) are both outstanding.  The other actors have rotten comedic timing or a forceful method that makes the reader cringe instead of laugh.  You will laugh at a few sight gags (a balloon stuck to the back of Mandy Moore's dress, anyone?), and Keaton's wardrobe is a stunning marriage of retro and modern stylings, but there is little else to hold this film together
total garbage. Some movies are not be remade. This remake does not have the creepy settings or lighting of the original. The cast stinks.  Why did they change the story? It is too wishy-washy. If you want to see better acting, creepier settings, and a music score that will scare you, see the original
And now you see how our state was suckered into the oil biz. I came upon this film while browsing my university library. My curiosity was picqued, since my home state is rarely discussed beyond such topics as drinking (Mardi Gras) and eating (Cajun food).This film reminds me of a line from an explanatory plaque in Jean Lafitte National Park. Looking out over a marsh (through which runs a large gas pipeline), the panel details all the restoration efforts sponsored by ExxonMobil, Shell-Texaco, et al., all of whom have refineries in or around the wetlands. If they're cleaning anything, it's their own mess. And what methods are they using? "Bio-restorative detonations," I believe, was the term used. Are those "life-giving bombs"?Back to the film, funded as propaganda by Standard Oil Co. when local sentiment was turning against the company. I'll pass over how many times the innocently befuddled Cajuns smile broadly at the blessed Oil Rig plopped in their marsh, and the way the young boy is given the Disney-nature-film treatment, as amusingly naive as Lobo the Wolf or Henry the Mountain Burro. No, just watch this film and catch a glimpse of the prosperity once promised to our humble state. And then visit the beautiful scenery of Norco, LA, in the middle of the famed Cancer Alley
last reviewer was right, I didn't like it because I need more fight scenes. that's not all, the story is really, really bad in this one.  My god, who thought butcher wing from OUATIC could be a worse actor than Andrew Dice Clay.  The dubbing is of course the exact same from swordsman 2, twin warriors, etc., so that certainly didn't help this out.
a weird japanese black/white film on cheap meth. what's the point of making this movie? the pain of the japanese youth lost in the crazy, totally pointless tokyo concrete jungle? a guy obsessed with a handgun, making a homemade one then finally got a real one with 5 bullets, then what? street gang fights, chasing, beating, killing, suicidal, wounds....what else this movie was trying to deliver to you and you thought you might get it? for what purpose? what's so deep in this clueless movie that you think you absolutely understood? you didn't really mean anything meaningful here, right? you just have to say it's so cool to show that you've got it. well, actually, this movie is such a stupid and pointless one, don't fool yourself, okay? if you're trying to tell me something meaningful about this movie, then you're just a pretentious shallow member of the generation x, y, z or whatever you think you are. grow up, guys.why not just keep watching the 'taxi driver', then go to the bathroom, facing the mirror, imitate robert de niro by saying to your image in the mirror: 'you talking to me? heh, you talking to me?!' then raise your hand with your point finger, 'pow!!!' yeah, you're so deep. i just know it
Was this movie made for the Lifetime channel?. If Lifetime switched from showing crappy dramas about wronged women to showing crappy horror flicks about wronged women this would one of them.  This movie was not scary.  It would have been suspenseful if I cared for any of the characters.  You know what the best part was?  When it was over.Few movies compel me to write reviews, good or bad.  This one obviously did
Boring, boring, boring!. I work out 5 days a week so I would consider myself advanced.  This workout is definitely too easy for someone who is advanced.  There were a number of parts where I thought I was watching a Saturday Night Live skit.  It was very cheesy and the other girls in the video look like robots.  My DVD did not come with a band, which I thought was a real bummer.  The set and the music are boring.  I normally love Denise Austin, but this video was very disappointing.  I would instead recommend Shrink Your Female Fat Zones
Ah..... huh??. What the ----.  "A tale of revenge"?  Why does everyone in their review say that?  B/c it's written on the box cover??  This is an interesting and compelling movie, but w/ a very odd, abrupt ending that leaves you hitting the "REWIND" button and saying, "what a minute, is it OVER??  Did I miss something??"Afte watching this, I scoured the internet, Wikipeida, and Amazon...still no reviewer seems able to say what was meant by the ending of this film.  My takeaway on it -- she is going to hang, and die (go to heaven);  he is going to stay on Earth..but maybe when they meet again (heaven), they can get married.  ??????How come no one else can come up w/ a definitive meaning to the end of this film?  Subtlety is great, but not if it's so damn ambiguous that NOBODY in the universe seems to be able to define or explain what this film was all about.  It was NOT about revenge.  Maybe it was about love and obsession and sadness and the silliness of despair.Sorry, can't really recommend this one!
Pitewww I spit on them too! They deserved it!. A novelist goes on a vacation to write a book,she gets raped by some town hicks..then it's on!I will admit this was a guilty pleasure. The acting was bad especially the autistic dude (Matthew)with the receding hairline comb-over do...I just wanted to slapp him silly!I first saw this as a kid in the 80s by accident..just now figured out after all these years that they captured this woman for the Autistic dude! He was too scared,So they figure "Can't let it go to waste" and then "Choo-Choo.." it was time to run that "Train".This movie is unnecessarily long,there isn't really THAT much dialogue, The Tripod never moves. there are scenes that don't contribute much. It's very dated in the visuals as well. Even though it is digitally remastered for DVD it still looks washed out and could've done another filter through for better quality.The Raping scene..my god! is one to remember though!Very graphic..the screaming too..very disturbing.The 2nd dude with the suspenders that raped her wasOVERACTING big time with that scene...it was VERY laughable..in fact I had to rewind it and kept laughing at the scene.I still can't believe that the gas station guy REALLY thought she came back for HIM...in lust. Gosh what an idiot!!!He deserved what he got, they all did. I spit on them too.
Hate it!. To violent for anyone! This movie is horrible. The cast is good, but the plot stinks! Its just this family who have super powers. Then this kid wanted to be Mr. Incredibles side kick. (in a way)Mr. Incredible says no so then he hates him. Then the kid turns evil and kills people, and wants every body to like him. Thats origanal. There are barely any jokes you laugh once every 20 minutes, and there is way to much violence. Killing, guns, punching, bombs, and they say stupid words sometimes. I do not like the person who directed this film because he should not like violence. So I do not recommend this movie to anyone. Especially the 2 disc special edition!
ok, for the money. The movie has too many cameo's or how ever it is spelled, I dont like this Freddy or the second Movie the rest our good though
disgusting!. the viuals were good, the actors were bad and the story line just blows
Unwatchably dull. I couldn't finish this movie, it was so boring.  I guess if you are a Sean Bean fan, you must like this film.  I'm glad those other reviewers got something out of this
If you expect it to be as good as Merlin, think again... I came across this movie on T.V. and was so excited that there was a sequel to Merlin, a film I thought was fabulous. I was completely wrong. This move is so flawed, I don't even know where to begin.First off, the story in no way correlates with the first movie, except for the fact that Sam Neil and Miranda Richardson have parts in it. You could fall into the plot holes. So, Merlin leaves Camelot in the care of Arthur with the belief that everything is secure. He goes a takes a "nap"  and accidentally sleeps for 50 years. He wakes up totally confused and puzzled (which he keeps telling us over and over by stating his questions aloud). Camelot has gone way down hill. Blah, blah, blah. Enter Jack, a thief with magical abilities. It's later revealed that he is the love child of Merlin and the Lady of the Lake, played by Miranda Richardson. By the way, in this movie, the Lady is evil and resembles Queen Mab more than she did in the first film. So, Camelot is sacked by crazy wood-dwelling people, the rulers are corrupt, Merlin dies half way through, etc. Jack along with Gawain's granddaughter, her lover blacksmith, a squire named "Brian" (whose really a very masculine looking female named Brianna) go on a quest to restore the lost grail (which Arthur supposedly found earlier)and save Camelot. A great battle errupts with the crazy people, everyone dies, Jack saves them with the grail, and shacks up with a very masculine Brianna to "sow some seeds" (...enough said).The plot is overly drawn out and boring, the characters/actors lack any depth or redeeming qualities, the writing is horrible and cheesy, and Merlin really lacks any substantial part (plus he's a bumbling idiot). This movie was a complete waste of time. There is no mention of any of the characters in the first film (i.e. Nimue, Mab, Frik, etc.) I advise any who saw the first movie...dont bother with this one
Almost. It is usually a bad sign when there is a guide included to explain the movie makers reasons for making the movie and to explain the lesson they want to teach.  The movie does give you a conclusion for the anime.  There is little to laugh at in this movie, the directors are to focused on making their point.  They have decided to make the anime and movie more "real" than the manga and as such have lost the light hearted humor and in their attempts to be "realistic" have created inconsistancies that can not be explained.The music and animation are excellent.  But I would recommend buying the soundtrack and renting the movie
turn it off. if pac was still here now he would never ride with ja nah nah nah nah nah na
Insipid and poorly done Street Fighter film with no heart or soul. Hey here's an example of a movie so poorly written, so poorly concived it makes that 'Jean-Claude Van Dam' live action film look really really good.How is that possible you ask?Easy, when it's Street Fighter Alpha.The story? Hard to say... something about clones, a wannabe Ryu's younger brother, and Mr. "will appear in almost any Capcom game for food" Akuma (Gouki if you know more about the Japanese series of games).The only bright spot on a rather gloomy feature? Sakura.  That's right, Sakura.  While most of the cast is bring the gloom, she brings the fun and most of her scenes show this with gusto.  But sadly even she couldn't save the movie.The acting is to say the least, fair.  For the most part; it is pretty much believable but then again it's not the acting that ruins the film but the script itself.The characters?  We get Ryu and Ken (Duh!), Sakura(awsome), Rose (who is as far removed as you can get from her video game persona), and a whole bunch of alpha characters who got the short end of the stick.Where's Bison you ask? Playing the invisible man: yep he was cut out of the story altogether.  Shame that really.Want some anime SF, go watch the movie or the SF2V (just don't expect too much from the ending of that).  As for alpha, better look elsewhere (I just wish I did)
Bow wow. I can't understand the good reviews given by others to this movie. Frankly, I thought it was a dog.Not to say that it had no redeeming features - the friendship between the young girl and the lawn man was endearing, if improbable. And the girl herself was a real sweetie, and a good actress - perfect for the part. In fact, the acting all around was admirable.But the script! Yikes! Not a single character in the whole movie - with the partial exceptions of the two protagonists - had any motivation for anything they did. People acting awkward or mean (in fact, just about everyone in the movie other than said two was mean), or spiteful, or stupid, for no reason at all!It seems as though somehow, the movie could have been good, but didn't make it. Call it almost watchable.I came away from Lawn Dogs (Yawn Dogs?) feeling not at all enriched. Puzzled, perhaps, at why anyone would make such a movie. Well, there was that admirable, unlikely friendship. But that was all.Pass this one by
If I could give it zero stars I would!. I do yoga and have done some Pilates.  I've actually got a pretty decent core, but the advanced moves on this DVD are most assuredly NOT appropriate for EVERYBODY.  It's not even an issue of doing less repetitions, because Denise Austin isn't doing that many repetitions of each position.  She doesn't give alternate moves or direction for beginners at any point during advanced moves, and she acts as each move is so basic that nobody could have any trouble with it.  This is terrible for beginners, who aren't even going to know how to modify the moves on their own to make them appropriate."Every body" would also make it sound as though the range of exercise was appropriate for somebody with physical limitations.  I have a mother who is short one abdominal muscle due to having tram reconstruction, and she has even had to undergo hernia surgery as a result of only moderate activity.  I could never recommend a DVD like this for her, despite the fact that Pilates in the hands of a good trainer is wonderful for rehabilitation or for those with limitations.  The reputation of Pilates for those purposes only serves to add to the danger of this poor presentation, and I sincerely hope nobody really injures themselves as a result.The bottom line is: Don't just listen to condescending remarks from someone who thinks they know what everyone's body is capable of or that everyone has innate knowledge of how to adapt Pilates even without any form of instruction.  If you are a beginner, out of shape, or have any physical limitations... please don't judge this DVD by its title.  Find instruction from a good trainer or DVD that and will teach you correctly for your body.  Denise Austin's instruction is completely irresponsible, and the title for this DVD should be changed.
Elton disappoints. The sound and video quality are excellent.  The show is spectacular.  Elton sounds terrible.  I've never seen Elton live, I'm a casual fan that has enjoyed several of his CD's.  I expected him to be a great show perfomer, but I thought he sounded old and tired.  It didn't seem like he could hit the notes or even sing some of the lyrics.  At times it was unbearable.  I expected so much more
Not so great. Having taken Pilates classed at my local gym, this DVD is way too basic and too short. Don't waste your money
Gay Men With Mullets and Celtic Accents. Alexander is portrayed as a neurotic and tortured individual who is shoved into power and conquest by his mother and turned into a monster by lust for authority. The character in this movie appears to have very little in common with the ambitious and thoughtful young man described by Aristotle. Watching this movie you get the feeling that Alexander and his men were a gang of sexually confused young boys who conquered the ancient world pretty much by accident.There is far too much emphasis here on the non-essential, and every conflict in this story is a contrived account of Alexander's strained relationships with his mother, father, friends and his own identity. If you're looking for a narrative on the epic story of the most important figure of ancient Greece, look elsewhere. This is the story of insignificant things in the life of a man who happened to be significant.
Philadelphia. Denzel Washington is probably my favorite actor. Even in that dog of a movie called THE MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE, he shone. Tom Hanks? Well, lemme quit hating the guy. This is a well-intentioned movie, Tom did a creditable job, and we had extreme close-ups with funny colors to camouflage the spots where he overreached. I was also pleasantly surprised to see Antonio Banderas fly in the face of his Latino studliness by playing a gay guy. A passionate one, though, since he's still a Latino, after all.Actually, this is a Hollywood "message movie," and you know what that means. It's about as subtle as Michael Moore. Those who agree with the message flock to be beaten about the head by it for two hours. Those who the filmmakers would like to see the movie, those who don't agree with the message, stay as far away from it as possible.There's a scene in the library where nobody wants to sit at the table with AIDS boy. The way they stared at him reminded me of "lao wei in China" experiences. Denzel's character was reminded of segregation, even though he's too young to remember it, and started to care about Tom Hanks' character.AIDS discrimination is bad. Actually, any discrimination at all is bad. And that's the movie's message. I agree with the message, but still. That's all we've got.As a totally irrelevant non-sequiter, if the name "Sam Francisco" means anything to you, you've seen subtle commentary on discrimination.I love a great courtroom drama. This one was merely good. With so much of an agenda to squeeze into a two-hour film, they had to take a few shortcuts here. Sad, ain't it? But even so, a well-intentioned film that I'm glad I saw. Once. Not twice. Once is enough, thank you.
Nowhere near as good as the book. I would like to reiterate a few points that I've seen in other reviews but I don't think were stressed enough. You should know this before you consider buying the dvd:1. The acting is horrible.  horrible.2. The film was obviously low budget.3. It is over thirty years old, and it feels dated.4. The story (which was amazing as a novel) did not translate well to film. Don't waste your time on the movie
Annoys even Theron fans. A beautiful young woman suspects that her astronaut husband might have been radically altered by an in flight astronaut. His partner has a suicidal freak-out, and so does his partner's wife. She learns that she is pregnant and so the stakes increase. Ultimately, a desperate ex-CIA man struggles to spill the beans to her. Will he make it? Will she?There is suspense in this suspense/sci-fi film; unfortunately, it is unintentional. It consists in wondering when the film is going to get suspenseful. We know everything from the get-go. We know what the husband's secret is, and we know the wife will eventually find out. The only possible pay-off is that the director makes what happens, when Theron's character finally figures it out, interesting. Unfortunately, she only finds out for sure about an hour and a half into a film well shy of two hours. How interesting could the remainder be? You do the math.I absolutely adore watching Charlize Theron, both for her obvious charisma, as well as her genuine dramatic ability. How she got sucked into this piece of dreck might serve as a lesson for her. It is certainly a mystery to me why a woman who could snag roles in "Celebrity" and "Cider House Rules" would select this script. Perhaps she felt she could save it, since the entire focus is on her character. She did not. The script and the direction made it simply impossible. Even a true Theron fan, like myself, will be sorely let down ( even more so for Depp fans, of which I am not one.
Read the book. For the times this movie was made, the acting is good. I would love to see this same story done in more modern times where I believe the acting would be less in the dramatic style and seem more real to life. If you've read the book, this movie cuts out so much of what I loved in the book. I wish not only that it would be done in modern times but I can see it being done in a trilogy style to capture all the interaction of characters and the essence of the story would be more complete. If you have to choose between the book and the movie, choose the book
Disgusting Mahabharata. I read on internet about this western version of Mahabharata and was curious to watch how Peter Brook captured it with his western mindset. After watching the movie on DVD which I bought, I was shocked and repented for buying it in first place. It was completely un-artistic and several incidents depicted in the movie are incorrect and the characters barring Draupadi  are hardly any reflection of the characters that Indians understand. Perhaps it is more apt to say that an average indian without knowledge of this movie wouldn't have guessed that he/she was watching Mahabharata. I am sure it's offensive to Hindu's faith, I think Mr.Brook should have limited his ambitions to produce simple stories rather than attempting to screen the greatest epic on earth with his limited understanding and parochial vision and in the process, reducing it to lower than street side drama. Suffice to say that the dramas played by primary school kids were several cuts above this movie. If I had an option, I would have given negative rating !
Tootsie. To begin with the movie Tootsie is classified as a genre of romance and comic.This movie is produced in New York. The protagonist is Michael Dorsey and he is the most important character in the film.The situation of this movie is of a man that is a talent actor but for reasons of money he decides to dress like a woman.For the reason that he cannot continue woring in the job he has and that his manager tell him nobody would hire him because he is unemployed  by that time. So there is where Dorothy appears and he starts working as a women is a soap opera in televison where he becames so famous. He gets the job here but he did it without having the intention of hurting anyone and also anyone in the place knew that he was a man dresses like a woman.In addition he falls in love with one of the woman that works with him in the soap opera. Thre is only one friend that knows what he is doing. He has one problem and is that his bestfriend falls in love with him but he didn't treat her well for the reason that he is in love with the other woman.The characters of this movie are really good actors evryone seems to knoe what they are doing.THe way the character acts in the movie is ok and the decision the man takes to wear  women's clothin instead of try to find a job in the way he is seems to me very intelligent. Because he could only accept that he was unemployed but no he decides to do something so that he could work. The stes in the movie are really well done and I like the part where the father of the woman that acts in the ospa opera gives a ring to dorothy without knowing thta she was a man.The lightnoing is was ok in every scene you could see everything ok and well iluminated. The costumes the actors used where a little diffrerent form he ones we use right now but eventhough they were not the same they look ok.Furthermore th emusic they put inspires the movie to look more interesting, there were not that much music but it was ok. This movie could be reall in life because  sometimes when people dont have jobs or they got fire they do everything they can to have a job.I will really recommend this movie to my audience because itis interesting to see how his man do all that work with enthusiam and it really leave us a message of life.
Not my Favorite... but take a look anyway. This out of all the many versions of Jane Eyre has to be my least favorite...Granted Samantha Morton has  a very  adorable fairy/ Elfin like face like Mr Rochesters Description of her, but her acting has  no highs and lows. She stands up to Mr Edwards a little too much giving really snappy answers, seemingly no respect to her employer, which is not fault of  hers, the writing of the script is bad.... and so the direction. Ciaran Hinds  is totally over the top. He is so angry with no understanding, his eyes are  very lustful and at times  crazed.  He is not at all like the character  described in Brontes epic book of a very sad and  tortured man who falls hopelessly in love with the  innocence and singular personality of earnest, honest and yet strong sweet  Jane Eyre that Charlotte Bronte brought so vividly to life with her classic words.The over acting of both during the proposal scene is almost comical.To me there is no love, feeling  or chemistry here between the two actors just lust.... He seems to be going through a middle age crises just eyeing up this young girl, and she though supposedy a virgin...  she dosn't act like one.Plus this movie  seems very rushed you can never get a good foot hold of the story Especially during Janes childhood. I do also miss the Gypsy scene that is omitted in many of these movies and was expertly done in the Dalton /Clarke mini series, which brought some brief light heartednes to an otherwise very dark story.If you want to see great versions. I  highly rate the 1944 movie with Orson Wells though it is another abreviatd version, that movie truly captured the spirit and feel. It is moody dark and mysterious. Another is the fantastic Timothy Dalton version which is most accurate to the book of all the movies taking actual lines right from the  Brontes story.  Dalton's and Clarkes acting is simply superbly sublime!However if you are like me, see them all and make your own decision. They all have something to offer and most are entertaining...
african-american experience. not a good script kind of slow, a regular movie if You are into history In America, but If You dont live there, or got any interest in this particular plot, I wont recomended, is borin
Not his best. The movie to me was very horrible,first of all the sound effects in this movie were very cheap. The movie wasnt one of his best. The other thing is that the whole thing of him having a family and being married was stupid
So, where's the extras?. Nothing. Not even a trailer. What a wasted opportunity for a commentary by West (who does do them -- he did one for When A Stranger Calls) or a retrospective featurette.All you do get with this extended version is additional dialogue between Cusack's character and a female law enforcement officer in a hanger, footage of a prison riot during the opening credits montage and a few more graphic shots of hapless inmates being killed during the course of the movie
no title. What a disappointment!  I remember Siskel and Ebert raving over this romantic comedy.  Romantic, maybe, but comedy - never.  Very predictable plot from beginning to end.  And Rosie Perez was truly offensive.  A few times I couldn't understand what she was saying.  There is no way I could buy that she and Cage's character were attracted to each other.  Maybe critics liked this movie because it had no sex, violence, or rough language.  Although Cage does get shot in one hold-up scene.  It was just that you knew what was going to happen every step of the way.  I am beginning to Like Cage more and more as he ages. [ spoiler] I was really disappointed at the end to find out that the real people whom this story is based on were always happily married to their original partners.  Either they shouldn't have changed it so much or they shouldn't have let us know about the real story it was based on.[end of spoiler]  But Fonda and Cage were very engaging together
Worthless. Not sure why this has got such a high rating as it is a complete waste of time. While 'Saw' had a unique story, this remains in the brain for all of 5 minutes after it is turned off and revels in sadism and ridiculous logic for what seems like an ice age. Firstly Jigsaw should not have been revealed and an attempt to make him more 'human' with a flashback to his former life is just ridiculous. Plus why does he torture people as punishment for leading amoral lives? isn't his just as amoral?The other characters in the film are witless, particularly the man assigned to 'play a game' which is based on showing mercy (or not) to the various people involved in the car crash which killed his daughter, this moron takes far far too long to make what should be split second decisions - watch the scene with the guy in the twister device and you'll see what I mean. We also get the background of Jigsaws accomplice, add to that a convoluted plot 'twist' and you have 90 or so minutes from your life you will never get back. Now *thats* torture
not my cup of tea but ok. d item was not fo me but d bits and pieces ive seen of d show r really gud and if ur n 2 d hole prison ting den dis is a gud 1 2 go fo
tisk tisk tisk. I am truly shocked that there are people out there that thought this movie good, and for saying it could be a reality? I mean the plot of this movie is sooooooooo pathetic it was almost enjoyable to watch. But the dog jumping the police cars, and climbing trees, swallowing a cat whole, and turning colors so well that it became invisible, were pathetic. this movie would be enjoyable to those who like really bad horror/sci-fi films. I would only recommend it to watch so you could see how stupid it is
Wow! Bondage people are as dull + boring as us normal people. It seems that all there is to the bondage scene is people going to special clubs with silly customs and talking about if they are the one in charge or the one to serve.Woah! So much to intrigue my non-BDSM mind!Rosie O' Donald(?) and Dan Ackroyd probably demonstrated the lifestyle as well in Exit to Eden
I HAVE NOW SEEN THE STUPIDEST MOVIE EVER MADE!. The cast of Boogie Nights does the most depressing movie since the Passion Of The Christ.  If you don't feel like being entertained by a movie, and want to be bored, upset, depressed and otherwise SICK, watch this [...] One of the worst ever
Poor Picture Quality. I don't feel Red Sonja is any better or worse plot wise than Conan The Destroyer.  However I found the picture quality to be one of the poorest I have seen on DVD.  It resembled that of an old VHS.  There were white creases in the print; not distracting but noticable, and the picture was grainy throughout, sound had a slight muffled quality to it, not crisp.I own about 500 DVD's and counting, don't write reviews because there are many of you out there that write really good ones.  But what I will do from now on is share with the rest of you when I come across poor transfers
Avoid. DO NOT BUY THIS MOVIE. Sounds good on paper but throughout the whole film, NOTHING HAPPENS. Unfortunately, I kept waiting for the payoff. Believe me, there isn't one
One of the most  homoerotic films I have ever seen!. Leeches is a terrible movie.  Dude, I have never seen anything so gay in my whole life (except the director's other film Speed Demon).  When the guys were less clothes than the gals, thats not a good sign.  The video shelves at a local corporate video rental store carry tons of this director's work.They're all filled with loads of homoeroticism.  Women are ugly and they were single piece bathing suits whilst the guys wear banana hammocks.  The 'roided up leeches enter their "male" victims through anal orrifices.  After watching about a half hour of this mess I had to turn it off.Why does this guy fool people into renting these movies.  I don't mind gay subtext in films but when it takes over the film and hits you over the head with it then it's time to draw the line.  No hetro relationships in this one.  Just the director molesting his male stars with his camera.Horrible stuff, stay away from David DeCoteau's work and his fifty different aliases (unless you know what you're in for)
Absolutely no value - Animal Cruelty at its worst. Putting aside the entire subject of the atrocity, this movie is absolutely horrendous just for the infamous cat scene.  I strongly disagree with any attempts to justify such unnecessary cruelty as art and I think that one scene waters down his the entire message of the film.  After watching that scene, the rest of the movie is simply about the shock of seeing an innocent animal being slaughtered for entertainment.I am missing point?  Probably.  But when someone spews out garbage like this one, I hardly can be blamed.  In the interest of art, I would be more entertained in seeing the director being thrown to a pack of hungry rats.  That would truly be educational
One of the worst movies I have ever seen. This entire movie could have run in only 20 minutes and you wouldn't miss anything and might even enjoy it. Unfortunately it ran 88 minutes too long and I couldn't wait for it to end.  I saw it in the theater and the people all around me were all complaining how boring it was. At least a quarter of them walked out before the end. It's that bad. It's a shame, I love a good suspense/horror movie and the decent actors in this movies were waisted
Very overrated, narcissitic, and self indulgent.... I was immensely disappointed by this film. The "avant-garde" style of the film has been done better by other filmmakers (specifically Derek Jarman, Kenneth Anger, and Harmony Korine), and the film is mostly about Jonathan, not about his mother. The critics made this film sound like it was an attempt by Jonathan to bring him closer to his mother, to try and understand her by making a film about her, and to bring "closure" to their relationship. Well, the film isn't really about Jonathan's mother, it's strictly about him. We hear and see tons of information (with annoying title cards) about Jonathan's life, career, and loves. It feels like an episode of "this is Jonathan's life", as if Jonathan is this absolutely fascinating, brilliant individual that we must all pay attention to. He may become a great artist someday, but he isn't there yet. Jonathan uses his mother merely as an excuse to make a very self-indulgent, narcissitic film about himself. He doesn't really seem interested in her, other than as an excuse to show how much HE'S suffered, not really about her suffering. While Jonathan had a horrendous childhood, I felt very little sympathy towards him, as he is constantly mugging for the camera in a "feel sorry for me, I'm gay and my mother is insane" way. The man has been taping himself since he was in grammar school, so he's just a tad in love with himself, methinks. Harmony Korine's julien donkey-boy is a film that deals with a schizophernic, and it is much more interesting and artistic than this film (Korine's uncle is a schizophernic). Derek Jarman shot his films in multiple formats similar to this film, like 35mm, 16mm, video, and super8, and weaved the images into an artistic and fascinating tapestry. Kenneth Anger, as well as Jarman, infused a gay sensibility into their films, which Jonathan doesn't do very well. Overall, disappointing, considering critics said it was absolutely brilliant....
Deep Deceptions. Deep Deceptions Was Not what it was advertised to be. In the advertisement it was to explain about how The Divinci Code just scratched the surface. The dvd talks about heaven and hell and nothing new or different about religion
There is NO unedited version available . . . The original, full-length version of this classic is not available anywhere, for any cost.  If you watched this on HBO growing up, you will not be able to find the same version.  There was a VHS version that has since become unavailable.  There never was a full-length, unedited version available on DVD.  Even the version with Kermit on the box has been signigicantly edited.  This is what's availble.  It sucks, but for $10.00, it might do to hold you over until the people at Henson Productions get their act together
ok but not scary. this movie is not scary at all  want to get freaked out watch boogeyman  very scary
Waste of Time. If you're a trusting sort, read the title of this review and stop--don't spend another moment thinking about this film. But if you must know why you should not waste 95 minutes of your life on it, as I did, read on.Garcon Stupide has delusions of grandeur, as does its main character, a young gay lad who seeks his thrills in anonymous sexual encounters and believes he's a good photographer because he takes pictures with the built-in camera of his cellular phone.Said lad (Loic, played by first-timer Philippe Chatagny) is pretty enough to warrant the numerous extended closeups of his face that comprise half the film--the picture on the box does not do his enchanting smile justice--but the pablum he speaks is by turns silly, nonsensical, and stupid. The plot, such as it is, takes its cue from the dialogue, and in the end it feels like a series of utterly random events have carried us to an implausible conclusion.What ought to make the film at least a little bit palatable for a gay audience--the gritty sex in which Loic engages quite freely during the film's first half--is filmed inelegantly and, in one uninspired split-screen scene, juxtaposed with the workings of factory machinery. This is an odd place for the director to make a play at realism in a tale otherwise so unconstrained by it!If you're looking for a good gay coming-of-age story, try Dorian Blues. You may not get to see the main character naked, but at least you'll respect yourself in the morning
*YAWN*. This is the most boring movie I've ever seen.  Each scene is so slow.  The storyline is cliche and predictible.  I knew exactly what would happen next with each scene, and how it would end.   Theres also nothing scary in this movie.  The parts that are suposed to be scary just have a little girl slowly walking around with cheesey camera effects and then she'll stab or strangle someone.  Most of this movie is just dull empty hallways, and a bunch of little girls staring at each other and talking in monotone voices.  To sum it all up this movie absolutely sucks, and if it scares you, your a pansey
Disgusting and pointless. "Listen, Bunuel. What are we going to do? The witch has quit. Says: too much nudity. Who does she think she is - Mother Theresa?""I am a little busy, JP (Quiet, babe! Can't you see? I am talking to my producer here!). Just get another broad for the role: anybody, only with a good front.""But, Maestro! We'd have to re-shoot half of the movie. Fernando is already talking of another engagement. In any event, with his rate if we use him again, it will be twenty years before we see any money from this flick. We might as well scrap the whole thing.""Don't worry, JP. We'll keep shooting as if nothing happened. That's what being Great Director all about. They are morons, or why you think anyone would pay cash to see such garbage. Most won't even notice that the face is different, and those who do, will find a good explanation for it. Subliminal, surreal, existential, women are alike - all that nonsense, you know. Relax and have a drink."
mind numbingly boring repetition. After seeing the first series, I thought (hoped) that intelligence had started to find it's way back to humor. With the second series, I see that I was wrong. Horribly wrong. In the former, we were introduced to these characters, and with each new scene, a new quirk or tidbit was released to us. In the latter, there is no development at all. It is formulaic. The characters basically do the same thing, again and again, without even much of a change in scenery. Messrs. Walliams and Lucas do not challenge themselves to broaden these individuals in the least, which I find all the more egregious because they have an unerring eye for detail. Perhaps the grind of a series is too much for them. It certainly seems that they have stopped caring. If you like to "parrot" characters verbatim, play drinking games by shouting out what's coming next in a scene, or find that you've been attracted to Saturday Night Live post 1979, you might like this. I was acutely disappointed
Can we ever have enough Michael McDonald?. I gotta tell you something. I'm really excited about it. Uh, for the first time, today, I woke up, I came to the store, and I - I feel confident to say to you that if you don't take this Michael McDonald DVD - that you've been playing for two years straight - off, I'm going to kill everyone in the store and put a bullet in my brain
Desperate Acts. I won't give a long drawn out account on why this movie was bad for me, but one thing sticks out in my mind. The characters tried too hard to me. I love Sanna Latham, but it seems like she was forcing herself to convince us that she was really romantically involved with Wesley Snipes. With all the ups and downs of their relationship, I was praying that they just chalk the relationship up as a loss and move on.After awhile it just get tiring ,you know, like a real relationship.I much prefer the book. This movie doesn't hold a candle to the book. The book is as real as it gets. Pretty much how things are today
Ghetto Monkey, Modification Morons with Mufflers. I would rate this piece of film trash a "0", but unfortunately, that is not an available option. This stupid movie did not start the scene, but it did contribute to it. This review is to all of you ghetto monkey morons who think that because you have ground effects and an obnoxious sounding muffler, that somehow you have transformed yourselves into Mario Andretti and a Ferrari; I have some astounding news for you, the average citizen thinks you are an idiot with a license, and should be barred from ever contributing to the human populus. No one is impressed with your driving antics that endanger the rest of us on the roads and highways. In fact, everytime I read that one of you idiots died in a tragic accident due to your own ignorance and lack of driving skills, I actually celebrate with my friends, and we relieve ourselves on the grave, because there is one less stupid person on the road. Do the rest of the world a favor, save your money, don't make your car look stupid and ghetto, which in return, makes you look stupid and ghetto,learn how to drive safely, turn your hat around (facing forward), pick up your retarded looking baggy pants, put a belt on, and hide your underwear, (that no one wants to see, but laughs at you while you walk past) and speak a normal language that includes words besides "dawg" and other non-understandable neanderthal sounds that clearly indicate your lack of education and stupidity
Why did I bother?. I kind of wanted to see this movie when it originally came out in theaters, but I never got around to it...I'm glad I didn't. This movie was really bad. Most of the scenes just didn't make any sense. The characters weren't likeable at all, I couldn't have cared less if they all got killed. The acting was awful and the script was just down right horrendous. Some of the worst lines came from chris kattan's character like, "this house is alive, we're all gonna die" and "you give me my money right now...I want it, so you give it". Thats the kind of bad script that I'm talking about. The only slightly decent thing in this movie is some of the special effects. I would also like to give credit to geoffery rush for trying to do the best he could with what he was given. All and all...don't watch this movie
This film was not faithful to the adaptation of the novel. There's lots of passion in Wide Sargasso Sea THE BOOK, but it's mostly emotional. It's an extremely multi-layered novel and the work of a true master. The film on the other hand is just your classic, bad 1990s film, beautiful to look at, with lots of skin, languid copulation, heaving bosoms, bodice-ripping nonsense, etc and next to no substance. It has no artistic integrity whatsoever, as its shameless makers must surely know they lifted their middle finger at the spirit of the Jean Rhys novel when choosing to make the film the way they did.I was unable to feel empathy for both the lead character. The much touted erotic scenes were not developed to what they lead to believe, and it also lacked much enthusiasm. They were incomplete and contributed little, if anything, to the plot. The viewer only gets a glimpse of the passion that supposedly exists between Edward and Antoinette. Therefore, they should have either gone all the way, tastefully (no pun intended), or have left those scenes out entirely.Now with regards to the plot of this film there were enormous holes, which perhaps could be rectified by reading the book. But for those who haven't read the book, there should be enough information in the film itself to keep the reader afloat. From the start it was unclear what was really going on with this family (despite the narration). Why did the ex-slaves keep laughing? (Something vaguely explained in the movie, though apparently fully explained in the book). Why didn't the parrot fly away? What made the mother go nuts? At no point in the movie were Mr. Rochester's "issues", as it were, fully explained. The man gets a letter exposing his wife as a Creole and dumps her like a hot potato, after (as Christophene explains) he was the one who came crawling to her in the first place. What a hypocrite. Again, maybe this is the ultimate point, that Mr. Rochester is a snob and the archetypical Victorian Englishman and that Antoinette is the victim of both his prejudice and that of the Jamaicans. But none of that exonerates the appallingly abrupt conclusion to the film.So, despite the beautiful cinematography, this movie is a hopeless muddle. I'd highly recommend the novel by the way: a book you don't forget in a hurry. Needless to say I think you should give this insulting (to the memory of Jean Rhys) film a miss, especially if you've read the novel: it'll just frustrate you, no matter how keen on a bit of easy titillation you may be feeling at the time.
MONK IS JUNK!. I really want to give this piece of garbage a Zero. Actually, I only watched part of one episode, I don't know if it's from season one. I am a Columbo fan, and a detective writer. I saw a sniper shoot a man on a platform. The platform was almost located right up against a building the sniper was in! A toilet with flowers in it. He reacts to colds? I saw a classroom full of kids. EVERY ONE had a cold! Not very realistic. Kiddie video game pacing, with no proper build up. They don't make stuff for intelligent people anymore! If you are new to this series, watch some before you buy. Maybe some of it is ok.
HAHAHAHAHAH. This movie was extreamly stupid, but very funny.  We just laughed though this hole movie.  This was pretty much very soft porn.  The hole time all the guys did was rub themselves or the priest rubbed them.  The special effects sucked, they were probably better in the old bewitched episodes (the black and white ones!!).  The acting was very bad, and this movie is very anticrist
Zombie Cows. Ummm... yeah this movie sucked. I mean come on, zombie cows? This movie had really bad special effects, even worse acting, and most of all it was just retarted. This lady even took her high heel shoe off and threw it at a zombie and  impaled its head. I know its a zombie movie and its not suppose to be realistic, but a high heel shoe? The only reason that you should rent this is because there is this short movie the director made that also sucks, but in a funny way. So, if you are super bored, go rent it and make fun of it. If you are just looking for a good zombie movie, keep looking. after watching this movie I actually think I've becaome brain dead.
FAILS TO TOP NIELSEN RATINGS. Leslie Nielsen stars in SPY HARD.  What kind of a title is THAT
A lot of wasted potential...... too bad.... This movie started off about as refreshing as you could get. Sure, there were "Lifetime channel" moments and such but for a horror movie at least it didnt just dump a bunch of hapless teenagers in the woods for them to be hacked one by one.The atmosphere was eerie and convincing.  The cave shots were well done, the tension was building ever so slowly and it was somewhat un-nerving when you just knew that something bad was brewing.  So, the first part of the movie was thumbs up all the way.  Unfortunately, like sooooooo many other horror films it resorts to silly blood spatters and totally unbelievable situations and it gets old rather quickly.  The creative tension that got me hooked was quickly replaced by absurdity. Too much ketchup, too many frantic scenes of the "monster guys" jumping around, and of course...the completely silly "tough" chick that Kung-Fu'ed her way through most of the monsters like they were invalids. That alone killed it.... the main characters were disposing the bad guys too easily and some of the ways they killed them was laughable.  I was angry at this movie not so much because I wasted my time but because it had a lot of potential and seemed to run out of ideas so they went the "Gorefest" route and completely chickened out of making what could have been a classic if it was done right.Remember how perfectly the original Alien movie slowly but surely built wicked tension and it never released you from that tension?  Remember how uncomfortable that movie made you feel for almost the whole running time?  This film started that way.... it was very creepy and made me feel uneasy. Just like Alien.  However, Alien never let up and did NOT turn into a pointless gore-fest like this movie did.  Too bad, it really is.Not Recommended... but rent it, dont buy it if you have to see i
Extend THIS. Editors have their jobs for a reason: Cutting the crap and getting to the point. Extended scenes were cut because they have no effect upon the film and in fact slow the pacing. I do not need to see the film's excess especially when that excess betrays the storyline. I did not need to see Saruman killed by Wormtongue and then fall fifty stories - this did not happen in the book. I did not need to see Sam confront Gollum, because he had done it many times already during the regular film. I did not need to see the Witch King confront Gandalf at Minas Tirith. I did not need to see the bizarre speaker for Sauron at the Black Gate. These added scenes confuse the viewer and soil Tolkien's work. These added scenes add another half hour onto an already long film. Enough is enough. Let's return Jackson's film back to its leaner, meaner, pristine condition
Overwritten debut effort for the talented Zach Braff. Zach Braff of "Scrubs" fame wrote, directed and starred in "Garden State."  The flick has a lot of good ideas, but at its heart there is a sodden, dull story that cannot be enlivened by copious amounts of wit.Braff plays "Large," a once-successful actor now reduced to waiting tables in a Vietnamese restaurant.  He returns home to Jersey when his mother dies, stirring lots of ugly family history.  Once home, Large's emotional zombie-status becomes evident, but is almost matched by the toneless muddle of high school friends he runs into.  The only spark is Sam (Natalie Portman), who for some reason falls for this sack of dull platitudes.The script is too clever by half, invoking hamsters, silent velcro, an abyss, infomercials on real estate, and other inanities in an attempt at edginess.  The movie feels like it was written by a hyper-depressed writer cut loose from the sad last year of "Northern Exposure."  Couple this with a too-on-the-nose soundtrack and a wasted crop of actors (why, Ian Holm, why?), and you've got "Garden State."Here's hoping Mr. Braff can get past the quips and into some serious storytelling.
I hate framing movies. After reading the storyline of this movie, it seems like a framing movie, so I didn't even bother to watch it because framing movies piss me off.
unable to view. I am very disappointed with your service.I am unable to view this dvd as it is not compatible with the australian system.I informed your company by email but received no response.I will not buy from you in the future
Disappointing follow up to "What the bleep....:. I love this topic as discovered in What the Bleep. However this book as a follow up is a disappointment. It is basically a documentary of how the scientists did the experiments and does not really expand on the significane of the findings or offer any new eye opening insights. The DVD is especially boring to watch. The book at least has some nice pictures
I don't love your work. Oh joy. Another movie about how tough it is to be famous, rich and liked.Actor/director Adam Goldberg's "I Love Your Work" attempts to tackle that subject, but the "poor little rich actor" storyline merely ends up feeling self-indulgent and whiny. Several of the actors are talented, but most of them -- except for star Giovanni Ribisi -- are misused.Gray Evans (Giovanni Ribisi) is famous, rich and miserable. He married Mia (Franka Potente) after seeing her in a French film, but their marriage is crumbling because he thinks she's cheating with Elvis Costello, who is friendly with Mia. Distraught, Gray ends up in a video store, where he becomes fascinated with a young video store clerk (Joshua Jackson) and his loving girlfriend (Marisa Coughlan).As his sanity begins to crumble, Gray stalks the couple, and starts to have visions of an ex-girlfriend (Christina Ricci) who reminds him of a happier time. He begins to reimagine his past, pre-fame life through the clerk and girlfriend, and soon the world of sanity is beginning to fade away.Perhaps this movie would be more palatable if it hadn't been done by an actor. In the hands of someone like Wes Anderson, this movie would have been brilliant, dark and understatedly satirical. From Goldberg, it just seems self-indulgent. It has nothing new to say, and it doesn't add any sparkle to the old stuff.And while Goldberg tries hard to make this a dark satire, he takes his Big Message too seriously. It starts off well, with Gray teetering on the edge of insanity, and imagining that everybody is watching, touching and pursuing him. For a short time, it has the elements of a lightweight Fellini movie.But after the first half hour, Goldberg goes wild with the camera tricks and the plot. He's trying so hard to be arty and insightful, that he ends up almost making the film a parody of itself. And not a good parody either. It aspires to be a bizarre, surrealist experience like "Mulholland Drive." But it's too unfocused and self-conscious to even come close.It doesn't help that Gray is not somebody we're going to care about. He's egotistical, self-absorbed, suspicious and whiny. And for all his complaints about his terrible life, it never seems to cross his mind to do the obvious thing. Quit acting. Retreat from the limelight. Maybe he secretly likes complaining.Ribisi is definitely the center of the film, and his turn as a crazed movie star is wonderfully unsettling. Yes, it really is that weird, even though Gray is such an annoying character. Potente isn't required to do much more than sit there and look glamorous, but Ricci is brilliant in her small role as Gray's nebulous ex.If you want to see navel-gazing, then "I Love Your Work" might be the ticket. But for anyone looking for clever, ingenious, entertaining filmmaking, look for someone else's work to love
This item borders on false advertising. I did a search for Cesar Milan (known on TV as the Dog Whisperer) and a number of items came up including this one. For author it just says "by Dog Whisperer". Well this isn't by Cesar at all. It's a complete piece of junk. Don't buy this
An astonishingly conventional film that isn't nearly as subversive as it thinks it is. Let it first be said that everyone who considers themselves a serious student of film should see "Blue Velvet" on principle alone-- this review is intended for people who have seen it, and thus contains SPOILERS.David Lynch's "Blue Velvet" is that rare breed of film: anunquestioned modern masterpiece, upheld by imdb geeks andEntertainment Weekly-pop culture hounds as something trulyspecial. Everybody seems to like it, and everybody's gottheir own reason. Some see it as allegory, some simply as aliving nightmare, some as genuinely effective drama, some asa coming-of-age story.I've seen "Blue Velvet" three times now. The first time, Iadmit a prejudicial point of view-- I wanted to prove RogerEbert right in his criticism of it, because Ebert was myhero at the time. I was unimpressed. Later, I returned to itafter a number of critics upheld it asthe genuine article. I'd seen Mulholland Drive and LostHighway, and loved both of them-- perhaps I was moreprepared for Lynchian weirdness this time around. Nope. Iwas still unimpressed, although I was entranced by thevisual look of the film.Recently, I found myself picking it up again, afterseeing Mulholland Drive with an artsy group of friends whowere convinced that they could explain everything thathappened in it to me, and pretty much did (except for theblue box and the scene with the huge dude who knocks out thedirector's wife). With an increased appreciation of Lynch, Ireturned to what most consider his masterpiece, ironicallyenough, prejudiced IN ITS FAVOR this time around.Well, I'm still not impressed. "Blue Velvet" thinks it's sodamn cool and subversive. It thinks it's turning Americanaon its head by depicting sexual perversion behind whitepicket fences. I don't think it's doing anything at all.Granted, for forty minutes or so, "Blue Velvet" is compelling. From the opening scene to the discovery of the ear all the way up to  Dennis Hopper's unforgettable apperance and including the dream sequence afterwards, Lynch had me hooked. He seemed at that point to be ready to go for broke, to show us unimaginable horrors, to penetrate through to thedarkest aspects of human nature.Yet something odd happens after the forty minute mark-- the story that we thought was gradually unfolding into something complex and sinister stops unfolding altogether. After forty minutes, we have all the plot we're going to get. We have a woman held in sexual slavery by a drug dealer who has kidnapped her husband and son, we have the naive college kid who tries to help her out, we have the sweet high school girl he's falling in love with, and that's all we have. Those expecting "Blue Velvet" to "go somewhere" from this point will be sorely disappointed.In the end, "Blue Velvet" goes down an entirely conventional path towards its conclusion. Instead of exploring the Hopper character, Lynch makes him into a campy villain. Instead of exploring the Rosellini character, Lynch makes her into a conventional damsel in distress, longing after her husband and son. Instead of exploring Jeffrey, Lynch turns him into an uninteresting do-gooder. The latterchoice is particularly odd, given that Lynch has set him up to have his whole world turned upside-down-- yet he heroically takes everything in stride and saves the day.Most egregious of all is the resolution of the plot, whichI've got to assume is intended as a joke on the viewer.After all of Lynch's pretensions about inverting Americana,he gives us a reaffirmation of it, in the form of aconventional ending in which a simple act of violencerestores the natural order of things, the robins makeeverything better, and, gee, everything's just great! Eventhough I'm sure this is intended as ironic, I found myself frustrated anyway. If Lynch isn't going to take his art seriously, why should the viewer?I don't want to seem like I'm making an attack on Lynch, although it may seem that way, as I'm criticizing his most canonized work. Lynch has proven that he is capable of taking himself seriously, and developing stories that go places-- even if they work with a logic that conventional films do not. "Blue Velvet," by contrast, goes nowhere and does nothing truly unusual or interesting in the process. I've endeavored to work my way around to enjoying it, but I can't. It simply is not interesting, as a dramatic work, or even as an abstract collection of images.I would direct those who want to see Lynch at his best to "Twin Peaks: Fire Walk With Me," "Lost Highway" (my personal favorite), and "Mulholland Drive." These are virtuoso films that see the director exploiting the most fearsome resources of cinema to lead his viewers on journeys that begin and end, with point and purpose. They are masterpieces, and no matter what anyone tells you, they make sense if you are willing to do the intellectual heavy-lifting.Compared to these later works, "Blue Velvet" is positively forgettable.
The Brat Pack and those enormous granny panties. This was the movie that gave us The Brat Pack, a staple of a certain 80s cultural set.  The term Brat Pack was derived from an article writen by a journalist out one night with most of the men starring in St. Elmo's Fire on a boozy night of partying.  Since then the gals in the movie as well as a few others who weren't in the movie (Anthony Michael Hall, for example) suffered a bit of a ripple effect.  Here we will see all of them at their prime and at their peak of heart throb success on every teenage girl's bedroom wall.Out of all the dramedies of the John Hughes movies, this was the one I liked the least.  Maybe it was the fact that all the characters were so vain and self centered.  Maybe it was the fact that it was all so idealized seeing all of them trying to adjust to their lives after graduating college.  It was trying to be the next generation "Graduate" movie, and I didn't relate when my time came.  Maybe it had to do with the fact that I have been let down by many people and didn't have that network of friends in similar situations, and the isolation I felt during that first year adjusting to the outside world having left the nest of academia.  I guess I was just a little more bitter.  Plus, as my life was surrounded by work and little else, I didn't have all the dramas going on they did.That was kind of sad, the one scene where Rob Lowe goes back to his old frat house and they tell him they need someone like him to couch their team.  It proves you really can't go home again and there are some clinging to the past.  Not to mention embarrassing with that one gal who has managed to hold onto her virginity for so long and in one of the attempts to releive her of it Rob Lowe finds those enormous granny panties.This caputed more of a time in fashion and music than it did a mindset.  It's not a bad story, but the vain and self centered antics of the main characters left me cold.
Swept From the Sea. I hated, hated, hated, hated this movie. It didn't make sense to me. To depresssing
Nice Movie, But A Huge Disappointment. This follow up to the brilliant 1983 classic &quot;A Christmas Story&quot; is a pretty disappointing affair. The movie does not hold the same magical quality and nostalgia as the holiday movie. Kiernan Culkin and Charles Grodin taking over for Peter Billingsley and Darren McGavin, were no match for the pitch perfect performances of the latter two. Mary Steenburgen takes over Melinda Dillon's role as Mom. The film deals with Ralphie's young childhood in the 40's. Kind of bland and boring. If your a &quot;Christmas Story&quot; fanatic like me, you will be disappointed as well. It's not a bad movie at all, it's just not what one would of hoped it would've been following the previous classic
A TRUE LOSS OF FAITH. Faith Hathaway had just graduated High School and was one week away from going into the army.  She was full of hope and life.  Robert Willie( the man this movie was based on), along with his accomplice raped and murdered her.  She was raped, stabbed 17 times, and raped after she died.   The director of this movie denied requests made by Faith's mother, and gave all the attention to the only person who deserved to die.  Where was the mercy for Faith?  Where was the compassion for Faith?  Where were the people protesting for Faith's life?  Finally where was the story about the mercy which was denied to Faith?  What about her suffering and that of her family?  Barely a foot note in this movie.  Ohh and Sister Prejean has been discovered to lie when it suits her case.
The thousand injuries of Fortunado. First, this piece of trash is based on The Journey To The West about as much as Raiders of the Lost Ark is based on the Bible. There are some characters common to both Lost Empire and Journey. Well, common in name. That said let's get to the real problem with this film. It is astoundingly insulting to Chinese religious traditions. Imagine for a moment some non-Christian producing a film in which: the God Jehova no longer cares what happens to humanity and just gives us over to Satan; Jesus gives up on that sacrifice stuff and is now focused purely on the personal acquisition of wealth and power; and the Virgin Mary comes to earth for a hot night at the singles bars. Sound offensive? It is. And this film is equally insulting to Buddhism, Taoism, and Confucianism (the three big ones in China).Confucius, a man revered these past 2500 years for his uncompromising moral standards appears in Lost Empire as a lecherous,traitorous,lying,cowardly weasel.The Jade Emperor,Taoism's chief God, is shown as a despondent,apathetic slob who no longer cares about the earthly or celestial realms.Kuan Yin, one of the Bodhisattvas, is shown in Lost Empire falling in romantic and physical love with a man. That is as likely as the Virgin Mary turning tricks on a street corner.If some religious bigot wanted to disguise a piece of anti-Chinese propaganda as a clever adventure-fantasy they could not easily do better than The Lost Empire. It makes me wonder if the insult was intended.
two movies dont work for some unknown reason. All these movies are good classics, but the problem is that Universal Studios' dvd transfer is horrible. two of the movies in this boxset dont even work and freeze when ever you play them. and its not just with this item, but also with some other legacy boxsets (including the one from hammer that are owned by universaL STUDIOS. either universal doesnt know how to transfer old movies onto dvds, or im just seeing things
You're kidding, right?. Essential Classics - Family Films?  Wizard of Oz, NO argument there.  But 'The Goonies'?  What reviewer thought that was a family classic?  It's good but there are so many other movies that are better (e.g., 'It's a Wonderful Life' - yeah I know it's a Christmas movie, maybe there should be another Essential set called Christmas Classics along with 'Miracle on 34th Street' - the original not the insipid remakes).  And 'Willy Wonka'?  It's kind of quirky classic, more of a cult film, if you ask me.  I think someone ought to go back and put together another three movies better suited to the moniker 'Classic Family Films'
Funky 60s Look, Some Interesting Scenes, Not Much Else. Gotta love the flashback to the sixties that is reflected in every scene of this movie (of course, it was just a product of its time--the mid-60s--it's not a film trying to recapture the era..it IS the era). Still the storyline is slim and the going slow. Interesting scenes appear here and there. The parts are definitely better than the whole. There's an intriguing idea in here it just never gets developed as it should. Actually, thinking about it in retrospect is more interesting than watching it was. It's subtle, I'll grant you that. And a nice character study....and yet....?We were counting the minutes left in the film by the end ("Only 25 minutes left in the film and then we can get back to our lives!") so that's not a good sign
trying. trying is the best word to describe this movie.it tried my patience. the opening scene was several minutes of nothing and i had to hold myself back from turning the movie off. I told myself, give it a chance, and i repeated that through the entire film. somewhere with in 90 minutes I just wanted to find out what was happening and why... well i can't spoil the movie but...it tried to be artistic. in fact i think most of the people who review this movie with five stars want to be artsy. examining composition and frames and dialog and colors and blah, blah, blah. this movie was a waste of my time.the only theme or concept i took away from the film was that upper class French people are annoying
Great on the movie part.  Terrible on the "scholarly" remarks parts. This movie would get 5 stars if it were not carressing with one hand - portrayingthe Gospel of John beautifully through the movie - and slapping Yahushua/Jesusand serious scholars in the face with the other hand.  The so-called "scholarly"comments, for example about how the Gospel was written 200 years after the events, are by and largeintellectually dishonest and quite simplyinaccurate.  Even the lowliest of Bible scholars, if honest, will realize this.It is very sad to see people making a buck off the Bible, while trying to tearit down at the same time.  The worst examples of Scripture put downs are in the 3rdDVD.  I gave the movie to a relative without that add on
bummer. How can I review the movie "Second Chorus" when I have never received it
Too many changes. I loved Gilad from watching him on ESPN and LOVE the beach scenes.  However, I felt like he went too fast; I was playing catch-up because he switched from one thing to another very quickly.  There weren't a lot of repeats before moving on to something new.  Maybe if I did it more and got used to it, I wouldn't mind.  However, I much prefer my Kathy Smith and Cathe videos.  This one is just collecting dust for me right now.  Maybe I'll give it a try another time, but I regret buying it
If you care about "The BOYS" get the UK set. It is a shame that American film classics ( like L and H)  get more attention and love outside of the US than in it.I just bought the Universal Laurel and Hardy 21 Volume Box set which is only available in Europe from Amazon UK (region 2). This set is EVERYTHING people are saying it is. It is a complete film history of the boys which starts with the boys early silent films ( some solo efferts) and goes though the Hal Roach Features. All the prints are restored and of pristine quality. A truly beautiful set and a worthy tribute to the boys. There are some missing films ( I assume for copyright reasons) such as Babes in Toyland, The Devils Brother, Bonnie Scotland and Flying Deuces.To acomadate these DVDs I bought a region free DVD player off Amazon,which is the only way to go if you really want to collect. The DVD player was very cheap. plays beautfully and  is well worth the investment. As a side note if you have a region free player all the DVDs in the Universal Box set are also availble as single dics, in case you don't want to spend all the money at once or just want a few of the films. If you love Laurel and Hardy this is the only way to go! Anything to screw Hallmark and the corperate monster!! Why did they buy these great films just to sit on them and distribute half-A prints!!!
great movie..hddvd worthless. Goodfellas is a classic "cult " movie and there is no doubt about it.But sorry when it comes to talk about High definition the rating goes to 2 stars maximum.There is nothing to be amazed in the HD transfer of this movie because purely and simply there is no HD such a 3D lookalike pictures,deep contrast  etc...It seems HD need today's technology to  render effects.In comparaison  "Ray " is rendering all the amazing good things of HD in pictures and sound
Wasted Potential. This movie could have been so much more than it is. It offers up more wasted potential than an "American Idol" audition.First, there's the angle of the absent father. While we're thrown some teasers - and even a pseudo-reunion between him and Ely - we are not ultimately emotionally satisfied with the outcome. There's no real resolution, no deep truth.Then there's the angle of the "love triangle." This never took off, simply because Celia and Hank had no further interaction once she and Ely took up together. And then, Ely parted ways with her entirely. Through all this, Hannah delivers no stunning performance. Her character is fairly two-dimensional at best.And then there's the "drive to win" that Ely is supposed to evince. This never really appears. We're just supposed to understand how driven he is by his brooding looks and foolhardy acts.I will give kudos to the slow motion filming sequences in the beginning and the end. They are affective. However, we could've done with a little less bull drool flying through the air like a trapeze act.All in all, this movie is plagued by wasted potential. The waste of Molly Ringwald's character is especially troubling. Why even introduce her, if she isn't going to play a pivotal role in what happens with Ely and Hank? A lot of this film seeming plodding and pointless.I wanted to like this movie. I truly did. I'm a whopping huge PBR fan, and desperately wanted to like this movie. However, the movie itself prevented me from doing so.
Horrible. Absolutely unwatchable. Cliche-ridden. So silly it's very nearly offensive. It's like watching one long music video by a B-level rapper - full of dumb, beautiful women, buff, monkey-headed ghetto thugs, and jokey tricked-out cars. Without a doubt one of the worst movies I've ever seen. The script is laughable, the acting worse. Vin Diesel and Paul Walker are more "Dumb and Dumber" than "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid". Awful
Too Bad the sound track was "Improved". This was and is a great,great, movie the way it was "originally" conceived! Then, DVDs came along with better visuals and the "required 5.1 soundtrack." Because of it's popularity, Lucas had to "improve" the already wonderful soundtrack inorder to "repackage" his wonderful creation. Well, you guessed it, he, or his audio engineers, ruined the sound by "updating" it. Yes, the visuals are improved but the "new and improved audio track" is barely acceptable which is a shame as there is so much wonderful music in this film. ("He must have changed the editing monitor speakers he used originally to a "better and improved version." The "new" sound track is simply too "accurate" and "uninvolving" on a modern sound system and does not capture the emotions of the original event as well as what you can hear on the "old" VHS and LaserDisc versions. Sad, as the "new" soundtrack, while sounding ok , can distract on a quality home audio/video system these days. Stay with the VHS or LaserDisc versions if your lucky enough to have them.
Certainly not stronger than Steele. I Netflixed this and was surprised at the results. Cybil Sheppard was likable, but Bruce Willis, the one for whom I thought I'd like the show FOR is abrasive (not "fun" abrasive) and generally hammy. I could not like the show because I could NOT like his character. Worse still, the chemistry between the two is simply cold and awkward. Totally lacking the spirit and warmth of Remington Steele and Miss Laura Holt. The humor is grating and sometimes embarrassing.For some reason certain shows just seem stuck in the time period they arrived in and Moonlighting is by far one of the, uh, stuckiest. The sound cues feel like they were yanked from Terminator One (not a good thing).There is a brief interview section on Disc One where they brazingly put down other shows of the time period and gloat on how they created something "different." If cold, dated, and impersonal is "different" than I guess they did. I would wager many here who give this 5 stars viewed it in its original time frame and have been fans all along, though I must say looking at this from the outside, it is quite honestly, a train-wreck. I have a feeling the show "could" get better but I won't be around to reset the tracks
So what?. This may be "how Mexico really is," but its not a good movie. After reading all the great reviews I was expecting much more. But like 21 Grams, it is just a movie about people you don't really care about because you don't get to know them well enough. You feel like a voyeur on other people's miserable lives and you never get inside their heads enough to really care. Its like watching a sit com, just splashed all over a big screen. There is too much violence without a point. The acting is good but the stories are blah, especially the middle one, and the themes are not developed very well. Its too much "film-making" without anough story. The style doesn't hook into the story and there is very little emotion generated. I simply didn't care, and I would never want to see it again.Y tu mama tambien is much, much better.
Great movie, horrible DVD!. Buena Vista (the company that releases Disney films on DVD) chose to not release anamorphic DVDs when they first came to DVD, so none of these films are anamorphically enhanced. This means, if you have a widescreen television, you will have black bars on all four sides of the picture. Also, these discs are absolutely barebones, only featuring a Dolby 2.0 soundtrack and a 1.85:1 widescreen presentation. Where are the extras?! I don't know about you guys, but I am a Mighty Duck fan who is disappointed by the DVD release of this film
Appauling. Wrong version, was searching for an older version where the little mermaid dies.  This is not that version!!!!Shame on Amazo
Sexually Chaotic and Dysfunctional. The reason I was drawn to watching this so-called French art film is the participation of Isabelle Hupert whom I enjoyed from I Heart Huckabees. Watching her in this film is as repulsive as watching European Divas like Monica Belluci in Irreversible and Juliette Binoche in Damage. Very slow-paced, bad camera work, unflattering makeup. The actor who plays the son is very unattractive and unconvincingl. The supporting actresses effortlessly pulled off performances that resembled live home video footages. Hupert is a great actress and I admire her courage to be part of this provocateaur, but at the same time I wonder why she wants to add a film like this to her resume. Perhaps having been around for long time, and have done every role out there, it's time to play a oversexed singled mother who messes around with her boy emotionally, psycholically, and sexually. By the way, the film seemed a bit too long, and I was so bored that I had to fast-forward after one hour. This film really deserves one star, and the second star is for Huppert. Do go back to playing a good woman again darling.
Sorry. This movie is so freakin stupid. Yes its funny...but so very dumb. Not good dumb; bad dumb. Terribly, painfully stupid. Funny at times. Best avoided or taken in small doses
A BOMB of a flick except for a few good gore effects. This sequel to a horror classic started out ok, but by the middle, none of it mattered anymore, I even got a bit tired of the well done gore effects because I had to sit through scenes of a severed [...] and rat duking it out! The original "ReAnimator" is a great flick to see if you want excellent and original gore effects as well as a creepy storyline, but this sequel just stinks
Isaac is a midget.  LOL. Where to begin, I have no clue. A talentless pool of unknown actors assemble together and do their best to act their way to an undeserved paycheck. The script was juvenile and the acting was just as bad. It is only appropriate that bad acting be accompanied by bad dialogue, don't ya think? There was some unintended comic relief in this messy film. Guess what folks, Isaac returns and he is a midget with a whiney voice. I almost felt bad for Isaac for having been in a coma for so many years only to survive as a silly looking buffoon. I couldn't help but laugh every time poor Isaac had something philisophical to mutter. Utter nonesense and not scary one bit. The whole movie is trash. Oh geez, why do is waste my time
Horrible adaption of "Macbeth". This has got to be one of the most horrible Macbeth adaptions I've ever seen. First of all, there are no real sets. Most of the time, the actors are performing in front of white and greyish backgrounds.This also seems to me like one of those Shakespeare adaptions with well-known actors playing the lead roles who'd probably say, "We're playing these parts just because we can." I mean, their voices sound wonderful and very appropriate, but they don't really look the way you'd expect a medieval Scottish king and queen to look. Too modern in appearance. Actually, some of the costumes in this performance seemed too modern.Also-- I have to touch on this because he's my favorite character-- Banquo in this production was absolutely horrible! He looked too old for the part (I imagine the actual character as being in his mid 30's to early 40's), and most of the time sounded dark and menacing, not at all like the innocent Banquo from the play.Another thing (which I knew was coming since most people producing prissy costume drama Macbeths believe the theory that it is merely a hallucination) is that they cheated us out of seeing Banquo's ghost! Not that I really cared to see what it'd look like in this version, but still-- rrgh! What is it with the whole figment-of-Macbeth's-guilty-conscience thing? It doesn't make sense, since the goings on in the play were supernatural enough to include a real ghost. But. . . I'm getting off-topic aren't I?Anyway, I would not recommend this version, as it is a perfect example of something I really, really dislike-- the stereotypical fancy overtly-dramatic Shakespeare
Great swordfights, lousy movie. I bought this movie on the basis of the many excellent reviews, but as I was disappointed on so many levels, I can't help wondering if we all saw the same movie!  An extremely sluggish and generally unbelievable storyline, ridiculous 'acting,' unsympathetic characters, what's to like?  Worst of all, after laboring mightily to get all the different main characters together for what appears to be the great denoumant of the tale, the whole thing is ruined by the antihero suddenly going berserk at the inn and getting himself killed in the process.  Why?  Because the hitherto heartless, calculating and cold-blooded murderer suddenly thinks he sees ghosts, and decides that in a fit of conscience he never had before, he should chop the entire inn to ribbons.  What appears most abundantly clear to me is that the producers of this turkey suddenly realised that they were way overbudget, and decided to end the movie as quickly as they could, and a good thing too.  Rubbish!  If you want to see a good samurai film, see 'Seven Samurai' and leave this garbage on the shelf
Could have been better. The best acting job in the whole movie, was Dean Cain himself. The telling of his back story could have been more detailed. It tended to be a bit disjointed in some areas. The action was pretty good though
Boooooring. If you saw the trailer like I did, you expect someting else, the guy who did it should get an award just for that, the movie itself is just plain boring, nothing ever happens, all the time you're trying to figure out just what in the world is really going on, and the ending is about the only good thing about this one,only because you're so tired of all the so called psychologycal drama. What really hurts is all the time they killed to get to the truth behind all this mess, I hit the wall watching this one, expected a whole lot more, and it just didn't deliver
Care bears movie II: New Generation. There was a flaw on the DVD. It would get to a point and stop. It was a gift and 30 days would have passed before it could be returned
Good movies - Bad copies. These are ten classic film noirs. Unfortunately the video and audio quality of these DVDs is very poor. Get these films in other releases
Exploitive?  How about BORING?!!. Why do people even bother making women-in-prison films when they don't understand what their audience is looking for?  I mean, nobody REALLY wants to see the serious side of what goes on behind bars --- it's mostly dull  and uninteresting, right?  So when I rented this video, I expected the fun  stuff --- the mean, bitchy guards and their cold, dykey warden, preying on  their pretty little helpless female prisoners.  This should include at  least two or three shower scenes, and at least one nocturnal visit between  barely clad cellmates!  But this movie had NONE OF THIS!  It was a  poorly-scripted soap-opera, with a totally forgettable script.  Note to  director:  Next time, stick to life on the outside
I know it is a VERY BAD MOVIE. Before clicking the link on this page for this film I knew that someone would say VERY BAD MOVIE, OR VERY BAD FILM, it is awful, but me and my friend use to laugh when we'd mention the title of this film and at the end when he's spinning around in a wheelchair. How can some of the best actors be in such a film, great cast, bad script, bad movie, it's stupid, and very violent, there are parts that are funny though like when Daniel Stern says "Have you done this before"? when he knew what to do with the body. Yes it is awful, it really is. The darkest "comedy" ever, they went way too far. It's almost as sick as the movie FREEWAY another movie with great actors in such a terrible film. Atrocious films.
Exciting concept, dud follow-thru. The concept was a dream for monster fans -- combine Werewolves, Frankenstein (Shuler Hensley), Jeckel/Hyde, and Dracula, with Bram Stoker's vampire-chaser Van Helsing, adapting Van Helsing into a young man, with Hugh Jackman to play him.  Then feature lots and lots and lots of Dracula's Brides screaming through the air against green-screen.  And miss out on many possible expositional scenes.  One of the few movies I've wondered when it would mercifully end, and I'm a Hugh Jackman fan.  My son and I kept saying,  "But why didn't they . . .?" -- show, not tell, and my daughter-in-law shrugging,  "It was what it was."  What it was was a mess.  When the TV "Making Of" feature was more exciting than the film, Houston, we have a problem.  Read the book instead
Enjoyable At Some Parts But Just Plain Stupid In Others. What i mean by the title of my review is yes this movie is going to be funny its Monty Python! but there is also some parts where it just really gets out of hand in my mind. If you are new to Monty Python I would get the quest for the holy grail before this one. Also the Monty Python's Flying Circus is great too. It comes in a 16 DVD set so it will give you a lot of their old stuff. I really did not enjoy certain parts. But there is a few good moments.
Far and Away. Very disappointed because I can't watch it on my DVD player. I would have asked for a refund and returned it but don't know how to go about doing that on Amazon
Ewwww that smell... this stinks...Buy Flying Daggers, [just plain] HERO, or buy Fong Sai Yuk at an online retailer..
The king of sleeze-Jing Wong forgets that he had Jet Li starring in this movie. Jing Wong truly sinks to a new low with this movie.  Jet has one oustanding action sequence but other than that, he just isn't used.Jacky Cheung is the star of this movie and plays an actor who absolutely never uses stunt doubles.  It became apparent within 5 minutes that this movie was made to make fun of Jackie Chan.  Of course it didn't have to be so obvious but Jing Wong just keeps driving it into your head that he does his own stunts.  So if you are familiar with Jing then you know this isn't going to be a tribute to Jackie.  Oh no, it is a punch to the throat through the movie screen.  Jet Li plays Cheung's bodyguard and ends up doing the a stunt for him.  After setting up his stupid Jackie Chan character, Jing tries to do a remake of Die Hard.  Remember how you never knew what Bruce Willis was going to do and it was always surprising?  Well Jing makes about the worst movie possible from here on.  Instead of being clever, he makes Jet just keep storming in on the hostages and then flee.  At one point he takes a helicopter up and starts shooting right into the buiding at the main bad guy with all of the hostages standing around.  After the helicopter crashes into the side of the building it doesn't blow up, it just destroys everything on that floor.  So other than one outstanding action sequence between Jet Li and Ben Lam(guy with sunglasses), this movie is a complete waste of time.  Even Billy Chow couldn't save this one.  Of course it would help if Wong Jing was smart enough to capitalize on the success of Billy Chow and Jet Li in 'Fist of Legend', but instead we don't get to see them fight and get to look at Billy Chow in a thong.  Yeah, that it just what I am looking for.The Universal Laser and Video company version is OK but the imbedded subtitles are sometimes hard to read.  There is a version of this released by Dimension Video(grrrr)that has been retitled Meltdown and has been shortened by 10 minutes and also has gotten a horrible new soundtrack including English dubbing and rap music replacing what was in the original.  Doesn't matter which one you get because the Chinese version isn't really any better since it is not a good movie to begin with.
The hard truth about Season 3. Like many folks who were born too late to catch televison's greatest shows when they first aired, but old enough to remember the pre-DVD era, I had previously only been familiar with the Twilight Zone through the magic of reruns and holiday marathons, and was thus unable to discern one season from another.It's one of the greatest, most inventive shows of all time. I don't think many people would argue that. But someone's gotta say it - with a few notable exceptions, Season 3 is a real stinker.First, there are an abundance of the 'silly' episodes - Twilight Zone fans will know the ones I'm talking about. You can usually tell from the soundtrack. Lighthearted, goofy episodes such as Season 3's "The Fugitive," "Once Upon a Time" (which gets an E for effort for featuring the brilliant Buster Keaton way past his prime), and "Showdown with Rance McGrew" are all pleasant enough, but not haunted with the same kind of masterful irony that the show is rightfully celebrated for.Still, these whimsical diversions are absolute blockbusters compared to the myriad of dull, lifeless episodes here. If you can't figure out the 'twists' to episodes like "The Mirror," "the Jungle," "Quality of Mercy," "The Passersby," "One More Pallbearer," "The Little People," "Four O Clock" and "Young Man's Fancy" within the first three minutes, maybe the OC is more your speed. Even worse are the dunderheaded, offensively preachy episodes like "Deaths Head Revisited" and "Still Valley." No wonder you never see these in syndication - they stink. Then there are the flat out awful epsiodes, like "Little Girl Lost," which almost certainly inspired the movie Poltergeist, but is still laughably awful anyway.There are some classics here - I'd count "It's A Good Life" and "To Serve Man" as some of the series's best - but they are in short supply, and chances are, if you're reading this, you're probably already quite familiar with these episodes.File under: creatively bankrupt.
Jimmy Neutron Buy Doofus!. The tv series is better!I don't know why kids think this movie is cool. This isn't a family film, because only kids would be interested in movies that say:Sheen: "I'm peeing... in the shower!"[Jimmy's dad burps]Mr. Neutron: "Well, at least it came out of the attic and not the basement."and  Cindy Vortex: "If we get blown up, whatever's left of me is kicking your ***."I'm glad I rented this because I don't wanna grow up to have immature bathroom-humor-loving kids
You Should Refuse To Watch. I was channel surfing one night and I landed on 50 Cent: Refuse To Die.  At first, I thought it was an authorized production but I quickly began to realize that something wasn't right.  This so-called documentary is loaded with hip-hop jams but none of them are from Fitty or the G-Unit camp.  Also, the majority of the film features some of the crappiest animation I have ever seen.  There are informative interviews with Fitty's Grandfather, DMC, Treach, and DJ Skribble but the movie still has a generic feel to it.  I was glued to the film like someone watching a train-wreck.  I kept wondering why 50 even agreed to narrate this turd up until the credits started rolling.  The voice of 50 Cent was provided by an imposter named Leviticus Richardson.  He had me fooled, but boy was I pissed.  Remember all the bogus 2-Pac cds that hit the streets after he died?  Several wannabes had copied Pac's flow to the max and we were bombarded with Mackaveli pts 2 to 92.  Remember the Bruce Lee imitators?  This smells like the same doo-doo.  I'm not even a fan of today's hip-hop but I would love to hear what 50 and company have to say about this.  I was tricked but there is no need for you to get played.  Avoid this urine stained comic-book and watch Cartoon Network instead
What?! Not Anamorphic?!. I was ready to order this great movie based on that it's supoosed to be a "Collectors Edition"; fortunately I happened to catch the comment from AP DUPIN from France (these are the really useful comments, Thanks AP!) that the transfer for this version is not anamorphic. Are you kidding? It's the 21st century, widescreen TV's are here! Non-anamorphic DVDs should be clearly marked as NON ANAMORPHIC. At this stage of DVD development, Widescreen Version should imply "Enhanced for 16X9 TVs", unfortunately it doesn't, so widescreen owners should make sure of what they're getting before buying. I just wish that people would include more comments about the quality and characteristics of the DVD itself along with the "artistic" review. In the meantime, I'm passing on this "Collector's Edition"(?) until someone lightens up and gives this movie the DVD treatment it deserves. The movie: 5 Stars; this DVD version: 1 Sta
Garland original screenplays = good. Adapted Garland novels = ... The Tesseract (Oxide Pang, 2003)I hereby forgive Danny Boyle for taking Alex Garland's amazing novel The Beach and turning it into the piece of celluloid excrement that it became. The problem seems to be that Alex Garland's novels have a pathological fear of being turned into movies, because unlike The Beach, The Tesseract comes with a director (The Eye's Oxide Pang) and male lead (b.Monkey's Jonathan Rhys-Meyers) who are absolutely above reproach and can simply do no wrong, and the movie's still... eh.(I hereby thank all things holy that Garland's excellent screenplay for 28 Days Later... was not, in fact, based on one of his novels.)The Tesseract is an interesting premise; the lives of four people (a drug runner, a psychologist, a bellboy, and an injured assassin) intersect in various ways in a disreputable Bangkok hotel. You know that Pang (who also directed the above-average action flick Bangkok Dangerous) is going to be able to do wonderful things with his home turf, and Jonathan Rhys-Meyers could make reading Harlot's Ghost worth watching. Add in Saskia Reeves (Dune) and you've got a recipe for a blockbuster. Problem is, it never quite gels.Pang, as expected, does in fact do wonderful things. (His use of repeated scenes from different angels to track the deeply confusing time element in the story is wonderful.) Rhys-Meyers, though he gets surprisingly little screen time for a male lead, acts as well as he always does. Saskia Reeves, who actually gets the most screen time (along with bellboy Wit, played by newcomer Alexander Rendell), also does a good job, although her part's not as well-written as is Rhys-Meyers' or Rendell's. The action is relatively fast, the camerawork is superb. So what's wrong with it?I can't really tell you. It's the same indefinable thing (I refuse to blame Leo DiCaprio, who does have a good actor hiding in there somewhere, viz. The Basketball Diaries and What's Eating Gilbert Grape?) that made The Beach into such a crapfest. I cannot urge you strongly enough to read Alex Garland's novels; I urge you with equal fervor to avoid the movies based on them. *
Not a good deal. This DVD is poor, and below the expectations of any wrestling fan mainly for Jeff's fans, the matches never end somebody always screwed him during his appereances. And the first disc is the worst of it.Buy it under your own risk.
I never received the video!. I read the statement: Will send in two to three business days. It's been almost one month. I never received the video.  I'm not happy
My Own Personal Hell. This is the first time I delved into the HellRaiser series, and I have to admit, I kind of regret it. The film opens with a collage of disturbing images, I guess to get my attention, but there is no real reason for them to be there. From there the film falls into a freefall where it jumps from one messed up scene to the next. It all looks perfectly twisted, but who really cares. Clive Barker, as he did in "Night Breed," shows his taste for creative costumes and set designs. Of course they are all very self-indulgent, but beautiful nonetheless in their own little way. Had this film showed up at a modern art museum I would have labeled it pretentious. But since it showed up in movie theaters I have no choice but to label it crap.I would love to describe the plot to you, but it didn't make a ton of sense to me. Kirsty (Ashley Laurence) is in a mental hospital and is convinced that her dad is calling out to her from inside hell, and thus she must go save him. Meanwhile her evil step-mom (and speaking from experience they are all evil) is reemerging from hell with the distinct disadvantage of not having any skin. Upon her return she uses her bloody pulp of a body to engage in a sexual act with another evil doer. I'm sure that gets laughs every time from the children who are watching, but to me it was silly and unnecessary. She goes on a quest for skin which goes off without a hitch, and from there a battle ensues between Kirsty and her step-mom over the soul of a little girl named Tiffany (or so everybody calls her). The whole point seems to be that our minds make up our own personal hells, and that is an idea I can get on board with. One overview shot of hell has it looking strikingly similar to an M.C. Escher print. With dead ends and trap doors and boogeymen we all travel through the labyrinth of our mind on a daily basis. But I cannot get on board with this film. It is sensational for the sake of sensationalism, which is fine with me, but not when it is mixed with a brain dead plot. What do I, or anybody for that matter, get from watching a man carve himself up with a knife? I guess that at least it is not soft like modern horror movies, but this one does not earn its gore.For those of you who demand nothing out of your movies other than the experience of a bad dream where nothing makes sense then this is your film. For the rest of you this is failed storytelling of the highest degree. I still have "HellRaiser" on my shelf to watch and I must say it won't be hard for that one to top this mess. I may never understand why people think atmosphere is enough to create a scary movie. It is the major flaw of this film and Japanese Horror in general, but I want a story to go with my scares. What this one is selling is a chance to be grossed out of your mind or bored stiff. . .or both. I hated this movie, and no I don't care how realistic it looked when the characters were peeling the skin off of their faces. *1/2
Outdated. I'm sure this was a fun video in its time, but the moves are just too 80's
Kill Me Now. Great casting, but poor choice of a stage script to translate to film.  It's so aggravating.  I want to chew my own leg off half way into it.  I know part of it is everyone is a "talker" of a various sort.  They're all a different type of scam artist for this reason in how they sell.  I just don't think it works.  Otherwise talented dialog delivery that comes off totally contrived.  The best actors in this are playing cliches of themselves.  It gives stage to screen adaptations a bad name.  Mamet's an extraordinary genius-writer, but this did not belong on the screen.
Somewhat Overdone Version Here. It's not as bad as the version done by Johnny Depp and Christina Ricci, but close enough. I did find it intriguing as it started off with a conversation with the author Washington Irving. I love this story, but there were some things brought out here that I wasn't quite ready for, and that was the truth the lovely Katrina actually despised Ichabod, and turned him down for marriage. I guess it's because I can identify with this rejection as I've been rejected before. It also showed a stern Ichabod, and one who tried to show how spiritual he was by singing loudly, and impressively in the church to the point where he was able to sweet-talk the minister into letting him be choir director, and for what may have been immoral motives. A far cry from the Ichabod that I remember reading about, and hearing about as he had a humble nature about him. I've heard many versions of this story, and some were more memorable than others, but it's a story that you'll never forget, but when it comes to this version I just rather soon forget it. It's a version that just tried to be too truthful, and for those of us who still see the romantic side of Ichabod and Katrina we tend to not want to know that Katrina actually didn't love him at all. At least there was no laughing when the Headless Horseman showed himself.
Feeble Homage. The Little Rascals collection is a set of 5 DVDs with a few shorts on each DVD, the fifth disk with an extra from the 50s and a documentary about child stars. This set was poorly put together, the shorts included are quite random, and buying this set would be a waste of money.Each disk opens with a montage of some of the characters. First there is Alfalfa, then Buckwheat, Spanky, Darla, Porky, Mickey, Stymie, then Fatty- oh wait, no that is Joe Cobb only they didn't know his real name, then Farina, and last Phil MacMahon- WHO you may be asking? Phil MacMahon, the kid who got bitten by the love bug in a song number in Our Gang Follies of 1938. Still don't know him? Maybe that is because he wasn't a regular cast member and should never have been featured like he was in this collection.Disk One features the shorts Dogs of War and Derby Day. Dogs of War is a silent film featuring the gang running loose on the Hal Roach lot; it is one of my favorite shorts from the series. However, it seems that they ripped off the Cabin Fever print and added a worse score. Derby Day also seems to be lifted from the Cabin Fever series. It is a silent film about the gang visiting the horse races. The films themselves are very good.Disk Two features a rarer silent film called Stage Fright. It is a film about a show put on about Marc Anthony by the kids in front of their parents. It is a total disaster. Just like in Reunion in Rhythm, one kid wants to go out on stage and recite poetry. The film has been seriously cut; there are no opening credits and the short is much shorter than the usual film length. The print is washed out and new title cards have been inserted. The music is much more childish than normal silent Rascals scores, but it works. There are sound effects too. Sundown Limited is a great short about the gang building their own train. It is a very cute film; Farina is especially funny in it. The train that the kids build would have been the envy of all the children in the neighborhood. The print is washed out and the music sounds just like Grapevine Video's soundtracks. The film titled The Pirates in this set is really called The Buccaneers. It is also a cute film about the kids trying to build their own ship. When it sinks, they find a real one to destroy. This short has also been cut; there is no opener for it either. It is a bad print and has kiddie music attached to it.Disk Three opens with Mary Queen of Tots. It is a really enjoyable film where Mary receives toys that look like the gang. She dreams they come to life, and when she wakes up, she finds the gang and believes they are her dolls come to life. This print is really bad especially considering there is a better print available on another cheaply made DVD set. It is funny that the music is the same on this set as on that one though. The Fourth Alarm is a film about the kids becoming junior fire fighters. The print on this one is not bad at all. The last film is School's Out, a talkie featuring a different cast. It is a film featuring Miss Crabtree, the new teacher. The picture is good; it seems to be the one from Cabin Fever.Disk Four begins with Bear Shooters. This is a less than great film. The print is great; it is the one from Cabin Fever. Our Gang Follies of 1938 is a great film, very funny, long, and exciting. It features the later talkie cast. Waldo's Last Stand is a film from the later MGM years, a lesser film that seems forced. It was also released in a 5 part Rascals set.Disk Five is the extra features DVD. It starts out with a segment from the You Asked For It television show. On it, some of the silent gang are reunited. Joe Cobb, Jackie Condon, Farina Hoskins, Johnny Downs, and Mickey Daniels are featured. The documentary called Kid Stuff really doesn't have a whole lot of information about the gang although Jackie Cooper is mentioned and Butch Bond does an interview. Other child stars like Jackie Coogan, Judy Garland, Shirley Temple, Roddy McDowall, and Ron Howard are focused on as well.The films in this collection are films that have lapsed into the public domain. Many of them have been available cheaply for years. The only reason a fan might want to see this collection, the same reason I bothered, was to see the rarer silent films. However, the rest of the set is trash
Disappointing. I hate to be one of the only people to leave a bad review, but this video just isn't up to the same standards as other Sesame Street productions.  While the title is "Get up and Dance", it doesn't always show the moves, and the choppy editing makes it hard for a young child to follow.  The dance instructor's voice is shrill and she yells instead of singing.  I'm assuming that was simply for her to be heard over the children, but it is unpleasant to listen to.  "I'm a Little Airplane" is a cute, retro sounding song that looks like a music video, but unless you dance with your child, there's no "dance" instruction with this song.  My 2 year old loves Elmo, and there is a song at the end where Elmo dances- basically it looks like an Elmo puppet shaken in front of a black screen for about of half of the song, and then it cuts off.  Obviously there are other children who do enjoy this video, but I recommend that you rent, borrow or check it out of the library first to see if your child likes it before you buy
Would be GREAT! If it was a 25 minute film. This movie started off with premise. Although I hate the actors in it, I wanted to give it a chance.  The first 20 minutes was good.  Then it got old.  Really quickly.  It's still old.  Make it STOP.  The slapstick is stupid.  The acting is horrid.  The idea is something because as you know this happens all the time and I have been through something similar myself.  But do yourself a favor and pass on this movie.  If you have to watch it, make sure you don't pay for it, record it on Tivo first and fast forward it every couple of minutes.  I gave it 2 stars, cause...well..I was trying to be nice
Cheesy Sci-Fi flick only has *some* good things to offer, but its really silly... Josh Charles (S.W.A.T., Tv's Sports Night) finds out that he is the bearer of a key that can make you travel into different dimensions. Andrea Roth brings him to her friend, played by Rutger Hauer (The Hitcher, Sin City) who guides Charles and tells him that his father was a timedimensional warrior and that he could be too as well. On the evil end, baddie Stuart Wilson (No Escape, The Mask of Zorro) wants the key and the septer that goes along with it so he can fuse worlds together and be the ruler and what not and the trio must bring back the septer to the right place before evil hands get on it and the fate of the world is at risk. Interesting idea is squandered by sillyness and dumb dialouge and some pretty crummy acting, altough Charles saves this from being a total disaster. It's good to see Hauer not being a bad guy but he's wasted along with Wilson. AND, well, it was surprising to see Jack Black (School of Rock, King Kong) in this movie...one before he became famous. Black does his mannerisms and speech. Watch it once and then dimension jump the hell out of the room.
Not Appropriate for Children!. I agree with Jane!  I bought this video for my four year old son because he's a Spider-man fanatic. Little did I know that this series is not meant for children. When we started to watch with him, I couldn't believe what I was hearing so I flipped the box over to find the rating (never dreaming there was one since I bought this in a toy store right next to a stack of Teletubbie videos!) There is a PGV rating on the back for violence but they don't tell you about the adult language as well as the sexual references. Needless to say we shut it off and tried to distract him with a more appropriate video for his age. I don't know if I'd let my 16 year old watch this
Sofia Milos is all the money!. The Order sheds light on a religious sect dating back to the Crusades.  Having survived throughout the centuries, it aims at fulfilling a prophecy, which would plunge mankind into a third world war...In short, the acting and the dialogues are extremely weak (Van Damme and Charlton Heston really disappoint with their performances!), while the plot and the setting, are actually very good, therefore, the potential for a great movie was definitely there if only the actors and writers could... act and write!As for the rating, if you're going to have it rated R at least give it the sex and/or the violence.  If not, give it the proper rating i.e. PG-13.Overall, far from being a masterpiece, it just might provide for an evening's entertainment if in a really silly mood and/or intoxicated. 1  StarsIf Van Damme movies is what you had in mind, check out the Legionnaire and Timecop
corny&ok. I saw this movie over the weekend&thought it was corny&Predictable but it passed the time so no harm no foul.iy had a few laughs but that was about it
Disappointing!  So 80's!!. I bought this dvd after seeing a recommendation by a celeb in a fitness magazine.  Bad idea.  I have several fitness dvd's from various outlets and this is the worst ever.  Tamilee even gets confused telling you 4 more - oops 6 more when counting reps.  It is formatted for vcr not dvd.  It is not inspiring or motivating.  Your money is better spent with other products
You Had To Be There. Made for a pittance, initially released in just two theaters, ultimately grossing over ten million dollars, "Sweet Sweetback's Baadasssss Song" became the progenitor of the "Blaxploitation" film craze of the seventies. Considered a seminal film in African-American cinema, Director Van Peebles feels it influenced the independent film movement as a whole. Its jazzy editing and strong hero set it miles apart from the standard fare - one can see how African-American audiences could see this film as a long-overdue cinematic thunderbolt.The plot is simple. Sweetback (Van Peebles himself) has grown up in a bordello to become one of its central attractions. One night, he agrees to accompany a pair of police officers downtown for questioning. A murder case lacks suspects, and the gesture appears to be compensation for the force's lenience toward the establishment.En route to the interrogation, however, the police intercept a youth on the street and brutally beat him. Using his handcuffs, Sweetback kills both officers. The rest is a protracted chase, with Sweetback using his fists (among other body parts) to make his way to the border. The police question his companions, hot on his trail with guns, bloodhounds and (at one point) a helicopter.Van Peebles has an eye for a striking shot, and there's some vivid scenes of police officers brutalizing Sweetback's friend Beetle that get their point across. While its historic contribution is clear, "Sweetback" has little to offer modern audiences beyond its kitsch value. Van Peebles is a strong presence as the laconic hero, but there's not much in the way of narrative or memorable characters to savor. There's plenty of sex and violence to be had (the 'X' rating is fully earned), but it's episodic - much of the film seems to be an enormous montage of repeated street scenes and dialogue clips, and the effect rapidly becomes tiresome.Thirty years after its explosive release, "Sweetback" will remain compelling for film historians and students. Its torch has been passed on to to other filmmakers, but the pioneering effort itself has not dated well.PS - The DVD release has an interview with the director. Initially, it shares some formal similarities with the feature, but later it settles into some interesting (and amusing) anecdotes.PPS - I just saw "Badasssss!" (Mario Van Peebles' docudrama on how "Sweet Sweetback's Baadasssss Song" was made) last night (10/25). It makes for a great double feature, as it really helps you to understand how difficult that production was
Not good quality. The movie is a good one but the quality of the dvd is bad! The sound is very low, picture is jumpy (I'm not sure how that happens on dvd?). I sent mine back and got the Martin and Lewis Collector's Edition with "At War with the Army" Movie included. I recomend that one instead. 6 1/2 hours of FUNNY
Thoroughly predictable "thriller". The only thing that kept this from being ABSOLUTELY predictable was that a dead bad guy did NOT spring back to life.  I found myself saying "Oh come on" to one plot point after another (previous reviewers have covered these absurdities).  The underlying scenario was unconvincing and un-involving (previous reviews in this thread provide details)
A Letdown from National Lampoon. This could have been a good movie. The premise was ripe for exploitation and nobody exploits the stupidity of people in general and young people in particular better than National Lampoon. They are the acknowleged masters of the exploitation genere: movies with absolutely no redeeming social value that still leave you laghing. In this case, however, they exploited only their reputation.The premise is of a couple of young idiots looking for an easy life without work. Hey...it's worked for years. They fail at just about everything including purse snatching and armed robbery. Finally they hit upon a scheme to marry a couple of rich spinsters and wait to collect the inheritance. There is a problem, though, in that the spinsters are hard up for cash as well and conceive of a plot to marry the dumb kids who tried to mug them, insure them heavily and then kill them for the payout. It had so much potential for comedy and it falls flat.There are a few moments of brief humor but they are far too few and far between. Most of my time was spent agonizing "surely, it will get better". It didn't.I almost gave this one a single star. What kept me from doing so is that there are a few movies out there that are even worse. Unfortunately, I have seen some of them.Buy this one if you MUST complete your National Lampoon Collection or if you want something to distract you from the pain of a root canal. Otherwise, don't bother. Even renting is a stretch
For kids only. The movie is very loosely based upon a book by Mary Norton about the Clock family, small people (about six inches tall) who live underneath the floorboards of a house, surviving by borrowing things from humans "beans". When they are discovered, they are forced to move.I was very disappointed with this movie. The only way to enjoy this film is if you haven't read the books. The acting was good, if over the top, but that was the kind of acting needed in a film like this, which seemed to be a combination of "Home Alone" and "Mouse Hunt".  But the direction was very odd. The movie seemed to be set in the 1950's, yet characters in the movie used a remote for the (black and white) TV and a cellular phone. The costuming was also odd. Yes, they had to make do with what they could "borrow" to make clothes, but their outfits, and the really odd hairdos, made them look like creatures from another planet. Also, have the cast was British and half was American, which added to the confusion about what world the movie was set in.On the other hand, the special effects were quite good. The best part of the DVD is the sequence that shows how the special effects were done. It was very interesting, but it used too many clips from the movie and not enough clips of how they did the special affects. There are also interviews with the cast, with the exception of John Goodman.Little kids will like this movie, but adults should stay away.
Big disappointment... Okay, first things first: "The Magificent 7" or "Seven Samurai," this movie is most definitely NOT.It is more like "The Storm Riders" meets "Conan" meets "Mad Max."The action is grotesque, without any really great choreography. The plot is thin. Character development is poor. Overall, very poorly done...Don't waste your time or money
Crapper. 'Ticker'...oh where to begin?Usually I write pretty in-depth reviews about Lord Steven's films but with 'Ticker' I'm not even going to bother.  Here's the only way that I can explain this film:  take the laziest and most ineptly made film you've ever seen, take a dump on it, then throw it against a wall, and then wipe yourself with it.  That is 'Ticker'.Lord Steven is nothing but supporting cast as a hippie bomb squad leader.  Tom Sizemore apparently took some time off from rehab or jail or wherever he was supposed to be to play the burnout cop.  Some various annoying rappers show up and are all killed off in a matter of seconds.  Dennis Hopper rolled out of bed to obviously just get an easy paycheck to play a mad bomber with no real agenda and throws in a constantly disappearing/reappearing terrible Irish accent just for kicks.  The director(Albert Pyun, auteur of other direct-to-video hunks of crap)must have been trying to one up crapmaster Uwe Boll for complete disregard for filmmaking.  Oh, and there must have been a sale of black leather jackets somewhere because every single character in this film wears one.  Every single person.  Even extras sport them.'Ticker' is, by approximately five thousand times, the worst film Lord Steven has ever been in.  And that is saying something if you have seen other Seagal flicks such as 'Today You Die' or 'Out Of Reach'.Pure, unadulterated fecal matter.  I'd rather burn my privates with cigarettes than watch this stinker again
PIECE OF CRAP!. Dragonheart did not need a sequel. The story was told. It is over. The first movie peaked therfore, end of franchise. This has bad acting, terrible C.G.I., and stupid story. Stick with the first
A Sizeable Disappointment. Like most people who made the effort to see this movie, I read Tim Sandlin's book and thoroughly enjoyed it.Unfortunately for this movie, Sandlin is a far better novelist than screenwriter.The film is disjointed, awkward, and hard to follow. It quickly hops from one important moment of the book to another, allowing almost no time to understand the characters and their motivations or appreciate the bizarre circumstances of the story.The casting isn't bad-- a prepubescent Mischa Barton was a fine choice (a hysterical one for fans of the O.C.), and Jennifer Jason Leigh is also respectable, although she doesn't fit her character's physical description-- but that doesn't nearly make up for the film's jumpy direction and half-baked plot.In sum, this is a dissatisfying and substandard film. Undoubtedly, the subject matter is better suited for a novel, and Sandlin's humor and talents are better utilized there.Read his books. Avoid this movie.
started out great, then went bad. I watched this movie with great anticipation. It is very well acted and starts out great. It's the story of a young Spanish woman who comes to America to star in movies. She has had an extremely hard life and wants to get away from it all. She becomes an overnight star and has everything, except love. She meets and falls in love with a Count and that's where the story goes horribly wrong. Basically, she finds out, on their wedding night, he can't fufill her in marriage, so she has an affair. She gets pregnant, which she is excited about, and then her husband finds out about the affair, but not the pregnancy, and kills her and the man she has the affair with.It was a horrible ending to an, otherwise, great movie.
Great Language Features. Band Camp was funny, but not as good as the first two American Pie movies. It was, however, on par with the third movie in the series. There were the usual silly, outrageous pranks and there were a few characters from the previous movies, but not the main characters. This movie was fun and worth watching, but probably not really worth watching again EXCEPT for the the language features. The movie comes dubbed in Spanish and French, plus you can have subtitles in several languages while viewing the movie in any language. SO, this movie might provide a fun way of developing or brushing up on your foreign language skills
NOTHING BUT THE BREAST. SKYSCRAPER is in one word, awful.  Anna Nicole Smith wouldn't know how to act, and once you've seen her watermelons once, they're not all that attractive.  The two love scenes with the wimpy background songs are some of the worst ever put on celluloid.  The acting is all around atrocious, especially Charles Hubere in the role of Fairfax, the Shakespeare spouting rastaman.  When Anna spouts off to her cop husband, that she wants a baby, you just wanna stick a binkie in her mouth, but not one as big as hers or she'd gag.Which is just what one must do to survive this horrifying cinematic waste
For The Hardcore 50 Cent Fans Only (2 Stars). I don't consider myself a hardocre 50 Cent fan, but I went out and bought this after getting a preview of it in an issue of XXL.  It wasn't all that entertaining.  The documentary doesn't really tell the people anything that we don't already know.  We've seen all these videos before, but the video for &quot;Heat&quot; is straight wack.  The street version of that video is much better and somewhat funny.  The Show In Detroit isn't entertaining at all unless you just get a kick out of 10 people on stage chanting the words right along with 50 while making it impossible to understand a word that's being said.  The sessions @ AOL are straight pointless and why did we need an 8 Mile DVD trailer?  The DVD borders on corny, but the CD isn't that bad.  These are all songs that most diehard fans have already heard on his underground bootlegs, but I had not been able to find the &quot;8 Mile Road (G Unit Remix)&quot; ever since I lost my underground CD.  Lloyd Banks kills that track and that song is now contained on this CD / DVD release.  If you're a Young Buck fan, you should know that he's nowhere to be found on this release.  Overall, The New Breed isn't completely terrible, but it loses its novelty after one or two uses.  The three songs on the CD are decent, but you probably have them already.  I would only reccomend this to the die hard 50 Cent / G Unit fans
Some advance warning, please?. I had no idea what to expect from this, and am still not sure how this pair of sketch comedy shorts featuring Jim Norton, Lewis Black, Greg Fitzsimmons, and Jim Gaffigan among others can be rated, or even explained as they are presented. Vaudeville and Laural & Hardy-inspired as these skits are, there is little to explain their concept or even what we are watching. On the DVD are two skits. That's about it. No interviews, no extra footage to invite the viewer into the concept, nothing.That's not to say that some of the performances weren't well done. The ideas for these pieces do seem like they were good ones; I am, however, left with an empty feeling after. In the descriptive terms that Lewis Black has himself used in the past, A Pair of Lewis Black Shorts come up short and to many will come across as proverbial candy corn.
Nobody want's to be this Mama's boys Valentine. Your typical, average, unoriginal masked man killing off people that he doesn't like. Not only that, People that don't like him. That don't love him. This whole things has been done to death and I'm sick of it. Enough with the killer's in masks. Many others have come before this one. Some where more entertaining than others but still, give it a rest already. Nothing is done different and everything is flawed in this movie. It's a complete waste of time.Here's a list of all the others that seem EXACTLY similiar to this undying tune:1. I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER2. I STILL KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER3. SCREAM4. SCREAM 25. SCREAM 36. HIGHSCHOOL DEATH7. THE ENTIRE JASON VORHEES SERIES8. THE ENTIRE MICHAEL MEYERS SERIES9. URBAN LEGEND10. URBAN LEGENDS: FINAL CUTfINAL vERDICT: This deserves to be forgotten
Terrible-don't waste your money. This supposed 'language lab' is VERY poorly designed. The dvd consists of images of items with a nursery rhyme or poem being recited in another language. The amazing thing is that the item shown has no relation to the words being spoken! It might as well be completely random sounds, since anyone who has studied child language acquisition knows that babies learn from making observations of language used in context. While I understand that supposedly this DVD is only intended to 'stimulate' the brain, by six months, a baby's brain has developed specifically to hone in on the sounds presented in his own native language, and to selectively ignore others. The brain continues to prune and forge neural networks in response to sounds from the language spoken in the home, thus the idea that random speech sounds are somehow beneficially stiumlating is invalid. A baby's brain becomes stimulated by the sounds that appear repeatedly in his own language. Habituation and imaging studies have shown this time and time again. Imagine if the baby's brain gave equal attention to any sound--the brain would waste valuable time and resources on information that would not be useful in learning to communicate with his caretakers. We acquire langauge so rapidly because the brain is selective.Babies depend heavily on repitition, adult modeling, observing cause and effect, and from watching other people's behaviors to learn language. The idea that your child with learn anything from just hearing forgien language sounds out of context is very silly. If you want your child to learn language sounds and words from a language not spoken in the home, try exposing him to another language speaker on a routine basis, or show him programs like Dora or Sesame Street, where there is lots of explicit context to help a baby infer meaning, clear annunciation, and repition.
Prisoners of the Mountains. I thought this movie was decent but nothing spectacular.  It kept me awake but just on the verge.  The few comical scenes helped to keep me interested as did the totally unexpected ending which was probably the best part of the entire movie.  I thought the acting in this movie was just mediocre at best. Overall I was not impressed with the movie but the few good scenes earned it two stars over just the lonely one star.
Dumbest movie ever. The entire premise of the movie is not merely ludicrous or far-fetched, it is actually completely false.  The concept of double jeopardy has nothing at all to do with WHOM is murdered (or is otherwise the victim), but WHAT you did, in distinct criminal incidents.  Even if you were wrongly convicted of murdering someone, if you go back and murder them "again" then that is a new incident, and double jeopardy does not apply.In movies intended to be fantastic, diverging this much from reality might be OK.  But this is a mainstream legal thriller.  It's like having a mainstream romantic comedy where the men wear lipstick and the women don't, for no apparent reason.But the producers of this movie either have no idea what the law actually says or means, or they just (accurately) banked on the general public being too ignorant to notice how ridiculous it is
Note to Tyrone Power fans:. While the movie is interesting, if you are a Tyrone Power or Vincent Price fan - They are barely in it.
Compared to the real story?. You only need to read the book by Whitley Strieber to know how truly disappointing this movie is.
UNWATCHABLE !. Save your money.  I gave up halfway through and shredded the DVD.  Amanda Peet was great in "Saving Silverman", but she should be mortified by this movie.  "Whipped" was probably written by two fifteen-year-olds on their junior high lunch break.  Absolutely abysmal
For die hard Kutcher fans only. The movie starts off very slowly, with childhood episodes from Ashton Kutcher's character.  It's at least 1/2 an hour before we see the adult Kutcher, although he does appear at the very beginning for a brief scene.  The premise is good, and it has some good momentum in the middle, which is why I gave it two stars.  The shifting situations of his life and the lives of his friends are interesting and well done, but the overall story line is very weak, and the ending is dreadful and not supported by most of the rest of the story.  Also, the movie has too many tongue-in-cheek references to Kutcher's real life circumstances -- such as the reference to "tighty-whities."  They distract from the story, and make the movie more of a vanity vehicle -- which is too bad -- If you are not a Kutcher convert and are just looking for a movie, skip this one
Half of Dickens. I would love to be able to comment on Parts 1, 2 and 3 of Martin Chuzzlewitt, with the brilliant Paul Schofield, but on the single disc I purchased, we received only parts 4, 5, and 6.And while Schofield, and many other favorites, were indeed excellent in that which we watched, we will be forever curious as to how they did in that which we could not watch. Parts 1,2, and 3 were neither on the single disc, nor on any other!!!It is certainly disappointing to me, a steady customer of Amazon.com and its DVDs, that there is no quality control over the product, and indeed not a soul or a voice to receive a complaint.
Worst Semi-Musical EVER!. There were two things that I really hated about this movie: the music and the forest. I'm not sure where they shot this movie, but the trees looked like they were most likely eucalyptus trees. You'd think they could have at least found a nice dark forest somewhere that would be reminiscent of the dark woods you'd expect in this sort of tale. The poor selection of filming locations might be over-looked, but the incredibly banal music was just unforgivable! I talked to a couple of young kids after they'd watched this movie and they very adamantly insisted that it was a terrible movie. In general I'd say that this movie was on the verge of being amateurish (despite the presense of well-known actors) except that someone did a nice job building the gingerbread house. If it weren't for that element of the movie, I'd rate it at zero stars instead of one star! (NOTE: The child actors did a fine job performing their roles and it is not at all their fault that the movie is so lame!
Fantastic PQ, awful movie. Reference picture quality on HD-DVD.  Basically unwatchable though.  I would not recommend the blind buy on this one.
Shallow affirmation of female stereotypes. My roommate got me to watch a bunch of this. I figured maybe since I'm a girl and girls like Sex in the City, just maybe I would like it too.Wrong. This series is pretty much a compilation of every modern female stereotype somehow moulded into a storyline. There are women talking on and on about shoes. There are awkwardly explicit and highly objectifying chats about sex. There are women freaking out for no apparent reason.This show is completely shallow and trivial. There is nothing deep underneath it all. The narration is annoying and often illogical, as is much of the dialogue.Though if you're the type who likes everything women stereotypically like (Cosmopolitan magazine, shopping, buying shoes, complaining about men, etc), you'll probably like this for whatever strange inexplicable reason everybody else does. But there's nothing intellectual, interesting or inventive about the series beyond that. It's no more interesting than the banal conversations you'd hear if you were eavesdropping on random girls at the mall. This show (well this season at least) made me irritated and bored, and the somewhat objectifying attitude towards men on the part of many of the women in the show made me a little offended too
The guys can't act. I'm not a professional critic or one that watches many movies.  I just love 80's movies and since this movie had good reviews, I had to watch it.  I was so dissapointed with the nerd and the rebel's bad acting in the movie; It was just horrible!  I like the storyline and the soundtrack, but the acting really ruined everything.  If you just want to watch it to see some skin and not for good quality acting, then this is your movie
okay melodrama....fuller style. Army sergeant, Robert Stack, working undercover, breaks up a syndicate led by expatriate Robert Ryan, in this hard-boiled melodrama set against the urban sprawl of post-war Japan. Expert commentary by Fuller scholars James Ursini & Alain Silver makes it all seem rather more interesting than it is - yet, effective characterizations abound, notably Stack's taciturn investigator, later honed to perfection as The Untouchables' Elliot Ness, a radiant Shirley Yamaguchi as the love interest, and Robert Ryan as an unusually sympathetic villain (more avuncular than sexually ambivalent, as suggested by some commentators).The letterboxed image is fine, though the drab color transfer blunts the immediacy of Joe McDonald's on-location photography
Waste of money. If you like reality TV or soap operas, this DVD is right up your alley. Jamie is indeed informative and amusing during his cooking shows. I guess I expected something like that from this DVD
Dissapointing. I ordered this CD because I thought I might learn some sexy dance moves from it. Bad idea. I didn't see any interesting choreographies or moves. And a lot of the girls I found ugly. If you want to see various examples of "capsular contracture" (women with (...)implants will know what I'm talking about), buy this CD
At least it's over. . . It should be noted that the Amazon description for this product is WRONG. It does NOT contain both English and Japanese audio tracks. No 4Kids DVDs ever do (save for a few rare, uncut releases that were discontinued).Sonic X may not be one of 4Kids WORST dubbed animes, but it ranks fairly high. Things are edited out for seemingly no reason, even the mildest of violence is cut, Japanese text and references are blanked and not even translated, and entire episodes are re-arranged. Not to mention, plenty of references to the Sonic games are not translated properly.This "season" of episodes 53-78 received some of the worst dubbing treatment of the entire series. These episodes in their original version contained very mild violence coupled with story arcs that were directed to older children around the ages of 9-14. It was still perfectly fine for younger children, but 4Kids decided to cut it to ribbons anyway removing anything in reference to character violence and death, instead re-writing the scripts and piecing together footage to make it seem like nothing ever happened. I do not think children should be exposed to graphic violence, but there was none of that in Sonic X and 4Kids has practically destroyed the entire Sonic X series.Do not buy this set if you are looking for a high-quality, entertaining product
Tokyo Razz. With the possible exception of The Possession of Joel Delaney, easily MacLaine's most bizarre film. Here she's cast as a Hollywood slapstick queen who's so desperate to be taken as a serious actress that she secretly flies to the Orient and, unbeknownst to her film director husband (Yves Montand), poses as a geisha to land the lead in his movie production of Madame Butterfly.Any resemblence to a remarkably similar I Love Lucy special of three years earlier (wherein Lucy and Ethel posed as geishas to fool their husbands while on vacation in Japan) is practically italicized. MacLaine's character has red hair, like Lucy Ball---and her character is even named "Lucy Dell." Need more convincing? Bob Cummings figures prominently in both the TV sitcom *and* this movie!What might have proved amusing as the punchline to an outlandish '50's sitcom (husband doesn't immediately recognize wife under geisha drag, but when he does, turns tables on her--ha ha!) is weak tea stretched out to feature-length and played relatively straight. And despite being billed as a comedy (laughs are few and far between, even when intended), this is actually more of a soap opera, with MacLaine constantly fending off Cummings' advances while using her disguise to test her husband's fidelity. The jarring movie-within-a-movie climax (a sobbing MacLaine commits hari kari with a samurai sword--a buzz kill seen twice!) hardly adds to the fun; meanwhile, a dour Montand wanders through the proceeedings looking like he's just had a bout with a plate of bad sushi. Beautiful location cinematography just points up the artificiality of the rest of theproduction.Ironically, just a year later, MacLaine would be much better served by the same trite disguised-lover plot (with Jack Lemmon as the masqueradee) in Billy Wilder's infinitely more entertaining Irma La Douce.
THE GAMES AFOOT. To GHOST GAME's credit, I didn't cut it off; it entertained me enough to make me stay with it.  BUT..what a lame movie.  A plot that makes little or if any sense; actors whose talents are minimal; and sloppy direction and editing.  Three witches back in the mid-seventies were killed during some kind of ritual, but we're not really sure what, and even though by the end of the film, we "kinda" figure out who killed them, it still doesn't make a whole lot of sense.  Then we have the typical group of college students (none who look under the age of 30) who for whatever reason decide to go spend a weekend at this camp where the witches died, and lo and behold, they find some kind of weird game which releases the witches and spells doom for the cast.  There aren't a whole lot of scares and the pacing isn't quick enough to generate any suspense, but there are a lot worse movies out there, so fans of this type of occult thriller may find themselves mildly diverted
mediocre piece of realist propaganda. A mediocre piece of realist propaganda, now elevated to the ranks of "film greats" because of its conformity to certain techniques of the era, this film has nothing to offer except rigid, cliched "villains" (the Germans) and the "noble born oppressed" (Italians).  It is sentimentalizing at its worse, I particularly found the portrayal of the German commander weak, as he looked like a gerbil, and did not seem very apt or capable.  There is very little in the way of story and the expected brutality of the Germans is what takes up the greater part of the screen time, how predictable
Awful!. Sometimes brainless action movies can be at least entertaining, but this movie does not deliver.  I couldn't even finish watching it on cable.  Really idiotic!  And this from the same director who made "Man on Fire!?!
This movie sucks. I was watching Cinemax one night, bored out of my mind and unable to sleep, when this movie came on.  The acting made me laugh.  The premise made me laugh.  Everything about it made me laugh.  Hey, at least it was fun to make fun of anyway.  Just kinda mad that I wasted a good 80 minutes on this piece of crap
One of the most moronic films I've ever suffered through. I was forced to endure this film when it first appeared in theatres ("Dude, you've gotta see it, it's great!", and "Man, we laughed our axxes off!"  were some of the comments I heard from friends.)  So I went, and in spite of being "tuned up" with some pretty ace left-handed tobaccy, I failed to laugh even once.Mindless, infantile, plotless, talentless, stupid, the list goes on and on.  Hell, there isn't even any good nudity in it.  Colossal waste of time
Having seen every one of these i can tell you, DO NOT BUY THIS!!. After Dark's "Horrorfest" as they titled it was only a horror fest because almost every movie in this set was not at all what you were promised.There really is no "Too Shocking for general audiences"!The shock actually comes from the fact that most of these lackluster movies actually made it on to the silver screen.After Dark is Lion's Gate's red headed stepchild, it took a hell of a blow releasing these, Lion's gate saw opportunity to make money, it marketed these films completely under false pretense and cashed in while audience members we're left unhappy and ripped off.the only good ones with any decent content we're The Gravedancers, and Reincarnation, every other one with the exception of the Abandoned (which i saw twice) was a true borefest.Penney Dreadful being number one as far as bad filmmaking goes.i truly do i hope people listen, but for those that don't after you're done, write your own review.
not much for laughs and even less for plot. Wedding Crashers is the kinda film alot of people will love because it is stupid but alot of others like myself, won't enjoy. two womanizers fall in love, one because he finds out that his gf is not actually a virgin, like first off, what does virginity have to do with love? & second, who would actually believe that she was telling the truth when she said that she was a virgin? & then Owen Wilson's character fall in love with Rachel's McAdams character and well, that's the usual predictable romance plot. the problem with this film is it's not that funny. it seems to think it's better then it is. I don't think I hardly laughed during this film. the part about the "supposive" gay guy like people think he is gay so therefore of course, because it's this kind of film, he ends up being gay and of course, he tries to hit on Vince Vaughn's character in a scene that is beyond creepy. lets just say that "gay" guy is prob one of the worst actors I've seen. & then we get a cameo from Will Ferrell, alot of people I know find this guy "so" funny. but I don't get it. it just wasn't funny to me. u know, I loved the classic, "American Pie" that was just stupid for its own good but it delivered the goods to make it a great comedy! this film wasn't so much funny as stupid. & for the most part, I'm not going to remember this film in 5 years from now because it's just an average film
Ridiculous. Dull, dull, dull.If I could have submitted a review and given ZERO stars I would have.Pointless
Totally uninspired, with needlessly shocking scenes. Unlike some other reviewers, I thought the acting was alright, but only just. The story is so full of unlikeable characters, however, that I never really cared if they got caught or got away.There is a lot of nudity and sexuality that was obviously thrown in to pander to the audience. One scene I found to be to be needlessly creepy and disturbing; Kidnapper Madsen and turncoat Tilly have sex in front of her anguished, captive husband, cruelly taunting him while he gruesomely kills himself.This movie can't decide if it is a fast, fun, bubblegum action romp or a brooding allegory for something darker. It finds itself in middle ground that just doesn't work
A Leaden Affair. "Histoire de Marie et Julien" is the most solemn movie I have seen in years. It comes complete with heavy-handed symbolism, characters who are wallowing in existential anomie, and all manner of pretentious ambitions. But worst of all, it is devoid of any shred of humor or wit.What remains? The "mystery" of the tale? Those viewers who find themselves still conscious at the end should have little trouble figuring it out. Rest assured that I take no pleasure in slagging this film; I'd just hate to see anyone waste their time and money on it.
Sorry for the huge and famous cast. This movie comes from John Grisham's novel of the same title. Most of the actions taking place in the novel were also presented in this movie. The spotlight reviews goodly summarize the movie, even when I don't agree with their rankings.The first movie's problem is the character's personalities, less credible many times. One reviewer well said the FBI's personnel looks rather wimpy.  The merciless Coal Fletcher looks like a simple clerk while he is the real president in the novel. On the other hand, the novel's heroine (Darby Shaw) losses her strong personality but at the same time behaves in obnoxious ways. For example, in one scene, she asks her best female friend to spread a gossip in college but Darby does not care whatsoever for her friend's safety as in the novel; Darby even tells her that "it's not good for her (Darby) to stay there". Darby does all the opposite in the novel. Next, her friend does all what she says, this not credible.The second movie's error is the way the show the events. For example, as I said Fletcher is not portrayed as a tough way, there's even an scene where we see his seeing his family's picture at his desk, really charming; however he is still punished in the movie. Any honest person who does not let to be impressed by the reputations of the actors and director should admit that the movie is not always understandable. I watched this movie right when released in 1992 and I didn't understand it but the huge Julia Roberts' success was on its highest so I didn't think much, just considered it was sort of boring. Now, I read the novel, watched the movie again and understood the movie was flawed. In fact, all bad guys in the movie were only small fishes who chased Darby.I also complain that the movie shows some misbehaviour as good ones. For example, in one scene the president asks the FBI chief (Voyles) to stop a crime investigation. Voyles offers to do it in exchange of favours. This is plain corruption yet the movie made it look like a cocktail party! In another scene one character (Callahan) is about to start driving while drunk and Darby only plays a little bit to stop him just to finally let him get on his car.The movie added a few action scenes the novel doesn't have, yet it is quite boring. The novel has less action, yet it is more exciting
Gag me with a spoon!!!. I found this film to be a total waste of otherwise good talent.  It should be rated X.  I didn't know "Johnny" could stoop so low.  It made me want to barf!!
A TOTAL DISGRACE TO THE EC COMICS LEGENDS!. William Gaines must be rolling around in his grave. Shame, shame...AVOID THIS
Come on, These are SUPPOSED to be for Kids !. This film is not fit for children under the age of 16 and it is a pathetic, crying shame.  It is all due to one stupid, needless comment. There is a scene in this movie in which a hit-man basically suggests having sex with Wonder Woman.  I could not believe what my eyes and ears were taking in.  How do you explain this to your 4-year old little girl or boy watching?  Kids always ask questions about what they don't understand.  Where were the editors Warner Brothers????   Why can't these guys making super-hero films just make clean, action-packed, well-scripted material.  For some reason they think they need to add some rough edges, innapropriate behavior or language and they think they are making it cool for older kids and adults?  Is that it?  All they do is alienate thier product from any self-respecting parent with half a brain.  The old Super Friends DVD's are much better
Poorly Written Script with Three Good Leading Ladies. Though too fluffy and light-weight, 'Chasing Papi' is not as awful as some opinions might suggest.  Produced by none other than 20th Century Fox, one of the major Hollywood studios, it has enough budget to create the colorful looks and joyful soundtracks.  Sadly, the film just doesn't know the right way to use three surprisingly refreshing Latina-American actresses, and that's the real problem.Well, but I think the opening chapters are awfully bumpy.  Think about this.  Thomas is dating three women at the same time; a Chicago laywer wearing glasses, a street-smart Miani cocktail waitress, and a rich, sheltered, spoiled daughter in New York.  Normally, this kind of guy cheating women, well-meaning as he thinks he is, is called Romeo, and I suppose most women would despise him, but because this Romeo, or Thomas, is so irresistible, the three women  cannot stop thinking about the possibility that SHE is the only one meant for him.  I wanna ask whoever gave the green light to this project -- are you living in the 21st century?But to be fair, that is only the introduction, and wait a while.  The real point of the film is the ad-hoc coalition to get over the embarrassing situation (like Thomas fainting and an FBI agent watching it!), which eventually develops to the friendship between them through joining in a beauty pagent or dacing on the stage.The film uses up its tricks pretty early on, and funny moments come very sporadically.  In fact, the characters, stories, and gags are all too familiar today, and look exactly dead art, like pie-throwing.  With short running time of 80 minutes, the film still looks padded out, and I didn't talk about the 'dream' sequences (including that of a chihuahua) that have nothing to do with the story.As I said, the three leading ladies Roselyn Sanchez, Sofia Vergara, and Jaci Velasquez do act with gusto, and they did admirable job for their characters always remain likeable.  And I like Roselyn Sanchez, who has curiously attractive charms like Sandra Bullock, and was the only good thing in terrible film 'Boat Trip.'  I just don't understand why Hollywood must keep on wasting them in this awful films again and again.Innocuous, fluffy, but that's not the problem.  The problem is that they could think of only hackneyed ideas to fill the 80 minutes.  And they used as many as four writers.
Only three episodes?. I love the shows, but a favorites DVD with only three episodes?  I couldn't believe it.  The three shows would get 5 stars, but the great ones that are missing bring my review down to 2 stars
boring and outdated. Cinematography is good. Actors are good. But script is boring and outdated. You can barely reach the end of the movie. Don't see it after lunch or you'll fall sleep.
Overall this game SUCKS!. This game is not what it has been hyped up to be. I can't even bother to make it through the first level I found it so stupid. Your character is limited to where they can go, you can't even walk up a slope to get behind the enemy.  The first mounted machine gun I encountered, I could not turn the gun to shoot the enemy behind me.  I stood right in front of the enemy (point blank range)and kept firing yet not one bullet was hitting him.  You can't even kill your own troops; Vetnam and you can't kill your commandor!? Wait a couple years for this game to be ten bucks and then buy it
Hotel Exotica For Her. When Ellen Evans directed this movie she managed to get sex scenes with energy, passion, sensuality, and creativity. Fans of softcore know how rare these things can be. An just how skilled a director has to be to accomplish them. Which make the directors cut of this movie (Which is being sold here) such a mystery. My only guess is that when she was given the chance to reedit this film she wanted a to make a version that she could watch with her 14 year old daughter, or maybe she was trying to get a job at the Hallmark Channel. What ever the reason if you are a fan of the Oxygen Network buy the Directors Cut, if you are fan of softcore get the original version.
Mildly Entertaining. This is another Family friendly movie, that my 3 littlest ones just didn't take to.  About have way through, 2 of the 3 were asking to put on Homeward bound instead.  There was a lot I liked about this movie, but my family voted with their feet and remote control.  They are 6 to 10 years old
A Film for Sandler Fans; Others, Steer Clear. You have to understand: I am not an Adam Sandler fan. I didn't like him on Saturday Night Live. I don't like his stand-up comedy. I didn't like Happy Gilmore. I didn't like Waterboy. I didn't like Mr. Deeds. (Though... I did like the Wedding Singer, but I take that as the exception that proves the rule...) It was to be expected, going in, that I wouldn't like Billy Madison. And, I didn't.But maybe you *are* an Adam Sandler fan, like the friend of mine who convinced me to take this chance on Sandler. If so, you'll probabaly really like this movie (it's his favorite of the Sandler films). I'd say that, if you're a Sandler fan, you can add two stars to my review for a total of four.Sandler is really himself in this film, doing his schtick. For instance, early on he sings a pointless, off-key ode to sunscreen. Sandler fans find that kind of thing funny; I don't. I think that's the barometer for this movie--ask yourself: guy singing about sunscreen, just 'cause. Funny? If so, get this movie.To get into specifics, Billy Madison is about the title character (Sandler), heir to his father's multi-million dollar corporation, who is in danger of losing out on his inheritance because he's uneducated and unmannered and, in general, a big layabout who spends his days sunbathing and drinking (and singing about sunscreen). Billy makes a deal with his dad that the business will go to him if he manages to pass each grade, 1-12, with 2 weeks for each grade. I hope I'm not spoiling too much to say that: Billy wins in the end, gets the girl (a very hot elementary school teacher) and sticks it to the bad guy (an unscrupulous businessman, scheming to "steal" the business away from Billy).I found the plot unrealistic. What the hell does it mean to "pass" 12th grade in 2 weeks... and more than that, Madison starts out unable to spell the word "rock" (his version: "rok"); do we really believe he could turn that around so quickly? I found Sandler's character inconsistent. One second he's a spastic moron, the next he's a relatively decent, sensitive guy, and there's no real reason to believe they're the same person. I found the humor lame--jokes revolve around ugly homosexuals finding Billy attractive and little kids pissing on themselves.None of this will matter to the Sandler fan, but those on the fence might take note.Some positives include two of the supporting cast--Norm McDonald (who needs to work more) and Chris Farley's brief appearance (who is missed). Also, the teacher/love-interest *is* really hot.Sandler Fans: 4 Stars.Everyone Else: 2 Stars
What's This Movie Trying to Say?. How come the arch-villain and the damsel-in-distress are the only Asian speaking roles in this otherwise virtually all-white film?  With so few prominent Asian characters in U.S. media, the message seems to be that white men need to kill Asian men and rescue Asian women.  This would be good on a double bill with Griffith's "Birth of a Nation."If you want to see the "hot princess" (Rachel Shane, a.k.a. Valerie Chow) in a better film -- dancing around in her underwear no less -- check out Wong Kar-Wai's "Chungking Express."
hysterical mother is vindicated (yawn). Jodie Foster is excellent but there is no doubt that the daughter will be found on the plane at the end. The only mystery is in the details. No real suspense. I found the plot to be a little farfetched
Waste of money. This DVD was a waste of money and a waste of time.  It's "unauthorized" by MUSE, so therefore there were no interviews, no live footage, and none of their music was included.  They interviewed people who had never even met the band.  I learned nothing new from watching it.  Don't waste your money
The whole planet lurves this show but I don't get it. $23 for the Chinese version and the English subtitles are mad.   The English subtitles available on American cable television enhance the drama so tape off of cable.  I don't regret this purchase because I think drama sets SHOULD be $25 tops and the camera is so CLEAR on this dvd compared to what is seen on American cable that you can really see how old the teenagers are.  It made for a more enjoyable viewing experience for ME when I didn't really care for it when it was mistier and flawless on cable.So what if there are a lot of matching fat scarves and sweaters in this series?  I don't get the appeal of this show at all.  I thought it was really slow.  My favorite part was a barfing drunk girl in the background of one scene but otherwise I felt my hair turning white watching the characters walk and walk, breath in, breathe out, and ponder ponder.  I think the phenomenon of the show's popularity is a tidge more interesting than the show but it is still boring boring boring.  Just thinking about this show, strips another layer of elasticity from my heart. It's so boring.p.s. This drama got a 20% rating domestically but Sam Soon and Jang Geum scored 50%.  Hahaha
SADLY ONE OF THE WORST FILMS MADE!!!!!!!. GREAT CAST / HORRIBLE SCRIPT / LAUGHABLE PERFORMACES / A WASTE OF TIME , MONEY & FILM / THEY PUT SOO MUCH MAKEUP ON THE VERY BEAUTIFUL CATE BLANCHETT THAT SHE LOOKS LIKE CARNIVAL CLOWN  & THAT IS SAD / DEPP LOOKS LIKE HE WANTS TO KILL SOMEBODY / RICCI PLAYS A RUSSIAN LITTLE ORPHAN ANNIE VIRGIN AND TURTURRO LIP SINGS OPERA AS A HORSE RELIEVES HIMSELF ON THE STAGE / SOUNDS LIKE A COMEDY BUT IT IS NOT / STAY CLEAR OF THIS DISASTER PLEASE
Well, if you are a true Beatle fan.... I have been a Beatles fan since 1964, and I have distinct memories of the band's influence on my young life.  I saw Hard Day's Night, Help!, Yellow Submarine, and Let It Be in the theater when they were first released.  This film has always been the Holy Grail of Beatle fandom.Now that I own it, I can honestly say I understand why it took so long to release it to the public.  That thirty years of isolation, locked up in a vault somewhere in London, only improved its standing in my imagination, not on actual film.  The BBC was right to bury this.  As a film, or television special, it's horrible.But as a fan, I had to have it.  Now, that's all I can say about it; I own it.  When will Let It Be be released
I REMEMBER SEEING AND LIKING THIS MOVIE 30 YEARS AGO. So, I bought it, viewed it and realized that it was THE VILLAIN I saw/liked. This movie isthe personification of why studios shelve movies. A boring mush of wasted star power,illogical , unfocused characterizations, plotting and irritating meaninglessness.Now, to go buy THE VILLAIN and revisit a cynical, black-humored, hopefully funnywestern of the Golden Seventies
See this movie at lest once. ...to see just how bad it is. Unlike it's predecessor Heavy Metal 2k has one single 90 minute story arch talking place in the far future, using both hand drawn animation and very bad CGI, bad even for 2000. The basic plot is that a miner named Tyler (Michael Ironsides) stumbles across a green glowing crystal that is a literal key to the fountain of youth. The only draw back is that the moment he touches it Tyler goes completely bonkers and starts killing a lot of people.The "Key" draws Tyler to a settlement called Eden, full of people who haves traces of the life giving compound in them, giving them a healthy good looking looks, Tyler probtly kills half of the population and kidnaps the rest, a lone survivor of the raid Julie (Julie Strian) begins a blind quest of revenge.Everything that could be bad in any given movie is bad in HM2K, the dialog is terrible, both written and performed, the camera work is terrible, there's no back story to speak of, tere are loop holes that even a baby can see, not even a connection to the first firm with the Loc-Nar, which the key is suppose to be a shard from, except that it's green. Also there are not special features on this DVD!!!!!I don't mind the violence or the nudity, in fact I want to see more of that in western animation, but this movie is just as forgettable as any other movie that Julie Strian stars in.
I hate This Movie it makes me wanna like Part 1!. SUMMARY: Film Students are making a movie called Urban Legends, and when they start working, they all start getting killed off one by one.IN MY OPINION: I HATED THIS MOVIE! This movie rips off alot of horror movies such as Scream 3. This is John Ottman's debut and in my opinion he ruined his career with this peice of junk. I liked the original, I thought it was awesome, but this movie talks about making a horror movie instead of Urban Legends. Oh yeah, I don't mean to spoil it for you guys who are gonna watch it, but this is a movie in a movie which is so stupid. Oh yeah, and Jennifer Morrison sucks in her role, but there is good acting. But either way the movie is not good.OVERALL: I warn you, if your still gonna watch it. Some people do like this movie, and you might too, but if your a horror movie lover, you'd be disapointed with the horrifyingly bad sequel to the B+ original.Sincerly,J
American version ok, da original chinese version much better. This movie was ok, but da dubbing ..., and thanx alot to "Dimension Home Video" they re did da sound effects of da movie and it was capital B "BAD". Trust me, if u wanna get dis movie on VHS or DVD, get da orginal one "My Father Is A Hero", itz in itz original language (since I never saw da original, I think da original language is Cantonese, either dat or Mandarin) and da sound effects have gotta be better. I saw da dubbed version of "Once Apon A Time In China" and compared to da original version (Cantonese) I saw da original is WAY bette
not very good. the big brother documentry part was great the janis live stuff is very poor quality sound and picture buyer beware
Not for this family. Guess I'm in the minority about this, but this PLAY (NOT a MOVIE) left me thinking that I wasted my money.  I enjoyed Madea, she is a great character.  I never seem to care about the rest of the people or their problems. For me the only thing funny about it was when Madea took the stage, the rest of it was simply boring
Also Bad TandA. If you're looking for sexy scenes, and why else would you watch these movies, don't waste your time
MORTAL KOMBAT. I DID NOT RECEIVE THIS MOVIE AND I WAS CHARGE FOR ITI WOULD LOOK TO RECEIVE THE DVDTHANK YOUCAN SOMEONE EMAIL ME WITH THIS INFOrossannemccullough@hotmail.comor call me at 312-404-0267 my name is ROSSANNE MCCULLOUG
really really bad. This movie is so bad. It is just about a annoying valley girl blonde who is rich and has tons of friends and who has no real problems. The only people who like this movie are the ones who wished they were the main character, a pea brained airheaded ditz who has no redeeming qualities. The movie tries hard to invent new "teen speak" with tons of lame catch phrases that unfortunately caught on with some unpopular kids who liked the movie so much, they tried to sound like the shallow empty headed spoiled main characters even though most of the movie's fans live the life nowhere close to cher's and look nothing like her but they want to pretend. The movie hits you with these lame catch phrases every 15 seconds, desprate to beat you over the head with them. In the movie, the main character, Cher thinks she is too good for the boys in her high school but then she ends up with someone who is pratically a relative to her. Nasty! She is really arrogant for someone whose realtionship should be jerry springer. She's supposed to be a posh valley girl but at the end, she's like Ella May Clampet going after Jethro when all her resources for finding a man runs out.
Why oh why?. Let me start by saying the first movie of the series was absolutely fantastic. Regardless of the fact that it didn't stick with a few key plotlines in the book, everyone still did a great job adapting the original Jurassic Park. Then came this piece of trash...Whereas the first movie at least attempted to loosely base itself on the book, this one just takes the brilliant writing of Michael Chrichton and throws it directly out the window.First off, John Hammond is supposed to be dead. He dies at the end of the first novel. Secondly Ian Malcome is supposedly dead, or at least MIA at the end of the first book, and we join him in a costarican hospital in the opening of the 2nd. There is no bratty daughter, and the entire premise has much more to it.MOST IMPORTANTLY... the entire ending in san diego with the T-Rex... which was possibly the worst conceived plot line in the history of movies... did not exist in the book!I went into this movie expecting a tightly woven plot, a huge concentration on the conspiracy of having such an island exist, and the anticipation of some good dino-scenes to top it off.What I ended up getting was the writing equivalent of a monkey at a typewriter drooling on a page. Not only that... but because of the lack of plot, the dino scenes are complete over-kill. When you see so much of it, you lose that awe and wonder of the first film. When you see that Brachiosaur in the first 20 mins of the original film, the wonderment is difficult to rival. There are no such moments in this film.If you're looking for a quick fix for decent looking dino FX, go nuts. However, if you're looking for something more substantial with an actual plotline, flick off the dvd player and pick up the book.Oh and one more thing... don't go NEAR the 3rd movie. They didn't even have a book to be untrue to. I can't imagine how much more long-winded and rambling my review would be for that one
not worth the buy. dont buy it not enough action but rent i
it's okay. i bought this thinking that this would be fun and a decent workout, i tried it a few times but just couldnt get in to it. it go's a bit fast but i know i could get used to it, but they have very big steps and they lung into it and i think it would be better if they work up to it i kept finding myself rewinding it to do the step corretly i dont realy strive for perfection i just want to do it some what right. there are better ones out there than this, but i think i am going to try it again cuz it wasnt so bad that i am going to quit it
WORST VIDEO EVER. I watched the movie DRIVING MRS DASIE with my mother and it had cooler cars than the ones in this movie.  It looked like the drivers stole these cars from the parking lot of the BINGO CLUB or a senior citizens house or something.  I didnt see a single tank of nitrous in the whole thing.  No subwoofers, no cop chases no anything a couple 25 ft long drag races that my mom probably could have one.  This is the worst video ever.  Anyone that gives it more than the worst rating possible only did it because they were either in the movie or because get some of the profit if it sells.  I cant believe I spent any money on this piece of junk.  DO NOT BUY IT, SPEND A COUPLE MORE BUCKS AND GET THE MOVIE MISCHIEF 3000. It has cars in it worth racing and it has police chases and hot frickin chicks.
The Dreamers. Despite the mixed reviews the critics and other viewers may have given this movie, this is really pretty sick stuff, with little or no redeeming social context.  Objectively, sick just isn't erotic, no matter how hard one may try to rationalize to make it so.  Those who think differently really ought to either:  (a) focus a little more; (b) examine their true motives; or (c) get a life
THESE TWO FILMS DESERVE EACH OTHER... I confess to being a big fan of the Coen brothers, which is why I was surprised at my response to "Intolerable Cruelty". With a cast to die for, it has all the makings of a terrific film. Unfortunately, that is about as far as it gets, as the cast cannot undo what has been done by a screenplay that is seriously flawed, due to its inability to decide what type of film it should be. Unfortunately, it looks as if the director could not make up his mind either, producing a film that is neither fish nor fowl.At first, I thought that it would be a screwball type of comedy, with George Clooney in the role that would have gone to Cary Grant in the golden age of filmmaking.  Then, it seems to take another direction altogether, as if it were supposed to be a romantic comedy with a dark side or simply satire gone awry. Who knows? The Coen brothers surely don't. The film lacks a total surety of identity that kills it, despite the stellar cast. It is a flop, pure and simple.The plot line is a fairly basic one. It is  about a slick, greedy and grasping, unscrupulous matrimonial attorney (George Clooney), the kind that gives all lawyers a bad name, and a greedy and grasping gold digging beauty (Catherine Zeta-Jones), who gives all beautiful women a bad name. Their paths cross, and the chase is on. Unfortunately, the viewer does not give a rat's behind about either one of them. There is nothing that would ingratiate them to the viewer, due to the two dimensional, leaden screenplay to nowhere in which laughs are few and far between.If you are a die hard Coen brothers fan, as I am, do yourself a favor and, rather than buy this film, rent it first. You will thank me for this advice, once you have seen this film."Lost in Translation" is a film that both my daughter and I were interested in seeing, given the acclaim that Bill Murray's performance had drawn. Moreover, the film itself had drawn critical acclaim. So, when my daughter was home from college one weekend, we decided to hunker down and watch it together. When we both fell asleep while watching it, we decided that we were just tired. So, we decided to give it another go around the next evening. Well, it was not much better the second time around, though we managed to avoid falling asleep, yet again.Quite frankly, if Sophia Coppola, the writer and director of this film, were not the daughter of legendary director Francis Ford Coppola, I am convinced that this film would have quickly vanished without a trace. In fact, I doubt that it would even have been made. When her acting career fizzled, after making her less than memorable acting debut in her father's film "Godfather III", Sophia Coppola apparently turned her hand to directing and was let loose upon an unsuspecting public.While this film has good production values, it simply meanders along in a loosey-goosey sort of way. If focuses upon two individuals, Americans who find themselves in Tokyo, alienated from their surroundings and, seemingly,  from life in general. One of these individuals is Bob Harris, a film actor on a career downslide, who now finds himself shilling whiskey in Japan for mega bucks, while his movie career is at an impasse. The other is a beautiful twenty-five year old woman, a Yale Graduate with a degree in philosophy, who is in Japan with her husband, a photographer who is working on a shooting assignment.Bob Harris, played with wry bemusement by Bill Murray, is a man who is alienated from his family and, quite frankly, just plain lonely. His is a stark universe, as he seems to have a myopic view on life, seeing little beyond his luxury hotel's bar, where he like to go and drink. Charlotte, played with surprising maturity and flair by eighteen year old Scarlett Johansson, feels bereft and set adrift, as she struggles to keep herself occupied while her husband is ostensibly working. It is these two souls whose worlds collide, coloring their perspectives on life when an unlikely bond forms between them.The film, which takes place in Tokyo, Japan, appears to mock the Japanese. Its stereotypic portrayal of the Japanese people, generally as buffoons, is reprehensible and a cheap joke. Sophia Coppola apparently thinks that the way Japanese people speak English is funny, as it  is a running, unfunny joke through out the film. Since the film takes place in Japan, perhaps it might have been funnier to see Bob (or Charlotte) attempt to speak Japanese, rather than turn Bob into the quintessential ugly American.The film meanders along lacking a definitive narrative and any real profundity of thought. While there is definition about the characters' exterior selves, the film never delves into their inner selves in defining their present state of affairs. There are no big or traditional cinematic moments. Unfortunately, there are no small ones either, as there is really no  introspection by either of the two protagonists.  This is a film that viewers will either love or hate. I fall into the latter category. "Lost in Translation"  is simply lost on me.
CAN'T FIND A GOOD SLEEPING PILL? THAN BUY THIS MOVIE!. Yes, I must admit that I was fooled by the "One of the most notorious, most debated, most banned films of the 'video nasty' era." line on this back of this movie case.  I was lucky because I found this at a Best Buy for $10.99.  It should be $2.99 for as bad as it is.  I've been let down by these Italian Horror Films one too many times.  If you want good, gore filled, Italian Horror stick with Lucio Fulci or Dario Argento.  Once you get past the bad dubbing and acting they're berrible.  Oh, by the way, unless you are fluent in Italian this second disk is almost worthless-there is no opportunity to even have English subtitles.  The only thing good about the second disk is the nudity and strong sexual content and that looks alright in any language
relentlessly stupid and sadistic. thankfully this is a very short movie. still, it's a waste of whatever part of your life it takes to watch it. it almost made this horror fan want to reevaluate their love of horror films. it's that bad. it's not scary, not funny, not sexy. nothing but stupid and sadistic. a total waste of time. and a ripoff of about 10 other bad horror movies. just terrible
What a rediculous pile of poo. You're kidding, right? The only good film in the trilogy is the origonal. How dare you try to continue the story of something that cannot be continued. The orgional was good enough. Leave it there. Just because you want money, don't ruin such wonderfull entertainment.I didn't even stay awake through all of the movie, it was so bad! I'd rather watch Barney with my 2-year-old
Time to Change the Litter Box. In the 80's, after Cats became the phenomenon it became, commercials for newly-opened Broadway musicals would often feature an audience member enthusiastically exclaiming "It's Better than CATS!" Just from watching these commercials, some of which where for Stinkers like QUILTERS, it would appear that anything was better than CATS. This video proves those commercials right. Anything IS better than Cats.What can one say about CATS? Tony Kushner sums it up pretty well when he has a character in his opus ANGELS IN AMERICA proclaim faux-enthusiasticly that "It's about Cats! Singing, Dancing Cats!" That's pretty much all to it. Sure, there's a shoestring plot (a tribe of cats have gathered together to decide which one of them gets to go to Kitty Heaven and get reincarnated. Or something. And somehow it won the Tony award for best Book of a musical), but CATS is one irrelevant song away from a musical review. About a dozen cats get a number about how special they are: This one is a magician, that one works on a train, another is some sort of master Criminal. At random points, they stop to dance irrelevantly and, at one point, have what a friend referrs to as "a cat orgy".  Taken at face value, such an evening couldn't be more than a train wreck.  But CATS somehow draws you into it's world, for better or for worse. In the case of this video, however, it is definitely for worse.CATS may prove magical in a live performance, but this video falls to capture even a shred of whatever attracts the audience to it onstage. The video direction and lighting reduces the magical junkyard set of John Napier into a garish, tacky Vegas spectacular (though some would claim that CATS is little more than that to begin with) and the choreography of Gillian Lynne, highly praised in the original London and Broadway mountings, seems amateurish and ugly onscreen. Without the crucial distractions of good direction and beautiful sets, the glaring flaws  in Andrew Lloyd Weber's score comes hurtling to the forefront of the conscious mind: repetitive, overblown and dull.  I'm not sure who's fault this is: The video Director's, Lynne's, or Lloyd Weber's, but it leaves a black hole in the center of the video.You can do nothing but pity the poor actors involved, some of whom are very good: Michael Gruber dances well, sings well and brings the right gravitas to the tribe leader Munkustrap, Jo Gibb and Drew Varley are an engaging pair of cat burglars (get it?) and Jacob Brent has a fantastic dance turn as the Magical Mr. Mistofelees. Also deserving mention are the duo of Aeva May and Rosemarie Ford, who sexily croon  "Macavity", a jazz duet about a cat who is the "Napoleon of Crime", like nobody's business.  Best of all are two older members of the cast: Elaine Paige as the tragic Grizabella and Sir John Mills as Gus the Theater Cat. The 90-year old Mills charms everyone off the stage and sings (in a beautiful quivery tenor) with an earnestness that brings a tear to your eye, and Paige, the originator of her part, belts out the one listenable song, the famous "Memory" with aplomb.The third senior cast member, Ken Page as the patriarch Deuteronomy, has little to do but sit and look magisterial, which he does well.  But on the other hand, John Partridge shakes his tail as The Rum Tum Tugger (an Elvis spoof) without an inch of sex appeal, and Susan McKenna is cloying and cutesy as the motherly Gumby Cat. Few of the other felines make any impression.However fine CATS  may be onstage (and even that is debatable), this video is a dismal failure, capturing none of the magic and all of the silliness of musical theatre. It's things like this that give musicals a bad name. If I were you, I'd pretend you are a mouse and run far, far, away from these CATS.
Interesting but not instructional. I'm a huge CL fan, and got interested in playing piano in part, because of the great music CL plays.But while the DVD is interesting, it was more style over substance. Not that that is bad, the video's are worth the price. But since CL doesn't really read music, they never show any music, and the teaching is very limited
Maybe I just have no sense of humor. Well, the good part is you gotta love Anna Faris.  She plays the ditz with such sincerity...Great.  But this movie...not funny.  Oh it had a  couple moments but over all, this movie was a total waste of brain tissue
choose this dvd if you want to be discouraged and feel crappy about yourself. I can't believe that other reviewers are calling the moves in this video "easy to master".  I found some of them to be nearly impossible to follow.  The camara barely focuses on her feet as she perfoms intricate latin dance footwork!  I am an athletic twenty-three year old girl who is not a slow learner.  I just excercised with this DVD for the first time and it was really tough!  I didn't get a work out at all because I was scratching my head and rewinding the thing so much.  She doesn't break down the moves at all and it's just so much more confusing than it needs to be.  The dances are cute, but it's frustrating that she doesn't explain the moves.  I hope no one else has to waste their money on this stupid thing
Sorry, Spy Hard is a waste of time. I love Leslie Nielsen, but this movie is not funny. His better movies are Wrongfully Accused and the Naked Gun movies
Had Promise, but Failed to Deliver. I have to agree with the other reviewers. "Legend of the Rangers" looked promising but ultimately didn't deliver.  The sets and effects are excellent and the actinng's not bad. And of course it was great seeing Andreas Katsulas reprise his role as Narn ambassador, now citizen, G'Kar, however these three elements couldn't save the film. The mysterious alien race threatening the Liandra's crew were too much like the Shadows of the series.If you're a die-hard B-5 fan you'll want this film, but if you're looking for an introduction to B-5 go with the season box sets.All-in-all not JMS' best. Which is sad because it had promise
Elizabeth Hurley topless is all this movie has going for it. The only reason why I think this "movie" continues to actually exist is the fact that the luscious & amazingly gorgeous Elizabeth Hurley does topless nudity in the film.Other than that asset, this film is absolutely abysmal.Atrocious acting, hackneyed script, ham fisted direction and terrible lighting.It's not even good in a so-bad-it's-good type of way.Avoid at all costs and just download the Elizabeth Hurley nudity off of the internet
a boring waste of time. there are a bunch of these movies and if you get one the Amazon program will state that customers who bought this movie also bought these others.  Unfortunately they are all the same with 5-6 very long sex scenes with exact matching simulated sex, oral sex, man doing her, her doing him, her sitting in his lap facing away. Never do any of these scenes have the missionary position.  Basically the actors are never face to face.  Is there a new union guideline forbidding to look one another in the face?  Well anyhow they are all long boring so much so that the only way to stay awake is to fast forward them.  And finally, if you want a plot forget it.  The total dialog in this movie and the others is about as much as this review so you can guess how long and drawn out the lousy sex is to fill a 90 min. movie. If you are into silicone and wonder how much can be put into someone.... nothing natural or wholesome her
Read the book instead. Just a note to those who were uncomfortable watching this film with their children; movies have ratings for a reason.  This movie is rated PG-13, which tells you up front that it has content that is considered inappropriate for children.  In this case, it is crude humor.What I don't understand is why they made a movie with a story line aimed at a young audience, and then inclduded content that earned it a rating that recommends that a young audience shouldn't see it
contrived, implausible crime drama. "Four Brothers" is yet another nail in the coffin of John Singleton's increasingly moribund moviemaking career.  The director - who burst upon the scene in 1991 with the vibrant and gritty "Boyz n the Hood" - has here mounted a film so burdened by implausibility and contrivance that it makes one wonder if the once-promising filmmaker will ever be able to get back on track again.  The story, reeking of artificiality, features Mark Wahlberg, Tyrese Gibson, Andre Benjamin and Garrett Hedlund as four troubled young men raised by the same foster mother.  When she is killed in a convenience store robbery, the quartet launches into action, seeking revenge against the perpetrators and becoming slowly convinced, through their investigation in the neighborhood, that the killing might not have been as random in nature as they had been initially led to believe.The main weakness of this film is that it gives us virtually no reason to care about any of the characters.  By not showing us any scenes between the boys and their foster mother (except for one embarrassingly bad Thanksgiving dinner fantasy sequence that looks as if it were conceived by a first-year film student), we are forced to take their relationship totally on faith, rendering the boys' thirst for revenge arbitrary at worst and academic at best.The acting is uniformly flat, with the characters little more than wafer-thin stereotypes, and even the action scenes come across as surprisingly mundane and second-rate given the Singleton pedigree in this area.  The boys' running around from venue to venue in their Detroit neighborhood, brandishing guns in full view of the populace and screaming for information about their mother's killer, is ludicrous on the face of it and often reduces the film to the level of cheap low comedy burlesque.With nary a single moment that rings believable or true, "Four Brothers" is by-the-book filmmaking from a director who has proven that he has the wherewithal and talent to do so much more.
A Charming bit of Camp for a Rainy Afternoon. As a fan of Mme. Austen, Thomas Hardy, D.H. Lawrence and other sundry novelists of manner, I freely admit to a hopeless addiction to "period" pieces -- and romances, in particular -- and this weakness clearly plays into the VERY generous aforementioned 2-star rating.  "Northanger Abbey" is a charming bit of camp for a rainy afternoon, but PLEASE don't expect this movie to be anything like the big-money Hollywood adaptations of Mme. Austen's other works.  The acting is over-the-top; the soundtrack, deplorable; and the characters (with the exception of Eleanor) are completely unsympathetic.  Catherine is portrayed as an insipid half-wit, rather than a day-dreamy post-adolescent on the verge of womanhood.  Peter Firth's Henry Tilney vascilates between compassionate, brotherly concern and annoyingly superior arrogance.  By the end of the movie, I had lost all patience with them and was convinced that Henry & Catherine fully deserve the misery they will inevitably wreak upon each other.  (This from a romance buff!) Most will give up before the end of the film, but true Austen fans will enjoy the parade of costumes, witty repartee, and the opportunity to daydream about the Regency culture.  Watch it or don't -- but if you choose to watch, make sure you do so with a sense of humor and forebearance.
Poor quality, somewhat entertaining. The special effects are very poor. The mixing of horror with humor and a teenage type script just doesn't do it for me. Not recommended
TYPICAL ACTION FILM; 1.5 STARS. AN AIR FORCE PILOT [ICE-T] FAKES HIS OWN DEATH ONLY TO RESURFACE AS THE PARTNER OF A DEADLY LATIN AMERICAN ARMS DEALER [ANDREW DIVOFF]. WHEN A STEALTH GETS STOLEN AND IT'S USED TO TARGET THE MILITARY, IT'S UP TO ONE MAN [COSTAS MANDYLOR] TO STOP HIM BEFORE IT'S TOO LATE. ONE THING THAT CAN'T BE DENIED IS THAT THIS MOVIE IS BORING. THE ACTION IS NOT WORTH WATCHING, THE SCRIPT IS DUMB, AND THE STORY JUST GETS TIRING AFTER A WHILE. ERNIE HUDSON'S ACTING TALENTS ARE ONCE AGAIN WASTED IN ANOTHER LOW-RENT DIRECT-TO-VIDEO FILM. IF YOU LIKE ICE-T AND WANNA SEE ONE OF HIS MORE RECENT FILMS, SAVE YOUR MONEY AND RENT OR BUY ''OUT KOLD''.
Here's A Puzzler: Who's The Most Loathsome Cast Member?. I am being generous in giving this film two stars. I saw a trailer for it, and while it looked intriguing, looks can be deceiving, much like the bulk of this would-be psychological potboiler. I think the photography work and acting deserve a minimum of two stars as both were excellent; the general storyline, however, was drivel.Many reviewers have noted how the film fundamentally makes no sense, and there are parts where I agree wholeheartedly. I don't mind thought-provoking films that leave you wondering what actually happened, but this was mostly in the shallow end from the standpoint of plot construction. It is inconceivable to me how the two female leads (Charlotte Rampling, and Ludivine Sagnier) could tolerate one another; further, it is incomprehensible why Rampling didn't merely leave France when Sagnier started making her life miserable. To believe that Rampling would actually help Sagnier conceal murder is impossible. Yes, I know that the entire character of the daughter is ambiguous by the end, but inasmuch as the character was constructed in Rampling's mind to be a murderess negates charges of cinematic intellectual superiority and holds Rampling's judgment suspect.The entire movie is filled with characters that are excruciating to watch, and the only real reason for a two star rating is that the actors do an outstanding job in their roles. I considered briefly watching the film a second time to make sure I understood all the nuances, but I just hated it too much the first time to give it a second chance. This is one film that looks positively great as a two minute theatrical trailer, but looks positively awful in the light of day as a hulking 103 minute feature.I am very open-minded to unusual, imported, and avant-garde films, but while this movie had touches of all three, I was merely relieved when it was over.
Beware........................................... Worst movie ever the creture on the front cover is not even in the movie you do not see the monster which is a beast until the last 15 minutes...Do not waste your money on this home made movie  Please take my word for it it is that Bad...............The majority of the movie is talking.......
The DVD extras are better than the movie itself. In the DVD extras there are several featurettes about the making of this film. One of the most telling is the one where they talk about the writing of the script with surprising candor. There were over 100 group meetings about the story, all with the Japanese filmmakers and producers arguing for one type of movie and the American filmmakers and producers arguing for another. The result is the watered down The Grudge 2, which neither captures the imagery and suspense that makes Japanese horror genuinely startling and spooky or the plotlines and characters that make American horror easy to relate to and entertaining.The Grudge 2 is a hodge podge of gimmicks taken from the first remake (The Grudge) as well as the original Japanese versions (Juon, Juon: The Grudge, etc.). Although you can still vaguely make out Takashi Shimizu's directorial hand in this film, it doesn't work this time. The reasons are numerous, but mostly it's just a failed hybrid of American and Japanese horror at work, as well as the basic story of a haunted house that curses those who enter beginning to show signs of weakness. There's only so far that story can be extended, and it's reaching its breaking point. (Which doesn't give that much hope for Juon: The Grudge 3, even though it will be made entirely in Japan).The storyline in this film bounces through time and geography far too much to stay coherent, and two of the leads (Amber Tamblyn and Arielle Kebbel) look too much alike for the stories to flash back and forth so much. It's all designed like a Japanese horror film where the plot is secondary to the images, but there is a profound lack of spooky images in this film to make up for the gaping plot holes. Why do the ghosts possess people in Chicago instead of just killing them like they do in Japan?It's all very confusing, and Sarah Michelle Gellar is lucky to get out quickly. Her entire role in this film barely qualifies her for a cameo.Also included on this DVD are three short films made by Toby Wilkins that tie into the whole Grudge story. And by short I mean around two or three minutes each. They each have their own spooky images, but end up feeling a little too much like "Are You Afraid of the Dark?" schlock more than credible short horror films.If you happen to watch this movie, before you take it out of your DVD player in disgust (or plain boredom) be sure to check out the special features with the making of featurettes, because they do manage to shed some light on the issues that went into making this film. And remember: sometimes sequels advance storylines and take the action even farther... and sometimes they're designed just so a big studio can line its pockets with your money. This film falls into the latter of the two categories
Yeah Right. Ok, so I am not a big vampire movie fan, so maybe that had something to do with the fact that I thought this movie sucked. But I am always open minded to all sorts of films, so I thought I would give this one a whirl. It started out with some potential, but within the first 20 minutes I knew it was going to be hopeless. I should have just turned the darned thing off. It was so unrealistic (ok, I know it's a vampire movie, so what did I expect) but I just didn't believe that the main character (Kerr) would have done the things he ended up doing thru out the movie. And then the girl (Izabella Miko) who had about 8 lines in the movie; that was just lame and pointless. She must have felt like such a loser telling people, yeah, I'm in this movie "The Forsaken", and I'm in it almost the entire time...but....ahhh....well just call me zombie girl. Anyways, I highly recommend a pass on this one, unless you are a complete vampire fanatic
IT IS HARD TO GET MUCH LAMER THAN - The Stan "Tookie" Williams Story. This movie is the BIG LIE logic attempting to prove itself again.  Most despotic criminals use a BIG LIE concept to manipulate those in society with the weakest minds a lame too often used mold from which Stan "Tookie" Williams is cut.  This DVD is nothing more than a BIG LIE! that ranks right up there with NAZI BIG LIE era Triumph Of The Will.  Like any monster Tookie spent his life hating the nasty reprobate aspects that defined his hearts core while hurting others to cover up the fact he lacked strength to confront and overcome demons who likely at birth began consuming his black heart.This DVD should be brought so you can look directly into the face of a demon and see how BIG LIES told on a grand scale can most effectively prevert truth beyond recognition infecting minds hearts and souls.Even if Stan Tookie" Williams is just responsible for "Helping Create" the Crips gang that in itself is enough to earn him the one way trip on the needle express in my book.  That he writes a few lame anti-gang kiddie books and played his con-game to perfection on 60 Minutes, "convicing soft headed bleeding heart liberals that he is, redeemed" is of no consequence whatsoever.  Tookie was a heartless murderer of whole neighborhoods.  Tookie by helping create his gang murdered the dreams of countless thousands of innocent children made victims of drive by shootings.  Tookie helped to utterly destroy thousands of urban inner city poor families usually those most ill prepared for the assult he used to lay waste what little they had.Tookie raped minds and whole communities holding each hostage at gun point to his perverted twisted desires and whims and a few good deeds no matter how heartfelt do not de-fang this monster of the first order.  Tookie Williams was nothing more than a domestic terrorist superimposed on a gangsta thug dope dealer's reality.  In the end Tookie Williams got what he deserved a needle ride to Hell's Gate if there is any enternal justice.Buy this Redemption - The Stan "Tookie" Williams Story DVD if you want to see the modern day media formula for exploiting weak minds at work.  I look at Stan Tookie William's and all I see is just another a weak minded pathetic monster who underwent his "caged creep conversion" but in truth the gang of thugs he spawned go on their merry murderous way.When I saw this DVD on Stan "Tookie" Williams he reminded me of Ernst Rohm) (1887-1934), German army officer and Nazi official who founded the SA (Brown Shirts who like the crips were just gangs of common thugs who murdered as much for fun as profit.)  This is a good DVD because Jamie Foxx captured the heart and soul of what it means to be an unrepentant psychopathic, self absorbed social parasite in Redemption - The Stan "Tookie" Williams Story.  If Tookie gets a Nobel Prize I think he should be forced to share it with Ernst Rohm) (1887-1934), German army officer and Nazi official who founded the SA (Brown Shirts) as they were in essentially the same business of neighborhood destruction, child killing, weak mind exploitation and death for fun or profit
Retarded. Robin Williams is Jack, whose physical development happens four times faster than normal. (There are real ageing diseases but I gather none of them remotely resemble this fairy tale.) So here he is aged ten with the mind of a ten year old and the body of, er, Robin Williams. His parents are educating him at home under the tutelage of kind old Bill Cosby. But this leaves him terribly lonesome for the company of other children. So Jack is unhappy. Sad Jack. Seeing this, his parents relent and send him to school where, just as they fear, the kids tell him he is a freak and pick on him. So he is still unhappy. More sad Jack. But then he is picked for a basketball side and next thing we know everyone loves him and he has lots of little friends. Hurray! Happy, smiling Jack. But then, oh dear, he starts comparing himself with the other kids. They will live to be 70 or 80 and he will be lucky to make it to 20. And the whole issue of girls is starting to confuse him. So he has a bit of a breakdown and his parents take him out of school. Oh dear. Real sad Jack. But then they send him back again. Happy Jack. Cut to Graduation Day and Jack, now very old in dog years, has been declared the school's first valetudinarian valedictorian. He's gonna die soon and all his friends are unhappy. Sad Jack's friends. But Jack is not unhappy. Jack is proud. Jack makes a speech about shooting stars being the brightest in the sky. Everybody cries. Mom cries. Dad cries. Bill Cosby cries. Wise Jack. Happy Jack. Awful, awful awful sentimental car wreck of a movie
Pro Immigrant and One Sided. This movie makes an attempt at showing a the plight of illegal immigrants but when you watch it you are only shown a glimpse of the trouble they cause. They cross through ranches, leaving litter, killing animals, provoking ranchers, causing crime and when they have trouble out there the US Taxpayer is expected to foot the bill. I get that these people are trying to find work (not in all instances) but you can't be overly sympathetic because they have a rotten deal - you have to respect the rights of US citizens. If this movie was going to be fair - they would have show a rancher and his family - show the fear, show the costs!!
There is only one reason to watch this event... This was probably the worst Royal Rumble in history. It featured three very bad matches, one decent one, a lousy Royal Rumble and an absolutely amazing match.Brock Lesnar vs. Big Show, Royal Rumble QualifierThis match was absolutely awful. The Big Show is a decent wrestler, but Brock Lesnar is absolutely terrible. A predictable ending made this match all the worse. This match is like watching a tumble weed.The Dudley Boys (C) vs. William Regal and Lance StormThis was a fairly decent match. Regal and Storm are very good wrestlers and in the tag team forum, the Dudleys can hold their own. Its sad though that this was the second best match on the card. Nice surprise ending though.Torrie Wilson vs. Dawn MarieIf you take out the fact that Torrie Wilson and Dawn Marie are very nice to look at, this match is worthless. Unless you are really bored dont even bother watching this.Triple H (C) vs. Scott SteinerTriple H did all he could to save this one, but Steiner really cant wrestle anymore. I remember back in the early 90s where Scott Steiner was one of the best wrestlers in the game. Now he can hardly even move. This match really isnt worth seeing, yet its still better than some of the other matches on the card.Kurt Angle (C) vs. Chris BenoitThere is no way to fairly describe this match. It was outstanding, phenomenal, amazing, incredible, brilliant. These two guys know how to wrestle and they put on a clinic. This match is easily one of the greatest wrestling matches of all time, and shows that you dont need steroids and steel chairs to put on an amazing match. Angle and Benoit are the two best wrestlers in the business and this match is proof.2003 Royal Rumble MatchThis match was decent alright. There werent any really good spots. It was fairly boring all the way through, and highly predictable. It got a little interesting when the final five were in, Rob Van Dam, Kane, Undertaker, Batista and Lesnar. Unfortunately, Lesnar is an awful wrestler and he looked pathetic out there with other talented wrestlers. A guy like Brock should never be in the Royal Rumble. It's sad when the worst wrestler by far in the match wins.Its sad that an event with one of the greatest matches of all time gets only a 2 out of 5 rating, but theres nothing much to watch here other than Benoit/Angle. As I said, the Rumble was poor, the undercard was weak, and several of the matches were downright awful. The Benoit DVD has the Angle/Benoit match. Buy that. This isnt worth your money
Probably the worst Travolta movie ever made. "What was he thinking?" was all I could think while watching this ... This is, without a doubt, John Travolta's worst movie since 1978's Moment by Moment with Lily Tomlin. The script is [weak] and the performances are lackluster. Lisa Kudrow, as in every role she plays, is downright annoying with her ever present snarling lip. Travolta is too talented an actor to waste his time on [stuff]like this. It's more suited to a ...comic like Rob Schneider or Adam Sandler. Director Nora Ephron also loses some credibility for having anything to do with this film. ..
Another pointless Disney midquel. All of Disneys direct to video follow ups are really starting to get tiresome. They are fast cheap ways to profit off the original and have no reason to excist. Tarzan 2 is no exception. The original Tarzan is a Disney classic. A great story of action, love, and trying to find your place in the world. Afterwords came the Legend of Tarzan series. Which featured inferior animation but decent stories. Tarzan 2 does surprise me by being the first direct to video sequel to have animation on par with the original. Breaking a long sucky tradition of sequels with inferior animation. Unfortunitly the story is below the quality of even most of the television episodes. It takes place sometime in the middle of the original sometime during the "Son of Man" song. It involves Tarzan feeling he is a danger to his family and runing away to find out what he is. The story has no strong villian, no real threats, and a cheesy as hell conflict resolution. All the elements of a kids movie that everyone over puberty will have a problem with. A real shame considering the orginal could be enjoyed equally by kids and adults. It has its cute momments and is better then many of Disneys very poor direct to video but thats not saying much going against garbage like The Lion King 1 1/2. The DVD has superb picture and sound. Why Disney denies DTS on the originls but gives it to its inferior sequels I don't know. An Ok little movie for the kids but Tarzan 2 leaves alot to be desired from adult fans of the original
The Only Movie I Ever Fell Asleep At. When The original "The Grudge" Came out. It was a shocking very scary experience at the theater. I was jumping in my seat. I saw the original when I was 16, up to that point it was one of the scariest movies I'd ever seen, and I've loved Horror/Scary movies since I was four years old.I really like Sarah Michelle Gellar. I think she's a great actress and I always like her movies. I was a fan on "Buffy" So, I was excited that she would be in the sequel.To my disappointment she had about 5 minutes of screen time in "The Grudge 2." I was really looking forward to the sequel. But, I was actually shocked at how bad it turned out to be. I really couldn't believe how terrible it was. It was NOTHING like the original "The Grudge" It lost all of it's spark. Not one part of the whole movie was even remotely frightening. NOT ONE PART."The Grudge 2" was the only movie in my entire life where I actually fell asleep in the theater. I never thought the day would come where I would fall asleep in the theater. It was that boring and uninteresting. Unfortunately, I didn't fall asleep for very long. I really tried to like this movie. I wanted to like this movie. But, I just couldn't. There were so many different ways they could have taken the sequel. But, they turned into something that could have gone straight to video.The Japanese Version of the sequel was much better than this. If you must see it, rent it.
Now I know why I didn't watch this when it came out in theaters 20 years ago. 1987. One of the worst years for movies. There were a string of losers that came out what seemed like all at once. There was the remake of "Wanted: Dead Or Alive", "Stakeout", "Adventures In Babysitting", and then this one. These were all losers because they had a shallow plot, a lack of talented actors/actresses, and no moral fiber to them whatsoever. With "Wanted" every 2 seconds there was swearing, "Stakeout" was just plain stupid, "Adventures In Babysitting" showed me that the young were starting to yell back at authority, and this one what people will do to be noticed and accepted in the popular group. I just feel that the world has come to this, and it wants to go even further until there are absolutely no moral absolutes. I witnessed this in my late teens early 20's, and now as I'm pushing 40, and have a child of my own I look back on this, and want to grab him, and run to hide. I know my outlook on life has been altered a bit....maybe a little anyway, but I have to still deal with what my son learns out in the world, and if it's not of strong moral fiber then it must be rid of; this goes for me too. It's still terrible after almost 20 years.
What has happened to the once great Seagal..... The movie begins with a short opening pre-credits action set piece which had nothing to do with the actual film in any way followed by one very short but well staged aikido fight very early on within the first hour and that's about all the action there is until the last 20 minutes which is full on action when we get another aikido fight similar to the end of The Glimmer Man and a long sword fight battle as Seagal takes down the Yakuza gang. For an hour of Into The Sun we watch Seagal drive around Tokyo talking to various people he has known over the years and that's really all there is to this until the last 20 minutes. Seagal again has a hand in writing this and the script is just bad and really takes away from the enjoyment of watching the movie. What is with Seagal bedding very very! young Asian girls in all his movies lately.He is doubled in about 80 percent of all external shots of his character walking to locations and entering buildings.  I don't mind Seagal doing movies that are more thrillers than action movies now that he is getting on in years and I'd even welcome the change if they were written with believability, simple plots and good production values and some well staged action set pieces, be it gun play or martial arts. I'm more disappointed  with Into The Sun because I really wanted to enjoy it and thought it looked like the one to help Seagal get back to mainstream directors who know what they are doing behind a camera. I bought this without renting it first based on reviews posted here obviously by blinded fanatical fans of Seagal who can not seem to be objective regarding the quality of Seagals movie releases. I will not make the same mistake again as I also did with Ticker. Rent before you buy........
Victory at Sea. The History channel should be ashamed of this effort.  I have seen the PBS broadcasts and indeed the original broadcasts on NBC in the 50"s  All were quality B&W films.This DVD has, aside from the audio problems mentioned in other reviews,  has muddy, low contrast, all gray images commensurate with 10th generation dubs. Viewing and listening are an unpleasant experience
Beware........................................... Worst movie ever the creture on the front cover is not even in the movie you do not see the monster which is a beast until the last 15 minutes...Do not waste your money on this home made movie  Please take my word for it it is that Bad...............The majority of the movie is talking.......
Just Say No. This movie is no "Heathers."  It's not even "Mean Girls."  As hard as it tried to be witty, shocking, dark, and satirical, it just made me want to bang my head against a wall to make the pain of watching it stop.  Maybe I'm just too old for this drivel -- although I could watch "Clueless" and "The Craft" until my DVD player breaks -- but whatever entertainment value this movie was trying to push, I just didn't get it.  The movie wasn't funny (which is sad to say when one of my favorite comedic actresses, Carol Kane, couldn't even elicit a smile out of me), the plot was full of holes, and the writing seemed very rushed and contrived.  I wasn't expecting greatness when I watched Jawbreakers, but I was at least hoping for 1 1/2 hours of mindless entertainment.  Unfortunately, the "entertainment" piece was dropped and I was just left with "mindless.
The Dead Zone (TV Pilot). While I loved the DVD, it's not worth the money if you are planning on buying the complete first season.  I bought the first season DVD after taping every episode from the TV.  The TV Pilot makes it sound like it was not aired on TV.  It was and I had it on a VHS tape (I threw them away when I bought the DVD's).  If you buy the complete first season, the episode is listed as "Wheel Of Fortune".  ..
Dean Cain completely ruins this movie. Some scientists in an underground lab are experimenting with DNA and create a dragon which gets loose and stalks them around the facility.  The setting is appropriately claustrophobic and the sets are done quite well.  The CGI dragon looks passable, not great but believable enough I guess.  The characters are all pretty good - EXCEPT Dean Cain.  He's the security guard, and he's a pompous, self-righteous prick.  His knowledge of childhood fairy tales makes him more knowledgeable about dragons than all the scientists put together.  He single handedly makes this movie absolutely unwatchable.  That's too bad because without him, I think this might have been pretty good.  Well, if not for the fact that the idiot director has a fetish for that split screen effect where they show four different scenes running simultaneously in the four different quadrants of the screen.  Even that would have only been a one star deduction from what could have been a four star movie, but Dean ruins the whole thing.Recommendation:  Skip it
HOLLOW INDEED. Waiting six years to do a sequel to the more engrossing original, this followup doesn't really seem necessary.  Confusing plot developments, standard effects and mediocre acting combine for a rather tedious thriller.  Christian Slater is going to become the next Stephen Baldwin with his laconic, devil may care and lifeless acting.  Peter Facinelli and Laura Regan try a little harder, but they're swamped in the script's ineptitude.  Maybe it'll be nice to say we haven't seen Christian Slater for a while
Horrid... This is going to sound like an exaggeration...but this is one of the worst movies I have ever seen.I will admit that I didn't have high hopes for this film.  I mean, it didn't come out in theaters (at least in the U.S.), which is never a good sign, no movie store seems to have it in stock, and I read some pretty crippling reviews right here on good ol' Amazon.  But hey, I gave it a shot.  Boy, was that a mistake...First of all, here's a quick synopsis: Years ago, King Hrothgar (Stellan Skarsgard) killed a troll, but took pity on the troll's son, Grendel (Ingvar Eggert Sigurosson), and left him alone.  Grendel, now full-grown, is seeking revenge on Hrothgar's kingdom.  Hearing of Hrothgar's plight, the fierce warrior Beowulf (Gerard Butler) comes to help the king kill Grendel.  Along the way Beowulf meets a witch/prostitute named Selma (Sarah Polley) and discovers that trolls have feelings too.Now, we all know that Stellan Skarsgard and Gerard Butler are great actors, but in this movie they fumble with a halting and painfully corny script.  The script affects the acting, and the acting affects the film.Secondly, though Sarah Polley is a lovely actress, she seems very misplaced in this film.  She's the ONLY character with an American accent and, in an age-old Anglo-Saxon myth, this is very, very out of place.  In addition, the small amount of weight that Gerard Butler has put on around the stomach area draws a little from his role as an unstoppable, highly-trained warrior.The battle scenes are unnecessarily gory, with fake-looking and very blood-soaked limbs flying left and right.  They seem primitive compared to the battle scenes of other films.  The scene in which Beowulf fights Grendel's mother is especially bad - there's lots of shrieking and strobe-light-esque movements that seem almost comical in this day and age.The only things that can be said in this movie's defense are that the sweeping Iceland landscapes are breathtaking and the Celtic monk (Eddie Marsan) is mildly-amusing in his efforts to convert everyone.1-star...please don't waste 103 minutes of your life on this film
Good Movie Deserves Better DVD Treatment... (Widescreen/Extras). I wholeheartedly agree with the others who stated that this DVD is less than adequate treatment for this good, fun film.  The picture and sound quality is good here but it is pan/scan instead of widescreen and has NO extras at all.   This film has enough "grown-up" appeal to warrant at least a nice "making of" featurette, some deleted scenes, commentary, etc. and especially a widescreen transfer.I bought this thinking it would at least be in its Original Aspect Ratio, but this disc is a result of Disney Home Video thinking anything with a "family" appeal HAS to be full TV frame pan/scan.  Of course the movie is short enough for them to have included both WS and FF versions on the same disc, but no, they haven't.The film itself is good silly fun and very nice to look at, for it's scenery, animal characters, and especially it's lovable buff lead.  There are lots of fun inside (adult) jokes, including one subtle music gag that plays briefly as Ursula goes to get our Hero off the Golden Gate Bridge.  For those who "get" that joke it's a hoot.Disney really needs to re-do this one as a Widescreen edition with some decent extras soon
ok, i'll admit it -- it WAS fun watching charlton heston drown ... the least of the big 3 of disaster movies (the others being "poseidon adventure" and "towering inferno") that hit across movie screens in the mid 1970s.  the sensurround gimmick obviously doesnt work when seen on tv, the screenplay and acting are pedestrian, and the special effects now look a cut above flash gordon serials.
Did we see the same movie??. Okay, the script is not the most imaginative I've ever seen, but I like the actors (especially Ben's best man) so I was friendly with this movie for the most part.  I didn't even mind the obvious holes in the plot, such as...why do these characters not have credit cards or cell phones? Or at least, why don't they use them?  Oh no, much more plausible that Ben will have to strip dance in a gay bar for $150 to buy a car to drive to NC.  I didn't even mind the fact that the whole "We're married and my husband's a doctor." charade was so predictable. Oh Gee, he's pretending to be a doctor and he's on a tour bus with a bunch of elderly people. D'ya think someone might have a heart attack and "Dr. Holmes" might have to step up?  And uh, they're pretending to be married and Oh! surprise there's the best man and maid of honor! D'ya think they're gonna get busted?What killed it for me was that ridiculous ending.  It was obviously supposed to be a surprise (and it was) but there seemed to be no other reason for it than to pull a fast one on the audience.  I felt cheated. I spent the entire movie getting emotionally involved with the relationship between Sarah and Ben, and I really cared about how they would handle things with the fiance and Sarah's little boy and all that.  I cheerfully became disengaged from the relationship between Ben and Bridget, I totally believed neither one of them was ready to get married or right for each other.  The film spent an inordinate amount of time showing me they're not right for each other and that this wedding was not meant to happen.  RIGHT UP TO THE LAST MOMENT, we think he's breaking it off with Bridget. Instead, what the heck let's just go ahead and get married after all.Huh?  He left Sarah sitting out there waiting for him in a HURRICANE!!! after making her promise that she would still be there when he got back.  This man obviously doesn't have a clue what he wants in life, and I'm expected to believe they lived happily ever after?Not only that, but what does it teach us about taking this commitment seriously?  It teaches us that if our instinct is telling us "don't do it!" and our genitals are yearning for someone else and even Mother Nature seems to be working hard to prevent this marriage, aw heck go on ahead and do it anyway.  It's just marriage. It's romantic! You could get lucky and live happily ever after!It's been my experience, when things aren't feeling just right as you approach that wedding, turn and run. The last thing you should do is close your eyes, grab your balls and take the leap
Not what I had In Mind........... Let's get one thing straight. I loved bionicle legos and when i first heard of this movie, i was hyped up to buy it. but when i saw it, i was really disappointed. let's see how this movie is:VOICESthe voices are really cheesy. They don't fit the bionicles at all. I'd rather have no voices than any!PLOTOkay, they totally missed out on the original bionicles. They only focussed on the second bionicle design which is Ugly!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!THE MUSICI have not much to say, but this music was............................... freaky.OVERALLthis movie would of gotten a one star if the plot was bad nothing relating to the stories in the magazines or website. However, the plot was okay following a bit at the comics and websites. so this somewhat a "ok" movie. just be warned
Dreadful!!!!!!. This DVD is dated, and lacks the eroticism and/or nudity you would expect in a women prison movie.  I bought the "Unrated" version, but I wonder what that rating was based on.  I have bought several "R" rated movies in the women prison genre that were rather hot, but compared to this 1969 rubbish they were volcanic.  I was sincerely disapointed, and wished I had read some of the reviews prior to purchasing this dreadful movie
Boring and Easy. I was disappointed with this DVD considering the title and how good Jeri Love looks.  It would be  good for beginners to weightlifting, but as an experienced weightlifter who is trying to build an at home routine, the DVD is really easy.  Just to give an example, I think the routine includes maybe 8 push ups and 12 lunges on each leg. The DVD is well intentioned, but Jeri Love lacks enthusiasm, giving a few weird winks and smiles once in awhile.  Oh, and even as a fan of techno music, the background beats in this video are really dull, bordering on annoying
Worst film i have EVER seen in my whole life. January Man is a film is a must see if you need to to update your film evaluation measurement scale. It is the absolute worst. You can then use it as a benchmark to reconsider other bad movies you may have seen.As I assume many others, I was attracted to the purchase based on the superstar cast. If one were to read the fine print, however, you could get a hint that something is wrong when you see that the film lasts 1 1/2 hours only. Unfortunately I did not read the fine print.This film is so absurd and bad that you truely need to wonder about the people who have posted the other reviews. Probably friends and family of the filmamaker
boring. didn't get into it; nothing engaging here; movie didn't make me interested at all; characters boring; turned it off after 30 minute
Slick--not much else. Think of this as the touring company of the original production, and they just happened to have a camera on-hand.  Elizabeth Taylor catches some of the outlines of Uta Hagen's original performance, but only crudely, and without the sense of a desperate, vulnerable creature beneath all of the crude bluster.  And just gaining weight and donning a fright wig do not a performance make.  As George, Richard Burton bring a more serious talent to bear on the character, but he seems to share playwright Edward Albee's illusion that George is a sensitive, superior creature telling necessary truths, instead of a vicious weakling who strikes at other's vulnerabilities as a way to stifle his feelings of self-loathing and failure.  As Nick, a smart fellow who may actually has something of value beneath his empty charm and predatory nature, George Segal is pleasant but suggests none of the intellect that would make him a college professor or the coldness that would make him the user that the script insists he is.  Worst of all is Sandy Dennis as Honey.  Melinda Dillon's peformance in the original Brodaway production was a small miracle, as a woman of substance emerges from beneath a soft and giggly exterior.  Dennis just plays the surface, and plays it badly; shrieking and blubbering and generally getting on your nerves.  You would never know from this performance that she was in fact a charming and gifted actress in films far less competent than this one.The competence was guaranteed by Mike Nichols, who had made a name for himself as both a performer of original comedy with Elaine May and as a skillful director of other's comedies, from an off-Broadway production of THE KNACK (where he first worked with George Segal, who played the lady-killer Tolan) to the early plays of Neil Simon.  His directorial debut shows that he had a good grasp of cinematic technique and vocabulary, but also that he had a tendency to use it glibly; the film is full of visual echoes of more serious directors, but recycled as shock tactics and quick grabs for stylishness.  This glibness infects Haskell Wexler's photography, which goes for pockmarks on actor's faces and flashy lighting effects.  The script, by Ernest Lehman, is mostly a matter or rearranging a few scenes to allow for exteriors and blue-pencilling a few of the rawer profanities in the Edward Albee original.  What's lacking is the sense in the original that something profound is happening before our eyes--that sense may have been illusory, but as the original-cast recording on Caedmon Records (now out of print, alas) makes clear, the right production was full of it.  This smooth, compromised film never achieves a whisper of i
I really, really dislike this DVD. well I guess I'm the odd one out as I really, really dislike this DVD. I love aerobics. in my search to find an aerobics DVD I bought "Moving Through Menopause" based on the other reviews on this site.my complaints settle around the aerobics part of this DVD, but that is what I bought it for. the workout starts at a ridiculously fast speed with no actual warm up. the choreography is horrible! it manages to be boring, while at the same time having you jump around like a jackrabbit on crack. several times through the work out, when it's mentioned that a lower level of activity can be followed, the shot pans the woman doing the highest level. the rhythm and enjoyment of motivating yet fluid moves which I look to aerobics for is fairly absent in this workout. the focus on balance during the cool down is interesting and of worth. but that's the only thing I have to praise about the aerobics section of this DVD.the presentation is flat. a workout DVD may not need to be a fashion show, but there should be some spark. after all, if it's any good the consumer will be doing it hundreds of times during their ownership of it. nothing in this presentation had that kind of spark. the most menopausal thing in this DVD is the women's attire. which may be a small thing, but combined with the rest is worth mentioning.I gave this DVD a solid try. I've done the aerobics workout several times in the last 6 months and just keep deepening my dislike for it.
Rather buy beer. I should have noted the previous review, which stated that you should not waste your money
Boring and quite uneven. The three stories are quite uneven, being the Wan Kar Wai's segment the most interesting: well acted, well photographed and with a kind of catchy story line. However, the other too are a wonderful invitation to sleep. The Steven Soderbergh tale is awfully dull and nothing really interesting happens. The Antonioni piece is the most disappointing one, not only for being the worst but for being Anyonioni's. It's absolutely pointless and confusing; in many instances, it seems to be an amateurish test from a lazy cinema student. It's a pity it's Antonioni's since his reputation deserves more than this. Only for the Wan Kar Wai piece, I give this movie 2 stars
Repeat & Rerun - Boring!. This was a total waste of money.  The "Aloha" set was great, but this one was a major disappointment.  One entire DVD was nothing but re-takes and out-takes, the same thing over and over.  It could have all been scaled down on one DVD and been much more interesting.  We are big Elvis fans, just went to Graceland on our anniversary.  Elvis was a great entertainer and this is an insult to his fans for paying so much money to be bored!  Elvis was never boring!!!  This was marketed to get you to buy it, DON'T!  Save your money
Van Helsing against the Cartoon People. Somehow they managed to get beautiful fresh-faced Kate Beckinsdale and lather enough make-up on her to make her a candidate for Madame Tussaud's wax museum. A bit to aggressive with the hair curling thingie didn't help either. No lead had enough "quiet" time in which to establish a character...they had the depth of Playstation 3 people. All the CG monster's just moved too fast. The thing that bothered me the most...1/3 of the film occurs in "dark-o-vision"...it's so dark you can barely discern what is happening. Combine that with the hyper active fight scenes and rapid fire editing...and whole scenes occur that don't involve us simply cause we are confused on what is going on. I would think there could be some frightining scenes, maybe some tension and dread, heck it's got the grand trio of monsters...nope, not here. We've seen enough how movies are made specials that we are bored by CG cartoons. The "face in the sky" ending was embarressing.
I saw this with a Holocaust survivor. We enjoyed the early parts of the film because of the humor, but my friend, a survivor of Auschwitz Birkenau and a forced labor camp, was finally outraged by this treatment of the Holocaust, as was I. A child in Auschwitz would have been gassed to death immediately so there would be no chance to make a game of the camp experience! My friend would have been gassed to death, because he later found out they gassed all kids under the age of 18 soon after he left for a labor camp. Watch Divided We Fall instead! Or for a very good depiction of life in the camps, watch Fateless or The Grey Zone
The Brat Pack and those enormous granny panties. This was the movie that gave us The Brat Pack, a staple of a certain 80s cultural set.  The term Brat Pack was derived from an article writen by a journalist out one night with most of the men starring in St. Elmo's Fire on a boozy night of partying.  Since then the gals in the movie as well as a few others who weren't in the movie (Anthony Michael Hall, for example) suffered a bit of a ripple effect.  Here we will see all of them at their prime and at their peak of heart throb success on every teenage girl's bedroom wall.Out of all the dramedies of the John Hughes movies, this was the one I liked the least.  Maybe it was the fact that all the characters were so vain and self centered.  Maybe it was the fact that it was all so idealized seeing all of them trying to adjust to their lives after graduating college.  It was trying to be the next generation "Graduate" movie, and I didn't relate when my time came.  Maybe it had to do with the fact that I have been let down by many people and didn't have that network of friends in similar situations, and the isolation I felt during that first year adjusting to the outside world having left the nest of academia.  I guess I was just a little more bitter.  Plus, as my life was surrounded by work and little else, I didn't have all the dramas going on they did.That was kind of sad, the one scene where Rob Lowe goes back to his old frat house and they tell him they need someone like him to couch their team.  It proves you really can't go home again and there are some clinging to the past.  Not to mention embarrassing with that one gal who has managed to hold onto her virginity for so long and in one of the attempts to releive her of it Rob Lowe finds those enormous granny panties.This caputed more of a time in fashion and music than it did a mindset.  It's not a bad story, but the vain and self centered antics of the main characters left me cold.
The Aweful. The only reaosn this show gets more than one star is because at the very least you can see that money is spent on it. the presentation is solid.however,if i wanted to watch (let alone buy) a series which is centered around a bunch of wanking rich kids i would walk around at the highschool i graduated from 7 years ago.its all the same uninteresting [...] that people escape come graduation time senior year.ive listened to scattered episodes from several seasons as background noise after whatever i was watching before it, but the show itself is aweful.like i said, a bunch of rich kids with nothing to gripe about, griping about nothing. bottom line: [...] happens. you either get passed it, or you dont.maybe my take on it is skewed by living (born and raised) in santa barbara CA which is about 2 hours north of the (real) OC, but is riddled with the same kinds of rich-kid problems.i would rather kill my time watching grass grow than sit down and actually watch this kind of dribble.do yourself a favor: read a book rather than buying the DVDs of the O
Why do scholars have to be so boring??. I acquired this video to interest my students in Dickens as I was about to assign reading.  BIG MISTAKE.  This video, while informative (hence the 2 stars), is dry an an old stick. If you use it, use it in small doses--interject your own anecdotes between small stretches of the video. That'll teach me not to preview a tape before I show it.
It is really Yoga?. People will say it is.  The only similarity I see is the end corpse pose. For the physical part, I would say it is quite primitive compared with other yoga. Moves include: spin your upper body around your spine, kick your leg across your body, some Konfu style punch, every move repeats forever.. It might be the origin of all other Yoga, but other Yoga has already evolved to much higher level.  My dad's own choregraphed exercise is better than this.  Frankly I can not find any thing special from this DVD
there is something wrong with you if you enjoy this!. This is a horrible movie with no redeeming value. I realize that such a knock will actually drive people to purchase this. Let me bring something to you attention.This is a slasher movie with effective gore. In fact, for the time, the gore was more sick that similar movies. However, there are no scares, no suspense, no clever script, no story and it has a stupic ending. I know, that applies to most gore movies!The problem with this movie is that it is overly mean spirited towards women (I am a man, a 6 foot 235 pound big strong guy that also raises a family).The story, which has a guy killing women b/c of mistreatment from his mother, seems like it was written and directed by a person that shares the same demons as the killer of the film.The murders in this movie are so mean-spirited (yet with no cinematic value) that a normal movie goer would have to be offended. This movie is not sick in a "good" movie way but rather sick in an ashamed manner.This is a woman-bashing movie that should make any viewer feel guilty that they are patronizing this garbage. A movie should have an entertainment value. There is no cinematic, artistic touch on this film.This is simply a mean, mean movie!
What were they thinking?. What the heck were they thinking when they made this movie? Were they trying to make a horror movie, a comedy movie, or an action movie? I couldn't tell, because it failed in every single one of those categories, and more. Even worse was the casting...I mean, sweet, lovely Eldin from 'Murphy Brown' as Count Dracula? And Mr Wick from 'Drew Carey' as an evil vampire? And Kim Catrall as a...actually, I don't know what she was, or where her accent was supposed to be from. Every accent in this was laughably bad, as bad as the acting, if you could call it acting. And the plotline was so illogical...I mean, allegedly the Count wanted to kill off a vampire girl because her killing spree was drawing attention to the existence of the other vampires. But then, the other vampires went around biting and abducting and killing people whenever they went, so how were they any better?This movie was awful. I think it was made simply for the sake of getting to see lots of people with their clothes off and women kissing one another. I don't usually have a problem with seeing either of those things in a movie, but in this instance I feel that there should have been more to the movie than just that...like a believable plot, for instance, or acting, or suspense, or something, anything, your average moviegoer would find interesting.The worst thing about this movie (and boy was it hard, in a movie this bad, to find a thing I hated more than everything else) was that many of the vampires had tans. And not only did they have tans, but they had tan lines where they'd obviously been wearing swimsuits while tanning out in THE SUN. Five bucks worth of fake tan probably could have fixed that little glitch and hid the tan lines. But no one involved this movie was cluey enough to think of it. That, or they realised the movie was crud and just didn't care. I got the feeling everyone involved in this was just there to get their paycheck.By the way, don't be fooled by the credit at the beginning of the movie that reads: 'music by Danny Elfman'. I think he does about one song in the whole movie, tops, and that was probably only because this movie was Richard Elfman's project (my guess is that they're related, and Danny did it as a favour, probably because he felt sorry for poor untalented Richard.)My advice is to avoid this movie. There are better skinflicks than this that you could be watching.If you want to see a GOOD, funny movie with the talented Natasha Lyonne kissing a girl in it, get hold of 'But I'm A Cheerleader'
Certainly not stronger than Steele. I Netflixed this and was surprised at the results. Cybil Sheppard was likable, but Bruce Willis, the one for whom I thought I'd like the show FOR is abrasive (not "fun" abrasive) and generally hammy. I could not like the show because I could NOT like his character. Worse still, the chemistry between the two is simply cold and awkward. Totally lacking the spirit and warmth of Remington Steele and Miss Laura Holt. The humor is grating and sometimes embarrassing.For some reason certain shows just seem stuck in the time period they arrived in and Moonlighting is by far one of the, uh, stuckiest. The sound cues feel like they were yanked from Terminator One (not a good thing).There is a brief interview section on Disc One where they brazingly put down other shows of the time period and gloat on how they created something "different." If cold, dated, and impersonal is "different" than I guess they did. I would wager many here who give this 5 stars viewed it in its original time frame and have been fans all along, though I must say looking at this from the outside, it is quite honestly, a train-wreck. I have a feeling the show "could" get better but I won't be around to reset the tracks
Northanger Abbey video review. This is one of the weirdest video adapatations of a novel I've ever seen.  The novel was an early work by Jane Austen (published posthumously) so it's not as well crafted as later works.  Despite the novel's weaknesses, however, even this video production does not do it justice.  The heroine looks like she's on heroin, Maj. Tinley (played by the same guy who played the older doctor in "All Creatures Great and Small") is positively creepy, his son, Henry Tilney, smirks instead of smiles, the Thorpe sister is just plain ugly (I should say she's just plain plain) and the Tilney sister is a stiff.  I can't remember whether other videos of this novel were available and this is the one I chose or whether there was no other choice.  The only value the video had for me was it helped establish who the characters were and their relationships--before I read the book.  As they say, "the book was better," and in this case, the old saying couldn't be more true
Yuck; they should have left well enough alone. I was eager to see this movie, having loved the original "American Werewolf" movie; but was sadly disappointed.  I didn't care at all for the characters, the humor was missing completely and generally it stank up the screen.  Mark me off if you don't agree - I know you rude lot will anyway - but that's my story and I'm sticking to it
Not really a sequel, and simple answer, ask for her news first., BAD MOVIE. I was semi-excited to see this coming out today, now, I don't know what to say but...SAVE YOUR MONEY.   This isn't even really a sequel, its almost a B-run rip off of the first...but it even discraces B-movies.  Yes, the guy can shift outcomes by warping through time using pictures..but that is the only thing this film has in common with the first. The movie is simple enough, he goes back to save his friends from death from the car accident they had as they were going back to town for the main character to get to work.  Now, easy enough fix to this, warp back in time to the picture she took at the park, decide to stay, movie over,sorry it was so short.  No, they tried to make a story from it.  He warps back using the other picture from the car, now what was wrong with that story line, he gets greedy.  Then he warps back using a christmas photo...and it gets worse for him, no woman and in with a mafia guy who kills his friend.  Now, he finally decides to use the picture from the park, and he manages to mess this up.  All he had to do is say he will stay all day, and then he should ask her news first.  But no, he dumps her, says nothing until it's to late again, and then he ends up sacrificing himself to save her...who goes on to have their baby....and they even left a sliver of a chance for sequel for this junk to top it all off.Summed up, movie could have been over in 5 minutes, lets drag it to 92.  Even when they tired to keep you intriged by "hinting" at a lost pregnancy, they telegraphed it from the begining by her "wanting to share news", which is usually in a movie Pregnancy news, and then even after the first warp her laying it for him as saying "we both know what we lost with the accident" and it sailing by this idiots face.   Just honestly, SAVE YOUR MONEY, or rent it if you just can't resist seeing a bad movie. Or as one other reviewer stated, con a friend into renting it for you, although i think you may loose that friend after they realize what they rented.
Bronson is suave, but what happened to J. Lee?. Not a great film by any means, but mildly diverting. However, all credibility is lost in one key scene.J. Lee Thompson, director of GUNS OF NAVARONE and the original CAPE FEAR is amazing example of a man whose considerble skills deteriorated over time. This one is OK, but he degernerated even further in his later collaborations with Bronson.The film lost it for me during a scene where the assorted characters are making an exchange of goods in a drive-in movie. The marquee says something like "Western Double Feature" and if you look at the screen, it's the same 20 second loop of a cattle stampede.So the other moviegoers drove in not knowing the names of the movies they were seeing and were staring at the same 20 seconds of film run over and over again.I know from fond memories that drive-ins were make-out hangouts back in the day and we didn't always focus on the movie, but this is ridiculous
Great Content but Lousy Packaging. I learn much more from watching the two great masters in TV than reading their cook books. I was really looking forward to receive these 4-disc DVDs.  Unfortunately when the package arrived, two of the discs were not secured inside the box and there were deep scratches on the surface of the discs.  I returned the set and asked for a replacement.  The second package arrived with the same problem.  A La Carte, the distribution, could have come up with a better packaging than cramping 4 discs inside a single box.  I decided to keep the merchandize because I really treasure this TV series.  But if you are not as crazy as I am, don't buy this set until the distributor comes up with a better package
A weird movie. This film is one of the worst I have seen.  I really don't know what other films Sean Reid has produced but this one was kind of bad. The film opens up by saying it's based on true events, so you wonder is it based on Sean Reid's young life trying to pursue acting.  To me this film was pointless.  It's named Redemption, redemption from what?  It shows Christian, played by Brian White,  going through depressive pshycotic episodes trying to find his way in life. The only scenes I liked were between him and his father.  The conversations between them were very meaningful with Christian trying to get through to his father, which lets you in on his family history, and his father trying to help his son cope with life.  Christian is battling many demons; his father not being a good example in his life, his mother not being there, his struggle to pursue acting, and trying to find love.  This all leads to Christian making poor decisions.  He starts partying and getting in stupid fights.  He starts to take a turn for the worse when he meets this actor who can get him a gig and starts using marijuana.  One of his friends, the guy who plays Marlon, acts like a total jerk and disrepects women and his girlfriend puts up with it.  It was ridiculous.  Melique, another one of Christian's friends stops hanging with them when he sees that they are starting to make wrong decisions.  Realizing this, Christian finds Melique.  Melique tries to redeem Christian from himself by having a serious heart to heart talk with him.  You would think that since the movie is named "Redemption" that Christian at this point would turn his life around.  He does find hope again and wants to start a new life with his girlfriend (Claire).  It doesn't last long when Trent (a foe of his) spots him and beats him up.  Then the downward spiral begins again.  Christian starts getting high and starts having hallucinations.  He has a mental breakdown and starts doing strange things.  He think he sees Trent and goes out in a rage with a knife in his hand running around town half naked.  When the police officers can't get through to him he gets shot.Overall this movie was bizarre and kind of a waste of time.  Some scenes didn't make sense and it was very overdramatic
The Duke saves it. I found the film was poorly directed and photographed. It didnt have a good flow to it. The Duke saves an otherwise poor movie
Amateurish. Even though Amanda is quite attractive, the camera work is bad, the lack of professionalism throughout make this naked yoga DVD a bitter disappointment. There are few close-ups and when the camera operater tries to get in close focus goes out the window. A bit of rehearsal may have made the actual yoga scenes a bit better. If you are looking for an accidentally soft focus DVD of a relatively pretty young lady doing joga naked while she discusses what she is to do with the photographer and looking lost, this is for you
Shuttle Discovery's Historic Mission (Blu-ray). Being a new Blu-ray owner I was anxious to acquire some high resolution material.  This was one of three discs in my first order and a quick lesson in shopping blind.  For full disclosure I will reveal that we only watched about the first half of the feature before hitting "eject".  At best, 10% of this program was high res, mostly familiar footage of ground based NASA training, etc.  All of the shuttle lift-off and orbital footage was standard res or worse, presented as a documentary and fully narrated.  Very disappointing and a waste of money.  The other two discs in the order were quite nice.
I.C.U. I had never heard of this movie until yesterday when I bought the VHS version of this movie for a very good price. Not normally a fan of "cop" movies or Stallone movies ( except Rambo ) , I decided to give it a try. What drew my attention to this movie is the fact that a serial killer is on the lose and for the strong violence and gore indicated on the box. I've seen worse movies but I've seen better! Although I will say that the acting was good and the cast was good. This is by no means a horror movie but a suspense movie. There were some cool scenes in this movie and was somewhat entertaining.
Rent this movie before you buy it. I know that everyone wants to hear how great a movie is.  Well, I can't say The Thin Red Line is a great movie.  On a scale of 1-5 I gave it a 2.Maybe my expectations were too high.  After all, I bought this movie after watching Band of Brothers, Saving Private Ryan, and A Bridge Too Far.  So, I was expecting The Thin Red Line to be on that level.  After all, with 7 Academy Award Nominations including Best Picture, a cast that includes many of the top names in Hollywood, and a huge budget, the bar was set pretty high.And I guess if you're into artsy, "message" films The Thin Red Line will be what you're looking for.  But, if you're looking for a "war" movie you can forget it.  Buy When Trumpets Fade or Saving Private Ryan if you're looking for action.  Or better yet, splurge for the Band of Brothers set.  You'll seldom make such a wise investment if you're really interested in knowing what happened.  I'm just not interested in watching a World War 2 movie that appears more interested in all this sort of introspective business.  Save that for Dr. Phil.I've warned you.  If you're into history and World War 2 in particular, rent this before you buy it.  Seriously.
I wish I could go lower than this. This is horrendous movie. I will never claim it as the movie of my generation. It's one of the many reasons why I absolutely hate the "80's". The others are:Breakdancing, The Yuppie lifestyle,Power hungry businessmen/women, Women with manly handshakes, New Wave Music, and junk movies like this. I know that the main character is nothing less than a manipulator who is only concerned about himself, and what he can get out of life. He ridicules his friend because he's sick, and doesn't feel like driving Ferris around...especially in a Ferrari that mysteriously gets lost in the parking garage, so what am I left to believe I have to wonder if this is where Ice Cube got the inspiration for "It Was A Good Day". I don't care what decade it was, or what was cool back then, or now manipulating your friends is "NOT" I repeat"NOT" cool. I know with John and Johnette Q. Public this is something of a sexual relase. I could picture private parts of men and women everywhere getting soaking wet from this movie, and I find it so repulsive that everyone out there finds this funny.
NiteinCO. Every Lakers fan I've ever met lives in the past sadly now.  To them, the clock stopped when Kareem and Magic hung up the shoes [and we know why Magic had to leave].  Their basketball knowledge from the 60s to the 90s is rewarding.  After this, however, they don't have a clue of what has happened to this once mighty and moral organization.The Lakers have been a good team over the decades [as apparent on this DVD set], but the run of greatness is coming to a LONG slide with Kobe driving the Bus.  The Lakers were once considered the Green Bay Packers of the NFL, but now they're just lucky to even get close to a playoff spot over a majority of the teams in the Western Conference which are much better than the present Lakers.I recently attended a game last Fall at the Staples Center, and besides all of the celebs eating hummus in the stands, I could barely hear myself think over Phil Jackson's mantra "I told you so."Further illustrating how things have changed in LA, Jack Nicholson has become embarrassed to wear anything purple or yellow.So it is understandable that Laker fans would rather focus on the achievements of Magic and Kareem, than rather extol the diminishing skills of Kobe since his Colorado folly.There are some good games on this DVD along with great moments from the Baylor, Chamberlain, West days.  I recommend any Laker fan to purchase this DVD set to relive the past.So Laker fans, keep living in the past if you so desire.  Maybe Kobe will retire and become a man of the cloth and lead the Lakers to the NBA Championship promised land once again.Long live the Forum [or the Staple Remover Center] or whatever they are calling the Lakers home now
Try Lock Down. American Me in review:Lousy, predictable story. There are two MAYBE three characters in this movie that have some depth but most are generic sterotypes, but since the script has such transparent and worthless dialogue it's almost not even the actors fault (almost). I am not a particular fan of this type of movie but if you watch "Lock Down" you'll see what a movie in this genre SHOULD BE.After all I've heard about American Me I thought it would be good, it wasn't even decent... and the extras are laughable
Japanese Goosebumps!. This film is $7.50 at walmart! The Japanese Goosebumps! Twilight Zone wannabes! Yeah, it's good.  Good to laugh at! The Sacrafice should have been packaged alone for $1.50; I would have been satisfied
A disservice to her voice!. Norah Jones has the most profound voice in music (I will NOT call it Jazz after hearing this DVD) since Joe Cocker (just saw his Woodstock performance-awesome) and Josh Grohban.In this DVD, and I'm echoing many of the other reviews, there were so many problems with the quality of the sound. Yeah, her voice was STILL powerful and smooth, but the listener could not here the band and much of the richness of the songs were completely lost. The drums yes, sounded like congos, simply awful! This is one reason I don't call it Jazz as this drummer should have been using brushes. The use of drumsticks reek of 'pop' music. Additionally, the songs were over almost as soon as they started with little to no improvisation. That is not Jazz, either.The Video showed her to upclose (the glitter on her face or whatever was not pretty and her nervousness was obvious. There were so many things wrong that the DVD did a disservice to her voice.I got this DVD to compare to Diana Kralls two DVD's (Live in Paris and Live at the Montreal Jazz festival). These were TOP QUALITY productions and her backing musicians, well, are probably the BEST (John Clayton-Bass; Anthony Wilson; electric and Jeff Hamilton; drums) in the world.Norah Jones' voice, however, is one of a kind and she should settle for nothing less than Diana Krall's backing musicians. I would love to see Norah singing along with Diana's group (plus Diana). This would serve Norah and us better
Capital  BORING... What were those people who gave this 5 stars watching?  If you want to see two people jabbering for 80 minutes this is it.  This was adapted from a play, but still...  This would be an "F" in any High School play.  I want my 80 minutes and $20 back
moronic. the script is garbage...as if they made it up as they were going along ( the amount of production goofs prove it).....even a golf ball knows you can stop a train by killing the power to the third rail...the subway chase scene ?...catching a train on a motorcycle ?...the two trains ramming at high speed ? ugh hello !!!this movie was a complete waste of time and to be avoided at all costs......if your into trains by any means, dig into the archives and discover "the taking of pelham one two three
Yet another ripped-off collector. I have to agree with the previous reviewer; those of us who faithfully bought every season of MASH up to now ($300+) are getting abused by FOX. They want us to shell out hundreds more dollars to get the special features that we were expecting to see on the season 11 set. Shame on you, FOX
Not for DVD aficionados. I'm rather upset with the technical quality of this DVD.  Grindhouse rereleased this disc exactly as it was in 2000, without so much as a 16x9 animorphic upgrade.  This is certainly not worth the $20+ dollar price tag Amazon.com has right now
Sorry for the huge and famous cast. This movie comes from John Grisham's novel of the same title. Most of the actions taking place in the novel were also presented in this movie. The spotlight reviews goodly summarize the movie, even when I don't agree with their rankings.The first movie's problem is the character's personalities, less credible many times. One reviewer well said the FBI's personnel looks rather wimpy.  The merciless Coal Fletcher looks like a simple clerk while he is the real president in the novel. On the other hand, the novel's heroine (Darby Shaw) losses her strong personality but at the same time behaves in obnoxious ways. For example, in one scene, she asks her best female friend to spread a gossip in college but Darby does not care whatsoever for her friend's safety as in the novel; Darby even tells her that "it's not good for her (Darby) to stay there". Darby does all the opposite in the novel. Next, her friend does all what she says, this not credible.The second movie's error is the way the show the events. For example, as I said Fletcher is not portrayed as a tough way, there's even an scene where we see his seeing his family's picture at his desk, really charming; however he is still punished in the movie. Any honest person who does not let to be impressed by the reputations of the actors and director should admit that the movie is not always understandable. I watched this movie right when released in 1992 and I didn't understand it but the huge Julia Roberts' success was on its highest so I didn't think much, just considered it was sort of boring. Now, I read the novel, watched the movie again and understood the movie was flawed. In fact, all bad guys in the movie were only small fishes who chased Darby.I also complain that the movie shows some misbehaviour as good ones. For example, in one scene the president asks the FBI chief (Voyles) to stop a crime investigation. Voyles offers to do it in exchange of favours. This is plain corruption yet the movie made it look like a cocktail party! In another scene one character (Callahan) is about to start driving while drunk and Darby only plays a little bit to stop him just to finally let him get on his car.The movie added a few action scenes the novel doesn't have, yet it is quite boring. The novel has less action, yet it is more exciting
Psuedo Anime,. Okay this is starting to piss me off, why the heck are there so many anime imitations coming out? Its so freakin annoying!!!!!!  The people who made this think they can do anime but they cant.  The charcaters are lame, the story is totally cliche'd and the voiceacting is horrible.  The thing that makes me mad is the fact that true authentic anime like Inu Yasha, Cowboy Bebop,  and Akira, are totally shunned by much of the american public, while this crap is considered great.  It's totally unfair, americans just can't do anime, they try but they cant, so they should stop trying!!!
CAN'T FIND A GOOD SLEEPING PILL? THAN BUY THIS MOVIE!. Yes, I must admit that I was fooled by the "One of the most notorious, most debated, most banned films of the 'video nasty' era." line on this back of this movie case.  I was lucky because I found this at a Best Buy for $10.99.  It should be $2.99 for as bad as it is.  I've been let down by these Italian Horror Films one too many times.  If you want good, gore filled, Italian Horror stick with Lucio Fulci or Dario Argento.  Once you get past the bad dubbing and acting they're berrible.  Oh, by the way, unless you are fluent in Italian this second disk is almost worthless-there is no opportunity to even have English subtitles.  The only thing good about the second disk is the nudity and strong sexual content and that looks alright in any language
Alas, another remake. Making this a musical with Bing Crosby isn't a bad idea. Making it advertize the Jazz Fest and him doing Jazz is. I've never cared for Frank Sinatra's singing and hearing his sour notes with Bing's voice makes him even worse. The only redeeming value is Shatch! They should have let Grace be a Princess and not encourage her terrible acting skills
Supernova in the classroom. Does anyone know if there is a real PG-13 version of this film?  I've been told it came out as a PG-13 and then was changed to an R film.  Pretty strange way to deal with a science fiction film that kids would want to see..
Steven Seagal, if you surf Amazon, please listen to us!. Back in the 1990's, Steven Segal and Jean-Claude Van Damme were the stars going head to head at the cinema for these types of movies. They, unlike Arnold, Bruce Willis, and Stallone, were both heavy into martial arts. Both had similiar acting styles (look mean -hit people). Both went into the straight to video route after a few under performing theatrical releases. But if Seagal keeps putting out crap like this, Van Damme might be looked upon in 100 years from now as the better of the two. He did afterall, go into sci-fi, tried more creative approaches in his movie plots and acted as if he really wanted to be an actor...he played a ex-con, a cop, a soldier,a father, even twins with more depth. Sure, he fell like Seagal in the end, but not as hard.Seagal, on the other hand, stayed the course with very few exceptions (except The Patriot) playing all characters the same. And somewhere in the late 1990s, tried to add a environmental message into his films, sometimes awkwardly.I heard, but don't know for sure, that he dated or married a Chinese lady, and this changed his movie style to the Asian themed, Asian style direction, and the choppy editing that have plagued his latest films.You have read the reviews of Out to A Kill so I won't go into it. But I do have suggestions for Steven if he ever reads Amazon.comThis movie would have worked better if he was a retired professor whose son was framed. He could have married a Chinese woman. He goes to China to snoop around about his son being in jail, and kills a bad guy who is with those that are smuggling the goods. The rest of the bad guys, as well as the Chinese police, and the American police are after him until the gets to the bottom of it and proves his son's innocence.Explain somewhere in the film he was martial arts teacher at the college he taught and one time was a champion so he kicks butt realistically..In fact, in this movie no characters (such as his wife)that are really explained....they just come and go.The acting is terrible all around.Action is nice and expected, but the story actually matters and time alloted for character's personalities to come together has to happen for it to be well recieved by most people (remember Under Seige?)Then it might get a theatrical release instead of the usual straight to video hell.LOSE WEIGHT. Be like other stars.Take pride in yourself. When a movie is in pre-production, other stars hit the gym, go jogging, etc. George Clooney once said he got in shape by cutting back on eating and working out hard twice a day for 8 weeks or more before shooting started. Stallone trained for months before the Rocky and Rambo flicks.Take acting lessons. Show more emotional range and still be a tuff guy. Maybe like Bruce Willis in his later roles?Get rid of the long leather jackets. It makes you look like My Cousin Vinney...totally out of place.Do something with the hair. Anything. Tie it back like you used to if nothing else.Play parts that fit your age, like Clint Eastwood does.Practice your martial arts and get your edge back so we don't have to endure stunt doubles, slow motion, camera tricks. Be like Jackie Chan and be real.Your fans love you so please respect them by no longer turning out doggie-do like this
Watch out!!! This DVD edited. Many scenes missing. Even though The Human Tornado is undoubtedly Rudy Ray Moore's Citizen  Kain, this DVD is completely butchered.  Xenon's DVD is missing more then  10 minutes of footage, most of which are some of the funniest gags in the  entire film.  Unfortantly, there is no other way to get the complete film  unless you can find a copy at your local video store that is at least 15  years old, before Xenon edited the hell out of the film.  Either way, the  transfer and sound on this DVD is beautiful and crisp and the menus are  funny and inventive.  If you have to buy any copy, buy this one but write  Xenon and demand an unedited verson be put out in the future, this time  with a commentary track from Rudy Ray Moore
Worst movie I've ever seen. I would have given this film 0 stars if possible.  This film was long, boring, and painful to watch.  If you like Jane Austen films or other BBC period films, do not be deceived by this one; it is nothing like those types of films
In a word: horrid. It pained me to sit through this movie and I would have turned it off after the first ten minutes if I didn't have to write a comparative analysis between it and Shakespeare's "Othello." The writing is terrible, the acting is so-so, the music is the pits, there is WAY too much emphasis on race, and the relationship between Odin and Desi is a joke. I'm supposed to believe he went stark-raving mad over a girl he had been dating for four months? Give me a break--I ended up laughing through the majority of this movie simply because it was so bad. This is teenaged melodrama at its worst
2 stars because its got that new slang garbage in it. i aint been much for these animated movies, especially that mickey mouse character. i bought this cd for my grandson because he likes these things and he's got one of them car beds, so i thought he'd like it. turned out the kid saw it with his dad already (big surprise, his dad acts like a damn 10 yr old and smokes the grass and what not) so i wasted 20 some dollars on this thing. anyway, i seen it and it aint that good. one of the cars is this country kind of fellow that can't keep his damn mind out of the gutter. you know, they should rate this things pg13 or some such. anyway ,damn wife keeps watchin it instead of playing cards so im stuck with this fox news crap and you know she dont want to play bingo. i dont know, dont buy this thing if you got good kids because theyll learn this damn new slang garbage. 2 stars because the wife likes it
Low budget--so what?. The movie "Dead Life" by director William Victor Shotten is a throwback to the great movies of old such as Night of the Living Dead--or at least it tries to be--unfortunately it's a stupid attempt and being original through looking old, which in itself is an irony.Looking at its writing, there's absolutely nothing to commend this movie on. Though this movie at least tries to give you an explanation as to the existence of zombies, it's as thought-out as a cat's decision to chase a shiny object. The common mistake made with Romero's films is that the story wasn't well thought out, since they never really explain the zombies (except a bit in the original about a meteor); however, what people don't realize is it doesn't matter why. Romero's films are satirical in nature, they focus on a larger picture and disregard details, that's what makes them so great--that's what makes them films.Dead Life makes some attempt and showing depth with its underlying theme, except it's stupid and unoriginal, and really not shocking or thought-provoking in the slightest.This movie is not shocking, it's not realistic, even the "gore scene" everyone is referring to is only a stupid attempt at being shocking and over-the-edge; but it comes off as just being tasteless.People are giving this movie credit for having no money, but really, people have done better with less. The acting is ridiculous, the sound is poorly dubbed, the camera is always out of focus, and the special effects are lame. It is a tasteless zombie romp with no point whatsoever, it doesn't deserve credit for having a low budget, it makes no effort to make people think and makes no effort to be good, period. Night of the Living Dead was a low-budget film, this is not even close to reaching that level.Oh, and it actually takes sound effects straight from the first Resident Evil game and dubs them in. Seriously
Much Ado about nothing. I personally started liking Tim Robbins from Shawshank Redemption & Sean Penn from Dead Man Walking and I believe these were the movies these guys should have recieved oscar for their outstanding roles.Keeping than in mind and seeing lot of recommendations I saw Mystic River which the review said was the best as far as Clint Eastwood was concernedAgain he had adapted another movie, Bridges of Madison County, which in my personal opinion was much better adaptation of a novel.The story line eventhough is good about three friends meeting again by fate and all the script is not that strong. I actually fell asleep in between.Off the cast my personal belief is Kevin Bacon was really good. Sure TimRobbins plays a character of sexually abused child with lot of conviction but even that was potrayed better in Shawshank Redemption where he is abused by a few inmates.And the end is kind of loose.Give it a mis
If I could give it a negative 5, I would... This movie was just about the worst movie I ever saw... so utterly and painfully pointless, and not the slightest bit funny. Tom Green makes a complete fool of himeself. I actually turned off the movie half-way through because it was so stupid... Don't waste your time or money on this one!
Just Say No. I am writing this over a year after actually seeing CUBE 2: HYPERCUBE, because it was the first time I could stomach to remember it.  I am a hard core indie-scifi freak (well any good scifi really) and I must say this movie was a train wreck.  I couldn't believe the film makers sheer lack of understanding as to what made the original CUBE great- all white rooms, street clothes, time traveling canabal, I'm saying.  I considered CUBE to be up there with the greats (Donnie Darko, Dark City, blah blah blah), CUBE 2 just cheapened it.  If you really need more Cubedom see CUBE ZERO the prequel tney recently made, it's at least decent.  But to this monstrousity just say no
Should be called "Nothing Here". It is quite possible for this film to wash over you and leave absolutely no trace of passing.There are about three or four lines in this effort which are funny however the tedium in-between does not make them worth the wait.Part of the problem with this film was that I felt that I had seen it all before. Which, of course, I had in Four Weddings. Slightly pathetic, floppy-haired middle-class Englishman falls for glamorous American who rejects him them gets back together with him and has a group of friends suffering from various disabilities.Not since "Intersection" have I spent a movie looking at my watch to see when it ended. I honestly don't know who was worse, Julia Roberts or Hugh Grant. They both became so grating on the nerves that I couldn't wait for the movie to end. The most enjoyable part of the film (aside from it being over) were the trailers they showed before it.Not worth seeing or renting. Save the money for something better... it shouldn't be that hard
Hilary, Hilary, when will you learn, acting just isn't your thing... I always end up watching these types of movies on TV, years after their release. And usually I watch them for the pure fun of mocking the cheesy cliched plot and bad acting. Hilary, as usually delivered a spectacular performance...as herself. The plot...what was it again? She stopped singing due to a death in the family? Learns to raise her voice...and move on...that that person will always be in her heart?Also kiddies, we learned to lie to people for our own benefit...maybe if Terri had her heart to heart earlier all the sneaking etc. would not have had to happen...just a thought. But no...they have to add conflict. Not that it made the movie better...just more pathetic.If you want to watch a predictable movie, with Hollywood morals and mediocre acting this would be it.
save yourself the trouble.. as someone said in an earlier review, the movie is split up into two parts.  the first part, training camp, was good. i enjoyed the movie up until it switches to vietnam.  after that, i found it unwatchable. the main character is so annoying, i kept hoping he would get shot instead of his supporting cast. if you're looking for a good war movie, look elsewhere.
trying. trying is the best word to describe this movie.it tried my patience. the opening scene was several minutes of nothing and i had to hold myself back from turning the movie off. I told myself, give it a chance, and i repeated that through the entire film. somewhere with in 90 minutes I just wanted to find out what was happening and why... well i can't spoil the movie but...it tried to be artistic. in fact i think most of the people who review this movie with five stars want to be artsy. examining composition and frames and dialog and colors and blah, blah, blah. this movie was a waste of my time.the only theme or concept i took away from the film was that upper class French people are annoying
NO!!. The horrible effects make it unwatchabe!! When the killer rats attack their victims its laughable how anyone would allow these effects to fly.. I mean this CGI goes down as the worse in movie history to date!! I laughed, I took the dvd out and laughed again!!!
read the book. This really isnt a bad movie if you havent read the book, if you have read the book then think of this as another story based on the same subject. i understand that a book to movie will leave certain things out, and i accept that, but to completely change the ending is not excusable. What was wrong with the way the book ended? Like i said if you havent read the book you will like this movie although they do solve these very complex puzzles after a glance at them(even though they hide a very very valuable secret that will change the world). If you havent read the book or seen the movie do yourself a favor and pick up a copy, its a better story and its cheaper if bought in the paperback, if you dont have time to read it then get it on audio disk or tape
Pretty much groan inducing.... -Not a great one here, entertaining for all the wrong reasons, mainly because the film is so bad, so often.-It is nice to see Christina Ricci in a movie again, as she's usually good even in a bad movie and doesn't do too bad here.-Wes Craven directs this one and I could tell right away it must have been do to a contract obligation (much like Edward Norton in "The Italian Job"). I could tell this because very little effort seemed to be put into the script, both the story and lines of dialogue were very predictable and dumb. Also very little effort seemed to be put into the effects, as they were very lousy at times, especially when they finally showed the werewolf.-As I said before, quite predictable the story was, both Ricci and her brother get bitten by a werewolf after they try to save a girl who got into a car wreck. Then both try to figure out what's wrong with them, though the brother is much more active about it than Ricci.-It's also quite obvious who the main werewolf was, the film tries a bit of a swerve, but it doesn't really work.-Besides Ricci, the cast includes Shannon Elizabeth (American Pie 1&2), Portia De Rossi (Arrested Development), Joshua Jackson (Pacey on "Dawson's Creek"), Scott Baio (don't ask me why) among others. All do pretty poor jobs, besides Ricci that is, the rest don't really seem to care, not that I blame them that is.-There is some humor throughout the film, but a lot of the film will get unintentional laughs from those who watch it.-The only reason to watch this is to make fun of it as the effort is not really there by mostly anybody on the cast or crew.
Not as funny or creative or whimsical as the first two!. This Rugrats movie is the worst of the three. Obviously, it was made for promotion and cash more than anything. Nickelodeon didn't consider the plot in the process, so the movie suffers. The plot is complex, yet it still manages to be too simple to be taken seriously, and it has about fifty holes and sub-plots. The movie is too complex for even a 10-year-old to grasp. Since Rugrats is aimed for 3-9 year olds, they won't get it. The main promotions for the movie were the scratch and sniff sequence [also, Burger King promotion to go with that], and the fact that Spike would now talk. Hah! Spike talked in the episode of the series about Chuckie's dreams. Besides, smelling some disgusting card [that you can smell anytime, not during the movie] isn't fun. The burger smells more like spoiled milk. Anyway, the movie is fluffy and light and tries for a few forced laughs but it dosen't happen. Debbie's well-publicized line and the &quot;That is so wrong!&quot; line, and the Wedgie-dance, are among the stupidest things I have ever seen. Maybe an 8-year-old would disagree. Being 12, I found the humour pretty dumb. So you're aware, I love the series. This movie just wasn't creative at all, it was more of a Thornberry-type flick. And finally, it just isn't whimsical or special in any way. Not recommended for anything except a rental from the video store, if that
Complete butchering of a good story. I had never seen Queen of the Damned until last night, when I had just finished Anne Rice's novel Queen of the Damned.  Knowing I would soon be done with the novel, I was curious to see the movie so I went out to MovieStop and picked up a cheap, used dvd copy, despite hearing that this movie was very bad.  Turns out, the word bad is an understatement.Let me get to the point, there were several changes in the story, and I understand that some of this needs to be done in the movies for screen time reasons, etc.  But I found that after reading the novel, while the basic premise of the story is the same as in the novel, pretty much everything that gave the novel's plotline it's depth and intrigue was removed from the story in the film adaptation, and this movie simply falls flat.  I was shaking my head by the end of the movie with such disappointment that so much of the story was hacked away.  The vampires in this movie are not portrayed with the amount of love & feeling that is intended by Anne Rice, Akasha included.  Maharet, perhaps the foremost character in the novel, basically doesn't show up until the end of the movie simply to take part in a disappointing final showdown.  Again, all of the backstory that should have been present here was missing.I won't spoil it for any of those who still plan to read the novel, but Akasha's motives for what she was planning to do were actually logical (in her own evil and misguided way), but there was a reason for it that she saw as legitemate, where as in the movie it was simply "everybody must die!".  Period.  That's your motive for everything that the movie was building up to.  I can't stress this enough - the depth of the book is GONE in the movie.Like I said, I understand that things need to be trimmed/skipped for the sake of screen time, etc., but this movie was barely over 1 1/2 hours long, and so much of the plot development could still have been included here to give this movie the depth that it lacked.  What's wrong with adding even another 30-45 minutes of screen time to fill in the story and make it a 120 or 135 minute film?  Heck, I sat in the theatres for all three Lord of the Rings movies which all ran over 3 hours.  Or was this movie directed at punk kids with 10 minute attention spans, rather than the fans of Anne Rice's Vampire Chronicles?  Such a shame, because this movie really had the potential to equal, if not better, the adaptation of Interview With the Vampire.I could go on and on about the other things that were done in this movie that I thought were just stupid, silly, etc. etc.  Kind of like how the other vampires were pissed at Lestat for revealing himself to the world as a vampire and giving away vampiric secrets, yet they decide to fly up on stage during the middle of the concert, in front of tens of thousands of people and start fighting, in essence "revealing" themselves as well, which is totally inconsistent with why these vampires were angry in the first place.  I won't go into all of the details, because it would take too much writing to tell you everything that bugged me.Bottom line, I guess if you're into cheesy vampire action flicks with a Korn, etc. movie score, then you may still see some value here, but Anne Rice diehards will most certainly find this movie a waste of their time.  But don't let this movie scare you out of reading the novel, because the book is much much MUCH better than this movie
The Postman is a very seriously boring movie. The Postman is a very seriously boring movie with terrible story line. One of the most conspicuous flops of its decade and there is good reason for it. I had to write this review when I saw that there were several people actually rating this movie at 5 stars. Seriously guys you forgot to take your pills this morning and your friends will the white coats will be visiting later to check on you, until then please refrain from using your PC as we are in danger of obliteration of good taste
Not Good!. I bought this DVD becuase I really wanted to learn the dance moves in "You Got Served" and was extremely disappointed.  The only routines they teach you are from the people who lost the dance battles in the movie and why you would want to learn those, I don't know.  The freestlye section at the end is fun to watch, but this is neither a good workout nor a good hip hop dance video
Boring. Now when I say boring I don't mean it isn't realistic I have no doubt that women do talk this much about sex when there alone but since they all seem so unlikable (with the exception of Olivia D'Abo who plays the lover of one of the women who reunite in this film), I didn't care about what happen to them. Matter of fact, I would be so happy if something bad happen
Why?. Why on earth did they release a 'miniseries' on DVD that was already on the Season 1 box set?While a great little show, it seems odd that they would rerelease a particular few episodes from the boxset as a new DVD...  and why this series vs, say, the two pilots/specials?Anyways, please don't be fooled and buy this in addition to the Series One box set... you'll be buying a repeat.How about releasing other Seasons on DVD?  Or the actual My Little Pony theatrical movie
The second dvd is much better!. I purchased this dvd because I own the 2nd one and like it so much.  Boy, was I disappointed!  The abs diet people must have decided to create the second dvd because this one needed a good edit.  The second dvd covers basically the same exercises but with better instruction and form.  Skip this one and buy the Abs Diet Workout 2
HO HO Now I Know!. Well it looks like my question regarding why these two "Classic Cartoon Favorites" DVD's are being released in September has been answered! Anywhey being honest, I do own one DVD of this series and that is called "Starring Chip N Dale" that is because there has never been a Chip and Dale collection on DVD before so i own it despite the bad resterration on all of the cartoons
Nothing But Noise - Big Disappointment. I thought maybe it was just old age creeping up on me. The Jimi Hendrix that I remember from my youth sounded a whole lot better than what I saw on this DVD. I thought I had just changed my tastes and wasn't into his songs anymore. Then I read some reviews here....and I feel better. It wasn't me: it was this concert - it sucked!I just wanted to have something on film of one of the most famous guitar players of all time, so I thought this long concert would do it.  All it turned out to be was noise, which was really disappointing considering the songs I liked best from him were all included in this concert.Unfortunately, they were hardly recognizable.  Save your money on this one
Great game, not for amateurs. My son gave me this game for Christmas and unlike the prior version, I cannot come close to surviving even a few minutes at any level above easy.  I've gone back to my Dawn of War that I can sometimes beat.  I recommend this only for VERY experienced players or people willing to devote a great deal of time into figuring out how to stay alive more than 5 minutes
DISAPPOINTMENT OF A LIFE-TIME............... and i guess along, i knew it would be!!! dark shadows 1966-71 is the only dark shadows. period.!!! THERE IS NO.. nor...EVER CAN BE a "revival" of the original...sorry! "revival" was a VERY forgettable attempt by dan curtis (genius) to desparately cling on to an old idea...and i don't blame him, cause it' is my favorite show of all time, but by the 90's, the people and the mood was altogether different fom the 60's...cast and acting not of 66-71 caliber, destined to fail because of that alone...was time to seal the old coffin up 1n 1971...and not be disturbed in '90 or '91 or whenever the heck it was.
Another one of those silly 80's movies. The jokes are pretty much what you would expect and there are a lot of slap-stick sight gags. I normally wouldn't have bought a movie like this but I needed it to make my Johnny Depp library complete
Worse than trash. If this is from Sony Pictures, I have to question the quality of every other Sony product. This is the worst picture ever made, period. I'll never buy another Seagal movie
Cannable: The Musical. It has been over a month and I have YET to receive my movie!!!!!!!!!!!
Don't Waste Your Money. I don't usually write reviews, but I feel so strongly that this one is awful, that I feel obligated to warn future buyers to keep your credit card in your purse when it comes to this one! I am an avid yoga/fitness DVD athlete -- have been doing yoga for over a decade, have run two marathons: I know my stuff.You could make a case for the yoga routine being a good one, but I find that the production is so awful that I can't hear the instructors voice, so I constantly have to bend out of positions just to look at the TV screen to see what she's talking about. Not to mention the camera shots of her tush and close ups of her inner thighs are just disgusting. She's very fit and toned, but I just don't want to see anyone up that close.If you want a yoga routine that makes you think you might be learning from a strip-dancer, go ahead and spend the 50+ bucks on this one.
Wait for the new Hitchcock releases. These DVDs are &quot;Laserlight&quot; releases which mean that they have very poor quality picture and sound.Wait for the new Hitchcock Box sets which have clear picture and sound plus documentaries and other extras.The superb Criterion versions are also a good choice.If it's introduced by Tony Curtis,then it's Laserlight,avoid it
Campy, weird and boring....but starring Jayne. When I bought this movie I thought "God: all the reviews are talking about a boring and absolutely unbearable movie"Yet I bought it ...only because of Jayne (and because of a low price)Script is for kids and boring, picture is not good, looks like a typical so-low-budget film.But Jayne left us when she was so young that I enjoy each opportunity to see her (no matter the quality)...And since there is now the  fashion for kitsch campy films which are becoming hip when you watch them with friends and nibbles...Less dangerous than bloody violent movies.so watch it and forget itand anyway better for Mansfield enthusiasts!NB ; look at that beautiful other girl running on the beach with long dark hair, terrific figure and cute face (she doesn't speak but runs and dances all the time): she's actress Linda Hamilton who played Nova in the 1968 version of "Planete of the Apes
Today Seagal Gets 2 Stars...Barely!. This is the second direct-to-video Seagal film that I have watched in a week. As I did with Out for a Kill, I've given Today You Die two stars. I've reserved 1 star for the Patriot and Submerged. I give TYD an extra star for the Las Vegas chase scene, somewhat coherent plot, and glimpses of Seagal doing Aikido. If I could I would downgrade TYD to 1.5 stars because of the hokey vision woman/girlfriend. She and her visions (seemingly totaly unrelated to the plot) became annoying after a while! On a different note my wife and I found it odd that Seagal was the only one wearing an oversized (obviously to hide his girh) jean jacket while in prison. I should also note that our hero's mumbling was kept to a minimum. His mumbling and films' poor sound qulaity often require the use of subtitles...not this time! The average person will think this film is total crap. Loyal Seagal fans will probably add a used copy of this to their collections and continue to hope for the day that Seagal will finally come out with something halfway decent
Skip It Lives Again, and go straight for Island of the Alive. It's ALive 3: Island of the Alive is down right hilarious. Nothing is better than watching mutant babies grow up and eat people. I mean seriously. My personal favorite scene was the court room scene with the "baby" in the cage. Good laughs.In this flick, Michael Moriarity portrays a father of a mutant "baby." The government decides to put the lil' suckers (theres five or so now) on an uncharted island. Five years later, they decide they need to get "fluid samples" off the creatures for scientific research. Michael Moriarity goes along for the ride. Well the "babies" have grown into five year old "adults." And one of them has had a baby of their own. Yes indeed, Moriarity is a Pappy. All is well until they all die. Except Moriarity. The monsters want to get back to civilization and Moriarity gets stuck with the job of taking them there. Somewhere along the journey, they chuck him out into the ocean, Cuba picks him up, he gets back to the states, bla bla bla. All in all, this is a funny movie that deserves a four star rating on a B-movie scale. Watching this movie alone is like getting beat to death by golf clubs, but watching it with a bunch of B-movie lovers is a riot.If you liked "Island of the Alive" I recomend: the awesomely bad movie "Creature," it's sci-fi on drugs and totally funny.What I learned from Island of the Alive: Cuban officers are nice AND funny
And the jungle reeked for days... Tanya can't act her way out of a - well, anything, but she can get out of any clothing whatever, and the gratuitous shots from below as she climbs trees and swings from ropes are great good fare for pubescent teenage boys without much of a social life.  Fred Wass does what he does best, wanders around on cue and collects a paycheck for no obvious reason.  Any one over the age of eighteen will want to drink a lot of beer while wasting time with this
Don't buy this 1-Disc release. I bought the Japanese 2-Disc edition from Amazon's Japanese site.  The only thing that is in Japanese only are the kiddy games everthing else is in English with removable JPN subtitles.  The JPN edition is NTSC and region 2.  If you only have a region 1 DVD player try to find a copy of the old Tarzan Collectors 2-disc edition release
Speeding to hell. The story here dosen't matter. The main characters fuse into a missle of meth and insanity towards an explosive ending. Scwartzman escapes his fate temporarily and murphy is blessed with a reprieve but rourke pays the full price for his evil concoction, meth. Quirky directing and film editing can be somewhat distracting but not meaningless. Roberts is so gay you want to smack his face. he an rourke have history on film and play out their familiarity. Rourke is phenomonal again as an immoral genius, a role he plays better than anyone today in film. BR
If you like this garbage you belong on death row. Actually to call this crap music is an insult to every musician. All this is are a bunch of uneducated punk racists spewing out hate and disrespect. They have no class and no morals and anyone who likes them is about the same
Like a car crash.... You want to turn away but you just can't stop watching!  Like other reviewers suggest, maybe I need to read the book.  The film on it's own holds the audience attention by bouncing from one obscure situation to another while remaining emotionally vacant. Some admirable performances by a suprisingly well known and talented cast. Definately one for those who prefer something from the 'art house' movie genre
Quiet possibly the worst movie ever. Not even Jennifer Garner in tight clothes could make this movie worth a second watch or first watch come to think of it.  AVOID AT ALL COST
whhhaaattt. How is this Scream 4 if Wes Craven is consisdering making a 4th installment to the trilogy? lol...and with original cast members lol.... i dont see this movie as Screams final stab....It might be a good film cause i love horror flicks...but this isnt the final stab....Scream 4 is set to release 2006...well thats wat i rea
Great acting wasted on a poor script... I've dared to challenge my cinema-going art student friends and uni-mates, amid heated discussions about David Lynch, Akira Kurosawa and such, by confessing that I really didn't like Magnolia at all.  I feel that PT Anderson does indeed create well-rounded characters, compelling dialogue and stuff like that.  The actors cast in his movies always deliver brilliant performances - but in the end, I really felt Magnolia fell short of something more substantial.  It dragged on way too long, the extensive scenes never really seemed to go anywhere and I felt that some serious revisions and editing would have been most beneficial.  There were twists and diversions that didn't really add anything and overall I felt like it was a waste of time which is a shame because some of the scenes featured some great and inspiring acting but maybe they were misplaced.  It didn't really have the sort of message that I couldn't have gotten from a song or another movie in less time and all the symbollic, arty stuff came across as pretentious film-student stuff.  I think PT Anderson is highly overrated as a director and his films are way too self-indulgent.  I don't think he's very good at telling a story without going overboard and sending the viewer astray.  With the exception of the performances by Julianne Moore and Tom Cruise, I thought this film was terrible
the fun is stealthiest of all... They call it brainless fun, but it's not even fun.  Yes, "Stealth" is that not-rare-enough bad movie that's actually so bad, it's no fun.  It starts out bad from the beginning - with an on-screen title sequence dating this film "In the Near Future", which should trip alarms for anybody whose ever watched an episode of "Mystery Science Theater 3000".  The heroes of our story - three pilots assigned to fly hyper-tech US fighters called "Talons" - are reluctantly joined by a fourth pilot, a robotic fighter jet called EDI.  Trouble starts immediately when EDI develops an acute case of self-awareness and faster than you can say "I'm sorry Dave, I really can't do that", EDI is ignoring orders and raising all sorts of havoc.  It's hard to get more specific without ruining the plot...because there really isn't any plot.  The story we see on the screen hints at several different plot-ideas that never form into a single story - we have the plot about stopping "Crazy EDI"; the plot about the evil admiral played by Sam Shepard who will do anything he can to keep the lid on EDI when he goes bad; we have Jessica Biel as a fighter pilot running from the bad guys after she's shutdown over North Korea; then we have Josh Lucas as the other Talon pilot whose on the run from some goons who are trying to...Oh, who cares?  None of these plots go anywhere.BUT WHAT ABOUT THEM EFFEX?? "Stealth" offers us hours of aerial dogfighting in unsurpassed CGI - unsurpassed because the movie demonstrates that there are some things that simply can't be left to computer animation.  Even though they're next generation aircraft, the F/A-37 Talon fighters never convincingly look like any airplanes, and the aerial effects here look little more believable than those done over 20 years ago in "Firefox" or "Deal of the Century", or nowadays on any flight simulator game run on any desktop-PC.  The effects compound the error by maximizing use of "impossible shots" - shots that couldn't be seen by a human perspective, such as those that cut across the sky and directly inside the subject aircraft - it's a clever shot, but not a terrible smart one (they never stop reminding us that these are effects).  It's probably too much effort to explain that even elite fighter pilots don't want to be confused by a flight panel that suddenly starts broadcasting real-time images of a bunch of terrorists sitting down as if for a CNN foto-op, or that none of the pilots come off as even casual aviators.  "Stealth" is one of those mindless movies that effete snobbish reviewers like to blame on teenage boys, but this flick lost a ton of money (stealthy profits) which is only strong proof that the monster audience of mindless boys is itself a delusion of these frustrated critics and studio execs, or even stronger proof that those mindless teenage boys may be smarter than anybody realizes
DULL AMATEUR WORTHLESS UNARTISTIC HOME MOVIES. The entire collection looks like somebody had nothing else to do so they got high and made some films for a joke. This is by no means art . It being released gives a bad name to independent film. To call it cheap would express some sort of aura so i can't do that ! It's more booring than a backyard barbeque shot by uncle Bob . I wish with all it's violence, sex & F words it would be at least disturbing ,but it's not.Some films are soo bad the're funny-NOT these . To put a adjective to this collection I would put the word " NOTHING ". it should be retilted " THE NOTHING COLLECTION
disservice to great director. This is a full screen, heavily cut version of the original Quiemada movie by Pontecorvo. Would you read an edition of Moby Dick or The Red and the Balck missing 1/8 of its pages? A missed opportunity to watch this great movie as it was supposed to be watched
Flat and mostly overacted. I had higher expectations when I purchased this DVD.I was not disappointed technically but I was EXTREMELY disappointed with the acting as a whole and with the uneven singing of Rachel York.  She couldn't seem to decide whether she wanted a pop, jazz, or traditional musical theatre sound.  Her voice was all over the place.  Furthermore, I found her character very annoying...she was screechy and not at all vunerable.  I preferred Kathryn Grayson's performance in the movie as she managed to be vunerable, witty, and charming, as well as screechy, demanding, and somewhat tyrannical.  Truly, I could barely watch this entire video and at the end I could have cared less if Fred and Lilli got together.  I think that was the most powerful statement for me.The production was acted (or directed) with a lot of mugging and so much of it was over the top.  Can today's directors PLEASE leave something for the audience to think about and figure out themselves?  Everything need not be a commentary!I wish I had seen Marin Mazzie because I heard she was incredible. Rent this before buying it or better yet do what I did and buy it used.  It hardly cost anything and that is what is it worth
This movie isn't that great. I was an extra in this movie, and I was really excited to see it in the theatre. But I was really disappointed. I thought it was a dud.  But some people like it, so maybe it's me...
This Film is a Disaster. Tom Berenger must have been desperate for work when he signed up for this embarrassment of a film.  It has the feel and tone of  the kind of made for television movie you might watch out of sheer boredom and exhaustion on a Sunday afternoon when you're too tired either to locate the remote or to fire a bullet at the television screen.  The acting is wooden and unnatural, and the music, which is supposed to be awesome, sounds curiously like a bad rip-off of Springsteen, even though the flashbacks in the film (when most of the musical scenes occur) are set, for the most part, in 1963, when NOTHING sounded like Springsteen.  Worse yet, the sets do not look like 1963.  This is very clearly a cheap production, doomed from the start by an awful script, terrible acting, and a devil may care attitude about capturing the feeling of an era.  Here's the premise of the film: years after Eddie, the tempestuous and dumb lead singer of the Cruisers, has disappeared (he died in a car accident, but his body was never recovered), a reporter decides to write a story about the band.  She has a theory that Eddie is still alive and believes that the band may be on the verge of a renaissance, if the missing final recordings, named A Season in Hell, can be located.  She forces her presence into the lives of the remaining band members, who are, by the way, dull as dirt, to piece together the band's history.  The reporter is so creepy and annoying that she'd probably have a restraining order slapped on her, nowadays.  Ironically enough, A Season in Hell describes quite acccurately the viewing experience
The WORST movie I have EVER seen! A Stupid, Pointless Bore That Put Me to SLEEP!!. I saw this AWFUL excuse for a movie in the theater in the Spring of 1995, and to this day I consider it one of the WORST movies I have ever seen (to date) and an ABSOLUTE waste of the cost of the ticket.I don't even remember now (it being over a decade later) why I even went to see it.But I do remember how stupid and boring it was and how I kept dozing off throughout this sorry excuse for a film.Looking at some of the other reviews I can see that there are others who consider Johnny Mnemonic one of Keanu Reeves's biggest flops.I like Keanu Reeves, but he should br embarrassed for being part of such a waste of people's money and time!If I could give this movie NO STARS, or NEGATIVE STARS, I would. But I can't on this site, so I'm giving it 1 star, though it deserves much less!1 STAR!!!!!!
Diabolical. What a terrible DVD. I'm no pessimist, this was recorded horribly. Either Shannon Hoon's voice is awful or the recording was. I suspect it was the latter. I will admit, I'm not a hardcore Blind Melon fan, but I'd downloaded some of their songs like mouth full of cavities et al..and was very impressed. I read the previous reviews and took the gamble of buying the DVD. What a mistake. I also bought Alice in Chains Unplugged which is excellent. If you want to see a grown man wearing makeup and flaling his hands like an octopus while shreeking to the crowd buy this. Otherwise save your money.
Misleading. This film is really about brainwashing viewers into feeling sorry for illegal aliens.  Not only did these filmmakers capitalize on a small town called Farmingville, they're also promoting their liberal agenda at the same time.The real story about Farmingville should be about the adverse impact this invasion of 2000 men has on a small town.For example:- about how this neighborhood has been destroyed with 40-50 men living in houses- about how the resale value of homes have fallen 50% or more- about how women and children don't feel safe to visit the stores or ride their bikes around.- about how kids lemonade stands have disappeared, or why girl scouts are not allowed to go out and sell cookies- about this underground economy that does not pay any taxes- about how prostitutes are seen visiting overcrowded homes where these men liveWake up America. Don't let other people paint a picture of what they want your to see
For Girlie men. I was a bit disappointed in this tape.  The workouts are too easy.  I had masteredAbs of Steel I and was looking for Abs of Steel 2.  I couldn't find it so I bought this one but its too easy.  I found a used Abs of Steel 2 and I like it much better
One of the few cumbia style salsa instructionals BUT the quality is poor. OK.  I give these videos credit because nobody else is releasing "Cumbia Style" salsa instructional DVDs.  Cumbia style (back step basics) is still more of a street style and you will have a harder time finding formal instruction in this area yet many Latinos dance salsa this way (especially from Mexico, Central, and South America).  HOWEVER the instructors on this video/DVD do little to break it down well, their sense of rhythm is poor, the styling isn't good, and there is a lot of over explanation that only wastes time.  I got a good laugh here and there from some of the moves like the one where he bends over and rotates in one direction while she runs around in the opposite direction hovering over him with her fingers on his back.  Still I learned a few good moves on these releases but you really should supplement with other better quality DVDs.  I have to give him credit though.  Nobody else was bothering to cover this style of salsa and the market was already saturated with stiff and hokey looking ballroom mambo instructionals.
Clunky remake of a classic. For those who don't believe in vampires, all one needs to do is look at the movie Cat People.  At one time, this had been a great 1940s horror movie, but someone (or something!) got a hold of it and drained all the life from it.  The lifeless remnants of the original movie became this 1980s version, which seems to believe that all the classic version was missing was some blood and some nudity.After a nice-looking but rather slow prologue involving women mating with panthers in the distant past, we come to the present where Irena (played by Natasha Kinski) is arriving in New Orleans from some foreign land.  There she meets her brother, played by Malcolm McDowell, whose interest in her goes well beyond sibling love.Both are under a curse of sorts that forces them to turn into cats if they are sexually aroused (although for Irena, it doesn't occur until she actually completes the act).  In cat-form, they must kill before they can be restored to humanity.  Of course, soon enough, Irena falls in love and must deal with her curse.Where the original movie succeeded with implied horror - things lurking in the shadows and similar suspense-generating effects - this movie puts it all out in front of the viewer.  Comparisons with the original aren't really necessary, however:  this dud fails on its own merits, especially from the greatest of all crimes a horror movie can suffer from:  it's often boring.  Add to that a distinctly '80s style and soundtrack, and this movie also looks extremely dated.  Stick with the original.
Poor Release of Movie. I found this movie very poor and totally a waste of my time.  It's plot needs to be rewritten and it does not contain a deeper meaning.  The ending was very disapointing and without proper conclusion. Denzel Washington did a great job playing the detective and John Goodman is a very good actor yet the other charaters did not do thier job and was poorly acted. My recommendation is to stay away from this movie and save your money. Buy somthing that has a good plot. D- is my ratin
No classics, but not the worst movies ever made. BLOOD OF THE DRAGON-this is the only movie I thought was actually worth seeing on this DVD.  The movie is made just for Jimmy Wang Yu and while it is extremely cheap, it still provides quite a bit of fun.  Just like Master of the Flying Giullotine, the movie is given an odd touch with rock music in the credits and mixed throughout the film.  While it didn't work like Guillotine, it does add to the movie.  Basically Wang Yu plays a guy who has to help a kid give a list of names to a leader of rebels so that the government won't kill him.  Lung Fei plays his usualy villian role very well but unfortunately he is only a small type of henchman.  The whole movie is a build up to the final fight where a whole bunch of people come to take out Jimmy.  It is spectacular and very well choreographed for 1973.  There are also a couple of very funny parts where you can clearly see the spear not going through and just does not really close at all.  I only saw it 4 times though and it did not detract from Jimmy Wang Yu being one of the baddest and coolest dudes ever on screen.Picture quality is very bad but not unwatchable.  I give it a 2.5/5 but lean more towards a 3 than a 2.CHAMP VS. CHAMP-Dragon Lee and Godfrey Ho collaberate for an almost watchable kung fu movie.  It is very odd that I actually made it all the way through this as Dragon On Fire was the only other Lee/Ho movie that I accomplished this.  There is one really good fight, the second to last.  I think it was Eagle Han but they manage to put together enough kicks and well timed moves to make it look pretty good.  Dragon Lee also puts on a few decent kicks though like Van-Damme, he doesn't show any real power, he just sticks his leg up there.  The final fight is just godawful as they chose a pretty large guy to fight Dragon.  The villians all look as corny as normal but Dragon's master is somewhat likeable.Picture quality is kind of bad but pretty watchable.  I give this movie a surprising 1.5/5 and may have to lean towards a 2.BLOODFIGHT-this is truly one of the most unwatchable movies ever.  Yusuaki Kurata is in a tournamnet at the start at eh movie and throws some people around.  We seriously don't get another action sequence form him until the final fight with Bolo that I almost turned off.  But after spending 90 minutes watching it, I decided to stick out the last 5 minutes.  Wow I was majorly dissapointed.  If you are looking for a movie that does not explain ANYTHING, has Simon Yam as the main martial artist in the film, and has a white guy with a jean jacket and sunglasses as the main bad guy throughout the film, then you may want to check this out.This movie by far has the best picture quality on the DVD.  It starts off widescreen then turns to full 5 minutes in.  Still pretty good quality, just not a watchable movie.
Imploding magic. Ursula Le Guin's Earthsea books are full of magic, mystery, philosophy and intensely powerful storytelling.But you wouldn't know it by this lackluster adaptation. Instead, "Earthsea" aspires to be "Harry Potter" in a medieval "Lord of the Rings" setting, with two plots mishmashed haphazardly into one, shoddy special effects, laughable action scenes, and some seriously wooden acting.Rebellious, impatient Ged (Shawn Ashmore) attracts the attention of the wizard Ogion  (Danny Glover) when he magically rescues his village from raiders. He joins Ogion as an apprentice, but soon proves too impatient -- and so Ogion sends him to the wizard school on Roke, where Ged soon proves to be one of the most gifted pupils. But his pride and anger become his undoing, when he accidentally summons a foul demon.Meanwhile on the island of Atuan, the High Priestess (Isabella Rossellini) is slowly wasting away, and she hastily selects her successor, teenage Tenar (Kristin Kreuk). What no one knows is that the king of the Kargides is having her poisoned, and his priestess lover is trying to find a way into the labyrinth below, where the dangerous Nameless Ones are kept. To save all of Earthsea, Ged must brave its most terrifying dangers."Earthsea" basically is two books' worth of plots crammed together, but not well -- the entire tone is changed to "Harry Potter in Middle-Earth," with the plucky wizard pupil on a roadtrip with his funny chubby buddy against the forces of evil. The entire time at Roke just reeks of Hogwarts.Even if judged purely on its own merits, "Earthsea" is still a disaster -- the direction is clunky, and the special effects are amateurish at best. Moments that should have been brilliant, such as Ged's climactic confrontation with the Gebbeth, fall flat. By the time we get to the drippy, sentimental climax, the entire plot spirals into a Disneyesque lovefest that is nothing short of nauseating.And the script isn't much better. In fact, it's simply atrocious, full of unintentionally hilarious moments (a lisping dragon), deus ex machinae, a surprisingly silly demonic threat, and horribly written cliched dialogue ("So this is our destiny?" "If not us, then who?"). When Vetch and Ged dress up as Kargides to fool an idiot commander, you know the movie has hit rock bottom.It doesn't help that Ashmore and Kreuk are tolerable actors at best, but they get progressively more wooden as the plot continues. They're only saved by the greater talent of the other actors -- Chris Gauthier is lovable AND smart as Ged's best buddy, and Glover and Alan Scarfe are given too little to do as some paternal old wizards. (And Amanda Tapping has a split-second cameo)Isabella Rossellini deserves special credit as High Priestess Thar. I'm not sure what an actress of her caliber is doing in a movie like "Earthsea," but she saves every scene she's in -- she's warm, kindly, wise, powerful and devastating in her disapproval.The Sci Fi Channel tried to have it all in "Earthsea," but ended up with a muddled mess that tries to be everything, and ends up with nothing. Cliched, cutesy and only redeemed a little by some good acting
Confusing story line, but what I understood was okay. The problem here is the script, or perhaps the directing or the editing. Wherever the blame lies, the story of the movie just isn't clearly enough delineated to keep you involved the whole time. There are some touching scenes, some good acting, some moments that make you think and feel, but overall it just doesn't stack up.  Too bad, too, because there's some good performances here.  The only thing they did well is promote Kentucky Fried Chicken. Makes you wonder if the whole film was thought up by KFC advertising execs as a way to promote their restaurants...Guess that failed as hardly anybody's ever heard of this film
Great Movie! Terrible transfer... I was really excited to get one of my favorite movies on Blu-ray, but unfortunately, the transfer is awful. I really couldn't tell a difference between this version and the DVD version I have
boo. not very good not worth getting it is not good pokefan is wrong and im right not the same as original boo boo boo boo boo boo boo boo boo boo boo boo boo boo bo
Not what I expected.. Oh Leo.. why would you take this role?? I guess I can justify it since it was his early days. I rented this movie on whim. I thought this movie was perhaps a fun look at life as a teenager.. boy was I ever wrong. It was not about diaries and there was very little basketball involved. I was hoping for an inspirational story about a boy who came out of a rough neighborhood, wins the state basketball tournament, gets the girl and receives a full scholarship to Harvard, while recording these life changing moments in his diary. However, none of those events happened. I guess next time I will read the back of the movie to save myself many months of nightmares and therapy
tedious... If you are a casual Cheap Trick fan, don't buy this DVD. The sound quality is poor and the performances are uninspired. Even the great Bun E Carlos seems to be just "going through the motions." After seeing an inspired Cheap Trick show in person back in the early 80s, this DVD depicts a mere shadow of the former band that I knew back then. If you are a hard-core Cheap Trick fan, it won't be  total bust, but I wasn't happy with it. If I'm going to shell out money for these DVDs, I'd expect a lot more than what I got in this case.
Jesus, what a steaming pile of crap!. Julia Roberts plays Ed Harris' young new wife. Susan Sarandon plays Harris' ex-wife. Ex-wife does not like new wife. New wife does not like ex-wife. Ex-wife's cutsey, but bratty kids make new wife's life a living hell. Ex-wife thinks new wife is a stupid bimbo. New wife thinks ex-wife is a nagging battle axe. New wife and ex-wife fight and yell at each other ad nauseum. How does the film solve this conflict? Ex-wife is diagnosed with terminal cancer -- everyone reconciles, ex-wife and new wife suddenly love each other, the end. This is one of the most cliched, saccharine, hackneyed and shamelessly manipulative pieces of garbage put out by Hollywood in the past decade. If you like Julia Roberts, Susan Sarandon or Ed Harris, please see Erin Brokovich, Dead Man Walking and The Right Stuff and run screaming from this nauseating cinematic catastrophe
FFC Belittles His Own Classic By Altering The Score... Not only does the new music change the mood and quality of critical scenes, it's tantamount to watching old Batman episodes. As soon as something develops, in comes the cheesy music...The added scenes were poorly produced which is why they didn't make the original cut...The interviews seemed contrived.I'm not impressed.The older version supersedes the new
Attempting to tribute, copy, and mix many American movies. This movie was obviously made by Japanese fans of several American films.  It then tried to mix them all together in one film.The main ones are the Matrix, Reservoir Dogs, and Night of the Living Dead.  Especially the Matrix.We have several yakuza meeting at a specified location where they usually bury their victims, the location turns out to be a forest of reincarnation so their victims are coming back to life.Then it is a dead-come-back-to-life genre gore film heavy with feuding Yakuza elements.Our main character has the long black Matrix type coat and general emotionless demeanor.   The high-tech 360 camera movements of the Matrix are blatantly being imitated minus the high-tech aspect.  Instead it is obvious that the camera itself is being moved 360 around the action.I really hated the Matrix so a film mainly paying tribute to the Matrix already has a big strike against it.As for the other elements, they were all brought in awkwardly and it just seemed to constantly extend the story with another element of their favorite American movies that they wanted to include.The gore was mostly uncreative and uninteresting.Note that if you are looking for something different than typical American movies by checking out those wacky Japanese movies, you will not get it here
oh God, why?!!!!. I remember this movie being really, really fun and great when I was 9. My wife wanted this for our video collection and I hate myself for buying this movie. All I need to know is why she wanted this today! If you have kids, which we do, they'll enjoy this for the first time, but after words they'll be as bored with it as I am. If you are looking for nostalgia, this is the movie, but if you are looking for a good dust collector, buy it quickly
Shoddy "Ultimate Collectors Edition", get the standard edition. If I'm not mistaken, the ONLY difference between the standard 50th anniversary edition and the "Ultimate Collector's Edition" is1) Collectible Robby the Robot replica2) Forbidden Planet and The Invisible Boy reproduction lobby cards portfolio3) Forbidden Planet original theatrical poster mail-in offer4) Metal Alloy Collector's CaseIn that case, the "Ultimate Collector's Edition", at more than TWICE the price of the standard edition, is a rip-off!The "Robby the Robot replica" is much smaller and much less detailed than the one depicted in the adThe mail in offer for the "free" poster requires a $3.50 shipping and handling fee.The "Metal Alloy Collectors Case" is made of very thin metal and arrived dented.  Not that it would take much to dent it.Save $21.00 and buy the standard version
The Horror!  The Horror!. Well, I had to succumb.  I was attracted to this alleged film by it's notoriety as possibly the worst film ever made and a few of my friends who told me it was not that bad.  My low expectations for it were not only met but were exceeded.  This film reaches new cinematic depths.  It's complete ineptitude lacks even the charm of "Plan 9 from Outer Space."  It's stabs at humor are beyond pathetic they're just desperate.  Tom Green has to rank as the most unappealing screen presence, ever!  I felt sorry momentarily for accomplished actors like Rip Torn and Julie Hagerty who signed onto this dross but, hey, they cashed the checks.  Watching a few minutes of this slop is painful.  Enduring the full length of the film is outright masochistic.  To get the stench of this swill out of my consciousness I'm going to have to watch an actual good movie, like "Showgirls"
I love Asia Argento...but absolutely HATED this movie. First let me say that this movie DOES, indeed, have subtitles.  Unfortunately, this is just one of those annoying DVDs where you actually have to turn them on with your remote.I personally think that Asia Argento is sexy in a very skanky sort of way.  I shouldn't like her as much as I do, but I do anyway.  I think she's gorgeous and her pelvic tattoo is amazing.  I also think she usually has great taste in the projects she takes on in Europe, but her American films leave a lot to be desired.  Unfortunately, this is NOT one of her great European movies.  In fact, I think the other reviewers who refered to this movie as "pretentious" were being way too kind.While I admire what Asia was wanting to do with this movie, it comes across as more of a  PRETENTIOUS ( I couldn't think of a better word) teenage-goth-girl-sex-fantasy.  It's a low budget DV feature done in a pseudo-Dogma 95 style.  Translated that means the script is very minimal and the production values aren't all that great.  Some would have you believe this is for "artistic" effect.  Personally, I think that's a bunch of crap.  The teenage-goth-girl-sex-fantasy aspect gets REALLY old after about 5 minutes.  The lack of an interesting plot doesn't even make the more superficial T&A aspects worth watching.  (AND I LOVE MY T&A!!!!!!!)Besides the nudity, I think the only other aspect of this film I liked was the jab they took at director Gus Van Sant, refering to a fictional version of Cleopatra he would direct.  (I've heard the Italians don't like Gus or his movies.)My personal recommendation is not to waste your time with this movie.  If you  must watch this film, borrow a copy from a friend.  If none of your friends own it, or you don't have any friends, rent a copy.  If you are so absolutely obsessed with seeing this movie, to the point you just have to buy a copy, get one from Amazon Marketplace.  Don't pay more than $5 or $6 for it, it's 90 minutes of your life you will never get back again.
Not as good as the original!!. Once again, Hollywood runs out of ideas and remakes a movie that doesn't need to be remade.  Even with more colorful characters, there really is no need for this!  Save yourself time and watch the original
What's most tragic about this film . . . . . . . . . is that it's actually being discussed. I'm pretty down about the fact that I have so few ways in which to usefully spend my time that I am offering an opinion on this excrement. Exploitation of aging film stars is nothing new and if they are willing to be exploited then who am I to complain?; there's nothing objectionable about seeing a naked body on the screen, in my opinion; we all do stupid and regrettable things in our youth and they are, potentially, funny. However, certain crimes against the viewing public are inexcusable, namely the fact that WE HAVE SEEN IT ALL BEFORE, SO MANY TIMES. I, personally, feel insulted that we are being offered this crud but am also aware of a sense of doom that people are actually getting laughs from the tired, old, flogged cliches (you know, sock over turgid member, lustful older woman, kooky student, BOY WHO REALISES THE ERROR OF HIS WAYS etc., etc., etc). As a final tirade and the most astounding feature of all the reviews that have appeared before is that some so beguiled by their own "insights" that they are reviewing this film in a pseudo-academic manner. I was sure the word "ouvre" (if that's how it's spelt) would appear somewhere. Please, someone, tell me that nobody has yet written a PhD thesis on campus comedy, that most banal of film types. Please!!! Otherwise, truthfully, any pretension that we are an intelligent race may as well be buried once and for all.Yes, this is a truly terrible film in every sense of the word. It is a "comedy" that is genuinely depressing but we're getting pretty used to being fed swill now, am I right? And some are becoming quite fond of the taste . .
Not What I Thought. I bought this movie, not from amazon, but I got it, watched it and then sold it. I was hoping for something really cool, but instead it made no sense. I like weird, I like really weird, but this was soo weird that I couldn't follow it and from what I've read I think it was supposed to have some kind of socio-political message behind it. Maybe something was lost in translation or maybe its just bad. I wouldn't say don't watch it, it has some crazy moments, but I would just say its not really worth owning. The problem there is that for most people, they aren't going to find this one at the video store unless you have a serious alternative/indie rental place. This is just my opinion though, so take it with a grain of salt, I wouldn't let you keep me from getting a movie I wanted, so get it if it looks good to you.Other options: If you want creepy go with Takashi Miike's Audition, if you want twisted go with most anything Miike. If you want violent, twisted and also some cinematic beauty go with Chan-wook Park's Sympathy for Mr. Vengeance. You may have heard of Park's later movie Oldboy, ultimately more twisted and very good, but I like Sympathy for Mr. Vengeance better
" Not what I would like in a video for Christmas ". Extremely dry to watch not really humorus unless you are into very dry humor and I do not think kids are...I bought because I did not know about this video before hand it was in the family kids section in the Borders Book Store. I cannot take it back so what to do with it...UGH!I guess another unused dust collector on my video rack...We decided it was for adults... but then my adult daughter said she did not like it so I guess it is better to know what it is about before buying it
Blank pages. "Morvern Callar" was a film destined to cause some trouble, for a number of reasons. Of them:#1- A movie adaptation that plays loose and fast and false with the book is often going to cause trouble.#2- Whereas many high-minded films and their critics have decided subtlety is a wonderful thing, this movie has decided "If some subtlety is good, more subtlety must be doubly as good!"#3- People who watch the movie are caught between their frustration with the film'd deliberate inaccessibility and their fear of appearing ignorant when rendering judgement. Thus, you have opinions that hang around on the poles of the extremes, with very little in the middle.#4- This is not really a dog on the movie itself, but you do have to wonder about the kind of people who write reviews and get on message boards that sneer "If you don't like this movie, go watch The Fast and The Furious." As if anyone who does not like this movie is a wifebeater-wearing, greasy cinema Philistine.#5- The idea that this movie is superior because it does not, quote "spoon-feed you" all the answers. I would venture that there is a difference between "spoon-feeding" answers and being purposefully evasive and disingenuous to the movie audience.#6- Samantha Morton is in this movie. That's cause for a lot of trouble, for you see Samantha Morton is a talented actor (I just learned two months ago we're not supposed to use the word actress anymore) who has amassed a cadre of "devoted" (re: rabid) fans who believe that anything she touches turns to gold. Morton has definitively proved her acting chops in movies like "Jesus's Son," "Sweet And Lowdown," and "Code 46" but went really awry in the saccharine "In America" and the sputtering "Minority Report." Morton is a good actor, she's even a good actor for what she's given in this movie.Unfortunately, that's not enough. This movie gives her too little, or perhaps too much, to work with. There is too much subtlety to this whole movie. Blank pages for the audience to ascribe what they think to them. You can either decide that look means she's torn up inside or not. You're given so little to work with, you can't say either way. Anyone who claims to have the definitive keys to this movie I would be suspicious of as a fraud out to elevate their standing.This movie doesn't give you a key, or a lock, and nowadays that's supposed to be something to be proud of. It's not. You can make a movie in this fashion, but it needs... for lack of a better word, "meat" to it. People go and walk and do things and mess around and party but they don't truly seem to interact with each other or their environment. Emotions that I think were meant to seem complex and multidimensional seem to be totally ignored. A feeling of numbness and even inability for release would be nice, but the audience is not even given that. Halfway through the film we begin to suspect that we're being strung along, and the ending confirms that suspicion.Stranger still, this movie gives off a very anachronistic feel to it, the film quality and setting looks like it was made in 1988 or some time.In short, I don't care for this movie. Morton did a good job with what she had to work with, but in the end this film just did not do enough, confront enough, or accomplish enough. The way this movie has been structured, I believe the reviews on here tell more about the reviewer than the movie. This movie is blank pages. Stare at them, try and figure them out. Make of them what you wish. Just don't attempt to pass any of it off as gospel truth
Gave it 45 minutes and turned it off!. This movie was so boring and stupid, I turned it off after about 45 minutes.  Maybe I had a poor copy, but I could barely understand what Paula Prentiss was saying -- and it wasn't because she was &quot;under the influence!&quot;  I ran it back a few times but still couldn't make it out.  From the other reviewers, it sounds like it got better but, if something doesn't grab my attention after 30 minutes, I say forget it
One Star just to be kind. Actually not going to be kind........... What a load of RUBBISH
Too Self-Aware and Self-Indulgent To Be Real Fun. What can you say about "Dead & Breakfast"?  I picked this up at the store not knowing much about it other than it had a cute title, clever holographic packaging, a few decent reviews and a young, appealing cast.  I can say that the charms, unfortunately, of the actual film are relatively limited.  Pretty standard fare, really--I didn't necessarily dislike it--I just felt that it was so obvious in its intention.This film wants to be cool.  It was designed to (hopefully) be a cult classic.  It wants you to revel in its self-aware kookiness.  But that's just the problem.  Taking its cues from so many better movies, this is a self-indulgent and unoriginal mess.  The cast and filmmakers seem to be having a good time--you know this was a party set.  It seems as if they feel that they are doing us a great service by letting us in on the joke.  Well, I've heard the joke--so don't do me any favors.I'm not saying that there aren't some amusing moments--how can you fail with redneck zombies?  And musical numbers are always fun.  And the TV-ready cast will be familiar to many, even if you can't always place from where.The movie imagines that it's "Evil Dead 2," but it lacks real cleverness.  It works slightly better as a comedy than anything else, but it's hard for me to imagine anyone being captivated by this
Disturbing. This is an intriguing movie that compels the viewer to search for the film's deeping meaning.  I am sure that I missed much of that meaning.  However, one aspect of it is painful clear.  The crux of this movie centers on the premise that seemingly innocent women can be sexually exploited and over time they were come to accept and thrive on that exploitation.  I found that premise disturbing and unrealistic.  Also, it left me with the fear that women hating men could use that premise to justify their abuse of the opposite sex.  If so, this movie could contribute, in a small way, to the perpetuation of the subjugation of women or at least the fantasy thereof.Watch this movie if you must, but be critical of its assumptions about male/female relationships.
Sweet Dreams Movie. I purchased this movie for my kid sisters and I was extremely disappointed in it. The characters in the movie weren't like the characters in the shorter videos like "Strawberry Shortcake In Ice Cream Island or Cooking up Fun." The appearance of the characters were more digital and phony. They appeared to have a latex type of face and body. They also didn't sound the same as they do in the other videos.As far as the story it wasn't bad. The sleep bug was sooooo cute. You got to see the sandman and how he makes dreams. I think if they left the characters they same as they were in the other videos I would've enjoyed it more and so would've my sisters
What a Waste!. I bought this collection hoping it would be good...it's the same old junk they've been playing on CMT. Reba's music videos are OKAY, nothing great, and I figured that they would be specially edited or something for this DVD...but they aren't. Very disappointed. Waste of money. Reba can't sing worth beans! Her voice sounds terrible! Reba needs to get off her a** and get a REAL job instead of mooching off of these hard working country fans. Get a life REBA
JohnyGluebag. ****this review is NOT for the superbit version*****The 2 star rating is not for the movie, but the fact that the description on this site says its widescreen; it kind of sucks when you get the movie in the mail, it says on the movie case its widescreen, yet its full screen, not much you can do.Can someone at Amazon change the product description to reflect whats going on?  It would help out
parochial and myopic. One of the most monumental events in the history of American sports, the 2001 World Series is perhaps more worthy than any other sports topic of a comprehensive, informed and inspired film document. This film is not that document.The premise of the filmmakers is that the New York Yankees, because they chose to play after September 11 rather than abandoning the season, should be regarded as saints. They then maintain that it was the patriotic duty of the Yankees' opponents to roll over and lose in order to improve the moods of their non-playing interview subjects (all New Yorkers). Meanwhile, the players responsible for the most courageous and inspiring performance in baseball history are cast as villains, and the city that experienced the greatest moment of sports-inspired civic pride in American history is ignored.Here are three reasons why this World Series will be talked about in 2051 that were barely, if it all, talked about in this movie:1. There has never been a greater contrast in the backgrounds of the two participants in a professional sports championship: the most celebrated, decorated team in American sports history against one that was only playing its fourth season. The Yankees were fielding teams when Arizona was not even a state! I would make the argument that not only was this the most important event in Arizona SPORTS history, but by way of having so little traditionally defined history, this was the biggest thing ever to happen in Arizona period!2. By virtue of becoming the first pitcher to win three games in one series since Mickey Lolich, Randy Johnson became the unchallenged star of the series. The most spectacular pitching performer since Nolan Ryan, this series marked his transformation from star to legend. While it's unfortunate that he did not make himself available for interviews that is no reason to be giving him passing mentions instead of prominent ones.3. There is no more magical moment in sports than a bottom-of-the-ninth come from behind rally by the home team to win the seventh game of a World Series. What will place this in the realm of the greatest sports legends is that it occurred in the context of a blown save by the greatest relief pitcher in the history of the game.For Pete's (and Pinnacle Peak's) sake let's all hope that fans from both of these cities someday get the film about this series that they deserve.
Denise Richards Strikes out. A bad movie. Not even if Denise had been nude, it still would have been bad
disappointing. i had never known that there was a movie made about the life story of one of my very favourite singers patsy cline.well they needn't have bothered as it was a very much by the numbers story something definetely not above anything that you would see as a midday movie on any weekday.i liked both of the main actors,jessica lange and ed harris.the problem for me was that there was no attempt at conveying any real depth to the characters.whilst i appreciate that there has to be some element of fiction in most bio-pics anyone watchimg the movie and not having heard of patsy cline would be none the wiser for her motivations and driving forces.the only saving grace for me was that patsys singing was used in the movie to at least try to convey the quality that others saw in her singing
The Tyler Pery Collection. I ordered these, and several other movies from the Tyler Perry Collection, only to find that they were not actual movies but on-stage plays. I returned them and was charged a high restocking fee. Not OK! No where in the description was mention of them being stage plays. I will order my CD's and DVD's from another source in the future.
Disappointing Second Set. With the exception of disc# 6 this collection was very disappointing.  It was obvious that the show lost its charm after season #3 and was well on its way out before Paul Reubens little incident.   However, if you liked Pee-Wee Herman the first collection under Playhouse#1 is excellent.  It was fresh and innovative.  My 3 year old loves the first 6 discs.  Disc #7 to disc #10 are actually pretty bad and not worth the purchase.  They should have included disc #6 with the first set.  Anything after that was simply not entertaining.  The quality of all the discs still is excellent.
Selma Blair gets some interracial lovin'. That's the only good thing about this movie. Well, also her dialogue during the aforementioned scene is great. Otherwise this is just shock-value schlock cinema posing as "controversial art.
What a snooze fest. Legally Blonde 2 - Red, White & Blonde is a very disapponting sequel to the blockbuster hit 2001, Legally Blonde. I love the original so much but the this one is slow, boring, has a stupid premise, and Reese looks like she hated filming this movie. All the magic is gone, people still treat Elle like she is an idiot. Sally Field's character is heartless and cold as well, Luke Wilson makes a brief apparance as Elle's boyfriend and yes they do get married in the end. This sequel focuses on Animal Rights in Washington D.C. Elle worries about the safety of her dog, the adorable Bruiser but I just couldn't get in to the story or new characters. Poor Reese, she is a wonderful actress, but maybe she should have read the script again before she agreed to take this sequel head on. Forget this film, buy the original instead.
They made Punk look BORING.... This volume is so hit or miss it's just insane.  I thoroughly enjoyed the coverage on early rock 'n roll, but after those first two episodes it seemed like the writers just didn't know what they wanted to say.What's really odd is that this "rockumentary" missed some fairly important stuff.  For instance they only covered The Beatle's early years, when they were just a straight ahead rock and roll band.  Granted, I hate the Beatle's later experimental garbage but still, I recognize it's significance to rock and roll and the huge influence it had on many other bands, who chose to, likewise, produce experimental garbage.  Instead the documentary bipassed the Beatle's mid and later years entirely and went straight to American dirty-hippie rock.And despite many interviews where Pete Townshend discussed rock music The Who themselves got shortchanged badly.Weirdest of all was how dreadfully boring they made the history of punk rock.  In that episode, they talked to Patti Smith and showed footage of her for about 15 minutes of the hour documentary only to hit on the Clash for about 3!  And they interviewed Sex Pistol's manager Malcolm McClaren FREQUENTLY in this episode.  No one in history has ever believed a word this man said but the camera's present his interviews as straight-up-truth.  I think these writers knew nothing about punk.Anyway, watch the first two episodes.  If you like hippie music (I don't) then watch the next few episodes too, cause they were actually done fairly well
Read the book. Don't bother wasting your time with this movie, instead read the book.  The book was one of the best I have ever read, the movie left me wanting.  I rented the movie after reading the book and never made it all the way through.  So maybe I am being unfair since I did not watch the whole movie, but honestly I couldn't, it just didn't do the story justice
I'M SORRY... I FIND THIS BADLY WRITTEN. spoilers!. Yes, this is a supernatural psycological thriller... but far from a good one as far as I'm concerned.I love these kinds of stories and I went to see this film with a lot of excitement... first because it has a interesting subject. Second because it has a great actor. I thought Denzel Washington would never associate himself with a bad script... but I was wrong.But Denzel is always top notch. The rest isn't.By now you already know the story. A good detective... a killer who happens to me a demon who happens to pass from person to person just by touch... the hunt... blah blah blah....The script is idiot from page one.The killer (as we will see as the story develops) travels by simple touch. So... excuse me... why doesn't the killer passes to a guard as he is going to be executed??? I mean... The guy is sooo powerful (and mobile) that I find it unbelievable that he gets to be executed in the first place.But... ok... let's give the screenwriters a break.Somewhere in the middle of the film, the demon enters a cat. Ok... so he can enter all kinds of animals. Fine.Later on, the main character learns that in order to defeat the demon, he must kill his body in a place where there is nobody around. His brilliant idea: the forest. Full of animals.Was I the only one who did not know the ending before it came????Want more?In an interesting twist, the protagonist kills an innocent man and later on... his own brother. And no one will believe the truth! How is he gonna get out of such a mess???In the world of storytelling, there are only two ways of getting out of such an impossibly difficult situation: EITHER the screenwriter is brilliant and finds a believable way to save his character from the master mess built by the screenwriter himself - so he should know! (and then we get some sort of positive ending despite everything...) OR something deep inside the protagonist fails and he loses the battle against evil (despite the fact that there was a way out).First line of solution: Die Hard, The Fugitive.Second line of solution: S7ven, Chinatown.We have none of that here.Instead we have an evil god against a simple man (great starter for drama, right?) ...BUT the man gets weaker and weaker and weaker... and the demon gets stronger and stronger... to the point where we get the fact that the demon IS invincible long before he actually wins. And the great turnaround never comes.Obviously we all hope he will be defeated... and that's why I kept myself seated all through the film... because if there was a way out... it would be brilliant. If the character dropped the towel... it would be thought provoking to say the least.But no... the ending was easy and predictable. The screenwriter could not achieve one of the two possible lines of solutions. He wrote the first thing that came to his mind and hid himself under "The story ends bad" label. Without any depth.Every villain has a weak point. It is up to the hero to explore it (may he loose or win). The only problem the hero faces here is a stupid lack of data. We have the data the moment the demon enters a cat. That's why we know how's gonna end.What about the girl who helps Denzel? What about his nephew? Shouldn't they be part of the ending too? Don't come with the "this is an open-ending" kind of talk!Do I sense a smell of desire for a sequel?Quick! Gas masks!!!! Or... as A.C.Doyle would write: "Quick, Dr. Watson, the needle!"Despite a stupid screenplay. Denzel is always great.
Blood and Black Lace disc won't play on some players. WARNING!  The Blood and Black Lace disc has a known problem with not being able to play in a Philips/Magnavox 825 and various Pioneer players including: DV-414, DV-515, and DVL-909
I hate framing movies. After reading the storyline of this movie, it seems like a framing movie, so I didn't even bother to watch it because framing movies piss me off.
This is one messed up HD-DVD. I could not get this disc to work right on either of my HD-DVD players.  It won't allow access to menues and it is extremely slow to respond.  I have a lot of HD-DVDs and this is the only one I regret buying
I kept watching: I didnt know they could make movies this bad. This film is so awful it will keep you watching just to see if it can get any worse. It has the feel of a cheap documentary, from the first scene it is clear that the budget is almost non existent.It seems like they rented a couple of apartments in Bucharest and decided to make a home video. Snipes is awful, his character is some ex-CIA operative who has everyone against him the only way forward is to break out those quick fire martial arts moves the we know and love. To make matters worse Snipes does Bugsy Malone style narration that makes the movie even more hilarious. One expects decent action from Snipes and to be honest there are some good action scenes and something to look out for is the ridiculous damage done to some of the bad guys, I am convinced some of the stuntmen suffered injuries because some stunts look clearly unsafe and would never been allowed to be performed in Hollywood becuase of the lack of safety.Let's hope Snipes avoids these type of films in the future
He's no Robert Redford. After reading the novel The Great Gatsby for school I went out and rented the 1974 version of the movie. I absolutely adored it. It showed the characters personalities as they were in the book. After that we watched the 2001 version in school and I found it to be almost unbearable. The acting was poor exspecially on the part of Toby Stephens (Gatsby). He seemed like more of a mix of Joey from friends and Boy George than a love struck man. While the hit and run scene did prove to be rather entertaining, over all I feel that this movie is just a waste of time and you would be much better off watching the 1974 version
Problem with the XBox360. This is the second HD DVD that I've had issues with the XBox360 player, the other being Children of Men. Ironically, both are dual format. While Children of Men refused to play, this one refuses to go past chapter 12. I've had no issues with my PS3 playing any of the Blu-Ray movies so it begs the question, what is wrong with this format? I've got another dual format HD DVD/DVD disk that I'm going to try. Anyhoo, if you're using the XBox360 HD DVD player, this movie might not play all the way for you or might not even play at all
Just Plain Stupid -- Actually Zeo stars. Why was this ever made? Just to make fans of the original mad? Rod Serling is rolling over in his grave. When I originally saw this in Burbank, CA, we were screaming and groaning at the screen
Long and Bleak. As indignity upon indignity is heaped on our protagonist, one gets a distinct whiff of self-loathing if not actual homophobia in this depiction of a young gay man's exploitation in the big city. Mandragora is way too long, relentlessly bleak and only has a couple of novel cinematic tricks to spark a bit of interest
This Waiting Waiting Waiting is Tough. At the end of this film Gene Hackman's character, strung out thanks to his surveillance heavy lifestyle, finally snaps and pulls apart his house in search of a mythical bug. This scene concludes an examination of the psychological toll that surveillance takes not only on the listen-ee but also the listener. Hackman plays Harry Caul, a surveillance expert who is at the top of his field. He gets assigned a mysterious conversation that he has to piece together throughout the film. More interesting to me was to see all the little ways that his job affected his life. He staunchly defends privacy, even though it is his job to invade it. He refuses to open up to people because he is paranoid that anything he says will be used against him. I know that today it is very fashionable to criticize Bush and his wire tapping program but this film only piles on. The chilling affect we watch take place in the world of Harry Caul is a microcosm for what is happening in our world today. Simply because you are aware of Bush's spying ways causes you to engage in self-censorship every time you send an email or talk on a cell phone. Harry deals with the reality of his situation by descending into madness, and while that may not be healthy I'm not going to be the one to say that he is handling it the wrong way.While there are lessons here that deal with living in Bush's America, this still isn't a very good film. This is a much smaller scale than Coppola usually deals with and it doesn't seem to be a very good fit for him. The script was original and unpredictable. However, it was also slow and filled with nonsense. I watched the film twice and still don't have a firm grasp on what happened at the end. Also, the scene in which we visit Harry's twisted dream was a total miss for me. The purpose was to show just had mad he had gone. To me it looked like Coppola losing control of his script and inserting a scene which only served to take the viewers out of the film. Hackman gives a good performance which was the norm for him pre-"Unforgiven."  A dashing Harrison Ford is trotted out to remind us of just how old he has gotten. Still, this film falls flat.Most of the film involves Harry trying to figure out the entire conversation. The tools he is using look downright quaint compared to what we know Big Brother is using today. I liked the way this film reminded me of "Rear Window." As in that film we watch as a lonely man has his imagination run away from him. It is a theme that affects us in our daily lives. Every story we hear has holes and lies in it. We have to fill those holes and sort out the BS to come to a perceived reality. But what if we're wrong? Nobody likes being called paranoid and nobody likes to be asleep at the wheel. If for no other reasons watch this film to explore these ideas. Then think about whether your communication behavior is paranoid or ignorant, and whether your Ok with your cell phone coming with a built in bug. **1/2
Baseball lovers only. If you don't enjoy baseball at all, then you won't enjoy this movie
all the clever British humor can't save this one... If this movie were set in the US, I would've given it 1 star but the British accent, humor, and colloquialisms partially saved it...but not enough, sorry to say!Why not?  Because despite a few mildly surprising and utterly contrived plot twists here and there, this film is still built on a particularly toxic myth: the desperately lonely and insecure 30-something single woman who is made to be as endearingly pathetic as possible for the audience to root for her inevitable finding by a Mr. Right.  Here, the film accomplishes that by making the central character tubby, clumsy, and possessing ridiculously bad luck and ill timing.Almost from the first 5 minutes, this movie just reeks of focus-group-inspired audience manipulation as it slogs through the same old trite cliches and recycled TV-sitcom bits.  Was there even ONE half-original character in this whole movie?  Don't remember any...maybe because I'd like to forget this dreadful cringe-fest of a flick ASAP
Honorably Courageous. Has everything:  a remarkable true story of a determined hero and the love of family in making his accomplishment even more special.  It makes you want to applaud his courage in many scenes, especially when he succeeds an incredibly painful test to stun his supervisory review board, winning their applaud as well.  This is a don't miss story told by tremendous acting throughout...20 star performances!  Thank you for sending me a copy.  -
letdown. I was very disappointed with this dvd. The last reviewer was spot on in their review. If you just want to see and hear some of these celebs talking, then get this dvd, but if you want more insight as to the photos, how they're taken, etc. then don't waste your money on this
boring and not a good work out. This was way too slow and not challenging. I would recommend it for elderly people, or people new to working out in general, not just new to yoga
Depressing. The good thing about this movie is that it didn't last more than it did. Not that it's bad, no, it's a fine depressing movie. It may be very well acted -Duvall is great all right-, with nice songs perhaps, well directed if you like... But unless you feel identified with these characters -and I don't- there's no way you can enjoy watching this.This is what I saw: All the characters here are self-centered individuals, conceited, self-pitying, deplorable and depressing. Duvall plays a drunk who quits drinking to start (perhaps) a new life. That he in the past was a sucessful country singer makes no difference to me, it just adds to his self-pity. I couldn't find anything positive in this story. Even the kids that show are aggravating with their persistent questions.The picture we have here is that of a bunch of losers and dreamers. Everybody seems to blame someone else for his miseries. The children their parents, the wives their ex-husbands (& viceversa). Death, either thru war or car accidents, plays a major role too. It seems people have trouble getting over it, looking for someone to blame it on. Then the scenes in the church... I'm not sure what they are intended for. The three main characters (Duvall, Harper and the kid) go to church; him and the kid even get baptized, but they have no idea what church is all about; to them it's a social ritual (a tradition, a superstition?). This is not a movie about faith. It's about the troubles of these guys; the lady needs a man because she's young and lonely; the man needs... he needs to grow up; the kid needs a father and some homework. Nobody cares for others, only for themselves.Honestly, the irony about this movie is that it's so realistic and its characters so phony. I understand why Duvall went immediately to make 'The Apostle', where he plays a role opposite to this one
Very basic. Not a bad video, but extremely easy.  I am not in great shape and it doesn't really challenge me.  But if you are really just starting to work out, it might be a good video to try
The Aweful. The only reaosn this show gets more than one star is because at the very least you can see that money is spent on it. the presentation is solid.however,if i wanted to watch (let alone buy) a series which is centered around a bunch of wanking rich kids i would walk around at the highschool i graduated from 7 years ago.its all the same uninteresting [...] that people escape come graduation time senior year.ive listened to scattered episodes from several seasons as background noise after whatever i was watching before it, but the show itself is aweful.like i said, a bunch of rich kids with nothing to gripe about, griping about nothing. bottom line: [...] happens. you either get passed it, or you dont.maybe my take on it is skewed by living (born and raised) in santa barbara CA which is about 2 hours north of the (real) OC, but is riddled with the same kinds of rich-kid problems.i would rather kill my time watching grass grow than sit down and actually watch this kind of dribble.do yourself a favor: read a book rather than buying the DVDs of the O
not my cup of tea but ok. d item was not fo me but d bits and pieces ive seen of d show r really gud and if ur n 2 d hole prison ting den dis is a gud 1 2 go fo
For this very reason, one star. I copied and pasted the bottom of this from another reviewer here.   I have not seen this DVD, but thanks to this person for not wasting my money.   For some dunb ass reason people that film so many shows do NOT GET IT!  we fans do NOT want to see a bunch of camera shots back and forth of the crowd!!  WHO, pray tell, when they are at a concert in person spends a bunch of time looking around the fans and not the show??? GET IT YET??  DOH!  simple!  Keep the cameras on the SHOW!  and DONT change from one camera to another every 5 SECONDS!  that pisses me off too to no end.   learn this, watch Roger Waters DVD in the flesh, learn learn LEARN!!!!!!!!!!The concert was recorded with many camera perspectives although Ned O'Hanlon said in an @U2.com interview that the expenses on that show were just a small fraction compared to the expenses for recording the Boston show. The spirit of the entire show is captured very well, shots from and of the audience are used very often and reflect its enthusiasm
This was RIDICULOUS. Someone please slap me because I BOUGHT this movie at my local grocery store thinking that it was going to be a documentary or something.  In reality, this was not even a B movie... is there such thing as an "F" movie.I do not think real film was used to for this movie... just cheap Beta tapes and a video camera 1981.  Furthermore, the only accurate "fact" in this movie was the name of the killer.  Dear Ulli, BTK did NOT carry around a picnic basket full of scorpions, tarantulas and rats to the crime scenes.  And when the "Nancy" character said "I know you... You're the dog catcher" I thought I was about to fall off my seat.  Dear lord in heaven, please do not rent, buy, borrow or steal this pathetic movie.  The fact that it was completely inaccurate, looked like it had been filmed by a 12-year old and contained non-sensical, gratuitous violence should be reason enough to stay far, far, far away from this piece of crap
The Brat Pack Comes of Age. "St. Elmo's Fire" is one of those movies that could have been better, should have been better and yet, it just wasn't.It featured an ensemble cast of THE young and hot stars of the 1980s, the so-called Brat Pack (well, everyone but Molly Ringwald and Anthony Michael Hall, who were spared this misstep).  Maybe this was supposed to be "The Breakfast Club - - After College", but while "The Breakfast Club" had characters, even stereotypical characters, that you could relate to, there is absolutely no one, with the exception of Emilio Estevez' character, that you care enough about to relate to in this film.The setting is not the John Hughes teen friendly Illinois, but Georgetown, where our bunch of Brat Packers have supposedly graduated from college.  Uh-huh.  Yeah, RIGHT.Judd Nelson and Ally Sheedy are living together and supposedly looking toward marriage - - problem is, Nelson is looking at and screwing everything else female that walks by and somehow hoping that Sheedy, in her prim and proper sweater and skirt sets and pearls can change that.  Andrew McCarthy is their mutual friend who knows what Nelson is up to and secretly harboring a festering desire for Sheedy (or maybe it's just the pearls?)  Emilio Estevez is a future attorney, working as a waiter/server and suffering a serious crush on Andie MacDowell.  Mare Winningham is a dowdy, trust-fund type girl who is still holding on to her virginity, working in social services and fighting over marrying the proper dork that her parents have selected for her.  She instead fantasizes about Rob Lowe, who is the pretty boy sax player in a local band, who has dropped out of school, married a white trash-y looking groupie, had a child with her and has now separated from her, and taking up with other groupies.  Demi Moore is the wild chick who works in international banking, has a serious coke problem, stepmother issues and a problem with painting her apartment walls hot pink and with giant murals of Billy Idol.Sounds promising, huh?  Well, in what is an early portend of the "Melrose Place" to come, Sheedy finds out what a dog Nelson is, dumps his ass, immediately jumps into bed with McCarthy, who is too desperately in love with her to realize that this is a rebound job; Estevez, after screwing up a lucrative house-sitting job by hosting a party there, travels to the snowy mountains to track down MacDowell and profess his love to her.  He finds that she is holed up there with her boyfriend and despite being crushed, he lays a huge kiss on her and then heads back home.  Lowe, in between faux-playing his sax and shaking his feathered head everywhere, takes Winningham's virginity and heads back to his estranged missus.  Moore, after whining seemingly incessantly about her ill stepmother, has all her furnishings repossessed, loses her job and freaks out.Not exactly "The Breakfast Club".The real problems seem to lie in the characters themselves.  With the exception of Estevez' character, they all seem like caricatures and horribly stereotyped.  Their every action, every line of dialogue seems like just that - - they seem very one dimensional.  Their so-called angst seems like a handy plotline device and nothing more than that.Winningham's character could have been salvagable - -except that she followed Lowe around like a sick puppy, knowing full well how he mistreated his wife and what a basic slacker he was.  And yet, she still gave her virginity to him.  Maybe if Winningham wasn't so bright, or she was a college freshman, it would be understandable.  But she was a college graduate and seemingly intelligent.Lowe really had little to do with his role.  Maybe if he had played the role Nelson had - - as the roving Lothario, with Sheedy waiting at home, it might have gone over better.  With his too-pretty looks, it would almost be understandable how the character could get random women he just met to sneak into dressing rooms with him.  Nelson just doesn't seem comfortable and doesn't pull it off - -but maybe Nelson might have been better suited for the sax player.Moore basically plays herself - -an interesting sidenote is that she was originally fired from this production for her drug problems, mirroring her character - - but was later rehired.While the title song later become a minor hit, "St. Elmo's Fire" itself missed the mark.
Don't bother. Sorry I can't recommend this one.  I bought it USED (thankfully) based on all the nice/good reviews here. I don't think we watched the same film.If you don't like movies where the characters talk to the viewer, you won't like this one
Lousy. Did Nicholson read the script before signing for this movie? Was he broke that he had to act? Has he reached senility to accept to play in such a poor scenario?Well, as a fan, I am totally disappointed. Don't waste your money for this, it is not worth
Profoundly unfunny and completely unwatchable film. Completey and utterly unfunny performances by Oldman and Roth. Stoppard may be a brilliant playwright but a filmmaker he is not, having botched a great potential for his play on the big screen. We get instead a literal and utterly uncinematic treatment of his much-touted play. Watching the first fifteen minutes of "heads, heads, heads, heads, heads, heads, heads, heads, heads," is colossal torture, like status elipticus. It's suited to the stage maybe but can never play well on the big screen. Having hopes it might pick up, that was dashed as the entire film seem to lack any momentum or any type of cinematic sensibility whatsoever. A classic blunder of failing to recognize two different mediums. Don't take my word for it, watch it yourself and see.
so bad it scared me out of eating. i watched troll 2 on showtime beyond(showtime's horror/sci-fi movie channel) and like the movie itself is SO bad it's laughable!i mean the part where joshua screams out "your a genius big sister" nearly made me fall out of my chair laughingthe movie takes place in a small town where EVERYONE is a veganand like the religous people there have a phobia towards those who eat meat and they are "unpure" if they eat it which ironically saves johusa in the movie by eating a double decker sandwich with meatthe goblins in this movie ARE creepy esspeically the one with the bolding eyes EEK!anyway thoughout the flim joshua is looking at pictures of CREEPY looking trolls which is ironic considering it's golibinsanyway in the movie the only way for the golibins to eat is for someone to eat something so they could eat them!i'm not a child but that still is a scary thought!after watching this movie i didn't look at green and red the same way again nor could i eat muchonly watch this movie if you are looking for a  laugh
Predictable and Uneven. I'm not going to write too much. If you need to hear more just check other reviews down here.From all the 3 episodes only the first one, by Kar-Wai, is worth your time."The Hand" is well done and typical Kar-Wai. Beautifully shot by his usual contributor Christopher Doyle, it's the most compelling and sexy episode of the bunch. Gong Li, always very elegant, give us a powerful sexy scene and her presence establishes and guide the rest of the story. Well crafted but very predictable. The director lately seems to be referencing himself, which is halfway form self parody."Equilibrium" is just a bad cinematic joke and absolutely non sexy. Other than a few gratuitous and unrelated naked shots, is a simple and boring exchange between Downey Jr. playing an adman and his analyst played by Arkin.But the worst by far is the Antonioni's episode. Is just so poorly done and acted that is an embarrassment. The, once, great director should have just retired by now (he was 91 in 2004) and let the rest of the world appreciate his masterpieces
Not what I expected. This was one of the first things I ordered through Amazon, and I guess being new I was naive.  I was expecting the Disney version and got the Hans Christian Anderson version and there is a world of difference.  I felt it was my fault and did not send it back.  It came in a timely manner and was in perfect condition
..not the same as earlier edition, sigh!. I recently purchased a copy of this edition, having loaned a niece with children my copy from a couple of years ago (which I may not get back...but that's okay) last Christmas.  It's a let-down from the other version; the interview with Arthur Rankin (informative) is missing, the scene where Yukon finds his dream as Rudolph and Santa are leaving Christmastown is cut out (one of the key scenes deleted from the TV airings to make room for ads) again, yet the question on the trivia game on it is there.  The Destiny's Child video is okay for the younger audiences but..me, I have an idea; why not a little info and maybe footage of who first popularized the song in the first place: Gene Autry?I just ordered another copy of the older edition from 2000.
It's Just Alright. This movie was alright, but not something I'd like to watch again. Once is enough. I never knew Sheila E. had starred in "Krush Groove" and it was kind of weird hearing her rap and mingling with hip-hop artist. She really looked out of place. Other than that, this movie isn't anything to write home about
Totally unrealistic and annoying. The main character came across as gay to me too. This movie is in no way realistic. The other reviewer is right about everything. It's a really cheap movie made by amateurs using plastic toy guns, the actors jerk the guns to make them look like they have a kick. The &quot;martial arts&quot; in the movie are weak and sloppy, there's no way that crap would actually work in real life. I don't even know why I bothered to watch the whole thing, I guess I just found the stupidity amusing. The cover makes it look like it would be a cool movie, unfortunately that's the only thing they put much effort into. I rented it from Block Buster too, they need to burn it. This movie looks like some kind of a high school project or something, like they had to make a movie to pass drama class
dirty work blows. i love norm macdonald and this is the dumbest movie of all tim
Can't stand being negative..but here goes. Okay. The premise of this movie had wings.I mean here we have a crazed asylum patient trapped in a spooky hospital for eternity trying to get out.Fun stuff..right.Not in the hands of this director.I mean, when the only good scare devices you can offer up are an exploding clown and a dog thats had it's day, your in trouble, Mr. Director.Okay..lets try to right some wrongs done by this movie.Right- Scary HospitalWrong- Un Scary plot devicesRight- Dead people making twitching movementsWrong- Exploding Clowns and rushes of violent air ala Evil Dead-       but much worseRight- My complete and utter hate for the jock in the movieWrong- My complete and utter hate for all of the actors in thismovie- I mean, come on who in the hell was this Shaftwannabe and why didn't that dead dog rip a whole in hiscranium before we had to sit through all of his inaneepileptic dialogue.Right- Use of confined spaces, like an elevator to heighten thespooky.Wrong- Too much use of going up the elevator and down theelevator. I mean if there is such a thing as elevatorsickness, I had it.Right- The film makers hearts were in the right place with anattempt to do something a little different.Wrong- Hey Bubs, listen. This day and age of horror..a littledifferent is like shooting yourself in the foot.We horror fans expect more now days..even from grade Bmovies.Wrong- This was obviously a lame attempt to run with the bigdogs aka: Session 9.Right- Okay everybody makes a big deal about them creepingpast that ghost. They say.."Oh what an intelligentthing  to do." What? How the helk is that intelligent?That ghost could have ghost rabies or something!Okay, I digress.See this film only if you would like to see a rubber clown explode and a dog with no skin.Other than that, don't say I didn't warn ya
Go with the editor's review!!. After reading the editor's review I was ready to dismiss this movie even as a huge Buffy / Angel / Bones fan.  Then I read all the other reviews and reconsidered.  Editors often pan movies I end up liking, so I thought I'd try it.  I'm actually somewhat surprised that I didn't just give up halfway through.  This movie was terrible.  The plot was idiotic, the three girls annoying, and it wasn't worth watching even to just see David on the screen.  Go with the editor's review and stay away - especially if your a Boreanaz fan!  What bet did he lose to be forced to do this role?!?
Its just ....ok. The first "Cruel Intentions" was highly underrated. There was a strong chemistry within the cast (obviously since Reese & Ryan married!) and the characters weren't one dimensional. Even evil Kathryn was capable of pain that Sarah Michelle Gellar managed to convey in brief moments which was perfect for that character. But Cassidy for CI3 falls way short of being three dimensional. She's just cruel for the whole film and showed no weakness. Everyone has a weakness. However, I will say that the character Patrick somewhat intrigued me. He went beyond the game of cruelty and ...well, I won't give away what happens, but I was very disturbed by it. As for Kerr, he was alright. Its not his fault his character was kind of dull. Anyway, the film is "ok". Its worth watching if you run into it on cable, but I wouldn't buy the movie.
redford/gandolfini cannot save terrible script. Redford is a 3 star general sentenced to 10 years, for what we later learn is sending men to die in a mission contradicting a presidential order.  Gandolfini is the brutal military prison warden, who orders the death of a soldier/prisoner, inciting Redford to lead the men in revolt.The problem is both men are cut from the same cloth, as the script poorly distinguishes them.  This complexity is useful, but not when neither character is worth rooting for.  The most telling scene is when a reluctant follower asks the ex-General if leading men is just moving pieces on a chessboard to him.  Redford answers it is, and we infer this is 'the burden of command,' his book on warfare, i.e. the ends justify the means in battle.  It is hard to become a pawn for the great military machine, when the cause is unjust or not worth the price.  Here, the men can just follow the severe code versus revolt.  While Gandolfini's warden goes too far, his justification of needing order is reasonable.He tries to get Redford shipped out on mental issues, delusions of taking command.  The problem is, Redford really does what the Warden says shows mental infirmity.  As if he cant adjust to not commanding thousands, he invents a battle.  The battle seems as much about the General's need to command troops and teach the Warden a lesson as anything else.  No real reason was given as to why his personal connections could not have fixed the prison problems, and they were already going that way as Redford met with the Warden's superior, who 'put him on notice.'In addition to poor character development, taking one step back the whole basis and execution of conflict in a prison yard is laughable.  Last, the ending is so insipid, everyone who sees it will think of 5 ways it could have ended more intelligently.  The film instead tries to make a tearjerker when no such ending was needed or justified.A great film of the evil nature of man's institutions is One Flew Over the Cuckoos Nest.  A great war film for moral ambiguity is Platoon.  Last Castle is a must miss
Not so fair and completely unbalanced - see my media scorecard. Pundits would have you believe that Fox news and Rupert Murdoch are the antithesis of quality journalism.  They even based a Bond villian on Murdoch in one ofe the more forgettable movies. Nothing gets a liberal's eyes rolling than when you say you watch Fox News.  This Attackumentary wants you to believe that Fox is biased and not credible.  Watch this Attackumentary and listen for yourself to what they are saying and draw your own conclusions.The former reporters gripe throughout this "piece" that Rupert Murdoch changed how reporters operate, for the worse in their opinion.  What actually happened is that these reporters had to work for a change.  They had to work hard, something they probably never did before.  Murdoch, like any driven person, demanded nothing less than excellence from his employees.  Those that could hang, rose with Fox news.  Those that could not keep up appear in "OutFoxed".Fox does have a bias on its commentary section.  This draws ratings.  The thing that the pundits seem to have a problem with is separating the Journalism from the Commentary sections even with Fox putting a big sign up saying "Commentary".  They are so used to their "Mainstream" liberal journalists blending their personal views and possibly slipping in actual news that they cannot tell the difference anymore.Here is my latest scorecard:  Mainstream Media:  Latest and greatest from Reuters, a major supplier of news to the always objective "mainstream media"; fired a reporter for falsifying photos to show violence worse than actually happened.  This photographer decided that his photos (or the war) was not alarming enough so he added a few more smoke plumes and darkened the overall image.  How many other war photos have been doctored this way?  On the Reuters' news page there is no mention of this deliberately manufactured garbage.  You had to go to their main page and look way over to the right side to find the story.  I guess they still have enough shame to be embarassed about this incident.The bastion of liberal "non-thinking"; New York Times has had several reporters writing stories about events that they did not actually do background work on.  In other words, they phoned in their stories without any actual knowledge of the events.  They also revealed secrets that hurt the World's efforts on fighting terrorists.  CNN - Nicknamed the Clinton News Network during the 90's for swallowing anything the Clintons had to give and asking for seconds, the only thing they were upset about during the whole Lewinsky scandal was that they wanted to be the ones under the desk.  On their online "News Headlines" section they repeatedly have Lou Dobb's column appear mixed in with news as if what he says is news.  Lou Dobb's is the paid liberal mouthpiece for CNN and everything he states is opinion not news.  You would think they would put him on their opinion section but unlike Fox they don't have one.  They think it is perfectly all right to mix opinion with news.  USA Today breaks a huge story on a massive phone tapping scandal.  Oops, turns out it wasn't as massive as it seemed and the data was given voluntarily.  Over 70% of the American population agreed with the Bush administration on this move despite his otherwise low approval rating.    CBS's Dan Rather, this is the man man who nearly wept on camera when the Republican revolution swept through Congress in 1994.  All his hopes of a liberal presidency were washed away.  He launched a smear campaign against President Bush using the worst journalistic standards imaginable.  His background investigation was nil.  People discredited this story almost instantly and yet he persisted on reporting it.  After everything was said and done he still tried everything in his power to prevent having to recant.  The editor for the Los Angeles times had to put out a memo to his people to try not to be so biased during the 2004 election.  Finally there is Newsweek, whose irresponsible reporting was the direct cause of riots that led to a score of deaths and untold injuries.  They were so eager to report the desecration of Islam's holy writ that they failed to see if it actually happened.  They ended up recanting with a pseudo apology that laid the blame on everyone but themselves.  The blood may wash off easy but do the memories and guilt remain?   That is a question the reporters and the editors can only answer. If so, that is the punishment you deserve for abusing one of the most important and influential professions in the World.  Perhaps others will think twice before fanning the flames of hatred just to sell a few more issues.These are just minor examples of how the "Mainstream" Media operates.  These are real stories and influence real events in the world, sometimes with serious consequences.  This is not the same as news commentators spouting off at the mouth about an issue of the day.  If you want more then read the book Bias by Bernard Goldberg to get a real understanding.  I will stick to Fox News as I have yet to find a major scandal regarding how they report the news.  Like any prudent person I take my news from a variety of sources and choose for myself on how to interpret what it all means.  I do take news with a grain of salt if it is coming from sources that have proven they are more interested in being first than in being correct.  CNN, Reuters, CBS, Newsweek, NY Times all fall squarely into the "dubious at best" category.All I have gotten from this attackumentary is a bunch of liberals and hack reporters whining because Fox separates the opinions from the facts,allowing people to decide for themselves how they want to interpret the news and America loves them for it.The liberals hate Fox news.   Fox actually investigates and reports on what happened; not what the liberals wished would have happened.  They show the liberals for what they are, full of $%$^.  They hated it when Fox repeatedly showed then President Clinton walking in a funeral procession laughing it up, that is until he saw a TV camera and started shedding crocodile tears.Fox news made the general public aware that the budget successes of the 90's was due mostly to Newt Gingrich.  Clinton had a disastrous first 2 years of his presidency.  Gingrich's congress would not send Clinton the pork barrel projects so he couldn't spend to excess.  I wish we had Gingrich leading the congress doing the same to President Bush.I am sure Rupert Murdoch is feeling "Outfoxed"; right now his network is ranked numero Uno as it has been for some time.  This DVD is hovering between 2000 and 3000.  I am ranked higher than it is.
Boring travesty of Le Carre's work. I love Le Carre and was looking forward to this film.  But what a mess!  The plot is a mishmash -- after about an hour I no longer cared what might happen to the protagonists.  Excellent actors like Ralph Richardson and Anthony Hopkins are wasted in secondary roles.  Other reviewers say that this movie was edited to death and I believe it.  Save your money.  Maybe they'll release Spy Who Came In From The Cold on DVD some day
Absolute garbage. O.K. who's brainstorm was this? They need two behind the ear. How can you take the phenomenal, real life story of Charlie Luciano's rise to power during the Castellamarese war, and turn it into &quot;Mobsters&quot;?!! This had the potential to be a fantastic picture, up until they hired the casting director. Instead it was turned into 21 Jump Street during prohibition. Luciano, Maranzano, Costello, Lansky etc. are doing cartwheels in their grave everytime anyone puts this in their DVD player. Trust me, &quot;Mobsters&quot; is an offer you can definately refuse
SUCKED!. This shouldn't even be considered a baseball movie!  That is like calling M. Night Shamalan's &quot;Signs&quot; a baseball movie because the one guy played baseball.  Not worth it at all
The worst of the worst. As a Will Ferrell fan I will go easy.  This was one of the worst movies I have ever seen.  Had I seen this in the theaters I would have demanded my money back.
I wanted to like it, but couldn't. I often like concert videos, and I usually like Irish music.  But this one was a bit dull and, more importantly, the sound engineering was simply horrible.  There is no excuse for not being able to hear pipes or drums that are clearly miked for the show.  And, often, the sound did not synch well with the video.  I'll trust the live show was a hoot, but translated very poorly into this video.  I wanted to like it, but simply could not get into it.If you want great concert DVD, try Ozomatli or U2 (Boston concert).
DO NOT BUY THIS!. Please do not support this release of Cassavetes' films by Criterion Collection.  Purchasing this DVD set constitutes a denigration of real criticism and suppresses the appreciation and comprehension of true art.  The troubling circumstances leading up to the release of this edition (in which world-renowned Cassavetes critic Ray Carney was snubbed and fired after his work was completed) are absolutely pathetic and embarrassing for both Criterion and Miss Rowlands.
Awful!. Bring back Roy Marsden!  This guy was terrible.  What a shame to ruin a good story with a very bad actor
Disappointing. There are way too few scenes and many are sequenced and repeated.  Not worth the money
Disturbing. I may have once considered this movie to be somehow romantic, like so many other reviewers.  But, that would have been during my single days or during the years of marriage that I thought were happy and stable.  However, after having my world turned upside down by infidelity this movie just serves as a disturbing reminder of the weak emotional nature of so many people who lack the discipline to be true to the fidelity they vowed on the alter.  Now I have to wonder if total reconsiliation is really possible or if people predisposed to this behavior are destined to seek happiness outside of marriage at any cost.  I was starting to believe that couples who survive infidelity can have stonger, happier relationships than they ever experienced with each other before the affair but this movie casts doubt on the cheaters - can they ever really be content with their spouses?  It's a sad reflection on the human condition.  Yes, bitter sweet indeed
A complete waste of time. I rented "City of the Walking Dead" expecting it to be similar to Lucio Fulci's masterpiece "Zombie." I was horribly disappointed to find "City of the Walking Dead" to be one of the most boring experiences I have subjected myself to. The zombies or whatever they are are more like mindless vampires preying on the blood of the inhabitants of the city. They have disfigured mutilated faces, but look ridiculous rather than convincingly scary. Don't watch unless you are a serious masochist
Liz is right - it's trash. All her life, Elizabeth Taylor has referred to this movie as trash.  She's not being modest.  She's being honest.  This movie is trash.  It's a joke that some people actually give it more than one star.  She knew what she was talking about.It is a moral play.  The moral is that bad girls get bad things happen to them.  The moral is that promiscuous sex is bad.  Gee.  America in 1960.  Bad girls can't get married.  The only thing for a bad girl to do is drive off a cliff and die, so keep those legs together, girls.The writing is so bad it's funny.  It is like The Seagull by Chekhov, a really bad melodrama.  A loves B.  B loves C.  Chekhov labeled The Seagull a comedy, despite its constant misery, or because of it.  Perhaps he was saying that we aren't supposed to suffer along with these characters; we are supposed to laugh our heads off at them.The writing is so bad that there were several times in the movie that I actually said the line before the actor did.  It was so obvious, that the next line would be such and such, that I said it before the actor said it.  When that happens in a movie, you know you are dealing with incompetent writers.One of the funniest things about this garbage is the acting of Eddie Fisher.  He disappears in the role.  He is simply not on screen.  His voice is so soft, and he has absolutely no stage presence.  He is the opposite of an actor.  His performance has the opposite of charisma.  Putting him next to an actor is like putting matter against anti-matter.  I'm surprised that he and Liz didn't explode and obliterate each other, because her stage presence is so strong and his is nonexistant.They feed you the old garbage about a poor husband complaining that his wife is too rich and that his wife's family got him a job.  Oh poor thing.  He must escape his marriage and find some pride.  What planet is this on?  That old stupid cliche.  Hey, idiot, why don't you find some pride working in a car lot, or driving a cab, instead of accepting a responsible position taking advantage of an opportunity that your mother in law set up for you.  What idiocy.  The old bull, re-wrapped again.Nothing about the writing of this trash is original.  It is just 1960 America showing off its cliches.  There are no real people in this movie.  It is utter garbage, and anyone who is impressed by it has no taste at all.  I totally agree with Liz.  Just goes to show that you can package any old trash and find some people to rave about it.She did the movie to fulfill a contract obligation, so she could be freed up to do Cleopatra.  She always hated this trash.  The only thing I can say good about Butterfield 8 is that you can laugh at it
We Don't Care. I was optimistic for Greg Kinnear once.  He was very funny ragging on Soap Soup.  He usually plays the nice-guy second banana in film or a man dying of AIDS.  Auto Focus gave him a chance to portray a 1960's TV icon, Hogan, in Hogan's Heroes.  The replication of the original cast is a bit eerie.  After all, these actors dress up as German prison guards.  A chill goes down my spine, but Hogan's was a comedy, which made the series kind of a curiosity beyond the silly caricatures of those funny SS guys.  Anyhow, Bob Crane played Hogan for six years and Kinnear badly imitated.  Yes, I'm sorry to say, Kinnear is awful as Crane, which puts a damper on the bio-flick.Here's a disc jockey with semi-hip 60's patter on the air with an All American family, a loving wife and cute kids.  They live like Ozzie and Harriet in the LA burbs, going to Catholic Church on Sunday.  Crane lands his big break, falling for the trappings of fame.  Most people fall for the trappings of fame.  Read the supermarket check out magazine racks.  So all of a sudden, Crane's garage porn collection isn't enough.  Women, very beautiful, Hollywood loose-morals women find Crane and his buddy William Defoe irresistible.  The birth of the video camera comes into play.The trouble with the script or maybe it's the cardboard way Kinnear acts, we watch, but in the end, we don't care.
ugh, what drivel. I'm a big Mann fan, and i even enjoy his not very good non noir or western films, thunder bay for instance. a great director, but this one stinks. i can't even get up the enthusiasm to criticise i
"Every time a guy gets married, he gets divorced from his friends.". In the Edward Burns film "The Groomsmen" 5 males--friends since childhood--prepare for a wedding due to take place in a few days. Paulie (Edward Burns) is the bridegroom who is marrying longtime girlfriend Sue (Brittany Murphy). The marriage is set in motion by the fact that Sue is five months pregnant, and while Paulie says he loves Sue, he's also experiencing a degree of pressure and reluctance due to the fact he's about to become a father.Paulie's four friends--who are all locked in various stages of delayed adolescence--react to his impending marriage in different ways. Paulie's doubts are echoed by his brother Jimbo (Donald Logue). Jimbo is married to Julianna (Heather Burns) and he is experiencing marital problems of his own. Loser Mike Sullivan (Jay Mohr) still lives at home and can't seem to get over his ex-wife. Paulie's married friend Dez (Matthew Lillard) acknowledges that married life and children take all his free time, but he advocates fatherhood as a maturing process to everyone. TC (John Leguizamo) is the fifth male of the group--he left abruptly 8 years before, and while he's returned for Paulie's wedding, there are also some old scores to be settled."The Groomsmen" seems to be a film based on ideas--and as such the characters are 'types' who have various issues, and these issues are miraculously worked through in the days leading up to the wedding. Some of the emotional scenes are overdone and consequently do not seem realistic (TC's temper tantrum at his father's house, for example). Several overly long scenes depict Paulie and his group of friends in their part-time band mode, and these scenes come across as pure indulgence.Dez is portrayed as the sage of this group--he has the most successful family life, and so Paulie turns to Dez, ultimately, for advice on marriage and fatherhood. One of the film's pivotal issues is Paulie's adjustment to his upcoming role, and while acceptance of the responsibilities of married life and fatherhood are unarguably critical, the film's treatment of Paulie's dilemma is troubling. And this is mainly manifested in the portrayal of Sue--an extremely annoying, clingy and demanding woman who goes around the house eternally rubbing her stomach while she flexes her domestic tyrant muscles and harangues Paulie for manifestations of his commitment. The film's message seems to be that it's a good thing for Paulie to respect Sue's expectations and her exacting demands for their relationship, and that their future is all warm and fuzzy thanks to Paulie's sublime subservience to his new role. But ultimately this feel-good film seems delusional and produces only a falsely optimistic ending--displacedhuma
Want to waste 2 hours of your life - ignore this review !!. If you have bothered to read all the other reviews here, i think you will get the point, but still unsure ?Think of KNIGHTRIDER from the 70`s ( i`m sure EDI used the same voice !! ) then add some THUNDERBIRD puppets ( thats a bit mean, at least they had personality ) then add a dash of C.G.I. on a budget, oh and not forgetting that the whole script was written by a seven year old!A bit scathing you may feel - but deservedly so i`m afraid.Seriously, watch some paint dry for a couple of hours, at least the fumes will give you some sort of a buzz.
NOT SO NUTTY PROFESSOR. Yes, Eddie Murphy is amazingly chameleonic in this reworking of Jerry Lewis' classic 1963 comedy.  Unfortunately, Eddie's not totally funny in this crass update.  If you're into flatulence or fat jokes, then this movie is right up your alley.  But its threadbare plot takes second place to Eddie's mugging not only of his title character and alter ego, but also all of the Klumps as well.  Jada Pinkett is the customary African/American woman who does her best (Like Halle Berry or Vanessa Williams) to look as Caucasian as she can.  The late James Coburn as a cameo role as a hotshot millionaire out to fund Murphy's research project, and Dave Chappelle has a bit as a stand up comic who is not all that funny either.  While the intentions are good, THE NUTTY PROFESSOR of 1996 doesn't capture the manic charisma of the one and only Jerry Lewis whose mugging was more charming than obnoxious
Just Another Heist Movie. &quot;Heist&quot; is, well, an heist movie like so many others. This one goes completely by the book and is uninspired at all levels. Gene Hackman gives a standart, average performance as the burglar who starts having problems with his mates. This is a &quot;who fools who?&quot; picture, it has some required though predictable twists at the end and the character motivations remain unclear. In fact, the characters themselves remain unclear, since they don`t speak all that much and the dialogue is poor. Acclaimed director David Mamet glues scene after scene with little creativity, so most of them turn to be boring and lifeless. This just seems like a weak episode of some late-night cable b-tv series. Dull, unsurprising and shallow, one to avoid
Because I can't give it "0" stars. Here's a film where all the actors and actresses know they're funny, but somehow it doesn't traslate into a funny movie. This film is far more irritating than enjoyable. Frantic disjointed and sloppy, this cinematic bomb could fall into the worst movie of all time catagory. Too many shots of actors looking smug and hamming it up after saying their lines.A pity, because all that talent is wasted.My 11 year old son found this film to be tiresome after 20 minutes.People who claim this movie is funny are probably not well
Not all that good. Not a huge fan of James Cagney or gangster movies, and nothing about White Heat has changed that opinion.  Lame plot, corny dialogue, and just plain bad acting constantly had me cringing.  In it's day this movie was no different than the generic blow-em'-up action/adventure movies that Hollywood has churned out en masse in more recent decades.  Hardly what I would consider to be a classic
I hated this movie. I never read the book, but I hated the movie. The acting was weak, the dialog was elementary and the plot was unremarkable. Let's hope they don't make a sequel. The final straw was the Avril Lavigne song over the end credits
Ju Dou: Razor D. E. lo-fi remix. Ju Dou is a great movie, I'd only previously seen it on VHS borrowed from the public library and was so looking forward to this release, but sadly I concure, this DVD is as bad as the other reviewers have previously stated.  Worse than the old VHS recording I saw 7 years ago.  So bad, that it's gotten someone like me, one who never writes reviews, to comment on it.  This DVD should not be sold in the United States, or anywhere.  Unfortunately, I picked this DVD up on a whim before reading any reviews.I'd suggest you just cherish your memories of this wonderful film until a better transfer is made available.  It was good to be reminded of the story, but very sad to see how carelessly Razor Digital Entertainment handled this transfer.It really baffles me how terrible this transfer is.  A few moments here and there the picture actually looks acceptable, but then the rest of the time it's blurry, washed out, monochromatic yellows and browns, lines and dust marks everywhere, and occasional digital glitches.  This dvd has probably any bad transfer cliche you can imagine; more than I've seen anyway.Yimou Zhang is a great director, Li Gong a wonderful actress, and it was from two beautiful films(seen only on VHS :( ) that I discovered this, Red Sorgum and Ju Dou.  But heed the reviews, this DVD lo-fi remix of Ju Dou by Razor Digital Entertainment is a nightmare
Disappointed. I bought this video as something to throw in with my regular routine so I wouldn't get stuck in a plateau from not enough variation.  Unfortunately, the routines were confusing and difficult to follow.  It also consisted of a lot of standing in one place and shimmying your body as opposed to really getting a workout by moving.  I was very disappointed, especially after reading all the other great reviews.  10 minutes into the workout I turned it off because my heart rate wasn't what I wanted for a cardio workout.  I would not suggest this as a good workout even for a beginner
DULL IMITATION. Helen Mirren imitated Queen Elizabeth rather than BEING her.  This was a dull, boring movie, which gave us very little insight into the character of this woman.  I do not recommend this movie at all...I don't care what the Academy of Arts and Sciences says.  Don't bother buying it.
can't tell much about the movie because the transfer is the pits. from what little i could make out,this may have been good. i can't say because this is so poor that at times you can't hear a thing and the static and grain are all over the picture. the pits leave it alone and spend your money on something worth whil
This is a poor remake. It really looks like it was done on a shoe string budget. The football scenes are lame.  Sean's Maher's Brian Piccolo was not well done...and not beleivable.  GET THE ORIGINAL...it is worth i
a comedy routine !. unwatchable  !!!!!--over rated poet-- singers who sing off key---- aggrandizing this mediocrity is ludicrous---
Rent It......Maybe. I watched this because it has Big Gipp from the Goodie Mobb in it.  That is the high point, the movie is not very good.  If your a Goodie Mobb fan rent it just out of curiosity.  If not stay away from this one
Silly, Just Silly. There is only one word to describe this flick - SILLY.  Good for 10 year olds and younger.  Story weak.  Acting mediocre.  The action sequences look very "staged" and unnatural and are unbelievable.  One glaring error.  This movie is set in early California, before it becomes a state.  Near the end of the film they show an American flag - and it has 50 STARS on it!!!  Mama Mia!!  Couldn't even get that right.  The title should have been "The Legend of Zero"
0 STARS: In all honesty, this is a pretty sorry movie.  Sadly, I've seen worse. "The Butcher" is a low-budget slasher flick along the same lines as "Wrong Turn" although "Wrong Turn" is clearly superior than this trash, albeit, that does not say much.  In a sense, "The Butcher" tries to be a mixture of "Wrong Turn" and the the remake of TCM.  The kills aren't that great and are indicative of a low budget horror flick, there is zero horror movie atmosphere, and the acting is below average for this type of flick.  Also, much of the action, these characters (including the killers) and the storyline are all just plain stupid!!!  Very immature horror movie here...defintely one for the teenagers although I would not let me teenager watch this trash if I had one.  All of these flaws make for a movie that simply is not worth a cuss, and that's my main complaint (along with the overly-retarded ending of course-they actually outdid themselves with that)
poor quality. very poor audio quality. i still enjoy dan zanes songs on disney channel but this dvd is a different story. never played it again ever since it arrived and we checked it out the first day.Bought after reading other reviews, dont know why others are raving about, could be his friends
Nothing but wasted time. I'm of the opinion that King's books rarely translate well into movies, and this is no exception. Some of King's work is fantastic,  but unfortunately, a lot of it is simply tired old themes with nothing new. This falls into the latter category.A novel about a novelist, and one who has a hard time finding inspiration: Please Mr. King, which college creative writing program did you steal this idea from? The writer's ideas showing up in real life: From whence do these fantastic ideas pour forth?I won't bother to tell you the ending, because if you have the poor luck to watch the movie, you'll have already guessed it by the time you're half way through. It's all bad and hackneyed, from start to finish.I will give Steven King credit for putting his fame to good use though. If anyone without Mr. King's fame and built-in fan base tried to sell a story this trite, their manuscript would never make it through the slush pile.Maybe it takes a bunch of bad stories like this to turn out gems like the Gunslinger series, but it doesn't mean that we have to watch them
Unnecessarily Epic... After 40 minutes of objective viewing, and shot after superfluous shot, I sat through another 30 minutes in pain. I've come to the fairly well informed conclusion that either Peter Jackson can ONLY do epics wheather it calls for it or not, or LOTR in all it's incarnations had immense levels of supervision for Jacksons from higher-ups. Kong is not an epic, it is a tragedy. Tell me to watch the whole thing, if you will, but if the film is constructed so poorly 70 minutes in, I don't need to. On another note. Jurassic park had better CGI than this. Mr. jackson, no more 'epic fly-by shots please.
ZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZ. Me and a female friend went and watched this one in the theater. I ... was ... bored ... out ... of ... my ... skull. After about a half hour my friend, who tends to be more "progressive" than I, actually suggested we leave. It was the first time either of us have ever left while the movie was playing. Ever!Perhaps I'm biased. However I highly recommend that no one get this movie. The only reason I can think that anyone would give it a good rating is because of its political slant. I tend to lean to the right, but even I was entertained by V For Vendetta, despite it being blatant liberal propaganda. If you are going to pontificate about how we conservatives are evil, at least make it interesting
I love most of Bob Odenkirk's work... I think I've seen almost everything Bob's been involved with and this just didn't do it for me. If you have friends and they aren't complete dullards, you've probably had most of the conversations you'll see in this movie
Couldn't get into it.... I own a ton of workout dvd's and thought I might try this one due to the ten minute interval toning sections. I like to use these as add-ons to my cardio vids.  However, I tried the entire video twice and could not get over the instructor... her chatter was really annoying and I felt like she was teaching a kindergarten class.  I am not easily annoyed, and was surprised by my dislike of this dvd... I am definitely selling this one on ebay
Fluff for bubbleheads. Another lopez "vehicle" in other words people who think Jlo is the "bomb" will watch it no matter how many other fine movies are out there.It's too hard to find them. Just go see dumb jlo movie. She's "really good"
This movie makes a 70's geology documentary look good. Geez, with all the remakes of old horror flicks these days, I'm losing faith in horror films altogether.  This movie goes to prove a point that horror movie creativity is headed south.  The plot sucked, the acting was predictable and the pulse was about as dull as the script itself.  I'm a fan of the Blair Witch mainly because it struck a chord of truth despite it's overly abundant attempt to be true, but the brothers who made that film wasted their budget on this junk.  There are no doubt kids in grade school that can conjour up better ideas, create more realistic suspense and drive you insane with terror.  But these days, horror directors fall back on old ideas, stale scripts with added gore and one or two decent actors, in hopes that their ship might sail, bringing in a budget that will carry them over until a newer, fresher idea surfaces.  Give me your budget, throw in the towel and let me scare the s#$t out of you, because if movies like these are all you have to offer up, then the genre of horror has a fate sealed in doom
BALKAN BULLCRAP. Let's be up straight and honest.  There is nothing really to recommend or like about this movie.  Shot on a shoestring budget way back in 1994, BALKAN RUNNER has a stiff and pondering script full of holes (like how did the hunky hero get unhandcuffed from the dominatrix's claws?), a talentless cast, and a score reminiscent of a 70s cartoon series.  Daisy White is certainly lovely as is Isabel Russinova, but their emotional range is that of a rutabaga.  Paced incredibly slow and with no exciting sequences to brag about, BALKAN RUNNER is one of those movies you've never heard about, and rightly so!!
Stick with Willy Wonka. I could barely get through the...um...er...reimagination...of the childern's classic - while the set design and special FX are state of the art, as usual for a Tim Burton film, the actual movie is hard to watch. Why? Depp's "performance" is chock full of ticks and mannerisms, off-putting, flat, self-absorbed, and finally, one-note. Rather than the quirky fun of the original 1972 Gene Wilder version, Burton's film is more horror than fantasy, often casually cruel and sadistic to the point of being far from family fare.  While deliberate on Burton's part, that doesn't make the final product any more watchable. It's one grim, dismal, downward spiral slog. Not much holidday fun, huh? As with most of Burton's other big, expensive failures, he knows how to CREATE a convincing world, but has no clue how to POPULATE it with characters and situations we identify with and/or could care less about.  The final result is a film that's like a fragile, hermetically sealed curio on the shelf - nice to look at from afar, but hard to get attached to, much less involved with. What a waste of millions of studio $$$
Horrible Audio, No Teaching. These other reviewers are kidding you.There are significant problems with this dvd.1. The audio on this dvd is horrible.  It sounds like they are talking and singing through a tube.  I could have done better in my garage.2. The tracks are: all the singing and stories in english, or the same program in Mandarin.  There is no teaching whatsoever.I realize there are not many dvd's for teaching children Mandarin, however there are a few better than this
Defective Recording. This recording is simply DEFECTIVE.It opens with a disclamer about the quality of the recording, and boy, they are not kidding!This is not a simple case of VHS quality on a DVD.  Instead the video quality is comporable to the first live broadcast from the 1969 moon landing.  And the audio quality is in the same league as early cheap casette recorders, complete with pitch shifts..It is clear that abosoltely no attempt was made to clean up or remaster this recording.  Even the title credits suffer from from jitter distortion and there is time base noise at the bottom of each frame.Some example frames at VienneseBall dot org slash PiratesThis is particularly criminal because it was such a superb cast and inspired live performance.I am immediately returning this to Amazon.  This recording should never have been released
just ok. Tyrese&Meagan Goode are the only performances in this film that work. but the film on a whole is real generic. it wants to be a modern day "Bonnie&Clyde" but it lacks any kind of depth. everything is very predictable. alot of over the top action. The Game is in this film&this should be his last film.  if Tyrese&Meagan Goode get a real script then they might be on to something
The enjoyableness level of Dr. Drake... This is just stupid.Now the first one I'll give 2 stars because it's so bad,it's good.But this is beyond that level.This is so bad it's...[...] BAD!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Stateside is an absolute mess. It's a disjointed mish-mash. Oh boy. Where to start? First of all, I was mistaken to believe this was a romantic comedy. Stateside is completely void of both romance and comedy. It also seems to be missing a cohesive story, and good direction.The story follows a young marine (Jonathan Tucker) who can't help but fall in love with a mentally ill musician (Rachael Leigh Cook.) As he spends time with her, her recovery begins to slow to the point where he is forced to sever contact. Will love conquer all? Believe me, by this point you won't care.I found the story hard to follow as the movie stumbled forward. With a story this simple, the audience really shouldn't have to question what is going on and why. And how believable is love at first site in a mental institution? "Oh, Hello. Sorry I squirt water on you from the broken water fountain... Will you marry me??" Give me a break.I was shocked to find that this isn't director Reverge Anselmo's first movie. It has "first time filmmaker" written all over it. The fault can't be put solely on the director though. This is an absolute wreck of a script, written by.. oh, look: Reverge Anselmo. Ok, all the blame falls on him.There is quite a fine conglomeration of talent gathered for this fiasco: Joe Mantegna, Val Kilmer, Ed Begley Jr, Penny Marshall, and Carrie Fisher all lend their faces to Stateside. All have small parts and try to lend credibility to the film. Ed Begley Jr did a good job with what he had. Val Kilmer however was very inconsistent. When he is yelling at the recruits he just seemed out of place. He wasn't a believable or natural military leader. However, when he slowed down to talk to the boys from his heart, he was quite good.Jonathan Tucker does a good job as the lead, and Rachael Leigh Cook does a decent job as the mentally ill musician/actress. I just never bought into the relationship.I really wish more time had been spent in the editing room prior to the films release. The story is interesting, but the way it unfolds is far too distracting to allow the audience to fall into a comfort zone and accept the story as told. The movie also feels very heavy. It really could have used a bit more humor to offset the dramatic tension caused by the marine's relationship with his father, and by his forbidden romance with his famous, mentally ill soul mate.mastercritic.co
A horrible ending to a horrible trilogy. I've always loved the original trilogy, but these prequals are just awful. This episode 3 was probably the most dissapointing. I had hoped that maybe lucas could salvage this horrible trilogy but he just made it worse. Horrible acting and writing really sent this movie down the toilet. The only slightly decent thing in the movie was the lightsaber scene between anakin and obi wan.
Ridiculous!. Didn't like it; unbelievably a waste of time and talent
Disturbing...Neurotic...A waste of good time. This film is deeply disturbing.  Besides being utterly revolting, this film also leaves the viewer contemplating suicide after being submitted to such utter depravity and lack of anything decent or worthy of flattery.  What an utter waste of film.  Don't waste your time or money
I haven't recieved this item yet. I ordered this item several months ago and its yet to arrive
CRAP!. Don't waste a single penny on this movie! It was total crap!No plot what so every and the main character was horrible! My eyes are still burning from this one
Bad Bad Bad. Bad Bad Bad WORST VILLAN WORST PLOT WORST ACTORS WORST SONG NOTHING WAS GOOD ABOUT IT!!!
What a stupid movie. I really thought this was pretty lame movie, and in NO way a comparrison to Reservoir Dogs or Pulp Fiction the way one reviewer described.  The attempt is to tell a story about some kid, played by Stephen Dorff, who becomes a pop-culture icon because he was held hostage and apparently didn't care.  At least thats what I got out of it.  I think what turned me off the most about this movie was Dorff's character--an "uber-cool" rebel type who's mean to his apparently oppresive father and cry-baby of a mother, slam dances and tears up his room (I guess to prove to us how cool he is), and who can get in front of an audience of high school kids and proudly cuss for no other reason then he'll know it'll get laughs.  In real life someone like that would be considered a slacker or an (...), but for the case of this movie I guess he's cool.  Anyway, my problems with the character aside, this movie just wasn't that good to begin with.  A REALLY weak script, and I swear each of these leading actors could have, and have done, about ten times better since, so I wonder why the only put in half the effort for this one.  Maybe they knew it wasn't going anywhere and needed the paycheck.  As cool and revolutionary it tries to be, S.F.W. doesn't really do anything all that spectacular. The gun battle at the end with the terrorists, as well as the movie's protrayal of the media are the best (and really only good) things about this movie.  But, most of you kiddies out there will probably like it because it has people cussing and drinking beer.  But that's just my opinion, I could be wrong
Stick with Willy Wonka. I could barely get through the...um...er...reimagination...of the childern's classic - while the set design and special FX are state of the art, as usual for a Tim Burton film, the actual movie is hard to watch. Why? Depp's "performance" is chock full of ticks and mannerisms, off-putting, flat, self-absorbed, and finally, one-note. Rather than the quirky fun of the original 1972 Gene Wilder version, Burton's film is more horror than fantasy, often casually cruel and sadistic to the point of being far from family fare.  While deliberate on Burton's part, that doesn't make the final product any more watchable. It's one grim, dismal, downward spiral slog. Not much holidday fun, huh? As with most of Burton's other big, expensive failures, he knows how to CREATE a convincing world, but has no clue how to POPULATE it with characters and situations we identify with and/or could care less about.  The final result is a film that's like a fragile, hermetically sealed curio on the shelf - nice to look at from afar, but hard to get attached to, much less involved with. What a waste of millions of studio $$$
Please enter a title for your review. This is as bad as Out Cold. I think most viewers, even if they just want dumb fun, will find this movie insulting to their intelligence. I guess maybe it's just a movie to watch while drinking with friends. Your brain would have to be completely turned off to be entertained by it. It's template derived, an endless string of cliches. The kind of script that draws inspiration from other movies rather than from real life or a creative imagination. The basic plot outline of a guy making an emergency trip across the country to save his relationship, while falling for another girl in the process, is ripped off of Road Trip who ripped it off of Overnight Delivery. Only in this movie instead of the other girl being wilder and broadening the guy's horizons she's more conservative, I guess a testament to the conservative mentality behind this film. The added bit of having to save the girlfriend from a sleazy record executive type = Wayne's World. The picking up girls who subject the unwitting guy to violent bondage = Tomcats. The popsickle scene was the only remotely clever part. If it was just the girl licking the popsickle seductively to tease the boy it would be really dumb, but because the guy was doing it too it had a certain inane random charm to it that I liked.It's pretty tragic to think that hundreds of people spent months working on this. The only real problem is the script. It's a professional looking movie as far as the actors and cameras go, but it's all wasted effort because of the weak script. It's like building a mansion on a sinkhole.
This IS NOT a horror film, in fact it's not much at all. There is nothing frightening about weird noises, angry phone calls and a DJ who won't leave the booth even though he has to take a pee and instead wets himself. As one reviewer wrote, there are a ton of flashbacks although the most important and relevant one is from a few hours before the DJ went on the air. As he gets the weird whispers over the phone, the callers start to ask him about those rather than the topic at hand. This starts to tick off an already arrogant person and he takes it out on the callers and the staff. There is a mixture of the "horror" he committed and the slightly weird things that are happening in the station. Oh yeah, the studio is creepy because of what happened decades before to another DJ.This was not scary, creepy nor good. It was a waste of my time. Even though there were a couple twists at the end, they didn't work because I didn't CARE. There are a myriad of Asian films that deal with phones out there that are average to really good. Put a phone, a girl with long black hair and a person (almost always a woman)who will die soon if they don't solve something before they die all together and you have a winning formula for an Asian horror flick.This isn't a bad movie, it's worse than that, it's boring. Which is a sin in any movie, much less in a supposed horror flick. Even so-so films in this genre avoid.If you want to watch a mystery, then RENT this. If you are looking to be shocked, scared or frightened stay away. FAR away
A very long political attack ad. I was trying to think of the best short description of what this is. Sure it's a propaganda film but that doesn't mean much to most people. However, most people have seen attack ads around election time. That's what this is, a very long political attack ad, full of all the things we commonly see in such ads: distortions, sarcasm, scary close ups, mood music, mocking tone, glaring omissions, out of context quotes, etc.That said, the most rewarding review so far must be the one by AT "DL" (New York), who basically condemns Michael Moore as pro-Bush because Fahrenheit 9/11 doesn't say Bush engineered 9/11 himself. What's next? A review that condemns AT "DL" (New York) as pro-Bush because his review didn't say that Bush flew the planes himself? Or that Bush is an alien who gave birth to Saddam and Osama on a UFO?Just when you think you've seen the craziest conspiracy theory ..
A slow drama, not for guys or die-hard horror fans. Ok, so I'm a half hour into the movie, and I'm falling asleep here on my couch. I rented "The Return" as part of a usual Saturday horror-film fest. The PG-13 rating was the first thing that caught my attention...however, there have been a few good PG 13 horror films, at least in my opinion (What Lies Beneath, The Ring), but they are somewhat of a rarity. I guess I should have figured that this one staring Sarah Michelle Gellar probably wouldn't stand the test of taste. So what's missing?A good horror film is like a good speech, book, article....what not. You have an introduction, a body and a conclusion. Well, we start off with an introduction. It was good, nice set-up, good acting, great environment. However, the introduction never seems to end. When you're 45 minutes into the film and so far all you've seen were a few flashy images, loud smash cuts, and eerie music, as the main character walks around in circles, it's just time to start something new. The scariest part had to be when I ran out of ice cream! In element we've gone from horror film to drama, with little to no plot advancement. Then we start a romance which seems way out of character to me for a career obsessed traveling sales-woman. If anything, this movie is more of a drama about strange stalkers who all seem to specifically go after Sarah (well, she is hott...).Reality: The film seems pretty real, all except for one spot where she reaches for a knife on the stairs after being cornered, yet she caries a switchblade in her boot...what?? Yet the rest of the film seems to be pretty realistic and the characters act somewhat reasonable.Plot: Ok, so it's not very intriguing. The story is a drama, not a horror film. Don't expect to be scared, but you'll probably jump at a few of the smash-cuts. Most of the plot carries Sarah around as she tries to figure out her past and why she's connected to this small Texas town. The creators gave a bit too much away too early and you figure most everything out before the third act. Nothing new, nothing interesting....it's just as it is. There's an interesting final twist at the end, but that's going to just about cover it. The final scene is just a simple fade to black. Everything comes together, and all is as it should be in the world.Effects: Yeah, um...virtually, there are no effects. So if you're looking for monsters, blood, gore, that sort of thing, don't rent this guy. There are a few vehicle wrecks which were pretty exciting, but that's about all the icing on this cake...Film elements; Acting, camera, lighting, sound, music....the rest is all about what you'd expect from a common drama. It's all placed together pretty well in a nice coherent manner. It's definitely a budgeted film, and lives up to hollywood standards by all means. Definitely technically sounds. A slight desaturated color scheme spills over the film's "style," and some strange quick zoom in, blur, quick zoom out type camera work adds to it. I'm not sure I particularly enjoyed this, but it's something I haven't seen to often.All-in-all, it's you average film, nothing new, nothing exciting, but it should please the drama or thriller fans. It's definitely no horror film and will provide little excitement to the die-hard horror fan. I might rent this on a rainy day with my girlfriend, but I wouldn't add it to my collection.
Boring porno. I give it 3 stars for porn and -2 stars for a movie, therefore, collectively; you have your single star.  By all means, I suggest you get yourself some hardcore porn, beat off, and then watch a real movie.  Caligula blows literally and royally.  It is a little under 3 hours, which seemed like 3 days, and there is only about 20 minutes of decent film.  The small amount of story that is somewhat portrayed is simply stepped on by asinine porn.  The most triumphant scene in the movie is where the Roman soldiers attack the phallus-humbling papyrus stalks while flailing their genitals to and fro.  This movie is ridiculous.  In order to enjoy this, one must be completely perverted and dimwitted
Do yourself a favor and read the book. A bad movie based on the best basketball book of all time.  The basketball scenes are not realistic or interesting, I just couldn't get over this fact.  Its a basketball movie with a lot of time spent on the court.  It should at least be fun to watch them play.  Its not.  The Bo Kimble cameo is the only thing that mildly interested me about this movie.  It tries to throw in several playground legends and stories and real-life experiences, but ends up coming off as a non-believable, overdone movie
AN INSULT TO ALL BLACK MEN ON ITS FACE - PERFECTLY VILE DVD. To answer another customer, YES UNFORTUNATELY I DID ACTUALLY SEE THE ENTIRE MOVIE FROM HIIDIOUS BEGINNING TO ITS AWEFUL END.  I DO SO TOTALLY WISH I COULD SUE THE PEOPLE WHO MADE HOW HIGH TO GET BACK THE MOMENTS OF MY LIFE WASTED WATCHING THIS DRECK!  Thank goodness a friend of mine rented it instead of my having brought this trash.I might share a movie I loved with people to a point but watching this movie was like taking a late night stroll through solid matter seperation tanks of sewage treatment plant in the heat of a still humid sweltering summer evening, not an experience one wishes to relive or share with others.  Generally I do not like druggie movies, but I have liked a few Car Wash, Which Way Is Up.  Even Cheech and Chong has more entertainment value than this critter. Oh I saw the all the black lackeys in the DVD including the Harvard token and to that I say one drop of dignity will not put out an inferno of toady stupidity. I know humor when I see it I just wish this How High had even the least little bit of humor in it for me to see.I even like a good black exploitation movie like "I'm Gonna Get You Sucka" which has no redeeming attributes but it was farce in weird and stupid way that did not suggest the kind of patently negative message How High touts.I often do not go into too much detail about a film because as bad as I might find something I won't be a spoiler.  My tastes in movies and books are generally not the mainstream which is cool by me.  Even if I hate a movie I will respect the artist enough not to ruin a movie for those others who might like it.  Where I come from not being a spoiler is just simple respect likely something not everyone can understand.This ranks as the most racially INSULTING vile stupid DVD I have ever seen.  The premise of the story is that black people (Black men in this particular case.) are so lame loathesome and hopelessly dumb that they can not logically be considered worthy of advancing to Harvard or other such IVY League Colleges without the help of "MAGICAL DOPE".  I honestly suspect the only person needing and using MAGICAL DRUGS WAS THE DOPE WHO WROTE THIS DRECK ONLY TO PLACE THIS SPAWN OF HIS PROFOUND NEVER ENDED STUPIDITY ON DVD.I think less of this foolish DVD than I do those old racist movies that portrayed all black people as, "Simple House Boys" bowing and scraping their way through life with the sole goal of "pleasin da masta".  At least older racially debased films lay legitimate claim to being products of a largely ignorant social and intellectual neanderthal nation mired in institutional hate biogotry and oppression.What makes this DVD especially bad is the fact that this is the new face of bigoted negativity in our modern age where some hip hop lackey's gladly take money to create messages that oppress and sell out our own black children.  The suggestion that black people are by nature of birth \ genetics alone inferior is wrapped into the core message of this DVD's storyline.  To watch this DVD youo must buy into its supposition that black people need MAGIC WEED, dope or some other supernatural transcending experience to become the intellectual equals of those who attend ivy league colleges which is the very height of today's more furtive ignorant stupid mindless bigotry disguised as comedy.This DVD functions as a racist tool to rob black men of their dignity, inner strength and self worth by suggesting as truth the lie that we need "MAGIC" to become the equals of those in this society who are afforded opportunities to acheive great things.Tell all the dopes who made this racist DVD you are not buying into their bright new package of old tired racist lies preaching the hate filled Gospel of supposed inheirent black inferiority by leaving this DVD trash on the shelf to rot.  Please do not buy this racist DVD media tool that insults the dignity and intelligence of every black man that has and will ever live.  I pray every black white red yellow whatever your race are stronger and better than sinking low enough to buy this racist filth
a fan of the first. this is by far the worst moive I've seen. I LOVE the first secret garden. No one can do a sequel to a moive as good as the origanl. It's a classic. But this sequel is terriable. It controdicts the first moive. It takes the magic away. If you liked the origanl, first moive don't watch this, it will take the magic out of the first moive
Movie is TOP - DVD is a FLOP!. This DVD gets only 2 stars because the 4:3 TV screen format of this DVD production is really ridiculous.But the movie is one of my favorites, number 4 on my all time best movies list.The feel of the movie is more like that of a typical 70's sci fi movie (like 'Andromeda') than of a 60's movie. Austere and unemotional (like Colossus himself), quietly and punctuously narrated, minimalistically acted and with minimal action - a movie for the brain, as befits a movie about a giant electronic brain taking over control of the world. I like the outdated look of the technology in the movie - black-and-green screens, LED displays, printout terminals etc. Really gets you the feel of the dawn of the computer age in the 60's. And captures- then reasonable-appearing - fears of computers surpassing human beings. ATTENTION! SPOILER! The movie has no happy end, the supercomputer maintains control of the earth in the end. Just as it is in D.F. Jones' novel 'Colossus' on which the movie is based. And that's another reason why I like the movie so much - one of the few movies WITHOUT a forseeable and boring happy ending. The absence of a happy ending is not the absence of an ending, by the way, contrary to what has been supposed by a previous reviewer.This movie almost has the quality of a Kubrick
Much more bad than good. I ordered this DVD on the basis of some of the reviews - it was a big mistake.  While Terry Dunn is very relaxing to listen to and obviously knows his stuff, the quality of the DVD makes its all but useless as a training tool.  The DVD does not permit selection of the section I want to perform.  The section that introduces you to the basic forms is so washed out that you cannot tell what the foot and hand positions are supposed to be.Finally, in the last segment where Terry performs the complete form, the camera pans in too often so that you cannot actually see the form from start to finish.Sadly, I highly recommend you seek another source of knowledge for this wonderful art.  I know I will be looking for something better.
Amazing Reviews!. I am amazed by all the 5 star reviews, how surreal!  No really.  I agree with the 1 star posts. The surreal life on MTV is a bit more, ah surreal.This movie is far from poignant, well...on second thought
Not worth the price. I study Amazons in both the ancient world and in modern incarnations of the legends.  You have to watch this movie without expectation of historical anything -- within two minutes I could hear how badly it would destroy anything vaguely historical.  There is a plot and it does circle back to the beginning and reach a conclusion to the opening conflicts but the points between are rather weak.  It has a soft-porn quaity to it -- lots of breasts and female bum, very little male nudity, the sex is all distant and softly lit.  Ultimately it feels like someone had an interesting idea, some productors messed with it and got their sex buddies jobs in it, and the result is something not really worth you dollars
Poor Casting, Predictable Story. Firstly I must say how much I dislike Jennifer Lopez so attempting to watch this movie has been a struggle since it was first released however I decided to brave it out for the sake of Ralph Fiennes.  Lopez plays a maid who falls for a guy who has loads of money (Fiennes, who is miscast, really) He thinks she is a guest in the hotel, she plays along. So she lies about herself for the rest of the movie and when all is revealed, it comes to a ridiculous ending.  There's not much else to say to this cinderella movie, except maybe that it's not funny. Lopez isn't a great actress, she and Fienness have about as much chemistry as a toothbrush in a toiletbowl
A Little Disappointing. 'Fat Girl' is a daring and explicit film that tries to explore the confusion, anxiety, violence of teenage sexuality.  It stars two sisters who are trying to find their sexual identity.  One of the sisters is a stunning beauty, while the other is a pudgy outcast.  They are on vacation, and the beautiful one meets a handsome college student who steals the virginity from her.  What saves the film from being a complete waste and being absolutely pointless is the dialogue between the characters.  The dialogue is fantastic as they show the bitterness and cynicism of two sexually confused teenagers.  It shows the emotional abuse that teenagers put on each other.The ending of 'Fat Girl' seems to have become very famous by now.  Yes, it is absolutely shocking, but the ending does not bring any sense or hope to the overall film.  It is an extremely pessimistic look humanity, and also, might I say, a savagely sexist outlook on males.  I don't know what the director is trying to say; maybe she is just trying to just shock the audience as much as she can, but many people will leave the movie thinking they have wasted their time.
Carp almost gets it back, yet loses it again. Pro-Life, a near hour-film for the Masters of Horror series on Showtime, is about a siege by three anti-abortionist boys and their father on an abortion clinic to "rescue" their sister who is impregnated by a demon. The first thing that pops into ones mind when the credits role is a lame phrase for a bad film: " Oh, where art thou talent gone, Mr. Carpenter." In Pro-Life this master is about half-way to his glory days for about forty-five minutes, or so. It might be an imperfect first two-thirds, but its still the best stuff he has done in a while. Yet, then it seems like he just went and ran out of money, because the editing becomes so irritating due to its choppiness, that this awkwardness seems like Carpenter just tries to get the film over and forgets something called "buildup:" as the flow in this last block just does not seem clean.  The film starts out good enough with a pissed of Ron Pearlman of Hellboy fame getting in shootouts with the doctor of the clinic. This is a good action scene, if done somewhat pedestrian, but its still all in fun, not to be taken seriously. While shades of  Carpenter`s latter-day, "Assault on Precinct 13" come to mind in the good way, and there's some great `n gross f/x scenes. Yet, the dialogue in the entire film is pretty awful, and the script does not seem to make many good statements on this controversial subject, besides being the backdrop of the story. Yet, this is not where it fails, it falters in the  concluding scenes in which the demon is featured, and this aspect to the story is simply not needed in a plot that should have just concentrated on human horror, and took its time, without rushing to the end credits.* 1/2 (Out of 5
I have autism and this movie is so UNREAL IT STINKS!. If you are a die hard Bruce Willis fan this movie is for you.  Bruce never fails at being himself a great action hero character and here Bruce does not disappoint.  The problem with this movie is the movie itself.  It is so untruthful as to be lame.  I have autism.  I am diagnosed with high functioning autism now but that was not always the case.  In my childhood I was more towards the catatonic side of the autism spectrum.The kid was so one demensional and flat.  While some autistic people can see patterns really well the little things the quirky natures and odd mannerisms absent or were wrong.  Being autistic is like living in a seperate world all your own while simulteanously trying to understand and survive in this world.  When you are autistic there is always a tug of war between the two opposing worlds that manifests itself somehow in the persons "acting out".  Especially at the extreme youth of the so called autistic child it is hard to beleive he was that in control of his senses and responses to humans.  When I was eight years old as a high functioning autistic I have no where near that level of self control in changing stimulus soak environments full of people.It is a ok movie get it if you want.  I guess its why real police officers never watch most cop drama's because they see live and experence police work real life and what they see on film seldom matches their reality.  Likewise Murcury rising is a great film to awaken neurotypicals to the existance of autistic people but please know it is stereotypical, superficial and trite in its handling of autism.  There is both more vigor and hope in life on the the autistm spectrum than this movie reveals.  This Murcury Rising despite its major flaws is an excellent first step on your journey to understand autism because it shows you care.  Rain Man is a better movie dispite some of its relatively minor flaws.I saw the movie Murcury Rising and it was so bad I did not want it in my collection because to me it just did not feel real or meaningful to me in any way.  Of course my tastes do not run in tandem with normal human tastes so most neurotypicals will likely love Murcury Rising but I am hard pressed to give it even one star
Definitive portrayal of generation X (for what that's worth). Many reviewers and critics said it best...what do you do when the "hero" of the film (Ethan Hawke) is a complete a---hole, Winona Ryder is a horrid documentarian that would give Ed Wood, Jr. a run for his money, and Stiller, who is supposed to be the bad guy, actually isn't that bad of a human being?  And Winona's friends are the smarmy, arrogant, Generation X punks who think they know everything (when the reality is (forgive the pun) they don't know jack).  Past generations would quote Tolstoy and Shakespeare, Generation X quotes TV commercials, Scooby Doo cartoons, Star Wars, and bad sitcoms.  Generation X is probably the most insincere generation ever, detaching themselves and calling themselves "ironic", when all they really do is indulge in pretentious pseudo-intellectualism.   Is this film an accurate portrayal of them?  Yes, in some ways.  Is the film worth watching?  Yeah, at least once.  Stiller gives a decent performance, it's nicely shot, and Garofalo actually almost gives her slacker character depth.  This is probably due to the fact that Garofalo actually has some substance herself, as opposed to the character she plays.Check it out more as an artifact of its time more than a cool film.
NO STARS movie!. A director who has no idea how to film dance sequences? An important song transmuted into God knows what? Mis-casting galore? A female star without one iota of chrisma? (If she stopped 3 shows cold they must have been high-school productions!) This is...or should have been...about the struggle to not only get a job on Broadway but to hang-on to that which is starting to fade. The all important role of Shiela seems little more than an after thought. Turned into a silly love story (which doesn't even play!) it is merely sad. Sad...and very, very BAD!!!(the one star rating is because I HAD to rate it!
Not worth seeing. George Segal is a good actor, but he is out of his element in this type of movie.  He is much better in light-hearted movies like "Fun With Dick and Jane."The biggest disappointment is the dialog by Harold Pinter.  The characters exchange meaningless small talk at cross purposes while nothing happens, and we all get bored.This spy movie is not even in the same league with "Day of the Jackel" and "The Odessa File."I threw away my copy of "The Quiller Memorandum" after watching it once.  I can't imagine ever wanting to see it again
Rent if you want to see, not a collectors item. These plays were okay, I'm glad I rented them before buying them.  The props and things were very nice, the actors didn't gel well with each other or connect with their characters and the singing was mediocre ( definitely no Tyler Perry quality on that note) but the messages were good just seemed a little unrealistic and too drawn out.  I thought Alexander O'Neal sang in one of them but he didn't
It killed an evening that needed to die, anyway. Thank God I borrowed this one from the library! Every time I saw a spinning propeller I thought of what my WWII veteran parents must be doing in their shared grave if they saw any of this crap through my eyes. I couldn't even enjoy the battle scenes because of the technical anomalies and anachronisms. It did keep me watching for the entire three hours just hoping it might get better and it finally did when it stopped
I love most of Bob Odenkirk's work... I think I've seen almost everything Bob's been involved with and this just didn't do it for me. If you have friends and they aren't complete dullards, you've probably had most of the conversations you'll see in this movie
Meh. The meta-story of this film was potentially interesting, but only before the gathering of the bad actors of the roundtable.One star each for Cross and Black, whose genuine talent are the only reasons to bother glancing at this movie. Unless you are the type to grow an emotional bond with unlikeable characters, whose masturbatory storytelling is untinteresting and unbelievable, I would recommend you spend ninety minutes of your life doing anything other than watching Melvin Goes to Dinner
Lies!. It is obvious that this movie is full of lies.  Although I have not actually seen it, I know this to be true because I have seen many discussions on the movie on the Fox news channel (God bless them!).  The way he attacks poor Mr. Heston is deplorable.  Can't Michael Moore tell from the comments Charlton made at the rallies that he doesn't have his faculties about him?  I am also unsure that Mr. Heston even said the things that the movie shows him saying.  The ability of Hollywood to manipulate and edit sound is truly amazing, making it appear that My President (Heston) is an uncaring, babbling idiot by simply using his own words - shame on you Michael!  And as for the way he got the gun from the bank, I agree with the other posters that the entire point of a bank giving away free guns is completely nullified by the fact that they didn't give him the gun the minute he walked into the bank.  Bravo to those who figured that out.  Also, Michael Moore is fat.  Take that Pinkie
BUY SOMETHING ELSE!. This movie was a major disappointment.  The plot is awful.  The dialogue stinks.  The camera-work is amateurish, even by b-movie sleaze standards.  It's poorly lit.  The acting is terrible, and most of the actresses are in fact ugly slags.  There is a lot of nudity, but don't expect to be aroused by it.  The people who made this did not put much effort into it at all and it shows.  I guess they figured that nudity + perversion was a big enough selling point, and that they could lazily toss the rest of the movie together in a slapdash manner.  Unfortunately, this movie does not even excel on the nudity and perversion front, except for perhaps the odd fellow who has a thing for trannies.  In other words, this movie has no redeeming value, and even the onanist should look elsewhere.  For something in a similar vein and from the same era, but that is actually enjoyable, I'd recommend something from the Something Weird catalogue instead.
I like Lenny Bruce just fine, but... I always thought of Dustin Hoffman as Tootsie, which I haven't seen, and the movie producer from WAG THE DOG, which I love. Or RAIN MAN, another fine film. But hey, the guy can give us a nasty edge if the script calls for it. Hoffman became Lenny Bruce. Bruce's material was great at times and awful at others. Nowadays, of course, none of it would be shocking. The film shows us Bruce's faults, unedited, presumably in contrast to the great material he could produce because of and/or in spite of his excesses. But still, something is missing. Something crucial. I don't know what. I only know this film could have been so much better.
not worth the time!!!!. this movie is such a bore that i sold it 2 hours after i watched it. not even lori singer was able to help this sad and unscary movie. a waste of time and money
GARBAGE DISC WON'T PLAY ON MY PS3 BLU-RAY PLAYER. If you intend to play this disc on a PS3 DO NOT PURCHASE IT.  It doesn't work on the PS3.  What a rip off
did they read the book??. while not one of his best novels, tommyknockers was much better than this waste of time! jimmy smits does his best,but the underwritten screenplay does him and this movie about dead aliens and the thought control they have over a small new england town is just not worth the trouble!! SKIP IT!!!!
It works, if you like formulaic garbage. "On Demand", the service offered by many cable and satellite providers, is proving its worth. It's getting me to watch movies I would never have watched before.This is one of those films that every starving altruistic screenwriter wishes he could write, but wouldn't dare because he values art above all else - even money. I would imagine that the writer was handed the plot by someone at Columbia, saying, "We need an action film involving a Chinese mob, a renegade hit man, a pretty girl, and a `hit' that makes the hit man go straight".How much more formulaic can you get?It sticks to the formula, for better or worse. Assassin encounters moral conundrum and can't kill target. Mob orders hit on assassin. Assassin goes to beautiful girl for help. Beautiful girl helps him in shoot-outs that she couldn't possibly have survived in a real-life scenario. Yada-yada. You can guess the rest. There's no question who will be the victor, and who will be spoiled.The saddest part was that Mira Sorvino's tremendous talents are - once again - wasted.Speaking of wasted, I won't waste more words. In addition, don't waste your time on this. I'm glad that I didn't pay for it.I am utterly astonished that ANY reviewer gave this five stars, or that it inspired another reviewer to write, "Gun Fu ballet at its finest". What the "H"? As I said, this is nothing more than a formulaic film made to - it hopes - appeal to those who enjoy movies about the Chinese mob. When you look at the films gross receipts, and its budget, you be the judge - it failed. It cost $30m to make, and grossed $35m worldwide. That's considered a monumental failure.
Average Jackie Film at Best. I say this because Jackie doesn't usually do wired Kung-Fu and this movie utilized that. It also utilized the sped up frame rate to make the fighters appear more skilled. Now that being said, the martial artists really are quite skilled. They really are pretty quick. They really can do most of those moves. It had some OK though special effects assisted fights, but this movie wasn't really about that. Jackie Chan was trying to break into "real" acting in this movie. I wouldn't buy it if you are trying to watch him fight, and if you buy it for the story....well that's your choice I guess
Disappointed. I would love to review this Lions Gate DVD, but I can't catch one word in ten.  It is NOT, as advertised, closed-captioned, and the characters' speech is too casual and British for me to get.  Drat! -- I was so chuffed to see there was a cc version
To basic. i bought this ballet 101 and 201. it is very ,very basic. i learned most of this stuff in 2 classes. i am glad i didnt buy this from here because it is almost 22 dollars. i bought the VHS versions somewhere else and only paid 11 dollars.. which after today i still think is to much. this still a good video but not enough time is spent on warm-up which could lead to hurting yourself if you dont know what you are doing. i say warn up for about 20 mins before doing any ballet. do not let your kids do this alone they will hurt themselves. it is great for in between classes to stay current and develop technique but you and you child will pass up this dvd/vhs in a few classes and find no need for it very soon. i suggest the The ballet workout it is an older taper but much more indepth about the barre work and center work and alot harder, and actually more fun
This is not what it seems. One reviewer wrote the review about the "Super Ants"....this is not that movie.This movie staring Dean Cain bites big time, unless you like movies about chases....there are several car chases, car chasing man, man chasing man, helicopter chasing car....Get the point?The plot is strained through out the movie in dribbles... if you can make it through the endless sceens showing actors walking around doing nothing,walking or staring blankly (probably wondering if this movie will ever be over).*** Fast forward special**
Think James Bond mixed in with a little Hentai. I really had big expectations going into this series.  Reading the other reviews on here I thought that I was in for something fanstastic, but my expectations were not met.Crying Freeman starts off with a lot of promise.  There's a mysterious charachter, a love connection, and then a destiny met-- all things that give the series a strong foundation.  After the initial introduction to the story and main charachters, the series falls apart.  Enter killing after killing, mission after mission that seem to lead to absolutely nowhere, sensless nudity, and you get an absolutely rediculous and humerous plot.Before I watched this series, one thing that a reviewer said stuck into my mind "the charachters seem to drop their clothes for no reason." Boy was he right.  The amount of nudity in this series gets so over the top that you have to wonder why it was put in.  Weere the producers looking for a crime-drama or were they looking for a hentai(anime porn)?  The amount of times that the charachters just casually take their clothes off makes one wonder.The sketching?  hmmm, Crying Freeman is an early 90's anime so you can't expect it to have the level of excellence of today, but some of the charachter sketches are very amatueristic.  There is one scene in particular that will make you laugh.. It's a certain decapitation scene in the latter part of this movie--look out for how the blood spurts lol.All in all, Crying Freeman has too many flaws.  There is no build up of the charachter Freeman.  In the beginning of the movie, he talks about leaving Japan and moving on with his wife, yet, as the story progresses he remains a brute killer.  Also, where exactly does his story lead to?  The only thing that occurs in this movie is a bunch of run ins with rivals and a bunch of deaths.  Where is the progression of the charachters and their lives?  There's none.  Despite it's shortcommings, Crying Freeman is a VERY entertaining anime.  The death scenes are artsy and flashy, and the women (yes, I actually got turned on by these anime women--hard to believe) and sex scenes that they're involved in are pretty steamy.I'd say to give this one a shot.  Don't go in expecting some Godfather bit, though.  Just approach it with an open mind and heart
Nice Cinematography, Shame About The Script. The film looks good. That cannot be denied. It looks stylish and is directed with flair. Unfortunately, the script plays out like it's the product of an immature adolecent personality who needs to get out more and mix with other kids his own age. The dialogue is just cringeworthy.One cannot help but think that someone indulged Tarantino based on previous successes in funding this project - indulged him to the point of allowing him to act in it - and made a big boob on all counts.I scare easy but this vampire horror movie with all its (much trumpeted) blood and guts didn't produce a single goosebump. It was like watching a cartoon.Disappointing.
WELL INTENTIONED, PERHAPS -- BUT SIGNIFICANTLY FLAWED. There are some good things about this film -- it gives audiences an idea of how insidious the Nazi propaganda machine was, for one thing. It also shows the main character, Antoine Moreau, a (fictional) famous French mime, having his eyes opened to the reality of the Nazis' 'final solution' to the 'Jewish problem'. Brought to a Czech town that has been 'given to the Jews' by the Nazis in order to stage a performance that will be seen by the Swiss Red Cross delegation, hopefully persuading them that the Germans are not as monstrous as they have been portrayed, Moreau changes his original idea for the performance, hoping to get a 'silent' message to the Red Cross that will let them know the true fate of Jews (and other 'undesirables') at the hands of the Nazis.I'll briefly mention a couple of less-than-positive observations, and then get into my main problem with the film.  The production values reminded me a bit of a made-for-TV movie -- and from time to time it seemed that the sound was a little out of sync with the picture. The image quality on the DVD could have been much better as well.  Also, the Shanachie DVD release is version of the film that has been dubbed with English.  This is, in the case of this film, not very well-done.  The cabaret singer, for instance, comes across as completely unbelievable in that her voice doesn't match her face or ethnicity in the least.  Everyone in the film winds up with an English accent, which detracts from any authenticity that might have been retained using subtitles instead of clumsy dubbing.Another reviewer below brought up the dubbing problem as it apples to one of one of the children, Stella (portrayed by Linda Jablonska).  Her voice does not sound at all like that of a little girl. She develops a bit of a crush on Antoine, which in itself seems like a pretty natural occurrence under the circumstances -- here is a famous artist who has come to the village to stage a show, with her as one of the leads, who is kind and supportive and friendly to her, who listens to her ideas and feelings with attention and respect.The problem I had was with one scene in particular.  Stella has been caught on the streets after curfew and chased by police.  She bites one of them and manages to elude them by squeezing through a break in a fence.  In the process of getting away, she gets muddy, scrapes herself bloody in a few places, and tears her clothing.  She goes to Moreau's hotel and climbs to the ledge outside his room and taps on the window.  When he opens it, he is shocked at her condition, lets her into the room, and begins to try to clean her cuts and scrapes, asking what had happened.  He then draws a bath for her, so she can wash herself.  As Moreau sits down, still in a bit of a daze over what has happened to her, she steps into the bath.  Just before she pulls her dress over her head, she says to him, `No looking.'  He shakes his head to bring himself out of his daze and says `Of course', then repairs to the adjoining bedroom, where he lies down on the bed to have a smoke, allowing her to conduct her bath in privacy.  A moment later, he hears a noise and looks up to see Stella emerge from the bathroom, completely naked, in a full-frontal nude shot.  Moreau gets up from the bed and lifts the covers, suggesting that she warm herself.  She climbs into the bed; he covers her up, and steps away to the other side of the room.  There is nothing about the scene that implies that anything improper occurred.  He has simply offered her care and comfort and sympathy.This shot only lasts a few seconds, but I feel that, regardless of the director's reasoning for shooting it in the first place, it could have been left out.  If the point was to show that Moreau has either had morals all along, or that he has acquired them, it could have been demonstrated in a variety of other ways.Earlier in the film, Stella had witnessed one of her caregivers, semi-nude, in Moreau's hotel room (Stella saw this from outside).  Given her `schoolgirl crush' on Moreau, it seemed natural for her to become upset over this.  As a result, however, the scene after the bath comes across as a young girl inappropriately mimicking adult sexual behaviour.  This, combined with the `adult' voice dubbed over Stella's, makes the scene even more disquieting.There are some viewers who might argue that, in Europe, `standards' involving nudity and sexuality are not as reactionary as those in the US.  In many instances, I would wholeheartedly agree with them.  There is much hypocrisy in the dynamics of American culture and moral values, and not a little bit of neurosis.  However, the sexual objectification of children is something about which I feel very strongly...and I think the scene in question in this film amounts to exactly that.  Don't get me wrong -- I'm not so prudish that I turn away from even full-frontal nudity in a film, if it's not gratuitous and it's an integral part of the storyline...but here, it involves a prepubescent girl, and could have easily been left out.  It worries me bit that this point has not been made by other reviewers.  Have we become so numbed in respect to nudity in films that many can't recognize an instance where it's not only unnecessary, but potentially harmful?I'm glad I've seen the film -- and I'd recommend it with a bit of praise and some strong reservations, as noted above. With all of the ridiculous claims from some quarters that the Holocaust never happened, I think it's vitally important for films on the subject to be made and seen.The Czech film ALL MY LOVED ONES is an excellent film about this horrible time that has not gotten the attention it deserves -- seek it out.n.b. -- This is the second time I have posted this exact review.  I noticed today (6 April 2006) that it has, for some reason, been removed from the site.  I've re-read what I've written, and I don't see anything objectionable or offensive.  The issues I have with the film are discussed straightforwardly.  If anyone objects to anything I've written here, I'd like to know what it is.
This just didn't do it for me. Maybe I loved the original one too much, but this version of the story did not work for me. I especially was dissapointed in the music and the oompa loompas. Stick with the first one. It was perfect
Who wrote this?. Waste of time.  I turned it off.  The "extra features" were slightly interesting.  The actual film was just a vehicle for the creators to show themselves dancing.  A vanity piece.  Why not present just the dance and save us from excruciating, badly-written melodrama.  Don't bother
I bought this DVD in september, 2006. But I have never received it. I bought this DVD in september, 2006. But I have never received it
Poorly Made, Average Music, Some Above Average Actors.. Here is a list of the music that was used for the film in order of its use:Picture Perfect - PollynLinctus - Aim - Hinterland LabelLebanese Blonde - Thievery Corporation - Mirror Conspiracy LabelChina Morning - Jussi Tegelman & Traci HendricksOceanwide - HalouRatio of Freckles to Stars - HalouRiverside - Nicholas DavidageHumming - Scott ThomasCome to California - Deborah FalconerClean Up - Funky Fresh FewSave Yourself - SirenBreakneck - Only ChildTrack 3- Ant MusicPolitical - HalouThe Dime Train - Mark RaeBanger - Funky Fresh FewInvestigation - Jussi TegelmanTrack 2 - Ant MusicFor Gloria - SirenAftermath - SirenQueen of the Sun - LuckyStimulation - Polly
Shame... I can not imagine anyone, who likes "Traffic" as much as I do, enjoying this crap. Don't expect to see these outstanding musicians doing their magic for more than 10 seconds at a time. Another bunch of losers, who believe that just to show the artist in action is not what music lovers are after, were allowed to screw up ones again. Don't buy this one hour long McDonalds commercial with "Traffic" music as a soundtrack
A Charming And Quirky Romantic Comedy--"Apartment 12" Delivers Everything Except Charm, Romance And Comedy. I have always admired Mark Ruffalo's indie sensibilities.  He has had some high profile and mainstream roles, but to me he'll always be an indie actor--a person to whom art is more important than commerce.  But let's face it, you're not always going to hit it out of the park--not every project enhances your resume.  Let's chalk "Apartment 12" up to a wrong headed misfire.Nothing about this tedious film works.  It's one of those "quirky" ensemble pieces where everyone is larger than life.  These films can be delightful or disastrous--my inclination on "Apartment 12" should already be clear.  In the wacky apartment complex Ruffalo finds himself in, there are the requisite oddballs.  The situation rings as false as a bad sitcom with everyone leaving their doors open for the sole purpose of letting mayhem ensue.But the film also wants to be a romantic comedy.  Problem is--Ruffalo's character is such an unappealing guy, it's hard to imagine anyone thinking he was a catch.  As a failed artist and pizza delivery boy, Ruffalo is childish, slovenly and superior--basically a loser in every regard.  "I'm a painter, I should be dating models from Milan."  That's about as much insight as the film has into his artistic integrity.  His romantic partner in this escapade, of course, is too good to be true.  But to show you the apparent lack of interest this film actually has in it's characters--we never know what she does for a living.  It's something vaguely professional in a building with lawyers--that's all you really need to know.Add to the wacky ensemble and forced romance--we have a self indulgent, empty headed look at the art community.  Cliche'd in every way possible, much that occurs in this milieu is cringe-worthy.  In typical Ruffalo fashion, at a showing he tells the artist his work is "unoriginal, banal and contrived."  Hmmm--sounds like some films I know, too.  KGHarris, 11/06
Save your time and money. This is another of the endless type of Hollywood movie that is lame, puerile, and stupid. I won't go into detail with examples of the lame attempts at humor, since other reviews here cover that well. And sure, as the the cover suggests, it's got a bunch of sexy babes in it, but don't watch it for them either, because there's very little to see of them. The only decent sexy scene is a hot tub one with several topless girls that runs maybe 2 minutes. Further, the cover advertises "4 UNRATED deleted scenes" as though those are sexy scenes, but they're NOT at all. So, if you're looking for very corny, adolescent humor, this film may be for you, but otherwise avoid it like the plague
Someone please rip my eyes out... What if I had made a horror movie in high school? It would have gone something like this..My best friend Tara, an aspiring thespian who can fake cry really well, would be my star.  Before filming, we'd make sure to touch up Tara's delicious golden locks.  Oooops, A little bit too much bleach!My story would revolve around a group of teenagers trapped in a strange house where they'd stumble upon an eerie, comatatose man wearing a bathing suit (Tom from the swim team would be a perfect fit...of course we'd have to shave his head...I wonder if he'd be willing?). The strange house will be dark and water will be dripping from everywhere, maybe in slow motion.  Tara and my other friends/actors will be extremely dim witted, and mostly deaf so that they can't hear each other very well.  My characters will then die one by one in entirely standard an unoriginal death sequences.  I'll think of some totally absurd story to tie everything together later, but it is sure to be absolutely terrifying. I'll save money by using a lot of stock footage, staging the car accident just "after" the accident occurs, and  scoring the music myself on my Casio at home.   Genius.  I'm going to be the most popular guy in school
Lust in aisle seven. If Jennifer Aniston's "Friend" Rachel Greene ever had a weird dream I could imagine it to be just like this minimum-waged, sex- changed variation of "The Graduate."  But just like Rachel, I'd probably shake it off as a weird time spent in the twilight zone."The Good Girl" would have believe that somewhere in Red State U.S.A. Aniston is a frustrated 30 year old sales clerk in a mythical "K-Martesque" store called the "Retail Rodeo." Her name, pun intended, Justine Last. As we can deduce from Aniston's off screen monologue (which she reads in a Forest Gump-ish, "Id-like-to-be-profound, but-I-just=got hit-by-a=baseball-bat" kid of sound), she feels trapped just like all the seemingly robots around her.  Married to a pot-headed, dim bulb of a husband (the wonderful John C. Reilly), Last yearns to be rescued and believes she's finds her shining knight in the person of an introverted but passionate younger man named Holden Worther(Jake Gyllenhaal).  The sex is great, of course, and before Last can bask in her newfound sense of intimatacy and hope for a better life she must contend with a major problem- Holden is a lovesick loon.From there on director Miguel Arteta and writer Mike White turn the tables on our own expectations for finding love in odd places .  No last minute romantic rescues here for "The Good Girl" is ultimately a cynical, extramarital version of "A Simple Plan" where one misdeed leads serio-comically to another.It's game for part of the way but the movie ultimately is phoney.  Another condescinding, Hollywood take on life in fly-over land as a fate worse than death.  All the characters are made to go a beat slower and drag around their surroundings like zombies from the movie "Dawn of the Dead." Further proof of the filmakers blue state status are depicted by haveing Gyllenhaal's parents act   like the subjects in the painting "American Gothic." They're two  silent, moronic centurians.Aniston is just too sitcom spunky and creamy-complexted for the low-rent heroine.  Her homestyle accent comes and goes while Gyllenhaal's hair looks as if it was styled somewhere on Rodeo Drive. The movie's one bright spot is Zooey Deschanel as Aniston's morose co-worker.  A funny riff she repeated in the movie "Failure To Launch."  Wake up, Rachel.  Wake up
Poor Release of Movie. I found this movie very poor and totally a waste of my time.  It's plot needs to be rewritten and it does not contain a deeper meaning.  The ending was very disapointing and without proper conclusion. Denzel Washington did a great job playing the detective and John Goodman is a very good actor yet the other charaters did not do thier job and was poorly acted. My recommendation is to stay away from this movie and save your money. Buy somthing that has a good plot. D- is my ratin
DEAR MORONS AT PARAMOUNT!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. My question for the Morons at Paramount is why do possibly glue the sticker seals the container with such strong stuff that you cannot avoid ruining the container when you remove it. May I remind that this a COLLETOR'S ITEM!!!!! Therefore if you damage it is WORTHLESS
Sooooo Bad. I took my 14 yr old grandson to see this and not only did I think this movie was bad, so did he. I think it should get a Razzie award for worst movie of the year. I wouldn't recommend renting and definitely not buying this movie
Depends on what you want. If you want to see Mr. Milan demonstrate his personal rapport with animals, this DVD will fill the bill.  However, if you are seeking advice and instruction on how to overcome aggression in your pet, this DVD will not be of much help.  The DVD is really nothing but an infommercial praising Mr. Milan's talents. I seriously doubt that the dogs he works with in the DVD maintain their non-aggressive behavior after he leaves. The strategies he uses, such as having the aggressive dog walk beside his non-aggressive pack dog, are not practical for the average dog owner. If someone were going to hire Mr. Milan as a personal dog trainer, this item would certainly serve as a recommendation, but it is woefully lacking as step-by-step instruction on how to overcome aggression in a dog
URBAN CRAP. 99 mins of suck..good thing i don't have a life..some nudity (eva mendes' fun bags?) definitely would have raised this movie another star..couldn't wait to look at the talent files(he he)after the movie was over..can't wait for the next one
Good special effects, trite story line, mediochre acting. I haven't seen a Superman movie since the first Christopher Reeve flic back in the 80s, so I'm probably behind the times on these.  Just picked this one up on a whim and, though it had its entertaining moments, it was overall rather mundane.The special effects were very cool, but they were forced to carry the weight of a lightweight script.  How many times can we see Superman, Lois and family, and "the average Joes" be in seemingly fatal circumstances only to be rescued at the last second by either the Man of Steel himself, or (in the case of Superman) by Lois?  After a while the pattern gets tedious.Also, fear I have some quibbles about the acting.  The good guys were merely okay (all of them could have done a lot more to make their characters more fun and memorable), but the bad guys were downright BORING.  Parker Posey seemed like she was asleep while she delivered her lines as Lex Luthor's girlfriend; Kevin Spacey seemed to be trying a little harder to bring Luthor to life, but, alas, he pretty much failed.Whole cast and crew seemed like they were under the influence of ultrapowerful Kryptonite that kept them weak and sleepy. Too bad
Blade Trilogy Ending Deserves Better Than This !!. This movie smacks of sub-par quality. Unlike its two predecessors which are far superior, Blade III is plagued with a poor script, an unqualified director (sorry, David Goyer is no director), and a storyline that sputters in closing out what would have been one of the best comicbook-to-film trilogies in the marketplace. Think Godfather III in the Godfather series and you'll know why to bypass this awful film. This movie simply lacks the raw emotional and psychological underpinnings that established and refined the Blade character in the first two films. Without these attributes, the follow-on action and violence in the film (an artistic staple in the Blade franchise) even lacks the heart-stopping emotional quality you'd expect. What you get is a convoluted story with no momentum and characters (including Snipes's Blade) who are all dressed up with no where to go. Rated or Unrated, avoid this DVD at all cost. It isn't worth the money or the effort.
Soundtrack intolerable. I found the singing in the soundtrack so utterly intolerable that I had to quit watching this after about 20% of the video. The movie seemed like it would have been nice otherwise (about a 4). The sound of the singing was very grating & harsh to my ears; since it was almost continous it made watching the video impossible. It also seemed to add little to the film in terms of content. The photography & art direction were exquisite
A two hour music video for "Que Sera Sera". I haven't seen the original "Man", so I can only judge this movie on its own merits and how it generally compares to other movies by the same director.  It's not good Hitchcock, and this is why:* The characters were all forgettable, save for the assassin, who got about a 9.5 on the creep scale.  Doris Day's character was useless, save for her singing ability, and yes, amazingly, the only time she did anything to help was during the climactic scene, when she screamed.  Jimmy Stewart's character was pretty good, but only when he was working alone - the puss factor went up considerably when he teamed up with wifey.  I was hoping from the start of the film, and even more so after the early parent/child duet scene, that the son hadn't even existed in the first place.  Bernard could have shaped up to be a decent character, but he got whacked REAL early... too bad...* The story and direction sucked.  Hitchcock could have used the central couple's inability to speak French as a means of isolating them and increasing the paranoia (similar to what Carol Reed did in "The Third Man"), but he didn't, which made the early setting in Morocco unnecessary.  Stewart and Day were supposed to be in desperate search of their kidnapped son, but accomplished their investigation so slowly, it was intensely annoying (TEDIUM DOES NOT EQUAL SUSPENSE).  There were almost no good twists to speak of, and about fifteen minutes after Bernard's death in the beginning, the sense of urgency was lost.  The couple made absolutely no plan to get their son back.  In fact, they ended up confronting the kidnappers directly - such a stupid (and boring) move - and still everything just kind of turned out okay in the end - damn, I almost pulled my hair out.  Guns were introduced so late in the film - and all that time before, Jimmy could have just run upstairs, grabbed his son and ran out with him.  And when Stewart's character pushed the gunman down the stairs, I was thinking, dude, that works for Bogey, but not for you.* There were few Hitchcock moments. The orchestra scene ended really stupidly with Day's scream (one person screams and all of a sudden the killer can't shoot straight - WHAT?!), but people seem to think that that scene's tense. Dude, it's not - you're watching the wrong Hitchcock flick, I'm sorry.  The only good parts of that scene were the shot of the cymbals resting on the chairs, and the one shot of the assassin looking down the barrel of his Luger - the rest was pure filler.* Besides "Que Sera Sera", which is only a decent song anyways, the music was stock.  Can't remember any of it.  No memorable scene-stealing sound effects, either.Apparently, Hitchcock thought this was the better version.  He was either stoned out of his mind when he said that, or the original was total crap.This movie does not deserve four-and-a-half stars, especially being that it's an average score taken from (currently) 65 reviews.  What the hell, people?  I only borrowed this from the library and still felt cheated after I saw it.  Four-and-a-half stars?!  There is absolutely no way this is on par with "Vertigo".Sorry, this review is fairly antagonistic, and meaningless in many areas for people who haven't yet seen the film, but hopefully people who read this will understand what I'm getting at and will not make the mistake of buying the movie just because it's another "acclaimed masterpiece".ALFRED HITCHCOCK MAY VERY WELL HAVE BEEN A GENIUS, BUT THIS IS NOT A GOOD FILM.  DO NOT BUY ON IMPULSE UNLESS YOU ARE A HITCHCOCK FANATIC
A has-been. The reviewers here are rating the performer, not the show. Stritch looks haggard, sings horribly, and most of her stories are only interesting to her. A dreadful performance all around
Not as bad as its reputation. "A Night in Heaven" opened in 1983 to terrible reviews and even worse box office.  It was a mainstay on ten worst lists everywhere.  It was dubbed "Flashdunce" after another hit movie of that year.Really, its not that bad.  Insubstantial, yes.  Ill-conceived, yes.  Entertaining?  Quite.Lesley Anne Warren plays Faye, a speech professor at the local community college who is having marital problems.  Her husband Whitney (Robert Logan), an emotionally stunted inventor, has seemingly lost interest in her and she is becoming depressed when her sister Patsy (Deborah Rush) takes her out with friends to a local strip club.  There, Faye is surprised that the club's star stripper, Ricky the Rocket (Christopher Atkins), is the same cocky student she just flunked in her class.  When he sees her in the audience, Ricky does a virtual lapdance for her, and it isn't long before they have plunged into an affair.Actually, there was probably a very good, serious film buried somewhere in writer Joan Tewkesbury's original script, which is glossily directed by Oscar-winner John G. Avildsen, who went from this fiasco to "The Karate Kid".  Unfortunately, the casting of Christopher Atkins in what was obviously originally a supporting role hurts the film considerably.  Cast after his breakthrough role in "The Blue Lagoon", Atkins received star billing and all of the film's pre-release publicity.  But Warren and Logan are the lead characters, have most of the screen time and obviously have the main relationship in the film.  This caused the film to be quite obviously heavily reedited to emphasize the Atkins character, who is a total jerk, completely amoral and unlikable, and poorly played by one of the worst actors ever to be spit out of the Hollywood system.  This sinks the film faster than the "Titanic".  As a result, what should have been a serious examination of a marriage at a crossroads becomes a smarmy sex-comedy/marital drama in which the disparate elements just don't fit.  Note the brief 80 minute running time.  This is one film which I wish could be reedited to a director's cut, so we can see what the writer and director's original intent was.  Instead, we will forever be saddled with the studio's botched reedit.In spite of all this, "A Night in Heaven" remains entertaining and easy to watch.  Lesley Ann Warren gives a good performance here, although I'm sure this film isn't listed on her otherwise stellar resume.  Robert Logan is also quite good, although his presence is a bit of an eye-opener considering he is best-known for family films like "The Wilderness Family" and this film comes as close to soft-core porn as any major Hollywood studio film of recent decades.  Deborah Rush gives able support, and there's a decent performance here by an actress named Sandra Beall as Ricky's long-suffering girlfriend Slick.  The late Carrie Snodgress also has a couple of good scenes as Ricky's mother.  Unfortunately, Atkins' horrible acting just about negates the performances of everyone around him.  It's impossible to do excellent work when the person you are acting with can't act to save his life.  It makes you appreciate Warren's work even more.  That she manages to give a good performance under the circumstances is commendable.One note:  This film contains one of the sexiest love scenes I have ever seen in a film, and is one of only three reasons to see it.  The other two?  Warren's performance and Bryan Adams' now-classic love them "Heaven", which plays in its entirety over the opening and closing credits.  When you take away the seven minutes for these sequences, that leaves 73 minutes of story, which makes the cuts even more noticeable."A Night in Heaven" is one bomb from the early '80's that should have been much better, but remains more entertaining than many much better films of the era.**1/2 (out of *****);  ** for execution; *** for entertainment value
Logo Imprint Compromises Presentation. I was thrilled when I first read that MLB Productions was finally issuing a DVD version of highlights of the Baltimore Orioles' three World Series victories.  I already owned the VHS versions, one of which (the 1970 World Series) had a major flaw in the audio synchronization (watching the last third of the highlights was like viewing a badly dubbed foreign film).  Finally, I could own all three highlights reels on one disc and without the sync error on the 1970 World Series.Much to my dismay, the MLB logo is permanently, and obtrusively, displayed on the upper right corner of all three programs.  What's that all about?  Does MLB Productions think I'm going to illegally copy and distribute stills?  Thank goodness I don't own a plasma TV or I'd be staring at that stupid logo for the next five years!Sound and picture quality are okay otherwise.  But....that logo is really annoying
I don't know how to explain this much suck.... This is just pathetic...Uwe Boll makes a better zombie film...really...They need to let this franchise die or find Russo & let him save it...But, it's probably too late - the cancer that is parts 4 & 5 has spread...This makes part 3 look like high art...I love zombie films more than any kind of horror..I own more than most people know exist...I don't say this to soud like a know it all but this movie is just embarrasing...You can cover dog poo in powdered sugar & call it candy, but this movie coated dog poo with more dog poo & called it candy..
The dreams of youth are the regrets of maturity. In school you are sometimes asked to summarize extremely lengthy books into one or two sentences to evaluate your knowledge on that certain piece of literature.  To me, that always seemed ridiculous because how could you accurately depict the true value of a 300-page book within two measly paragraphs?  That feeling is exactly my reaction to Ridley Scott's overly produced and underly executed film, Legend.  Throughout the film I felt that Scott had the potential to go anywhere and everywhere, really making this underground cult fantasy film bigger than The Neverending Story and Lord of the Rings put together.  I felt this way because 80s fantasy films seemed to be less commercial and more imaginative than those released in the past decade.  I was waiting for a stronger outing of Willow, but instead I saw Legend disintegrate right before my eyes.  It was as if Ridley had 300-plus pages of material, but had to condense it all into two very small paragraphs.  What ultimately happened was that we, the viewer, were cheated out of quite a bit of potential visuals, creative lands, and mythical creatures.  We were instead handed a body of work that seemed to grasp at straws instead of development, weak heroic characters with an exaggeration on Curry's over-the-top "Price of Darkness" portrayal, and a finale that teetered on sarcasm instead of excitement.Legend, in my eyes, begins with an unsettling "bang".  We see no characters outside of a menacing voice that speaks in rhyme and talks about the end of light.  Scott pulls us gracefully in by giving us these highly imaginative characters and a world that we think will be full of Hensen-esque creatures.  Alas, immediately after pulling at our dark sides, he slaps us in the face with what seems like an hour of pointless drivel with conversation between the Princess Lilly and her man-boy Jack (played by Mia Sara and Tom Cruise respectively).  Caught between horrid writing, unfamiliar past experiences, and a uni-brow the size of Kansas on Cruise's face, we are left with nothing to do except wait.  With the promise of unicorns and a possible dark future, we wait.  The unicorns finally appear and darkness does become momentarily triumphant, but what never brings us back to that immediate opening of dark delight is that Scott never recreates it for us.  Legend fails, not just because of the shallow acting, but because the story never quite hits the momentum it had at the beginning of the film.  While this critic blames Ridley's choice of Sara and Cruise as our guides, I do think he could have strengthened the story to be a bit more energetic and sweeping.  I felt trapped throughout this story, as if the walls that contained Princess Lilly were the actual boundaries of the film.  This hurt Legend.  Unlike other fantasy films of this nature, the walls of a structure may encase our hero, but we know there are bigger and more exotic things happening around the fictional planet.  With Legend, I never felt that.  I felt as if Scott kept us on a lighted path without the comfort or luxury of any outside imagination.  I needed, maybe even wanted, to see more of this planet Scott created, but the door was shut abruptly in my face.I would like to state again that I thought Scott had good intentions with this film, but the final result (either from its original bad screenings to the infamous "director's cut") just didn't feel like it was worth the two hours one had to put into the movie.  Scott had some (I stress "some") moment of excitement, moments of imagination, and moments of sheer fantasy, but they were all clouded by the brazen push of over-the-top melodrama and visions.  What makes most fantasy films work is that you care both for the story as well as the characters.  In Legend, the story seems weak because we care nothing for the characters.  Cruise's portrayal of Jack could have been done by anyone who passed Acting 101, while Curry does give the BEST performance of the film, it is another case of "anyone-itis".  Without the horns or the bold eyes, anyone could have been underneath the mask.  Curry did great, but take him out of the costume and ask the question, does he stand-alone?  Follow this up with some elves and dwarves that seemed more clich than original, and the final result is an ill-fated Legend.  I wanted to like this film.  I knew about the cult-ish status of Scott's fantasy attempt, but in the end, I felt bored instead of moved by the overall picture.Overall, I cannot recommend a second viewing to this film.  I went in expecting a larger-than-life Willow or Neverending Story (or at least enough darkness to counter Alien or Blade Runner), but instead finished the film thinking that in today's standards this would have counted as a "direct to video" release.  Scott, as well as his brother, are fabulous directors and continue to push the boundaries on modern cinema, but Legend failed.  Legend failed because of the story as well as the acting.  Both were not in place, therefore, both could not work together.  During the commentary, Scott mentions his passion for Cocteau's Beauty and the Beast, but it was obvious that he was just name-dropping to gain film critic's respect.  Legend, if anything, insults Cocteau's masterpiece.  From the wrongly used word of the title (not a legend but a fairy-tale), to Cruise's uni-brow, to the cheaply forgettable ending, Legend didn't impress and it would be very difficult to sit through another viewing without some cash in hand.Grade: ** out of ****
Terrible. We struggled through this - luckily we didn't pay to see it. (My stepdaughter owns it, and lent it to me.) A waste of time
Unbelievable rubbish pitched at 13 year olds. A number of talented actors walk through this sham, half awake.  Motor cars, and tiny minds, poorly scripted, rubbish for the brain dead.  Get a life.
Don't believe the hype. This effort shows it's age. In addition, there is a uncomfortable tone in the narration that smacks of a reliance on a pseudo-scientific method somewhat reminiscent of Mengele. I suppose it's possible for it to be taken as tongue-in-cheek by those at the post-graduate level of study at the Cheech and Chong School of Anthropology. However, I have to admit I was unable to prevent myself from throwing this one in the trash after one viewing
GREAT MOVIE!...but... I am writing neither to critique the movie nor to eplore the quality of the video or audio. I would simply like to warn potential buyers of the manufacturer defects that I have enconter with TWO copies of this DVD.The first copy was scratched so severly it looked like a fat guy attempted to use it to ski down slopes of rough pavement. So Amazon promptly shipped out another. The second copy didn't have a scratch but the movie hung up in the EXACT same place as the first. ANNOYING! I am currently waiting on another copy, but if it's bad I'm giving up.*IMPORTANT* Consumers, take my review very seriously because I suspect these other reviewers have no experience with the DVD, they're just fans of the film. And what an awesome film it is
The *ahem*...LESSER Farrelly film. Ok, check it out, there's two Jack Blacks. One is the guy from Tenacious D, you see him all the time. He's funny and childish and insane. Then there's the other Jack Black. He's the evil creature who pervades films like Shallow Hal and King Kong, whose only humorous lines are the ones that are funny by accident. Well, as long as you aren't fat and don't feel patronized by Gweneth presuming to know what it's like not to be desired all her life (ha), then by all means suspend all disbelief, logic, and brain power and watch this dumb movie. Gweneth's fat suit is actually pretty convincing, although most of the movie she's played by an actual fat chick...who by the way should have just been left in, without the whole "ha ha the dude thinks she's skinny" nonsense. Obviously, a film about a dude trying to cope with dating a big girl would have a lot more resonance if:a) He weren't brainwashedb) His fat girlfriend wasn't replaced by a twiggy blond chickc) The movie didn't throw ridiculous concepts your way (like a guy could have sex with a 300 lb woman without realizing it)d) Tony Robbins was in no way involved whatsoeverI knew I was slumming it when I saw this movie.  But I'm not sure what the message of this film is.  Jack Black's character is decent, considerate, great with kids and perfect in every way.  Oh, except he's really shallow for no dicernable reason, other than his dad's dying words were for him to go out and chase tail.  The weird part is that Hal's not a bad person.  The movie beats you over the head showing you he's the nicest guy on on the face of the Earth, so you can't really laugh at him looking like an idiot.  Rosemary is so fat she has superpowers.  Her butt actually creates typhoons (I wonder if that has military applications?).  Suddenly, Hal mistakes ugly pimply girls for supermodels and evil skanks for old shrews.  Tony Robbins brainwashed him, the fiend! When Hal finally realizes this he decides to (ooh big spoiler) love Rosemary anyway, and learns a VALUBLE LESSON.  Along the way there are a ton of cliches like people thinking he's dating Rosemary just because her dad happens to be his boss, and a sexy neighbor in his building who starts to get the hots for him when she sees how non-judgemental he is dating a fat girl ('cause that would make any woman melt).  Of course there's requisite best friend, played by Jason Alexander, who is repulsed by fat people and plots to get Hal to dump her.  Then again, the friend is a complete troll, so I don't know why Hal would want him around.  And to insult us further, they force some burned kids on us at the hospital to strike a SERIOUS note about how true beauty is on the inside. Too...many...public...service...messages! PICK...ONE..!!But brain-dead writing aside, Paltrow really sells her performance when they actually show her in the fat suit (despite Gweneth's postering when this film was first released). Regardless of its clumsy benevolence, I have to rate this as a romantic comedy. And for that, I give it a rating of totally unremarkable. Nice gesture, Farelly brothers. Not to be bothered with
You'll Never Get Rich. This is not one of Fred's better efforts,  the dancing is so so and Rita Hayworth is among his poorest dance partners.  Lacks the glamor and sex appeal of the Astaire/Rogers films.  In spite of these shortcomings the film is worth watching
I wanted to love this . . . This dark mystery wrapped around a school-days farce could have been a really great movie in somebody else's hands, but this director really dropped the ball.  The characters are mostly drawn in such raging generalities that you can pretty much recite the lines before they actors say them.  I wonder if those casting the film have ever met a college student.  They had the varieties right, but the ages were goofy.  The obnoxious film student looked 40, the dream girl model looked more like the hero's big sister than his girlfriend.  The story, on the other hand is interesting in an art-house kind of way but there is so, so much wrong!  Even in the capable hands of Jim Broadbent, the villian of the piece is underdrawn.    Like "A Day Without Mexicans," this was a terrific idea that just didn't wash.  I wish somebody more capable would make it agai
Not Good. This is obviously an unauthorised film. A couple of English people with a handycam with nothing new to say
Ive seen better ghosts movies then this. This film is just like the The Sixth Sense film.  Both films have the same borring plot.THE BORRING PLOT.In the two movies they have 2 boys who can see and speak to ghosts and in the 2 movies there are 2 teenagers girls who are ghosts who want help and showing the boy and man the people who had kill them.  After the boy and the man shows and tells other people who has killed the 2 teenagers, the two teenager girls ghosts are happy and they are at pease at last.The Sixth Sense and this film is deserve to be seen only one time and after that you dont want to see again.If you are like me and love ghosts who are bad and evil and kills people, you will love 13 Ghosts.  That film is what I called a good ghost film
Why waste the cash. This is a poor excuse of a movie. The actors are less than right for these rolls. I will be selling this movie used if anyone wants to waste the cash...
It's no warning, it's Predictable!. When I saw the movie, it was so predictable. Halfway into it, the broadcasts were so lame as well as the so-called live-footage. Total rip-off of "War of the Worlds." Reminded meof an NBC-TV movie from the early 80's called, "Special Bulletin." Much better with it's live-broadcasts! The onlything i liked about this movie, when I switched back to catch it's climax ending. They never even saw their ever-ending doom.Sure put's the military in it's place!
The Passion of Ayn Rand's Haters. I was skeptical from the beginning about this movie seeing as how it was based on the ridiculous book by Barbara Branden and I must say, all my worst fears were confirmed when I viewed the movie. It could not have been worse than if it was written, produced and directed by someone who detested Rand, but then again it was. The movie portrays Rand as some kind of mind manipulator that preys on the weak and crushes them to be devoured. Rand was the most intelligent thinker of the twentieth century and her ideas challenged two thousand years of religious and cultural beliefs. The individuals involved in this movie should be ashamed of themselves. Rand and the rest of us deserve better than this. This movie is on a level of depravity I can't even describe.
Branagh's Frankenstein. Having taught the book for some years and having admired Branagh's talents as well, I was excited to see what he did with the book.  His acting talents are remarkable, again; the sets are exceptional; the liberties taken deplorable.  He ruined it.  Killing Elizabeth to make the monster lady is laughable.  The end of Justine is pointless.  Deniro does not capture the integrity or depth of the monster.  Minimal script that truncates and eviscerates. Horribly disappointed, especially by the maudlin sentimental ending...bathos supreme.  Frankly, disgusted.  Kenneth, what are you doing
not a good image. based on the novel with the same title by jean de berg. i am sorry: everything is unconvincing, the setting in paris, the actors (except perhaps for claire), the sadomasochistic relationship between the two women and between the two women and the man. this is in part due to the fact that this is an american movie which strictly follows american codes; there is no hint of the real paris and parisians.
We all hated this film. I bought this DVD because a friend said it was one of the funniest films he had ever seen. We're still friends, but I'll never listen to one of his reviews again--our taste must not be compatible.My wife, daughter, and I seldom agree on anything but we unanimously consider this the worst movie we've ever seen. It's the only movie I've ever turned off before the end.On the plus side, watching most of this film has given me a new perspective on cinema. I used to think I knew bad movies. Now I know that most movies are at least pretty good, and it's only a very few that are truly bad. This is one of those very few bad films.Best in Show belongs to a genre of "comedies" that I find boring at best, but often cruel and mean. Other films of this type are "Waiting for Guffman", "Bottle Rocket", etc. If you enjoy watching pathetic people struggle then perhaps you'll appreciate this movie
Easy Come Easy Go should be for boats fans. If you got Elvis Presley and Dodie Marshall and put them in the same film you will have Easy Come Easy Go, an Elvis Presley that people who like boats or sailing or both will love. But anybody that hates boats or sailing and is an Elvis Presley fan will be un-happy. And Elvis' leading lady in this film is Dodie Marshall which I guess is a re-make of a film with the same name came out in 1947. And this is one of final films that Elvis sings the same song with somebody else, and the song is Yoga Is As Yoga Goes. He sings that with Elsa Lanchester who plays a not very nice yoga teacher. If you are an Elvis Presley fan, then buy or rent Jailhouse Rock on video or dvd
